18021577
Evaluation of diagnostic tests when there is no gold standard. A review of methods. 
OBJECTIVE: To generate a classification of methods to evaluate medical tests when there is no gold standard. METHODS: Multiple search strategies were employed to obtain an overview of the different methods described in the literature, including searches of electronic databases, contacting experts for papers in personal archives, exploring databases from previous methodological projects and cross-checking of reference lists of useful papers already identified. RESULTS: All methods available were classified into four main groups. The first method group, impute or adjust for missing data on reference standard, needs careful attention to the pattern and fraction of missing values. The second group, correct imperfect reference standard, can be useful if there is reliable information about the degree of imperfection of the reference standard and about the correlation of the errors between the index test and the reference standard. The third group of methods, construct reference standard, have in common that they combine multiple test results to construct a reference standard outcome including deterministic predefined rules, consensus procedures and statistical modelling (latent class analysis). In the final group, validate index test results, the diagnostic test accuracy paradigm is abandoned and research examines, using a number of different methods, whether the results of an index test are meaningful in practice, for example by relating index test results to relevant other clinical characteristics and future clinical events. CONCLUSIONS: The majority of methods try to impute, adjust or construct a reference standard in an effort to obtain the familiar diagnostic accuracy statistics, such as sensitivity and specificity. In situations that deviate only marginally from the classical diagnostic accuracy paradigm, these are valuable methods. However, in situations where an acceptable reference standard does not exist, applying the concept of clinical test validation can provide a significant methodological advance. All methods summarised in this report need further development. Some methods, such as the construction of a reference standard using panel consensus methods and validation of tests outwith the accuracy paradigm, are particularly promising but are lacking in methodological research. These methods deserve particular attention in future research. 

12018411
Comparison of two timed artificial insemination (TAI) protocols for management of first insemination postpartum. 
Two estrus-synchronization programs were compared and factors influencing their success over a year were evaluated. All cows received a setup injection of PGF2alpha at 39 +/- 3 d postpartum. Fourteen days later they received GnRH, followed in 7 d by a second injection of PGF2alpha. Cows (n = 523) assigned to treatment 1 (modified targeted breeding) were inseminated based on visual signs of estrus at 24, 48, or 72 h after the second PGF2alpha injection. Any cow not observed in estrus was inseminated at 72 h. Cows (n = 440) assigned to treatment 2 received a second GnRH injection 48 h after the second PGF2alpha, and all were inseminated 24 h later. Treatment, season of calving, multiple birth, estrual status at insemination, number of occurrences of estrus before second PGF2alpha, prophylactic use of PGF2alpha, retained fetal membranes, and occurrence of estrus following the setup PGF2alpha influenced success. Conception rate was 31.2% (treatment 1) and 29.1% (treatment 2). A significant interaction occurred between protocol and estrual status at insemination. Cows in estrus at insemination had a 45.8% (treatment 1) or 35.4% (treatment 2) conception rate. The conception rate for cows not expressing estrus at insemination was 19.2% (treatment 1) and 27.7% (treatment 2). Provided good estrous detection exists, modified targeted breeding can be as successful as other timed artificial insemination programs. Nutritional, environmental, and management strategies to reduce postpartum disorders and to minimize the duration of postpartum anestrus are critical if synchronization schemes are used to program first insemination after the voluntary waiting period. 

12477674
Oxygen in air (FiO2 0.4) improves gas exchange in young healthy patients during general anesthesia. 
PURPOSE: One hundred percent O(2) is used routinely for preoxygenation and induction of anesthesia. The higher the O(2) concentration the faster is the development of atelectasis, an important cause of impaired pulmonary gas exchange during general anesthesia (GA). We evaluated the effect of ventilation with 0.4 FiO(2) in air, 0.4 FiO(2) in N(2)O and 100% O(2) following intubation on the development of impaired gas exchange. METHODS: Twenty-seven patients aged 18-40 yr, undergoing elective laparoscopic cholecystectomy were administered 100% O(2) for preoxygenation (three minutes) and ventilation by mask (two minutes). Following intubation these patients were randomly divided into three groups of nine each and ventilated either with 0.4 FiO(2) in air, 0.4 FiO(2) in N(2)O or 100% O(2). Arterial blood gases were obtained before preoxygenation and 30 min following intubation for PaO(2) analysis. Subsequently PaO(2)/FiO(2) ratios were calculated. Results were analyzed with Student's t test and one-way ANOVA. P value of < or = 0.05 was considered significant. RESULTS: Ventilation of the lungs with O(2) in air (FiO(2) 0.4) significantly improved the PaO(2)/FiO(2) ratio from baseline, while 0.4 FiO(2) in N(2)O or 100% O(2) worsened the ratio (558 +/- 47 vs 472 +/- 28, 365 +/- 34 vs 472 +/- 22 and 351 +/- 23 vs 477 +/- 28 respectively; P < 0.05). CONCLUSION: Ventilation of lungs with O(2) in air (FiO(2) 0.4) improves gas exchange in young healthy patients during GA. 

3533522
Characterization of rabbit uterine estrogen receptor proteins by radioiodination and partial peptide mapping. 
Two estrogen binding proteins (Mr = 50,000 and 65,000) were purified from rabbit uterine cytosol using an improved procedure for affinity chromatography on diethylstilbestrol-agarose. The estrogen receptors were radioiodinated while adsorbed to the resin using the lactoperoxidase or Bolton-Hunter techniques. After elution, the labeled receptors were utilized for peptide mapping studies and investigations of receptor function. Partial peptide mapping revealed strong homology between the Mr 50,000 and 65,000 proteins suggesting common structural features. Estrogen receptors labeled by the lactoperoxidase procedure were rendered unable to bind immobilized heparin or hormone; in contrast, the Bolton-Hunter labeling technique yields proteins that retain both their ability to bind hormone and to absorb on heparin-agarose. The development of these iodination methodologies appears useful for the investigation of both the structure and functional properties of the receptor proteins. 

1297115
Structure-activity relationship studies of CNS agents. Part VII. The effect of the imidazole fragment in 2-substituted 1-[3-(4-aryl-1-piperazinyl)propyl]imidazoles on their interaction modes with 5-HT1A and 5-HT2 receptors. 
The synthesis and the 5-HT1A and 5-HT2 receptor affinity of 2-substituted 1-[3-(4-aryl-1-piperazinyl)propyl]-imidazoles (1-8) has been described. It has been shown that both the N-3 imidazole atom and the N-1 piperazine one should be considered as possible protonation centers under physiological conditions. It has been found that the folded conformations of 1-8 exist predominantly in solution. Moreover, three different modes of interaction of the analyzed compounds with 5-HT1A and 5-HT2 receptor sites have been proposed. 

10542352
Texture analysis of spinal cord pathology in multiple sclerosis. 
Texture analysis was applied to MR images of the spinal cord in an attempt to quantify pathological changes that occur in multiple sclerosis (MS). Texture features quantify macroscopic lesions and also the microscopic abnormalities that may be undetectable using conventional measures of lesion volume and number. Significant differences in texture between normal controls and MS patients were seen. Texture differences were detected between normal controls and relapsing-remitting patients before detectable spinal cord atrophy. There was also significant correlation between texture and disability. The segmentation and texture analysis technique demonstrates intraobserver coefficients of variation ranging from 0. 6-8.2%. Texture analysis has potential as a tool for monitoring changes associated with the development of disability in patients with MS. Reproducibility and sensitivity must be improved to use the technique for serial monitoring in individuals. Magn Reson Med 42:929-935, 1999. 

6527761
5-Hydroxytryptamine uptake by blood platelets of unipolar and bipolar depressed patients. 
The active transport of 5-hydroxytryptamine (5HT) by blood platelets of unipolar and bipolar depressed patients was determined. The 5HT uptake by platelets of bipolar patients was determined in depressive, euthymic and manic states. The 5HT uptake was always followed by studying platelets of healthy individuals of the same sex and age. The results confirm the known fact that there is a decreased 5HT active transport in platelets of unipolar depressed patients. On the other hand, the amount of 5HT transported by platelets of bipolar depressed patients was higher than that observed in platelets of healthy individuals. In manic and euthymic bipolar patients the uptake was similar to their matched controls. 

7251592
The stabilization of proteins by sucrose. 
The interactions between proteins and solvent components have been investigated for the sucrose/water system. Thermodynamic and kinetic measurements of the thermal unfolding of alpha-chymotrypsin, chymotrypsinogen, and ribonuclease were performed as a function of sucrose concentration. The alteration in protein-solvent interactions in the presence of sucrose was also studied by density measurements and analyzed by multicomponent thermodynamic theory. Sucrose does not induce a conformational change in three proteins studied, although it does induce a small change in the circular dichroism spectrum of ribonuclease. The enthalpy of thermal unfolding shows little dependence on the concentration of sucrose, while the apparent activation energy of the unfolding process is increased by the addition of sucrose. The results from the protein-solvent interaction study indicate that sucrose is preferentially excluded from the protein domain, increasing the free energy of the system. Thermodynamically this leads to protein stabilization since the unfolded state of the protein becomes thermodynamically even less favorable in the presence of sucrose. The exclusion of sucrose from the protein domain seems to be related to the higher cohesive force of the sucrose water solvent system since all the experimental observations can be correlated with the effect of sucrose on the surface tension of water. 

2187306
[The use of echo- and scintigraphic study of the biliary system in chronic cholecystitis] 
Data are reported of a study of the functional state of the biliary in 50 patients with chronic cholecystitis by means of complex employment of dynamic echo- and cholecystography and dynamic computerized gamma-hepatobilioscintigraphy. It was found that dynamic echo- and cholecystography proved highly efficient indicating that ultrasound tomography is of importance not only the diagnosis of structural but also functional disorders in cholecystitis, for the choice of optimal tactics and evaluation of the efficacy of therapeutic measures excluding radiation treatment. 

12179567
Sexual Offences Act 1993 [20 July 1993]. 
This Act provides as follows: "1) The presumption of criminal law is that a boy under the age of 14 is incapable of sexual intercourse (whether natural or unnatural) is hereby abolished." The Act comes into force on 20 September 1993. It applies to England and Wales, but not the rest of the United Kingdom, and does not cover acts carried out before the Act comes into force. 

8218624
Comparative measures of systolic ejection during treadmill exercise by impedance cardiography and Doppler echocardiography. 
Measurements of systolic ejection dynamics by impedance cardiography were compared with simultaneous Doppler echocardiography in normal subjects and coronary artery disease patients. Patients with chest pain admitted for elective coronary angiography were monitored by simultaneous impedance cardiography and Doppler echocardiography before, during, and after treadmill exercise. Ensemble-averaged ECG, impedance cardiogram (ICG), the first derivative of ICG (dZ/dt), and Doppler waveforms were analyzed to identify systolic ejection variables. The timing of aortic valve opening was well correlated (r = 0.78) the timing of peak ejection velocity was very well correlated (r = 0.86), and the timing of aortic valve closure was moderately correlated (r = 0.69 and r = 0.73) in these subjects. The thoracic electrical impedance acceleration and normalized impedance acceleration indices were moderately correlated with Doppler model acceleration (r = 0.74, r = 0.79). The impedance cardiogram waveforms are of complex origin and are related to both aortic blood velocity and aortic blood acceleration. Users of dZ/dt timing features for determining aortic valvular events might consider alternative impedance features to improve ejection time accuracy. 

8774329
Family planning requirements in the adult congenital heart disease clinic. 
OBJECTIVE: To determine whether women with congenital heart disease were receiving appropriate advice on contraception. SETTING: Adult congenital heart disease clinic in a tertiary cardiac referral centre. DESIGN: Questionnaire administered to 35 consecutive female patients attending the adult congenital clinic. The cardiologist assessed what the risk would be if each patient used an oestrogen containing contraceptive pill (OCP). RESULTS: Of the 33 patients admitted to the study 6 patients thought their heart condition precluded them from taking an OCP when in fact it did not and 3 incorrectly said that an OCP would be suitable for them. Three women with relatively minor lesions had been incorrectly denied the OCP and 2 further patients were using inappropriate methods. There had been 6 unwanted pregnancies in the total group. CONCLUSIONS: Many women with congenital heart disease do not know the most appropriate method of contraception for them or have received incorrect advice. It is often patients with less severe lesions who receive the most inappropriate advice. It is clear that the family planning needs of this population are currently poorly catered for. Each unit must ensure that the information necessary in making informed decisions on contraception is available to the doctor advising on family planning. 

9038546
Intrahepatic segment III cholangiojejunostomy in advanced carcinoma of the gallbladder. 
The majority of patients with advanced carcinoma of the gallbladder have irresectable disease and require palliation for jaundice, pruritus and cholangitis. Intrahepatic segment III cholangiojejunostomy has been described for palliation of high biliary obstruction in these patients. Forty-one patients with stage IV gallbladder cancer underwent intrahepatic segment III cholangiojejunostomy. Subsequent jaundice, pruritus and cholangitis were documented; liver function tests and isotope hepatobiliary scans were performed. All patients had jaundice, 29 had pruritus and 12 had cholangitis. Postoperative complications included anastomotic leak in six patients and wound infection in six. Five patients died within 30 days of operation. Thirty-two patients were available for follow-up. The procedure failed to relieve jaundice, pruritus or cholangitis in four patients; 18 were free of jaundice, pruritus and cholangitis until death or last follow-up, and ten had recurrent jaundice or cholangitis. Isotope scanning was found to be useful to predict success of the procedure. Intrahepatic segment III cholangiojejunostomy provided excellent palliation from jaundice, pruritus and cholangitis with acceptable mortality and morbidity rates in patients with advanced carcinoma of the gallbladder. 

11339283
Validated gas chromatographic-mass spectrometric assay for determination of the antifreezes ethylene glycol and diethylene glycol in human plasma after microwave-assisted pivalylation. 
A gas chromatographic-mass spectrometric assay is described for identification and quantification of the antifreezes ethylene glycol (EG) and diethylene glycol (DEG) in plasma for early diagnosis of a glycol intoxication. After addition of 1,3-propanediol as internal standard, the plasma sample was deproteinized by acetone and an aliquot of the supernatant was evaporated followed by microwave-assisted pivalylation. After gas chromatographic separation, the glycols were first identified by comparison of the full mass spectra with reference spectra and then quantified. The quantification has been validated according to the criteria established by the Journal of Chromatography B. The assay was found to be selective. The calibration curves for EG and DEG were linear from 0.1 g/l to 1.0 g/l. The limit of detection for EG and DEG was 0.01 g/l and the limit of quantification for both was 0.1 g/l. The absolute recoveries were 50 and 65% for the low quality control samples and 51 and 73% for the high quality control samples of EG and DEG, respectively. Intra- and inter-day accuracy and precision were inside the required limits. The glycols in frozen plasma samples were stable for more than 6 months. The method was successfully applied to several authentic plasma samples from patients intoxicated with glycols. It has also been suitable for analysis of EG and DEG in urine. 

8173845
Elevated serum levels of TNF soluble receptors in patients with positive anti-neutrophil cytoplasmic antibodies. 
ANCA are found in various systemic vasculitis and are supposed to play a role in the pathogenesis of the disease, in co-operation with other factors such as cytokines. A total of 36 ANCA-positive and 10 ANCA-negative serum samples were analysed for the presence of TNF soluble receptors (TNF-sR), which are shed from the surface of activated cells and may act as TNF inhibitors. Of the ANCA-positive samples, 67% had elevated TNF-sR75 and 72% had elevated TNF-sR55 compared to ANCA-negative specimens (mean [S.E.] 18.7 [17.3] vs 3.6 [1.5] and 10.5 [9.7] vs 1.9 [0.7] ng/ml, P < 0.01). Elevation of TNF-sR in patients with ANCA suggests that cytokines and their inhibitors are involved in the pathogenesis of ANCA-associated autoimmune diseases. 

10399855
Clinical applications of gas chromatography and gas chromatography-mass spectrometry of steroids. 
This review article underlines the importance of gas chromatography-mass spectrometry (GC-MS) for determination of steroids in man. The use of steroids labelled with stable isotopes as internal standard and subsequent analysis by GC-MS yields up to now the only reliable measurement of steroids in serum. Isotope dilution GC-MS is the reference method for evaluation of routine analysis of serum steroid hormones. GC-MS is an important tool for detection of steroid hormone doping and combined with a combustion furnace and an isotope ratio mass spectrometer the misuse of testosterone by athletes can be discovered. Finally the so called urinary steroid profile by GC and GC-MS is the method of choice for detection of steroid metabolites in health and disease. 

1710737
The role of target word stress in auditory comprehension by aphasic listeners. 
The present investigation was designed to determine the influence of stressed word prosody on auditory comprehension by listeners with aphasia. Paragraph-length narratives were computer-edited to yield two conditions. In one condition, both the target words and the surrounding context were prosodically neutral; in the second condition, target words were stressed and the surrounding contexts were prosodically neutral. The paragraph-length stimuli were presented to 10 aphasic listeners and their comprehension was tested. Analysis revealed that prosodic information carried only by stressed target words, within paragraph-length stimuli, did not provide significant comprehension benefits to aphasic listeners. The comprehension improvement typically observed when paragraph-length narratives are stressed is, therefore, most likely due to prosodic cues that precede stress-bearing target words. 

915431
Quantitative morphological analysis of early mouse embryogenesis in vitro. I. Perfusion culture system, tissue preparation, sampling. 
To facilitate a quantitative morphological analysis of early mouse development under controlled conditions, a perfusion culture system capable of supporting embryogenesis to blastocyst stage has been developed. The use of a mesh system allows identification of individual embryos by position, and control of their orientation during culture and preparation for light and electron microscopy. Quantitative evaluation of tissue-processing procedures has permitted selection of conditions which reduce changes in linear dimensions to -1-6 +/- 1-8% in two-cell embryos. Through the definition of a coordinate system based on mesh structure and the development of a special sectioning procedure, sections can be localized within the intact embryo and three-dimensional coordinates given to any element of embryo volume. 

11270694
Spatial aspects of ventricular repolarization in postinfarction patients. 
QT dispersion has been proposed to reflect the heterogeneity of ventricular repolarization, but a poor reproducibility limits its clinical usefulness. Spatial vectorcardiographic descriptors constitute a novel approach to quantify ventricular repolarization. To test the ability of vectorcardiographic descriptors to discriminate among different subsets of postinfarction patients, 50 consecutively recruited patients with acute MI, 50 patients with history of an old (> 6 months) MI, and 50 healthy controls were evaluated. The maximum and minimum QT and JT intervals and QT and JT dispersion were manually measured from a digitally recorded 12-lead ECG. X, Y, and Z leads were reconstructed from the 12-lead ECG. The amplitude of the maximum spatial T vector (spatial T amplitude), the angle between the maximum spatial QRS and T vectors (spatial QRS-T angle), and the frontal plane QRS-T angle were automatically calculated. The spatial T amplitude and the spatial QRS-T angle did not differ between patients with a recent and those with an old MI (P = 1). QT dispersion was significantly lower in patients with an old MI than in patients with a recent one (P = 0.002). The spatial repolarization descriptors showed better short-term reproducibility than the dispersion indices. In conclusion, the spatial T amplitude and the spatial QRS-T angle are accurate measures of ventricular repolarization that do not differ between patients with recent and those with old MI. The different QT dispersion values observed in this study between the two post-MI groups should be considered cautiously because of the low accuracy of the manual measurements. 

8298433
Thermal behaviour of the rabbit sublingual gland. 
The purpose of this study was to show how some aspects of the biological matrix water can be investigated by thermoanalytical methods when using thermogravimetry and differential scanning calorimetry. Such methods allow to investigate the water in the rabbit sublingual gland and to quantitate it. The results supported the view that the water contained in this secretory organ show a large number of energetic interactions established on the basis of differential steps of water release by thermal disruption. 

7922363
Prostaglandin synthase. At the heart of the matter. 
The structure of prostaglandin synthase, the target of aspirin therapy in cardiovascular disease, reveals a remarkable integration of the enzyme's catalytic and membrane-binding properties. 

9054661
The significance of human monocyte thrombomodulin during membrane vesiculation and after stimulation by lipopolysaccharide. 
Thrombomodulin acts as an essential membrane cofactor of thrombin in the triggering of the natural anticoagulant protein C pathway responsible for the inactivation of procoagulant cofactors VIIIa and Va. Because monocytes play a critical role in the coupling between infection/inflammation and thrombosis, the fate of monocyte thrombomodulin was assessed at the cell plasma membrane and on derived microparticles. A significant basal level of thrombomodulin activity was measured on unstimulated monocytes and microparticles. Lipopolysaccharide treatment resulted in increased thrombomodulin activity on monocytes (approximately 40%) and microparticles (approximately 80%), whereas tissue factor and prothrombinase activities were strongly expressed on both. Flow cytometry detection of thrombomodulin antigen confirmed its presence on unstimulated monocytes and microparticles. A decrease (approximately 30%) in thrombomodulin labelling was noticed on stimulated monocytes. Labelling of microparticles shed from stimulated and unstimulated monocytes remained unchanged, only an increased proportion of microparticles (approximately 20%) was observed. The absence of early down-regulation of thrombomodulin following monocyte stimulation suggests that it fulfils an important regulatory function of membrane-associated procoagulant activities. This would be of particular significance at the surface of microparticles having the ability to diffuse and concentrate by adherence at inflammatory sites. 

14560487
Histological analysis of the Ankylos peri-implant soft tissues in a dog model. 
PURPOSE: The importance of the soft tissue-implant interface is enhanced by the presence of a microgap between the implant and the abutment, which represents a contamination site for bacteria. The aim of this study was to investigate the interface between the Ankylos gap-free implant system and the surrounding soft tissues in a dog model. MATERIALS AND METHODS: Six Labrador dogs were included in the study and two Ankylos implants were inserted per dog. The dogs were killed 6 months after abutment placement without functional loading and without plaque control. The implants were analysed histologically by scanning electron microscopy, light microscopy, and histomorphometry. RESULTS: Some sections exhibited histologic signs of a mild inflammation. The connective tissue between the most apical epithelial cells of the junctional epithelium and the alveolar crest was characterized by collagen fibers running from the periosteum and the alveolar crest toward the oral epithelium and, in front of the cone-shaped abutment, by a narrow zone of extracellular matrix with a few collagen fibers. CONCLUSION: Compared with results obtained in other studies using different types of implant (Astra, Branemark, ITI), the Ankylos implant showed a higher length and a larger width of connective tissue contact as well as a shorter epithelial downgrowth. The absence of a microgap in the Ankylos system could explain the histologic mild inflammation in the connective tissue. 

11773475
Segmental infarction with graft dysfunction: an emerging syndrome in renal transplantation? 
BACKGROUND: Segmental allograft infarction is a poorly characterized complication following renal transplantation. The present study was undertaken with the goal of defining the incidence, clinical characteristics, pathogenesis, and prognosis of this entity. METHODS: A retrospective study was performed, reviewing the renal scans performed on all renal transplant recipients at our institution, from January 1997 to January 2000. Segmental infarction was diagnosed on the basis of a significant elevation in lactate dehydrogenase (>500 U/l) together with a photopenic perfusion defect. In these patients, graft characteristics, operative details, clinical course, and long-term outcomes were evaluated. RESULTS: Segmental infarction was identified in 13 of 277 consecutive renal transplant recipients (4.7%). In nine recipients the onset of infarction occurred within 24 h after transplantation. All received marginal grafts, and in five recipients the transplant operation was complicated by major blood loss. Eight of these recipients exhibited primary non-function, or developed dialysis-dependent renal failure after the onset of infarction. In four patients, the onset of infarction occurred after 24 h (35 h to 10 days). One recipient demonstrated primary non-function, and renal function deteriorated after the onset of infarction in the remaining three. Overall, long-term graft function was impaired. Two allografts never functioned, and six recipients had nadir creatinine clearances below 60 ml/min. CONCLUSIONS: The pathogenesis of segmental infarction appears to be multi-factorial, reflecting the combination of an initiating anatomic lesion and potentiating thrombogenic milieu. Segmental infarction typically occurs in the early postoperative period, and prompt diagnosis is difficult to obtain. In view of this, prophylactic heparin may be warranted for those at highest risk. There was no correlation between the infarct area and the graft function, and the long-term graft function is compromised out of proportion to the extent of parenchymal loss. This finding highlights the role of predisposing factors, particularly marginal graft quality, in determining the functional outcome. Segmental infarction may be more frequently encountered as cadaveric organ shortages encourage greater use of marginal donor kidneys. 

16781687
Taurine attenuates D-[3H]aspartate release evoked by depolarization in ischemic corticostriatal slices. 
Taurine is thought to be protective in ischemia due to its neuroinhibitory effects. The present aim was to assess the ability of taurine to attenuate glutamate release evoked by ischemia and to determine which component of this release is affected. The release of preloaded D-[(3)H]aspartate (a non-metabolized analog of glutamate) from superfused murine corticostriatal slices was used as index of glutamate release. Preincubation of corticostriatal slices with 10 mM taurine reduced the D-[(3)H]aspartate release evoked by either chemical ischemia (0.5 mM NaCN in glucose-free medium) or oxygen-glucose deprivation. The taurine uptake inhibitor guanidinoethanesulfonate (5 mM), the glycine receptor antagonist strychnine (0.1 mM) and the GABA(A) receptor antagonist bicuculline (0.1 mM) did not block the taurine effect. To determine which component of ischemia-induced glutamate release is affected by taurine, three pathways of this release were pharmacologically modeled. Unlabeled D-aspartate (0.5 mM) and hypo-osmotic medium (NaCl reduced by 50 mM) evoked D-[(3)H]aspartate release via homoexchange and hypo-osmotic release pathways, respectively. Taurine did not influence these pathways. However, it suppressed the synaptic release of D-[(3)H]aspartate evoked by the voltage-gated sodium channel opener veratridine (0.1 mM). Taurine thus reduces glutamate release under ischemic conditions by affecting the depolarization-evoked component. 

9242658
Ca2+ binding to the first epidermal growth factor-like domain of factor VIIa increases amidolytic activity and tissue factor affinity. 
Coagulation factor VIIa belongs to a family of homologous enzymes, including factors IXa and Xa and activated protein C, composed of two epidermal growth factor-like domains located between an N-terminal domain rich in gamma-carboxyglutamic acid residues and a C-terminal serine protease domain. The first epidermal growth factor-like domain in factor VIIa contains a Ca2+ binding site, the function of which is largely unknown. Site-directed mutagenesis of two Ca2+-liganding Asp residues in this domain abolished Ca2+ binding and resulted in a 2-3-fold decrease in amidolytic activity at optimal Ca2+ concentrations. The lower amidolytic activity persisted in complex with soluble tissue factor, apparently due to a lower kcat of the mutant factor VIIa. Mutant and wild-type factor VIIa bound to lipidated tissue factor were equally efficient activators of factor X. The dissociation constants, derived from amidolytic activity and surface plasmon resonance measurements, were 2-5 nM and 50-60 nM for the interactions between wild-type and mutant factor VIIa, respectively, and soluble tissue factor. Binding to lipidated tissue factor was characterized by dissociation constants of 7.5 pM for factor VIIa and 160 pM for the factor VIIa mutant. Hence, a functional Ca2+ binding site in the first epidermal growth factor-like domain added 7-8 kJ/mol to the total binding energy of the interaction with both lipidated and soluble tissue factor. 

3216031
Alteration of pentoxifylline pharmacokinetics by cimetidine. 
Pentoxifylline, recently approved for the treatment of intermittent claudication, is hepatically cleared with a high degree of first-pass metabolism. Subsequently, the effect of cimetidine on pentoxifylline pharmacokinetics was studied in humans. Ten healthy subjects received, in random cross-over fashion, pentoxifylline 400 mg as a controlled-release tablet every 8 hours with and without cimetidine 300 mg four times a day for 7 days. Pentoxifylline and metabolite plasma concentrations over one dosing interval were measured on day 7 of each phase. The unavailability of an immediate-release pentoxifylline dosage form prevented a single dose trial. Cimetidine significantly increased (P less than .05) pentoxifylline area under the curve at steady state 26.2% from 675 +/- 97 (mean +/- SEM) to 852 +/- 108 ng. hr/mL. The average steady-state plasma concentration increased 27.4% from 84 +/- 12 to 107 +/- 14 ng/mL (P less than .05). Apparent oral clearance decreased 21.5% from 1309 +/- 304 to 1027 +/- 244 mL/min (P less than .02). Significant alterations in pentoxifylline metabolite concentrations were also observed. The results of this trial suggest cimetidine elevates pentoxifylline plasma concentrations, presumably by decreasing apparent oral clearance, although a reduction in total body clearance or an increase in gastric absorption could not be ruled out. 

8848745
Comparison of inversion recovery fast spin-echo (FSE) with T2-weighted fat-saturated FSE and T1-weighted MR imaging in bone marrow lesion detection. 
OBJECTIVE. To prospectively compare inversion recovery (IR) fast spin-echo (FSE) with T1-weighted spin-echo (SE) and T2-weighted chemical-shift fat-saturated (FS) FSE magnetic resonance sequences in the detection of bone marrow abnormality. DESIGN. Twenty-nine sets of T1-weighted SE [400-640/10-20 (TR/TE)], T2-weighted FS-FSE [2400-3800/91-112/8 (TR/TE/ETL), and IR-FSE [3700-6000/12-14/170/8 (TR/TE/T1/ETL)] images were acquired with a 1.5-T magnet in 27 patients with bone marrow lesions. The visibility, margination, and extent of 41 lesions, image quality, contrast, and artifacts were qualitatively and quantitatively compared. RESULTS. The lesions were more conspicuous on the IR-FSE than on the T1-weighted SE and T2-weighed FS-FSE images. The extent of lesions was similar for all three sequences. Image quality was better and there were fewer motion artifacts on the T1-weighted images. The mean lesion contrasted-to-noise ratio was significantly higher on the T1-weighted images (p < 0.05). CONCLUSION. The IR-FSE sequence is highly sensitive for detecting bone marrow pathology, with scan time comparable to the T1-weighted SE and T2-weighted FS-FSE sequences. 

8406022
Deletion of the beta-turn/alpha-helix motif at the exon 2/3 boundary of human c-Myc leads to the loss of its immortalizing function. 
The protein product (c-Myc) of the human c-myc proto-oncogene carries a beta-turn/alpha-helix motif at the exon2/exon3 boundary. The amino acid (aa) sequence and secondary structure of this motif are highly conserved among several nuclearly localized oncogene products, c-Myc, N-Myc, c-Fos, SV40 large T and adenovirus (Ad) Ela. Removal of this region from Ad E1a results in the loss of the transforming properties of the virus without destroying its known transregulatory functions. In order to analyse whether deletion of the above-mentioned region from c-Myc has a similar effect on its transformation activity, we constructed a deletion mutant (c-myc delta) lacking the respective aa at the exon2/exon3 boundary. In contrast to the c-myc wild-type gene product, constitutive expression of c-myc delta does not lead to the immortalization of primary mouse embryo fibroblast cells (MEF cells). This result indicates that c-Myc and Ad El a share a common domain which is involved in the transformation process by both oncogenes. 

12644592
The cannabinoid CB1 receptor antagonist SR141716 increases Acrp30 mRNA expression in adipose tissue of obese fa/fa rats and in cultured adipocyte cells. 
This study investigates the effects of SR141716, a selective CB(1) receptor antagonist that reduces food intake and body weight of rodents, on Acrp30 mRNA expression in adipose tissue. Acrp30, a plasma protein exclusively expressed and secreted by adipose tissue, has been shown to induce free fatty acid oxidation, hyperglycemia and hyperinsulinemia decrease, and body weight reduction. We report that N-(piperidin-1-yl)-5-(4-chlorophenyl)-1-(2,4-dichlorophenyl)-4-methyl-1H-pyrazole-3-carboximide hydrochloride (SR141716) treatment once daily (10 mg/kg/d, i.p.) from 2 to 14 days reduced body weight and stimulated Acrp30 mRNA expression in adipose tissue of obese Zucker (fa/fa) rats. In parallel, the hyperinsulinemia associated with this animal model was reduced by SR141716 treatment. In cultured mouse adipocytes (3T3 F442A), SR141716 (25 to 100 nM) also induced an overexpression of Acrp30 mRNA and protein. In addition, in adipose tissue of CB(1)-receptor knockout mice, SR141716 had no effect on Acrp30 mRNA expression, demonstrating a CB(1) receptor mediating effect. Furthermore, RT-PCR analysis revealed that rat adipose tissue and 3T3 F442A adipocytes expressed CB(1) receptor mRNA. Relative quantification of this expression revealed an up-regulation (3- to 4-fold) of CB(1) receptor mRNA expression in adipose tissue of obese (fa/fa) rats and in differentiated 3T3 F442A adipocytes compared with lean rats and undifferentiated adipocytes, respectively. Western blot analysis revealed the presence of CB(1) receptors in 3T3 F442A adipocytes, and their expression was up-regulated in differentiated cells. These results show that SR141716 stimulated Acrp30 mRNA expression in adipose tissue by an effect on adipocytes, and reduced hyperinsulinemia in obese (fa/fa) rats. These hormonal regulations may participate in the body weight reduction induced by SR141716 and suggest a role of metabolic regulation in the antiobesity effect of SR141716. 

10751578
Kappa opioid receptors in rat spinal cord vary across the estrous cycle. 
Kappa opioid receptors (KORs) were immunocytochemically localized in the lumbosacral spinal cord of female rats in different stages of the estrous cycle to examine the influence of hormonal status on receptor density. KOR labeling was primarily in fine processes and a few neuronal cell bodies in the superficial dorsal horn and the dorsolateral funiculus. Quantitative light microscopic densitometry of the superficial dorsal horn revealed that rats in diestrus had significantly lower KOR densities than those in proestrus or estrus. This suggests that female reproductive hormones regulate spinal KOR levels, which may contribute to variations in analgesic effectiveness of KOR agonists across the estrous cycle. 

2239238
Ultrastructural aspects of the human peripheral vestibular system. 
The sensory epithelia from the membranous labyrinths of 4 patients were examined by transmission electron microscopy. The distribution ratio of type 1 to type 2 cells was recorded, compared for each sensory area and correlated with age. An ultrastructural assessment confirmed generalized patterns consistent with autolytic and preparation artefact, viz. calyceal dilatation, cytoplasmic protrusions and some sensory hair loss. More specific features, i.e. lipofuscin accumulation, membrane-bound inclusions and neural degeneration were consistent with pre-mortem pathological change. In 2 patients, total nerve fibre counts of 15,766 and 19,741 were obtained. Total fibre counts correlated with the sensory cell density of the innervated areas. Differential counts of the superior and inferior vestibular nerves suggested that there was a reduced number of fibres in the superior division of both patients, in comparison with established normative data. Morphometric analysis of the constituent fibre diameters revealed a skewed distribution with a modal value of 6 microns for both patients. 

9163098
[The effect of spermatozoon morphology on the fertilization rate and on disorders in early embryonic development] 
The influence of teratozoospermia on the results of in vitro fertilization was analysed. Indices of normal sperm morphology, in cases of failed fertilization in vitro, significantly differ from those of successful fertilization. Fertilization rate in patients with less than 14.0% of normal sperm morphology was 41.9%. If the index of normal sperm morphology exceeded 14.0%, the rate of fertilization made up 62.2%. These data enable us to conclude that teratozoospermia may result in zygote development disorders and in the increased probability of embryo fragmentation. 

9592994
Mantle cell lymphoma with amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (motor neuron disease) 
We describe a previously unreported case of mantle cell lymphoma (MCL) associated to amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS) in a 63-year-old woman with a 1-year history of weakness of arm and leg muscles. The both molecular-genetic and flow cytometry analysis of lymphocytes of peripheral blood (PB) demonstrated leukemic phase of MCL. 

7288413
Biochemical composition of lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus interfering particles. 
Lymphocytic choriomeningitis (LCM) was interfering particles were enriched relative to infectious virions by ultracentrifugation in a shallow gradient made of Urografin. Electrophoretic analysis revealed that they lacked the small ('S') 23S RNA as well as GP-1 and GP-2 of the infectious virion and also lacked a newly characterized glycoprotein of apparent mol. wt. 85 x 10(3); instead, they contained a novel glycoprotein with mol. wt. 65 x 10(3). 

7766720
Quantitative analysis of fosinopril sodium by capillary zone electrophoresis and liquid chromatography. 
A capillary zone electrophoresis (CZE) method was developed for the quantitative analysis of fosinopril sodium. Validation parameters of the CZE method were evaluated and compared to an existing LC method. In terms of precision and sensitivity. LC performance was superior to that of the CZE method for this application. The CZE method achieved better selectivity for several degradants of interest within a much shorter analysis time than did the LC method. Effects of detection wavelength, applied voltage and buffer concentration on optimization of the CZE method are presented. Effects of diluent composition on capillary loading and peak behaviour are also discussed. 

2628654
International dimensions of the Department of Justice arguments in the Webster case. 
The brief presented by the Justice Department in support of the Attorney General of Missouri invoked a favorable image of European legislative responses to the practice of abortion in order to argue the appropriateness of locating legislative control at the state, rather than federal level. The foundations on which these arguments are based is fundamentally flawed. The brief omitted the fact that in all the countries that share a common culture with the US, and in fact the US as well, the trend has been a liberalization of abortion laws. A woman's access to abortion is better than in any other time in history. 5 issues are examined as part of the criticism of the Department's brief: national legislation in Western Europe must conform to the same minimum standards of respect for human rights and freedom; in order to protect women's reproductive health, many Western countries have liberalized their abortion laws and protected women's choices in a manner consistent with Roe v. Wade; restricting public facilitation of abortion is out of step with the practice of other Western Countries and endangers women's health; abortion laws in many western countries utilize frameworks comparable to the trimester-based approach of Roe v. Wade; and the decision in Roe v. Wade achieves necessary protection of woman's bodily integrity from the invasive implementation of mandatory governmental programs. Contrary to the assertion presented in the Department's brief, Western democracies do not entrust fundamental questions of reproductive freedom to the unfettered discretion of national legislatures. Quite to the contrary, the European Commission of Human Rights has found that legislative decisions regarding reproductive freedom fail to safeguard the liberty, health and welfare of women and violate international conventions, including the European Convention on Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms. 

3603106
Diagnosis of diseases of the lumbar spine: correlation of computerized tomography with myelography and clinical findings. 
Data from 339 patients referred for evaluation of suspected lumbar disease were studied retrospectively to correlate findings in the routine clinical evaluation with results of computed tomography and myelography. Clinical features from the patients' history that correlated with an abnormal CT and myelogram included age greater than or equal to 40, a history of previous surgery, and absence of a history of injury. Signs from the physical examination that correlated included reduced lumbar motion, a motor or sensory deficit, abnormal reflexes, and reduced capacity for straight leg-raising or walking. Using a clinical score incorporating these variables, we suggest a diagnostic strategy to promote more efficient and selective use of CT scans and myelograms. We project that the use of this diagnostic approach can reduce the number of myelograms ordered in a similar population by more than 50%. 

1791365
Accessory nerve injury: conservative or surgical treatment? 
In order to clarify the functional prognosis of accessory nerve injury after nerve repair and nonsurgical treatment, 27 of our cases with accessory nerve injury were studied. 20 cases were followed up for more than 8 months. In ten cases treated conservatively, the dull feeling and hypaesthesia did not improve. However, pain and dysfunction of the shoulder improved in half of these cases. In ten cases treated surgically, nerve suture was performed in two cases, nerve graft in five cases and neurolysis in three cases. In the surgically treated group, subjective complaints disappeared in all cases, but hypaesthesia or contracture of the shoulder persisted in three cases. Surgical treatment of the accessory nerve is recommended in fresh cases with complete paralysis and in cases in which there is no sign of nerve recovery within one year after the original injury. 

6314980
Comparison of whole blood dried on filter paper and serum for measurement of the temporal antibody response to avian infectious bronchitis virus by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. 
Two methods for collecting specimens for measuring sequential antibody activity of infectious bronchitis virus (IBV) were compared. Whole blood was collected on filter-paper strips, dried for 2 hr at 37 C, and then stored in plastic bags at 4 C or eluted overnight and tested immediately. Eluates of whole blood were paired with serum samples and tested for IBV antibody activity by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) at four weekly intervals. Both sampling methods yielded ELISA antibody levels that were detectable at 7 days postinfection (PI), peaked at 21 days PI, and then began to decline by 28 days PI. The paired samples showed no significant difference (P less than 0.05) between ELISA titers at any time tested. Whole blood dried on filter paper could be stored sealed in plastic bags at 4 C for at least 2 weeks with no appreciable loss of antibody titers. Virus-neutralizing antibodies, measured in serum only, were not detectable until 14 days PI but then continued to rise through 28 days PI. It was concluded that eluates of whole blood dried on filter paper may be used as an alternative to sera in ELISA for measuring IBV antibodies. 

1909778
Demonstration of an unstable variant of pyruvate dehydrogenase protein (E1) in cultured fibroblasts from a patient with congenital lactic acidemia. 
The deficiency of pyruvate dehydrogenase enzyme complex causes congenital lactic acidemia and devastating neurologic abnormalities in newborns and children. In the majority of cases, the basic defect appears to be in the pyruvate dehydrogenase (E1) component, which consists of two subunits, alpha and beta. Whereas some patients are deficient of a single subunit, in other patients both subunits of E1 are missing. To find out why two proteins were deficient, we investigated the cultured fibroblasts of a female patient who had missing E1-alpha and E1-beta protein bands on Western blot. Radiolabeling-immunoprecipitation studies with 35S-methionine revealed that patient fibroblasts synthesized normal sized precursor E1-alpha and E1-beta proteins, which were presumably transported into mitochondria and processed into normal sized mature proteins. However, pulse-chase analysis showed that alpha- and beta-proteins were degraded rapidly compared to normal. Our findings proved that alpha- and beta-subunits were synthesized and processed normally but failed to form a stable structure for incorporation into the pyruvate dehydrogenase complex. 

8085408
[Intracellular calcium homeostasis. Calmodulin and Ca(2+)-ATPase of the plasma membrane of Trypanosomatids] 
The intracellular Ca2+ concentration in all eukaryotic cells so far studied is 4 orders of magnitude lower than in the extracellular milieu. In trypanosomatids, the intracellular concentration of this cation is around 50 nM, even lower than in higher eukaryotics. This differential concentration is maintained by diverse transport systems at the plasma membrane level and at certain intracellular organelles. In the case of trypanosomatids it have been identified the presence of an electrophoretic uniporter at the internal membrane of the unique giant mitochondrion of these parasites, showing identical kinetics properties to the homologous system of higher eukaryotics. Thus, the low Ca2+ affinity of this system is not compatible with its putative function of maintaining intracellular Ca2+ at the submicromolar level. Contrary to previous reports, we have identified a Ca(2+)-ATPase in the plasma membrane of Leishmania braziliensis, Leishmania mexicana, Trypanosoma cruzi and Trypanosoma brucei. The enzyme possesses a high Ca2+ affinity (Km Ca2+ = 0.5 microM), is Mg(2+)-dependent and activatable by calmodulin purified from these hemoflagellates. The Ca(2+)-ATPase is sensitive to vanadate (Ki = 1 microM), thus typifying it as a "P" type ion pump. Vesicles from the plasma membrane of these parasites are able to accumulate Ca2+ against a concentration gradient. The kinetic properties of both transport and ATPase are essentially the same, thus suggesting the same molecular entity. The above results strongly suggest that the Ca(2+)-ATPase is the mechanism responsible for the long-term fine-tuning of intracellular Ca2+ at the submicromolar lever in trypanosomatids. 

2099376
The use of rapeseed screenings in diets for lactating cows and subsequent effects on milk yield and composition. 
This trial was to determine the effect of dietary rapeseed screenings on milk production, milk composition, and feed intake of lactating dairy cows. Pelleted rapeseed screenings were fed at 0, 7, and 14% of diet DM. Assignment of 36 multiparous Holstein cows was based upon parity and previous lactation performance. The experimental period was from parturition through wk 16 of lactation. The control ration had 3.1% ether extract, whereas the ration with 14% rapeseed screenings had 5.4% ether extract. The rapeseed screenings contained 52.2% of C18:1 and 24.2% of C18:2 as percentage of total fatty acids. There were no significant effects of dietary treatment on milk yield or feed intake. There were significant increases in milk fatty acids C18:1 and C18:2 for cows consuming the diets with rapeseed screenings. Treatment did not significantly affect milk protein percentage as measured by Kjeldahl N or by the infrared method. Increased unsaturated fatty acids in the milk of cows fed rapeseed screenings had no apparent effect on infrared fat analysis. There was no interaction of treatment and milk fat analysis method (infrared versus Babcock). Dietary treatment did not affect blood serum nonesterified fatty acid concentrations over the 16-wk period. In conclusion, rapeseed screenings, fed at levels up to 14% of the diet, did not affect milk yield, milk protein, or milk fat percentage but did change milk fatty acid composition. 

6369251
Enzymatic conversion of adenosine to inosine in the wobble position of yeast tRNAAsp: the dependence on the anticodon sequence. 
We have investigated the specificity of the tRNA modifying enzyme that transforms the adenosine at position 34 (wobble position) into inosine in the anticodon of several tRNAs. For this purpose, we have constructed sixteen recombinants of yeast tRNAAsp harboring an AXY anticodon (where X or Y was one of the four nucleotides A, G, C or U). This was done by enzymatic manipulations in vitro of the yeast tRNAAsp, involving specific hydrolysis with S1-nuclease and RNAase A, phosphorylation with T4-polynucleotide kinase and ligation with T4-RNA ligase: it allowed us to replace the normal anticodon GUC by trinucleotides AXY and to introduce simultaneously a 32P-labelled phosphate group between the uridine at position 33 and the newly inserted adenosine at position 34. Each of these 32P-labelled AXY "anticodon-substituted" yeast tRNAAsp were microinjected into the cytoplasm of Xenopus laevis oocytes and assayed for their capacity to act as substrates for the A34 to I34 transforming enzyme. Our results indicate that: 1/ A34 in yeast tRNAAsp harboring the arginine anticodon ACG or an AXY anticodon with a purine at position 35 but with A, G or C but not U at position 36 were efficiently modified into I34; 2/ all yeast tRNAAsp harboring an AXY anticodon with a pyrimidine at position 35 (except ACG) or uridine at position 36 were not modified at all. This demonstrates a strong dependence on the anticodon sequence for the A34 to I34 transformation in yeast tRNAAsp by the putative cytoplasmic adenosine deaminase of Xenopus laevis oocytes. 

9562376
Deoxyspergualin neither counteracts lipopolysaccharide (LPS) or Staphylococcus aureus enterotoxin-B (SEB) induced lethality in mice nor does it modulate the release of tumor necrosis factor-alpha. 
To gain further insights into the immunopharmacological mode of action of the immunosuppressant antibiotic deoxyspergualin (DSP), its effects were evaluated in murine lethal endo- and exotoxemia. These are two cytokine-mediated macrophage and T cell dependent immunoinflammatory conditions that can be induced in D-Galactosamine (D-Gal) presensitized mice by the injections with either LPS or SEB, respectively. The results show that prophylactic treatment with DSP (2.5 or 5 mg/kg bd.wt. 48, 24 and 2 h prior to challenge) neither improved the rate of survival, nor influenced the massive increase in the blood levels of tumor necrosis factor-alpha which followed the challenge with LPS or SEB. In sharp contrast, these clinical and seroimmunological events were both markedly counteracted by prophylactic treatment with sodium fusidate, another immunosuppressive agent used as control. 

12381830
Substance P-saporin lesion of neurons with NK1 receptors in one chemoreceptor site in rats decreases ventilation and chemosensitivity. 
All medullary central chemoreceptor sites contain neurokinin-1 receptor immunoreactivity (NK1R-ir). We ask if NK1R-ir neurons and processes are involved in chemoreception. At one site, the retrotrapezoid nucleus/parapyramidal region (RTN/Ppy), we injected a substance P-saporin conjugate (SP-SAP; 0.1 pmol in 100 nl) to kill NK1R-ir neurons specifically, or SAP alone as a control. We made measurements for 15 days after the injections in two groups of rats. In group 1, with unilateral injections made in the awake state via a pre-implanted guide cannula, we compared responses within rats using initial baseline data. In group 2, with bilateral injections made under anaesthesia at surgery, we compared responses between SP-SAP- and SAP-treated rats. SP-SAP treatment reduced the volume of the RTN/Ppy region that contained NK1R-ir neuronal somata and processes by 44 % (group 1) and by 47 and 40 % on each side, respectively (group 2). Ventilation (.V(E)) and tidal volume (V(T)) were decreased during air breathing in sleep and wakefulness (group 2; P < 0.001; two-way ANOVA) and P(a,CO2) was increased (group 2; P < 0.05; Student's t test). When rats breathed an air mixture containing 7 % CO(2) during sleep and wakefulness, .V(E) and V(T) were lower (groups 1 and 2; P < 0.001; ANOVA) and the Delta.V(E) in air containing 7 % CO(2) compared to air was decreased by 28-30 % (group 1) and 17-22 % (group 2). SP-SAP-treated rats also slept less during air breathing. We conclude that neurons with NK1R-ir somata or processes in the RTN/Ppy region are either chemosensitive or they modulate chemosensitivity. They also provide a tonic drive to breathe and may affect arousal. 

10148714
Compliance with worksite nonsmoking policies: baseline results from the COMMIT study of worksites. 
PURPOSE. Little is known about compliance with worksite nonsmoking policies. This study provides an examination of the relationship of policy compliance to characteristics of the organization and the manner in which the policy was implemented. DESIGN. Data came from two separate surveys of 1) representatives of worksites that reported having a nonsmoking policy and 2) employed residents from the same communities whose worksites had nonsmoking policies. SETTING. This study was conducted as part of the Community Intervention Trial for Smoking Cessation (COMMIT), being conducted in 11 diverse intervention communities. SUBJECTS. Data are presented from surveys of 710 worksites (response rate = 90%) and 3,143 employed residents (response rate = 80%) of the same communities. MEASURES. Compliance with nonsmoking policies was measured by self-report in both surveys and is compared with worksite and respondent characteristics, type of policy, and methods of policy implementation. RESULTS. Compliance with nonsmoking policies was high; 55% of worksites with a policy restricting smoking reported that employees always adhered to the policy. Compliance was highest in worksites with more restrictive policies and where labor-management relations were reported to be good. Compliance also was high where the policy was effectively communicated to workers, as through worksite distribution channels, the absence of cigarette vending machines, and the availability of cessation assistance. CONCLUSIONS. These findings indicate that compliance with worksite nonsmoking policies is generally high, especially in the presence of more stringent policies. 

3164366
Bilabial compression force discrimination by human subjects. 
This study examined and compared bilabial compression force difference limen (DL) values (the minimally perceivable difference between two compression forces) for a group of twenty normal-speaking female subjects (mean age, 25 years) under conditions with and without the teeth clenched. In addition, measures of maximum bilabial compression force under conditions with and without the teeth clenched were obtained. Mean DL values obtained against a standard of 100 gm were 36 gm for the clenched condition and 38 gm with no clenching. Discrimination performance under these two conditions was not significantly different (P greater than 0.05). Mean maximum bilabial compression force was 411 gm with the teeth clenched and 568 gm without clenching. This difference in performance was significant (P less than 0.01). This study provides initial normal data against which individuals with labial sensorimotor dysfunction can be compared. 

6253820
Met-enkephalin-Arg6-Phe7, present in high amounts in brain of rat, cattle and man, is an opioid agonist. 
The enkephalins Met-enkephalin and Leu-enkephalin were first isolated from porcine brain by Hughes and co-workers. We have recently isolated from bovine adrenals another enkephalin with the structure Tyr-Gly-Gly-Phe-Met-Arg-Phe, or Met-enkephalin-Arg6-Phe7 (ref. 2). We report here that this new heptapeptide is found in human, rat and bovine striatum in concentrations comparable with or greater than that of Leu-enkephalin. This molecule should not be considered as a mere precursor of Met-enkephalin. A pharmacological study indicates that this naturally occurring enkephalin has similar properties to the two enkephalins characterized earlier. 

6245615
The use of cryosurgery in treating the fibrous papules of tuberous sclerosis. 
A patient with fibrous papules of the face as a part of tuberous sclerosis was treated by cryosurgery. The definite improvement attending this treatment was maintained over an eighteen-month follow-up period. 

16192293
An improved method for clearing and staining free-hand sections and whole-mount samples. 
BACKGROUND AND AIMS: Free-hand sectioning of living plant tissues allows fast microscopic observation of internal structures. The aim of this study was to improve the quality of preparations from roots with suberized cell walls. A whole-mount procedure that enables visualization of exo- and endodermal cells along the root axis was also established. METHODS: Free-hand sections were cleared with lactic acid saturated with chloral hydrate, and observed with or without post-staining in toluidine blue O or aniline blue. Both white light and UV light were used for observation. Lactic acid was also used as a solvent for berberine, and fluorol yellow for clearing and staining the samples used for suberin observation. This procedure was also applied to whole-mount roots with suberized celllayers. KEY RESULTS: Clearing of sections results in good image quality to observe the tissue structure and cell walls compared with non-cleared sections. The use of lactic acid as a solvent for fluorol yellow proved superior to previously used solvents such as polyethylene glycol-glycerol. Clearing and fluorescence staining of thin roots such as those of Arabidopsis thaliana were successful for suberin visualization in endodermal cells within whole-mount roots. For thicker roots, such as those of maize, sorghum or tea, this procedure could be used for visualizing the exodermis in a longitudinal view. Clearing and staining of peeled maize root segments enabled observation of endodermal cell walls. CONCLUSIONS: The clearing procedure using lactic acid improves the quality of images from free-hand sections and clearings. This method enhances the study of plant root anatomy, in particular the histological development and changes of cell walls, when used in combination with fluorescence microscopy. 

3924808
Long-term treatment with cimetidine does not essentially affect the hypothalamic-pituitary-gonadal axis in man. 
The effect of cimetidine maintenance treatment on gonadal function has been assessed by seminal analysis plus prolactin and gonadotropin blood level concentrations. Nine patients, all with duodenal ulcer, 5 of whom had received 400 mg cimetidine at night for 18, 3 for 24 and 1 for 36 months, were studied. All patients were presumably fertile, having fathered a child born not more than 3 years before the start of cimetidine treatment. In all patients two seminal analyses were performed and blood specimens were obtained for radioimmunoassay estimation of FSH, LH and prolactin concentrations both in basal conditions and 20', 30' and 60' after the i.v. injection of Gn-RH (100 micrograms) and TRH (200 micrograms). All but one patient, in whom mild oligoasthenozoospermia was detected, had normal sperm counts and motility; moreover hormonal levels both in basal conditions and after releasing factor stimulation were found to be similar to those observed in a control group. Cimetidine maintenance treatment has no effect on sexual activity, the quality of seminal fluid or the pituitary secretion of gonadotropins or prolactin. 

1835293
Public screening for lung disease: experience with the NIH Lung Health Study. 
The Lung Health Study is the first major initiative of the National Heart, Lung, and Blood Institute in screening for and intervention in early lung disease. The objective of the study is to identify cigarette smokers who have early disease and determine whether an intervention program of smoking cessation and bronchodilator therapy will alter the course of their disease. After an extensive screening program, 5,887 participants have been randomized to one of three groups: usual care, intervention with smoking cessation and the use of a placebo inhaler, and intervention with smoking cessation and the use of ipratropium bromide. All participants will be followed for 5 years. Preliminary data from the screening indicate that chronic obstructive pulmonary disease is more prevalent than was previously recognized, that it is widespread in women as well as men, and that it is far more common in young individuals than was thought. Approximately two-thirds of the study participants have hyperreactive airways. Preliminary data from the Lung Health Study indicate that screening for lung function can be carried out in a cost-effective manner. 

12066217
Genetic discordance between primary tumours and metastases of head and neck cancer detected by microsatellite analysis. 
Very little is known about possible intra-tumoural genetic heterogeneity between primary tumours and lymph node metastases in head and neck squamous cell carcinoma (HNSCC). To investigate this phenomenon, we analysed 96 micro-dissected tumour samples for allelic imbalance at four of the most frequently altered chromosomal locations in HNSCC (3p14.2; 9p21; 11q23.3; 17p13.1) using microsatellite markers. From 23 patients, matched pairs of primary tumour and lymph node metastasis were analysed. Discordance in the allelic distribution was identified in 8 cases (35%). With one exception, the metastasis contained a more balanced allelic status than the primary tumour. In contrast, in a group of 25 tumours with two anatomically different samples from the primary tumour site, discordance was identified in only 3 tumours (13%). These results are compatible with the dissemination of subclones from the primary tumour site with a more balanced allelotype in the metastasis. In our opinion, several scenarios could explain this phenomenon. From a clinical point of view, genetic discordance between the metastasis and the primary tumour must be taken into consideration when establishing molecular biologic markers for choice of therapy and prognosis in head and neck cancer. 

9740743
Distributed parallel processing for multidimensional maximum entropy reconstruction. 
We have developed a two-dimensional maximum entropy spectrum reconstruction program designed to run in parallel on workstation clusters. Test reconstructions of planes extracted from a three-dimensional NMR data set indicate that the parallel speedup is nearly equal to the number of processors provided that the individual processors have comparable performance and that there are at least as many planes as processors. The program also works well in a typical laboratory setting consisting of heterogeneous workstations. 

1400018
Influences of NREM sleep on the activity of tonic vs. inspiratory phasic muscles in normal men. 
Studies of sleep influences on human pharyngeal and other respiratory muscles suggest that the activity of these muscles may be affected by non-rapid-eye-movement (NREM) sleep in a nonuniform manner. This variable sleep response may relate to the pattern of activation of the muscle (inspiratory phasic vs. tonic) and peripheral events occurring in the airway. Furthermore, the ability of these muscles to respond to respiratory stimuli during NREM sleep may also differ. To systematically investigate the effect of NREM sleep on respiratory muscle activity, we studied two tonic muscles [tensor palatini (TP), masseter (M)] and two inspiratory phasic ones [genioglossus (GG), diaphragm (D)], also measuring the response of these muscles to inspiratory resistive loading (12 cmH2O.l-1.s) during wakefulness and NREM sleep. Seven normal male subjects were studied on a single night with intramuscular electrodes placed in the TP and GG and surface electrodes placed over the D and M. Sleep stage, inspiratory airflow, and moving time average electromyograph (EMG) of the above four muscles were continuously recorded. The EMG of both tonic muscles fell significantly (P less than 0.05) during NREM sleep [TP awake, 4.3 +/- 0.05 (SE) arbitrary units, stage 2, 1.1 +/- 0.2; stage 3/4, 1.0 +/- 0.2. Masseter awake, 4.8 +/- 0.6; stage 2, 3.3 +/- 0.5; stage 3/4, 3.1 +/- 0.5]. On the other hand, the peak phasic EMG of both inspiratory phasic muscles (GG and D) was well maintained. (ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS) 

9320547
Size-dependence of water-running ability in basilisk lizards (Basiliscus basiliscus) 
In the past, it has been proposed that basilisk lizards (Basiliscus basiliscus) are able to reach high population densities because the juveniles and adults have differing water-running abilities and therefore live in different habitats. However, there is no a priori reason to expect juveniles to be better able to run on water than adults. To determine the causal relationship between body size and water-running ability, we made three types of measurements: (1) direct morphological measurements on preserved specimens; (2) hydrodynamic measurements on physical models of the lizards' feet; and (3) kinematic measurements on basilisk lizards running on water. The information gathered from these investigations was used to develop an allometric model which predicted the maximum upward force impulses that the lizards could generate. We find that small lizards have a capacity to generate large force surpluses. A 2 g lizard can generate a maximum upward impulse that is more than twice that needed to support its body weight (225 %). In contrast, a 200 g lizard, under optimal conditions, can just barely support its body weight (111 %). 

5409799
Respiratory mechanics and dust exposure in byssinosis. 
Acute exposures to hemp dust, in healthy subjects as well as hemp workers with byssinosis, resulted in two different responses. Men with symptoms (chest tightness, coughing, and wheezing) after exposure showed decreases of forced expiratory volumes (FEV(1.0)), flow rates on maximum expiratory flow-volume (MEFV) curves, and of vital capacity (VC), while airway conductance (Gaw: TGV ratio) did not decrease significantly ("flow rate response"). Men without symptoms after exposure showed no changes of VC, FEV(1.0), and MEFV curves, but had a significantly decreased airway conductance ("conductance response"). The flow rate response is attributed to a pharmacological bronchoconstrictor effect of hemp dust on small airways, the conductance response to a mechanical or reflex effect of hemp dust on large airways. Both responses were abolished by a bronchodilator drug. The type of response reflects a difference between individuals and is not related to age, smoking habits, or prior exposure history. Men with normal control function data had either a flow rate or a conductance response. All men with abnormal control data had a flow rate response.Long-term hemp dust exposure causes irreversible obstructive lung disease, in particular among men who respond to acute dust exposure with symptoms and flow rate decreases. The detection of this response, with FEV(1.0) measurements and MEFV curves, is essential in the study of byssinosis. Decreases of airway conductance after dust exposure have no consistent relation to the development of clinical symptoms. The relative value of measurements of maximum expiratory flow rates and of airway conductance in other lung diseases needs to be reassessed. 

2543326
[Development of a new therapeutic method in hepatocellular carcinoma using a culture system--the intensifying effect of human epidermal growth factor (hEGF) on the antitumor action of antitumor agents] 
The culture system of hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC) has been established and the effect of hepatotrophic factors on these cell lines have been studied. During this study the effect of the human epidermal growth factor intensifying anti-tumor action of anti-tumor agents will be evaluated. HCC cell lines (C-HC-4, C-HC-20) show logarithmic growth in the serum-free medium. These growth curves after administration of 1 x 10(-12- -8) M of hEGF were measured, and the existence of the hEGF receptors was evaluated using the ABC method. The growth curve of HC-4 transplanted into nude mice was measured in 4 groups; the control group, the hEGF group, the gamma Interferon (gamma IFN) group, and the hEGF + gamma IFN group. The hEGF enhanced the cell growth of C-HC-4 and C-HC-20, and EGF receptors were confirmed immunohistologically. In the hEGF+ gamma IFN group, growth inhibition seems to be most important. The hEGF may intensify the anti-tumor action of the anti-tumor agents. 

15080700
Catalysis with TiO2/gold nanocomposites. Effect of metal particle size on the Fermi level equilibration. 
Photoexcited semiconductor nanoparticles undergo charge equilibration when they are in contact with metal nanoparticles. Such a charge distribution has direct influence in dictating the energetics of the composite by shifting the Fermi level to more negative potentials. The transfer of electrons to Au nanoparticles has now been probed by exciting TiO(2) nanoparticles under steady-state and laser pulse excitation. Equilibration with the C(60)/C(60)(-) redox couple provides a means to determine the apparent Fermi level of the TiO(2)-Au composite system. The size-dependent shift in the apparent Fermi level of the TiO(2)-Au composite (20 mV for 8-nm diameter and 40 mV for 5-nm and 60 mV for 3-nm gold nanoparticles) shows the ability of Au nanoparticles to influence the energetics by improving the photoinduced charge separation. Isolation of individual charge-transfer steps from UV-excited TiO(2) --> Au --> C(60) has provided mechanistic and kinetic information on the role of metal in semiconductor-assisted photocatalysis and size-dependent catalytic activity of metal-semiconductor nanocomposites. 

10262131
Effects of hospitalization on young children: implications of two theories. 
In this article the effects of hospitalization on the young child are analyzed from the perspective of two theoretical models of development. The first model, the critical periods model, asserts that there is an hypothesized critical period for the development of certain skills and competencies. In this model early experiences are crucial to the skills which either cannot develop or develop with much difficulty after the critical period has passed. The second model is a transactional model of development which asserts that, although early experiences are important, each interaction of the child and the environment makes a difference in development and only through continuous assessment of these transactions can we determine how the child changes and evolves. Data from studies of the effects of hospitalization on children are used to illustrate the utility of these models in the study and management of children who are hospitalized. 

8896233
Phylogenetically conserved epitopes of leukocyte antigens. 
The occurrence of conserved epitopes in the immune system was investigated on the leukocytes of cattle, river buffalo, sheep, camel, swine and humans by indirect immunofluorescence and flow cytometry. The distribution of the most conservative epitopes on leukocyte sub-populations suggests that the expression pattern of the proteins is similar. Western blotting experiments indicate that the recognized antigens are structural homologues. 

17131416
Developmental abnormalities in the nerves of peripheral myelin protein 22-deficient mice. 
Peripheral myelin protein 22 (PMP22) is a tetraspan glycoprotein whose misexpression is associated with a family of hereditary peripheral neuropathies. In a recent report, we have characterized a novel PMP22-deficient mouse model in which the first two coding exons were replaced by the lacZ reporter. To investigate further the myelin abnormalities in the absence of PMP22, sciatic nerves and dorsal root ganglion (DRG) neuron explant cultures from PMP22-deficient mice were studied at various stages of myelination. Throughout the first 3 months of postnatal development, myelin protein and beta4 integrin levels are dramatically reduced, whereas p75 and beta1 integrin remain elevated. By immunostaining, the distributions of several glial proteins, including beta4 integrin, the voltage-gated potassium channel Kv1.1, and E-cadherin, are altered. Schwann cells from PMP22-deficient mice are able to produce limited amounts of myelin in DRG explant cultures, yet the internodal segments are dramatically fewer and shorter. The comparison of PMP22-deficient mice with other PMP22 mutant models reveals that the decrease in beta4 integrin is specific to an absence of PMP22. Furthermore, whereas lysosome-associated membrane protein 1 and ubiquitin are notably up-regulated in nerves of PMP22-deficient mice, heat shock protein 70 levels remain constant or decrease compared with wild-type or PMP22 mutant samples. Together these results support a role for PMP22 in the early events of peripheral nerve myelination. Additionally, although myelin abnormalities are a commonality among PMP22 neuropathic models, the underlying subcellular mechanisms are distinct and depend on the specific genetic abnormality. 

277922
Disulfide-linked high molecular weight protein associated with human cataract. 
A major high molecular weight disulfide-linked protein has been isolated from cataractous lenses. It is only present in the water-insoluble protein fractions. This species has not been found in normal lenses of comparable age. Upon reduction of this fraction, polypeptides having molecular weights of approximately 60,000, 43,000, and 20,000 as well as a noncharacterized heterogeneous species are released. Similar sized polypeptides have been found in various noncovalently linked aggregates in both normal and cataractous lenses. Examination of the disulfide-linked protein fraction indicates that approximately 70% of the sulfhydryl groups are in the oxidized state. Although little change in the sizes of the other major polypeptides in the water-insoluble fraction is observed upon reduction, these components were also found to contain an appreciable disulfide content. Such results indicate that the only major lens fraction containing disulfide-linked polypeptide is the high molecular weight species and that the disulfides present in the remaining fractions are either intrachain disulfides or link polypeptides to small peptides. 

10721423
Establishment of bovine chromosome region specific high resolution maps using microdissection. 
An alternative approach for the direct analysis of chromosome regions corresponding to economical traits on the basis of chromosome microdissection is described. Large fragment clones isolated with primer pairs designed from chromosome fragment-specific DNA sequences were localized by FISH to the scraped chromosome region of interest. The chromosome fragment-specific clones are a useful tool for the generation of region specific high density marker and gene maps and represent the source material for the development of a DNA contig including the economical trait. 

8853429
Prostaglandins stimulate renin secretion and renin mRNA in mouse renal juxtaglomerular cells. 
This study examined 1) effects of prostaglandins (PG) on renin secretion and renin gene expression from isolated juxtaglomerular granular cells and 2) expression of cyclooxygenases in juxtaglomerular structures. Incubation of granular cell cultures with PGE2, -I2, -F2 alpha, and thromboxane B2 identified PGI2 and PGE2 as stimulators of renin secretion; the effects were dose and time dependent. PGE2 also increased renin mRNA accumulation time and dose dependent. PGE2 and PGI2 activated adenylate cyclase concentration dependent in granular cells. PGE2 stimulations of renin secretion and renin mRNA were nonadditive to those of forskolin and were inhibited by endothelin. The findings are compatible with cellular actions through adenosine 3',5'-cyclic monophosphate (cAMP). On total RNA harvested from whole kidneys, from microdisected glomeruli with attached afferent arterioles and from mesangial cells in primary culture, reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction revealed significant expression of cyclooxygenase I and II. By direct interaction with PG receptors on renal juxtaglomerular cells, PGE2 and PGI2 can act as potent and rapid stimulators of renin secretion and renin mRNA probably through cAMP-dependent pathways. 

15850202
Management of regional German river catchments (REGFLUD) impact of nitrogen reduction measures on the nitrogen load in the River Ems and the River Rhine. 
The REGFLUD-project, commissioned by Germany's Federal Research Ministry (BMBF), addresses the problem of reducing diffuse pollution from agricultural production. The objective of the project is the development and application of multi-criteria scientific methods, which are able to predict diffuse pollution in river basins subject to economic feasibility and social acceptability. The selected river basins (Ems and Rhine basins) cover a variety of landscape units with different hydrological, hydrogeological and socio-economic characteristics. This paper focuses on the analysis of the effects of certain policy measures to reduce diffuse pollution by nitrogen. For this purpose a model system consisting of an agricultural sector model, a water balance model and a residence time/denitrification model was developed and applied. First results indicate a wide range of annual nitrogen surpluses for the rural areas between less than 10 kg N/ha up to 200 kg N/ha or more depending on the type and intensity of farming. Compared to the level of nitrogen surpluses the level of nitrogen inputs into the surface waters is relatively moderate because of degradation processes during transport in soil and groundwater. Policy impact analysis for a nitrogen tax and a limitation of the livestock density stress the importance of regionally tailored measures. 

3051068
[Psychodynamics of childhood instability] 
This work focuses on the Anglo-Saxon idea concerning "hyperactivity" and "hyperkinesis" and the French-language idea of "child psycho-motor instability". The author's own personal study (having two separate parts, on the one hand studying the psychic functioning of parent and their interaction with their child, and on the other, studying material gathered on the individual psychotherapy of unstable children), goes along with the French school of thought, highlighting the extent of incestuous sexual advances toward children (especially boys) in the family unit and the sexual nature (in the sense of child sexuality) of this excitement as the source of their instability, justifying a comparison between the unstable child and a Don Juan-type of instability. What comes out is epistemological thinking on Anglo-Saxon and French-language ideas, in particular criticism of the pre-suppositions in the Anglo-Saxon way of seeing things, which seems only to envisage the characterization of a syndromic range, rather than an organic etiology, this being more often implicit; distanced by the idea of psychodynamics, which predominate in the French-language studies, integrating the symptom of "psycho-motor instability" in the general "wholeness" of the child and evaluating ways of parent-child interaction. 

7896981
Matching individuals to weight loss treatments: a survey of obesity experts. 
For identification of factors for matching individuals to treatments, experts in the field of obesity were surveyed about the indications and contraindications for 11 common approaches to weight loss. The experts provided 170 client characteristics as possible matching factors, yet only 5 factors were matched to specific programs by 50% or more of the respondents. The results are discussed with regard to potential variables for studies on matching individuals to treatments, working hypotheses to be tested, and the value of matching information for clinical decision making 

9303540
Dual pathways for induction of wingless expression by protein kinase A and Hedgehog in Drosophila embryos. 
The secreted Drosophila Hedgehog (Hh) protein induces transcription of specific genes by an unknown mechanism that requires the serpentine transmembrane protein Smoothened (Smo) and the transcription factor Cubitus interruptus (Ci). Protein kinase A (PKA) has been implicated in the mechanism of Hh signal transduction because it acts to repress Hh target genes in imaginal disc cells that express Ci. Changes in Ci protein levels, detected by an antibody that recognizes an epitope in the carboxy-terminal half of Ci, have been suggested to mediate the positive effects of Hh and the negative effects of PKA on Hh target gene expression in imaginal discs. Here we show that PKA inhibition, like Hh, leads to increased "carboxy-terminal" Ci staining and Hh target gene expression in embryos. In addition, we find that Hh and Smo can stimulate target gene expression at constant Ci levels and that increased PKA activity can induce ectopic Hh target gene expression in a manner that requires Smo and Ci activities but does not involve changes in Ci protein concentration. This suggests a branching pathway of Hh signal transduction downstream of Smo and that PKA exerts opposite effects on the two branches. Finally we show that Hh signaling in embryos does not depend on cAMP-dependent regulation of PKA activity. 

17922414
Analysis of SOX4 gene mutation in non-small cell lung cancer tissues. 
OBJECTIVE: To investigate the mutation of SOX4 gene in the different tumor tissues with pathological stages and types of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC), and to explore its roles in the progression of lung carcinoma. METHODS: The SOX4 gene HMG-box of lung cancer tissues and paracancerous tissues were amplified by PCR, 20 cases shown difference by single strand conformation polymorphyism analysis were sequenced. The DNA sequences were compared with normal sequences by software Clustal and DNAStar. RESULTS: In the 90 NSCLCs, 18 cases were found with mutations of SOX4 gene and were sequenced, and there were 2 mutational points. Seven were detected from squamous cell carcinoma, five from adenocarcinoma and six from adeno-squamous. Three were obtained from tissues in stage I, five in stage II, six in stage III, and four in stage IV. The mutation rate in stage II, III and IV was significantly higher than that in stage I. CONCLUSION: SOX4 gene mutation is not associated with pathology histological types of tumor, but it is significantly associated with pathological stages and the mutation rate increases gradually, which has relation with advanced pathological stages in NSCLC. The results indicate that the SOX4 gene mutations might be related in the lung carcinogenesis and tumor metastasis. The study also provides molecular data for study the links between the mutation of SOX gene and human oncogenesis. 

6931266
Some data on the proliferative activity of prolymphocytic leukemia. 
Two cases of prolymphocytic leukemia were studied in order to find out whether or not there is a correlation between the fatal prognosis and the cell proliferation activity. Mitotic indices, DNA-contents, and nuclear and nucleolar sizes were essentially higher than in chronic lymphatic leukemia corresponding to values of immunoblastic sarcoma. The different proliferation activities of the two cases reflected their divergent courses of 9 and more than 24 months, respectively. 

11800393
Salt stress increases the Ca2+-independent phosphoenolpyruvate carboxylase kinase activity in Sorghum leaves. 
In C4 plants, the photosynthetic enzyme phosphoenolpyruvate carboxylase (PEPCase; EC 4.1.1.31) is subjected to a phosphorylation process via the light-dependent up-regulation of a Ca2+-independent PEPCase-kinase. The present work aimed to study the effect of salt stress on PEPCase phosphorylation in Sorghum vulgare Pers. leaves. The growth of salt-treated plants was reduced compared with that of the control plants. PEPCase activity modestly increased (around 20-40%) whereas PEPCase phosphorylation was markedly enhanced, on a protein basis, in extracts from illuminated leaves. The enhanced protein kinase activity was found to display a low molecular mass in the range 32-35 kDa, to be independent of Ca2+ and to be up-regulated by light. Furthermore, up-regulation was blocked in vivo by the cytosolic protein synthesis inhibitor cycloheximide. Collectively, these data demonstrated that salinity stress altered the Ca2+-independent PEPCase-kinase, presumably by increasing the mesophyll content of the enzyme. Potassium chloride, but not abscisic acid, mimicked the effect of NaCl on PEPCase-kinase activity. 

10310083
Health economics--concepts and conceptual problems. 
Awareness of the economic manifestation of health and diseases and the limited resources allocated to health care services has brought to the focus a new discipline - health economics. Cost accounting, cost benefit, cost effectiveness methods etc. are increasingly becoming an integral part of the health management and evaluation of health programmes. Various concepts and problems relating to health economics are discussed in the present paper. More efforts should be made to conduct health economic studies in hospitals and health centres by which the process of standardisation of the concepts, would be easier. Health economics should also find its due place in the medical curriculum. 

11130474
Leukemia in pregnancy. 
Validated data from which conclusions may be drawn about the management of leukemia during pregnancy are sparse. Cytotoxic agents should generally be avoided during the first trimester, when there is an approximately 17% chance of fetal malformation, particularly with folate antagonists. However, acute leukemias demand prompt institution of cytotoxic chemotherapy to maximize the chances of maternal survival. Treatment beyond the first trimester is generally safe if appropriate monitoring and obstetric care are available. Treatment of chronic leukemias can usually be delayed until delivery without compromising maternal health. Treatment of leukemia during pregnancy does not appear to have a significant impact on the future growth and development of the child. 

2490424
[Prediction of fetal sex by ultrasonography] 
Five hundred thirteen echographic reports are analyzed in order to predict fetal sex between 17 and 39 weeks of pregnancy. The diagnostic certainty was of 98.06%. The error was of 1.48% for masculine sex and 2.49% for feminine sex. Podalic presentation and early and late pregnancy influenced negatively in the prediction of the fetal sex. The amniotic fluid, placental localization, and any abnormality of the fetal anatomy, have no influence in the prediction of the sex. The best moment for sex prediction was between 28 and 36 weeks of pregnancy. 

3062296
Hypothalamic site of action for N-methyl-D-aspartate (NMDA) on LH secretion. 
Excitatory amino acids have been shown to increase luteinizing hormone (LH) secretion following ventricular or systemic administration. In the present study we attempted to determine possible hypothalamic sites of action for the potent excitatory amino acid agonist, N-methyl-D-aspartate (NMDA). The ability of NMDA to enhance LH release was tested in male rats following infusion into the medial preoptic nucleus (MPO), anterior hypothalamic nucleus (AHY), ventromedial hypothalamic nucleus (VMH), and arcuate nucleus (ARC). In the MPO, infusion of 50 or 500 pmole NMDA increased pituitary LH secretion, resulting in a 2-7 fold increase in plasma LH. The 50 pmole dose was selected to test more caudal hypothalamic sites. Plasma LH levels were not affected following microinfusion of NMDA (50 pmole) into the AHY, VMH, and ARC. The present results indicate a regional specificity for NMDA in the enhancement of LH secretion. This regional specificity may reflect either a greater density of LHRH perikarya in the MPO or the presence of specific amino acid receptors on neuronal elements in the MPO, but not on neuronal elements in the other areas tested. 

15254134
Phosphorus speciation in manure-amended alkaline soils. 
Two common manure storage practices are stockpiles and lagoons. The manure from stockpiles is applied to soils in solid form, while lagoon manure is applied as a liquid. Soil amendment with manure in any form introduces a significant amount of phosphorus (P) that exists in both organic and inorganic forms. However, little is known about P speciation in manure stored under different conditions, or the subsequent forms when applied to soils. We used solution (31)P nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) spectroscopy and conventional P fractionation and speciation methods to investigate P forms in dairy manure and liquid lagoon manure, and to study how long-term amendment with these manures influenced surface and subsurface soil P speciation. Our results show that the P forms in solid and lagoon manure are similar. About 30% of the total P was organic, mostly as orthophosphate monoesters. On a dry weight basis, total P was much higher in the solid manure. In the manure-amended soils the total P concentrations of the surface soils were similar, regardless of manure type. Total P in the subsurface soil was greater in the lagoon-manure-amended soil than the solid-manure-amended subsurface soil. However, the fraction of organic P was greater in the subsurface of the solid-manure-amended soil. The NMR results indicate that the majority of organic P in the soils is phytic acid, which is enriched in the surface soils compared with the subsurface soils. These results provide insight into P speciation and dynamics in manure-amended soils that will further increase our understanding on how best to manage manure disposal on soils. 

1913620
Ornithine decarboxylase induction in mouse kidney as indicator of renal damage. Differential nephrotoxic effect of anticancer antifolate drugs. 
High doses of folate and its quinazoline analogue with antitumour activity, N10-propargyl-5,8-dideazafolic acid (CB 3717), caused severe renal damage in mice, leading in the case of folate to death. The mouse kidneys increased in weight, which was accompanied by time- and dose-dependent induction of ornithine decarboxylase (ODC) activity. In contrast, methotrexate (MTX) had negligible effect on mouse kidneys except when applied together with the non-steroidal antiinflammatory drug, indomethacin. 

15230764
Diagnosis of intraventricular cysticercosis by magnetic resonance imaging: improved detection with three-dimensional spoiled gradient recalled echo sequences. 
Neurocysticercosis (NCC) is caused when the cysticercus larvae of Taenia solium infect the central nervous system. The larvae usually land in the parenchymal tissue, but quite rarely can lodge in the ventricles and cisterns of the brain. Unlike parenchymal NCC, it is not easy to demonstrate the cysticercus cysts within the cerebrospinal fluid spaces. Computed tomography and even conventional MR sequences can fail to detect such cysts. However, obtaining three-dimensional spoiled gradient recalled echo imaging sequences can help in improving the detection of intraventricular NCC, as is borne out by a case described in the present report. The use of such special MR sequences is therefore strongly advocated in suspected cases of intraventricular NCC. 

222084
Density-dependent growth adaptation kinetics in 3T3 cell populations following sudden [Ca2+] and temperature changes. A comparison with SV40-3T3 cells. 
Lowered extracellular [Ca2+] cause low growth rates and low stationary cell densities in 3T3 cell cultures as compared to physiological [Ca2%]. Under otherwise constant conditions the extracellular [Ca2+] determines a stable stationary cell density, which can be reached by increase of net cell number or decrease of net cell number, depending on cell density at the time of [Ca2+] adjustment. SV40-3T3 cells do not show this [Ca2+] dependency. At 39 degrees C 3T3 and SV40-3T3 cell populations show an increased growth rate at low cell densities as compared to cell populations at 35 degrees C. Approaching the stationary density the growth rate of both cell sorts is reduced faster at 39 degrees C than at 35 degrees C, leading to lower stationary cell densities at 39 degrees C than at 35 degrees C. A temperature change from 39 degrees C to 35 degrees C or in the opposite direction can affect the stationary cell density of 3T3 cell populations only if applied before reduction of growth rate by density-dependent growth-inhibiting principles has taken place. 

10617653
Coregulator small nuclear RING finger protein (SNURF) enhances Sp1- and steroid receptor-mediated transcription by different mechanisms. 
The small nuclear RING finger protein SNURF is not only a coactivator in steroid receptor-dependent transcription but also activates transcription from steroid-independent promoters. In this work, we show that SNURF, via the RING finger domain, enhances protein binding to Sp1 elements/GC boxes and interacts and cooperates with Sp1 in transcriptional activation. The activation of androgen receptor (AR) function requires regions other than the RING finger of SNURF, and SNURF does not influence binding of AR to cognate DNA elements. The zinc finger region (ZFR) together with the hinge region of AR are sufficient for contacting SNURF. The nuclear localization signal in the boundary between ZFR and the hinge region participates in the association of AR with SNURF, and a receptor mutant lacking the C-terminal part of the bipartite nuclear localization signal shows attenuated response to coexpressed SNURF. Some AR ZFR point mutations observed in patients with partial androgen insensitivity syndrome or male breast cancer impair the interaction of AR with SNURF and also render AR refractory to the transcription-activating effect of SNURF. Collectively, SNURF modulates the transcriptional activities of androgen receptor and Sp1 via different domains, and it may act as a functional link between steroid- and Sp1-regulated transcription. 

16324093
A role of TNF-alpha gene variant on juvenile ischemic stroke: a case-control study. 
The role of genetic factors in the individual predisposition to develop ischemic stroke has been assessed by previous studies performed both in animal models and in humans. The main goal of the current investigation was to determine the possible contribution of genes encoding procoagulant and inflammatory factors on the occurrence of ischemic stroke in a cohort of young cases and corresponding controls. One hundred and fifteen cases of ischemic stroke were recruited for this study. A detailed clinical assessment, a definite etiologic diagnosis, as well as the presence/absence of known risk factors for ischemic stroke were obtained for each patient. As a control group 180 healthy, unrelated subjects were included. The whole population was screened for polymorphisms belonging to genes encoding FII, FV, alpha-fibrinogen, beta-fibrinogen, GP IIb/IIIa, tumor necrosis factor (TNF)-alpha, interleukin 1-beta. Hypertension was the most important risk factor for ischemic stroke in our cohort [OR = 6.9, confidence interval (CI) 2.9-16.7, P < 0.0001]. Among all genes tested, the TNF-alpha gene variant exerted a significant, independent effect on individual predisposition to ischemic stroke occurrence (OR = 1.8, CI = 1.01-3.3, P < 0.05). Our findings, obtained in a cohort of young Italian patients, may support the existence of a direct contributory role of TNF-alpha, a proinflammatory cytokine protein, in the susceptibility to brain damage. 

183501
The effect of trigeminal nerve and ganglion manipulation on recurrence of ocular herpes simplex in rabbits. 
Latent herpes simplex virus (HSV) has been demonstrated in the trigeminal ganglia of experimentally infected rabbits between episodes of spontaneous ocular recurrence. In three experiments reported here, the normal pattern of recurrence was modified by manipulation of the trigeminal nerve and ganglion. Temporary retrobulbar disruption of trigeminal nerve function in chronically infected animals significantly decreased the number of ocular HSV isolations obtained during the 20 weeks immediately following surgery. Stereotaxic interruption of intracranial trigeminal nerve function prior to initial HSV infection dramatically reduced the incidence of peripheral recurrence of HSV. In chronically infected animals, stereotaxic stimulation of the trigeminal ganglion caused a marked increase in positive cultures within 2 days. These studies provide additional evidence for the theory that the reservoir for latent ocular HSV in rabbits is the trigeminal ganglion. Moreover, the studies suggest that the transmission of latent HSV from the trigeminal ganglion to its infectious form in the peripheral tissues involves the trigeminal nerve. We have shown that mechanical and stereotaxic stimulation of the trigeminal ganglion is a reliable and rapid means of precipitating peripheral ocular shedding of HSV on command, a finding which should prove most productive in future research. 

7373604
Endometrial estrogen and progesterone receptors in a uterus didelphys. 
A 23-year-old woman with a uterus didelphys and a totally occluded left tube had a hysterectomy one year after having a child. Endometrial estrogen and progesterone receptors, both cytoplasmic and nuclear, were determined in five longitudinal sections of each horn. The amount and distribution of these receptors were normal, but the receptor content of the right horn was higher than that of the left. 

3865880
Vascular growth factors and the development of macrovascular disease in diabetes mellitus. 
There are two different classes of humoral growth factors for arterial smooth muscle and endothelial cells that age of potential relevance for the development of macrovascular disease inn diabetes mellitus: hormones (growth hormone, insulin like growth factor I and II, insulin) and locally released growth factors of platelet origin. The following hormones have to be considered: Increased growth hormone plasma levels might contribute to macrovascular disease, but its actual relevance remains to be determined. Insulin like growth factor I and II are present in vivo and stimulate growth of vascular cells in vitro but their relevance for macrovascular disease in diabetes is unproven. To insulin, see Dr. Stout's paper. Human platelets contain at least six growth peptides or proteins that all stimulate in vitro growth of arterial wall cells: platelet derived growth factor, epidermal growth factor, platelet derived endothelial cell mitogen, endothelial growth factor, diabetic serum growth factor (DSGF), transforming growth factor-beta. As their plasma concentrations have not been shown to be increased in diabetes increased local availability at sites of stimulated platelet aggregation has been postulated. Therefore, their relevance for macrovascular disease i diabetics is based mainly on circumstantial evidence. The concentration of DSGF of platelet origin depends on the metabolic control: it increases in vivo in poorly controlled diabetics and is normalized after 2-3 weeks of good metabolic control in the same diabetic patient. The growth potency of DSGF from poorly controlled diabetics is greater than that of physiological amounts of insulin or growth hormone. (ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS) 

6540964
Health related psychosocial correlates of neuroticism: a study of adult male twins in Finland. 
Some health related psychosocial correlates of the Eysenck neuroticism scale were examined in a questionnaire study of 1501 monozygotic (MZ) and 3455 dizygotic (DZ) male twin pairs representing the adult male twin population in Finland. In analyses of the individuals, 34% of the variance in neuroticism was associated to: psychological variables (stress of daily activities, life satisfaction, quality of sleep, and extroversion - the explanatory rate of this variable set was 30%), psychotropic drugs (5%), alcohol use (4%), and smoking (2%). Neuroticism was also associated to social, life change, and medical variables. In pairwise analyses, the heritability estimate (h2) was 0.54 for pairs living together and 0.39 for pairs living apart. It seems that heritability estimates are confounded by the closer intrapair relationship between members of MZ than DZ pairs. In pairwise analyses, 23% of the intrapair difference of neuroticism in MZ pairs was associated to intrapair differences in the aforementioned variables. The following explanatory rates were found: psychological variables, 21%; psychotropic drugs, 2%; alcohol use, 2%; and smoking, 1%. Neuroticism of pairs discordant for background variables showed similar intrapair differences as between individuals in the following variables: service vs farming work, use of alcohol, use of antacids, hypertension, heavy physical work, quality of sleep, changes of workplace for negative reasons, smoking, and use of tranquillizers. It appears that in Finland environmental factors explain at least 61% of the variability in neuroticism, and that factors determining neuroticism are also associated to health related behavior such as smoking, use of alcohol and psychotropic drugs. 

10428052
Caspase-3 expression by cerebellar granule neurons is regulated by calcium and cyclic AMP. 
Caspase-3 enzyme activity is induced, and cell death follows, when cerebellar granule neurons (CGNs) from 8-day-old rats are transferred from an extracellular concentration of 25 mM K+ (25 mM [K+]e) to 5 mM [K+]e. Death of these neurons is diminished by an inhibitor of caspase-3 but not by an inhibitor of caspase-1. Actinomycin D and cycloheximide inhibit induction of caspase-3 and prevent death. Experiments in which CGN intracellular Ca2+ concentration ([Ca2+]i) was manipulated by either changing [K+]e or adding a voltage-gated Ca2+ channel antagonist or a Ca2+ ionophore to the medium showed that caspase-3 mRNA rises 2.5-fold when [Ca2+]i is diminished from 300 to 150 nM, with a corresponding rise in peak caspase enzyme activity. Whereas the caspase-3 mRNA level does not rise further with a still greater diminution in [Ca2+]i, peak caspase enzyme activity continues to increase, reaching sevenfold induction when [Ca2+]i is reduced to 55 nM. In CGNs in which [Ca2+]i is set at 55 nM by incubation in 5 mM [K+]e, treatment with forskolin or dibutyryl 3',5'-cyclic adenosine-5'-monophosphate delays caspase-3 induction and diminishes death but does not alter [Ca2+]i. We conclude that, in immature CGNs, both caspase-3 transcription and the subsequent processing of caspase-3 are induced by a fall in [Ca2+]i. Elevating cyclic AMP content delays caspase-3 induction by a mechanism that does not require an increase in [Ca2+]i. 

12566818
Analysis of premature ejaculation in hemodialysis patients using the International Index of Erectile Function. 
OBJECTIVE: We have conducted the following study to determine the prevalence of premature ejaculation in male hemodialysis patients and its impact on sexual quality of life. METHODS: This study was performed in hemodialysis facilities. Patients were asked to complete the International Index of Erectile Function (IIEF) questionnaire and also to report their ejaculation status. 98 male hemodialysis patients with normal potency were included in the study. The IIEF domain scores were determined, and the overall and relationship satisfaction rates were calculated for the patients with and without premature ejaculation separately. RESULTS: The mean age was 45.9 (range 30-69) years and the duration of hemodialysis was 37.8 (range 7-84) months. Premature ejaculation was determined in 31 (31.6%) patients. Patients with premature ejaculation experienced significantly lower overall satisfaction scores. Items of satisfaction with overall sexual life and sexual relationship with partner were responded to with a score of 'moderately satisfied' or 'very satisfied' in 47 and 53% of patients with premature ejaculation and 84 and 86% of patients without premature ejaculation, respectively. CONCLUSIONS: Premature ejaculation is a prevalent disorder in hemodialysis patients and seems to affect the satisfaction rate and sexual quality of life of these patients. 

7856047
The immune system of the respiratory tract in pigs. 
Although the lung is not a lymphoid organ it contains large numbers of lymphocytes. These can be found in different compartments: (1) the pulmonary intravascular pool, which is organ-specific and shows a unique migration pattern; (2) the interstitial lymphocyte pool, which is equivalent in size to the whole blood pool; (3) the bronchus-associated lymphoid tissue (BALT) which develops as a result of microbial stimulation; (4) the intraepithelial and lamina propria lymphocytes of the bronchi, with their typical subset composition; (5) the lymphocytes in the bronchoalveolar space, which can be sampled by bronchoalveolar lavage. The size and kinetics of the lymphocyte pools have been studied in the pig in more detail than in most other species. Despite this organotypic compartmentalisation of the pulmonary lymphoid cells in the pig, the lung is part of the integrated mucosal immune system, as shown by protective oral immunisation against the lung-pathogenic bacteria Actinobacillus pleuropneumoniae. The lung immune system in the pig is not only of veterinary interest, but also a relevant model for the human respiratory tract. 

8428512
Localization of the horse (Equus caballus) alpha-globin gene complex to chromosome 13 by fluorescence in situ hybridization. 
The alpha-globin gene complex in Equus caballus has been mapped by fluorescence in situ hybridization to the telomeric region of the long arm of chromosome 13. This is the first equine gene to be mapped to this chromosome. 

16849611
The dermal microenvironment induces the expression of the alternative activation marker CD301/mMGL in mononuclear phagocytes, independent of IL-4/IL-13 signaling. 
Recently, we have shown that mononuclear phagocytes comprise the majority of interstitial cells in the mouse dermis, as indicated by their phenotypic and functional characteristics. In particular, these cells express the mouse macrophage galactose-/N-acetylgalactosamine-specific-lectin (mMGL)/CD301, identified by the monoclonal antibody ER-MP23, as well as other macrophage markers. As expression of mMGL is induced by IL-4 or IL-13 and is therefore a marker of alternatively activated macrophages, we asked whether dermal mononuclear phagocytes are genuinely alternatively activated. We observed that these cells expressed, next to mMGL, two other alternative activation markers, namely, the mannose receptor/CD206 and Dectin-1. Yet, as this expression profile was similar in IL-4 receptor alpha knockout mice, neither IL-4 nor IL-13 signaling appeared to be required for this phenotype. We also found that Langerhans cells (LC), which showed only a low level of mMGL in the epidermis, up-regulated mMGL expression upon migration through the dermis, allowing these cells to internalize limited amounts of mMGL ligands. LC isolated from epidermal preparations did not show this up-regulation when cultured in standard medium, but whole skin-conditioned medium did stimulate mMGL expression by LC. The vast majority of mMGL molecules was present in the cytoplasm, however. LC, which arrived in skin-draining lymph nodes, quickly down-regulated mMGL expression, and dermally derived cells retained significant mMGL levels. Taken together, these data suggest that the dermal microenvironment induces mononuclear phagocyte subpopulations to express mMGL and possibly other markers of alternatively activated macrophages, independent of IL-4/IL-13 signaling. 

10321402
Do postal questionnaires change GPs' workload and referral patterns? 
OBJECTIVE: We aimed to determine changes in workload in general practice associated with the postal administration of a health needs questionnaire. METHOD: We carried out controlled before-and-after intervention study of the effects of delivering a postal questionnaire to assess needs for care for patients with arthropathies of the hip and knee, groin hernia and varicose veins, and to assess health service utilization, general health status and risk factors for cardiovascular disease. The setting was a seven-partner, fundholding, group practice in Avon. The subjects were patients registered with an NHS group practice situated in Backwell and Nailsea, Avon. The outcome measures were the frequency of consultation, home visits and night visits, reasons for consultation, referral to specialist agencies and patterns of prescribing. RESULTS: There was no significant difference between the study and control group in the year before and the year after the postal administration of the questionnaire with respect to changes in overall frequency of consultation, frequency of referral (including type of referral) and frequency of prescribing of non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drugs. In the study group there was a significant (P<0.05) reduction in the number of daytime home visits and prescriptions written for analgesics. Analysis of the records of those who had received a medical examination, in addition to a postal questionnaire, showed that there was no significant difference between the study and control group with respect to frequency of consultation, referral to outside agencies or items prescribed. CONCLUSION: Administration of a health needs questionnaire to patients registered with this general practice was not associated with an increase in consultation frequency or referral, or a change in prescribing patterns. No plausible explanation could be identified for the significant reduction in the number of home visits and prescriptions written for analgesics. It was concluded that these results were a statistical artefact. On the basis of the evidence from this study, GPs can be reassured that the administration of health needs questionnaires of the type used in this study will not result in any increase in workload or costs of care incurred by increased referrals to outside agencies or increased prescribing. 

9546237
In vitro evaluation of electrostatic endothelial cell transplantation onto 4 mm interior diameter expanded polytetrafluoroethylene grafts. 
PURPOSE: To perform an in vitro evaluation of electrostatic endothelial cell transplantation of human umbilical vein endothelial cells (HUVEC) onto segments of 4 mm internal diameter expanded polytetrafluoroethylene (ePTFE) vascular prostheses. METHODS: This evaluation consisted of exposing vascular graft segments that had been subjected to either electrostatic or gravitation transplantation with HUVEC to a physiologic shear stress (15 dynes/cm2) under steady flow conditions within a flow loop system. Biochemical assays were performed on freshly transplanted grafts by means of radioimmunoassay for prostacyclin and thromboxane A2. RESULTS: There was a 30% loss of HUVEC after 30 minutes of shear stress exposure from the grafts subjected to gravitational transplantation with no additional significant (alpha = 0.05) loss after 120 minutes. Grafts subjected to electrostatic transplantation had no significant (alpha = 0.05) loss of HUVEC during exposure to physiologic shear stress. Furthermore, after 120 minutes of shear-stress exposure, the grafts subjected to electrostatic transplantation (78,420 +/- 6274 HUVEC/cm2) retained 2.3 times more HUVEC than the counterparts subjected to gravitational transplantation (34,427 +/- 4637 HUVEC/cm2). The biochemical assay results indicated no significant (alpha = 0.05) production of prostacyclin or thromboxane A2 regardless of the method of cell transplantation. CONCLUSIONS: (1) The electrostatic transplantation technique was superior to the gravitational transplantation technique in terms of cellular retention when the ePTFE grafts were exposed to physiologic shear stress. (2) Production of prostacyclin and thromboxane A2 did not differ between transplanted HUVEC subjected to gravitational or electrostatic procedures. 

1910035
Treatment choice after one antidepressant fails: a survey of northeastern psychiatrists. 
BACKGROUND: Because limited evidence exists to help clinicians choose the next step after a depressed patient fails to respond to an adequate trial of an antidepressant, I conducted a survey to explore psychiatrists' treatment choices. METHOD: I asked 118 northeastern psychiatrists what they would do next in response to a clinical vignette of an inpatient with DMS-III-R major depression who failed to respond to 4 weeks of nortriptyline at adequate blood levels. RESULTS: Lithium augmentation was chosen by more than a third (33.9%) of psychiatrists. Other choices, in order of decreasing frequency, were continuing nortriptyline for another 2 weeks (17.8%) and switching to either fluoxetine (16.1%), electroconvulsive therapy (11.0%), or a monoamine oxidase inhibitor (6.8%). Only one psychiatrist each chose thyroid augmentation or bupropion. CONCLUSIONS: The surveyed psychiatrists overwhelmingly preferred lithium augmentation over other strategies to manage treatment-resistant depression. Research on comparative strategies is lacking and urgently needed. 

16492005
Family physician's knowledge, beliefs, and self-reported practice patterns regarding hyperlipidemia: a National Research Network (NRN) survey. 
Objective: Family physicians have the potential to make a major impact on reducing the burden of cardiovascular disease through the optimal assessment and management of hyperlipidemia. We were interested in assessing the knowledge, beliefs, and self-reported practice patterns of a representative sample of family physicians regarding the assessment and management of hyperlipidemia 2 years after the release of the evidence-based National Cholesterol Education Program (NCEP) Adult Treatment Panel (ATP) III guidelines. METHODS: A 33-item survey was mailed to a random sample (N = 1200) of members of the American Academy of Family Physicians in April of 2004, with 2 follow-up mailings to nonresponders. Physicians were queried about sociodemographic characteristics, their knowledge, attitudes, and self-reported practice patterns regarding the assessment and management of hyperlipidemia. Four case scenarios also were presented. RESULTS: Response rate was 58%. Over 90% of surveyed family physicians screened adults for hyperlipidemia as part of a cardiovascular disease prevention strategy. Most (89%) did this screening by themselves without the support of office staff, and 36% reported routine use of a flow sheet. Most had heard of the ATP III guidelines (85%), but only 13% had read them carefully. Only 17% of respondents used a coronary heart disease (CHD) risk calculator usually or always. Over 90% of those responding reported using low-density lipoprotein (LDL) as the treatment goal but only 76% reported using non-high-density lipoprotein (HDL) cholesterol as a secondary goal of therapy. CONCLUSION: We found a large variability in knowledge, beliefs, and practice patterns among practicing family physicians. We found general agreement on universal screening of adults for hyperlipidemia as part of cardiovascular disease prevention strategy and use of LDL cholesterol as a treatment goal. Many other aspects of the NCEP ATP III guidelines, such as use of a systematic, multidisciplinary approach, using non-HDL cholesterol as a secondary goal, routinely using a CHD risk calculator for risk assessment to guide cholesterol management, have not yet penetrated into self-reported clinical practice. 

2635624
[Follow-up and evaluation using brain-stem evoked potentials of a pediatric population diagnosed as premature] 
We study 65 patients coming from neonatology service with a diagnostic of prematurity and we test of audiometric level with brain stem response audiometry during three years, giving importance to the clinics characteristics that have affected during the story in the hospital. We diagnose hearing loss in a 41% of the patients, and in one case (5.88%) is retrocochlear (17.6%) as with no valuable. After three years only one patient presents persistent hearing loss; while in the first exploration 17 are considered pathologics. The prematurity by itself and without others clinic factors doesn't involve an important risk in the generation of hypoacusy. 

15931557
Protein kinases in drug discovery and development. 
The Protein Kinases in Drug Discovery and Development meeting highlighted protein kinases as validated therapeutic targets in many types of disease, especially cancer. Drugs designed to inhibit protein kinase activity were widely tested in preclinical and clinical evaluation, demonstrating significant efficacy with acceptable toxicity profiles. More than 600 kinases are encoded by the human genome, some of which are already well established as validated targets due to extensive scientific research from both academic institutions and industrial companies. As demonstrated by several speakers during the meeting, different diseases exhibit mutations or over-expression of the same kinase. Therefore, a drug designed to inhibit these specific kinases can potentially be used as a therapeutic agent in the treatment of more then one disease. The major strategy employed by most companies today in drug discovery is using genomic information, together with clinical research, to identify novel potential targets. A drug discovery project is then established around the chosen target kinase, in order to identify, optimize and deliver novel potential drugs to clinical trials. 

16209593
A novel route to fully substituted 1H-pyrazoles. 
A novel one-step synthesis route to fully substituted pyrazol-4-ols is reported. This simple yet nonobvious method for the construction of pyrazol-4-ols by the condensation-fragmentation-cyclization-extrusion reactions of thietanones with 1,2,4,5-tetrazines is reported. All of the elements of the thietanone except its sulfur are incorporated in these novel products. 

11797200
[Qualitative characteristics of selected species of the genus Echinacea Moench] 
The paper examined the effect of production-technological conditions in relation to the ontogenetic stage of plants in three different species of the genus Echinacea Moench., comparing the species Echinacea purpurea, Echinacea atrorubens, and Echinacea pallida. It also examined the differences in the content of essential oil in different plant organs and evaluated the representation of individual components in the essential oils of the species under study at the stage of the optimal maturity for collection. 

17315562
Statistics used in current nursing research. 
Undergraduate nursing research courses should emphasize the statistics most commonly used in the nursing literature to strengthen students' and beginning researchers' understanding of them. To determine the most commonly used statistics, we reviewed all quantitative research articles published in 13 nursing journals in 2000. The findings supported Beitz's categorization of kinds of statistics. Ten primary statistics used in 80% of nursing research published in 2000 were identified. We recommend that the appropriate use of those top 10 statistics be emphasized in undergraduate nursing education and that the nursing profession continue to advocate for the use of methods (e.g., power analysis, odds ratio) that may contribute to the advancement of nursing research. 

16392835
Correlations of structure and rates of energy transfer for through-bond energy-transfer cassettes. 
Fluorescent DNA-labeling cassettes are designed to have a common absorbing chromophore matched to a single exciting laser wavelength, but up to four different emitters. Experiments reported here have examined the energy-transfer rates and fluorescence polarization characteristics for two different types of cassette, involving three distinct relative orientations of the donor and acceptor transition moments and the axis of the rigid linker. Energy-transfer times range from <200 fs to approximately 20 ps, the fastest transfer times occurring when the transition moments of the donor and acceptor species are aligned parallel to the linker axis. Experimental evidence is presented that supports a through-bond energy-transfer mechanism, in contrast with a commercial DNA-labeling agent, which exhibits much slower transfer times controlled by FRET. These rigid cassettes also exhibit polarized fluorescence from the acceptor species, so that this particular type of DNA-labeling probe has some of the advantages of single-molecule probes such as rhodamine and coumarin dyes. 

7474518
[A new protein titrator tape for self-assessment by outpatients with proteinuria] 
l- have invented a new dipstick (protein titrator tape) for measuring the volume of protein excreted in the 24-hour urine. The principle of the method is based on the protein error of indicators with the modification of a conventional dipstick test. The dipstick consists of two thick filter papers, containing differently adjusted pH indicators of tetrabromphenol blue, making it possible to detect a wide range of protein concentrations in the urine using a standard color chart that includes twenty color blocks. Two hundred and ninety outpatients had their urine samples assessed with this method as well as with the pyrogallol red test as a comparative study for quantitative measurement of protein concentrations. The new-type dipstick method exhibited good correlation with the results of the pyrogallol red test, especially in the range of protein concentrations from 50 mg/dl to 400 mg/dl, showing the linear equation of "y (Pyrogallol red) = 10.5 + 0.99 x (Dipstick) (r = 0.91, P < 0.01)". Although there was good correlation with the pyrogallol red test at higher concentrations from 400 mg/dl to 1,000 mg/dl, the dipstick method tended to exhibit lower concentrations than those indicated by the counterpart method. The rate of consistency between observers was quite high. This new-type dipstick method will offer a reliable method for patients or their family to assess their protein excretion in the urine every 24 hours at home using a portable urine sampling device. 

8711458
[Trends in alcohol consumption in Switzerland from 1975-1992] 
Based on four representative surveys independently conducted at 6-year intervals, the study presented here delineates the development of alcohol consumption in the general population of Switzerland between 1975 and 1992. A description of changes in the frequency and quantity of alcohol consumption by sex is presented, as well as specific changes by beverage type. Even though Switzerland remains one of the high consumption countries, a marked decline can be observed. Compared to 1975 when 28% of respondents reported daily alcohol consumption, this figure dropped to 20% in 1992. Although 10% consumed more than 60 grams of pure alcohol in the 1975 sample, this proportion fell to only 3% in 1992. This downward trend, which is also reflected in secondary statistics such as sales and mortality figures, can be mainly attributed to male consumers. In contrast to international trends, which in general demonstrate converging drinking patterns, reduced consumption in Switzerland, a wine-producing country, is mainly due to a decline in beer consumption and not in wine consumption. 

10335618
Working gases in thermoacoustic engines. 
The best working gases for thermoacoustic refrigeration have high ratios of specific heats and low Prandtl numbers. These properties can be optimized by the use of a mixture of light and heavy noble gases. In this paper it is shown that light noble gas-heavy polyatomic gas mixtures can result in useful working gases. In addition, it is demonstrated that the onset temperature of a heat driven prime mover can be minimized with a gas with large Prandtl number and small ratio of specific heats. The gas properties must be optimized for the particular application of thermoacoustics; it cannot be assumed that high specific heat ratio and low Prandtl number are always desirable. 

9715100
Input and central processing expressed in ERP and heart rate changes to rare target and rare nontarget stimuli. 
Whether late positive components of event-related potentials (ERPs) parallel changes in heart rate (HR) indicative of attention/orienting to rare stimuli has been debated. In the present study, a three-stimulus design was used, with rare target, rare nontarget, and frequent standard stimuli delivered under identical conditions except that instructions to subjects described the targets to which subjects should respond but did not describe the nontargets. In Experiment 1, stimuli varied among modalities; in Experiment 2, auditory stimuli were employed. Both ERPs and HR were consistent with automatic processing preceding two stages of controlled processing. Rare stimuli evoked larger parietal P300 and initial HR deceleration than standards. Presumably because of load-reducing effects of long interstimulus intervals, targets and nontargets were not distinguished before a late slow wave and a late phase of HR acceleration. Neither rare stimulus elicited a recognizable frontal P3a. 

8498646
Pediatric histiocytosis. Characterization, prognosis, and oral involvement. 
PURPOSE: Forty-five children with histiocytosis were reviewed to characterize such a group and to establish the prevalence of oral involvement. In addition, patients with and without oral disease were compared for severity of disease, response to treatment, and incidence of recurrent disease. PATIENTS AND METHODS: There were more boys (62.2%) than girls (37.8%) among the patients studied. About half (53.3%) were < 2 years of age. Approximately half of all patients had two or fewer affected organ systems at diagnosis. The average length of treatment was 46 weeks. RESULTS: A total 75.6% of patients were alive without disease at the completion of data collection, 15.6% died from the disease, 4.4% were alive with active disease, and 4.4% were alive with unknown status. Of the patients, 55.6% had long-term sequelae, and oral sequelae were present in 22.2% of the sample. In all, 28.8% of the patients exhibited oral symptoms at diagnosis, while 44.4% had oral involvement at some point during the course of the disease. Patients with oral symptoms were treated significantly longer and had more systemic therapy when compared with those without oral disease. 

6495519
[Roentgenomorphological changes in gastric and duodenal stumps after pylorus-sparing operations] 
Rentgenological examinations of 114 patients subjected to pylorus-preserving resections of 3 types for ulcer disease and benign tumors of the stomach have revealed characteristic alterations of the stump of the stomach, gastro-gastroanastomosis, duodenal bulb in different variants of operations. 

3356115
31P nuclear magnetic resonance study of steady-state adenosine 5'-triphosphate levels during graded hypoxia in the isolated perfused rat kidney. 
1. A model of controlled hypoxia in the isolated perfused rat kidney has been used to compare the extent of reduction in the steady-state level of adenosine 5'-triphosphate (ATP) from that initially observed with alterations in renal function and with the development of tubular cell injury. 2. ATP depletion was observed in response to decreased total oxygen delivery even when delivery greatly exceeded consumption and the venous oxygen tension remained in excess of 150 mmHg. 3. Increases in the fractional excretion of sodium occurred progressively below an apparent threshold value of whole kidney ATP of approximately 80% of the baseline. 4. With modestly decreased oxygen delivery, cellular injury was confined to deep proximal tubule and medullary thick ascending limb of Henle's loop. Severely decreased oxygen delivery rates were associated with cellular damage spreading throughout the cortex. 5. Even the smallest reductions in whole kidney ATP were associated with morphological damage to tubular cells. The extent of reduction in whole kidney ATP was closely correlated and approximately equivalent to the calculated volume of injured cells. 6. Our results indicate that reduction in whole kidney ATP during decreased oxygen delivery is a valid marker of the extent of injurious cellular hypoxia and are consistent with the view that cellular ATP concentrations in hypoxia are markedly inhomogeneous. They support the hypothesis that specific regions of the perfused kidney become critically hypoxic and develop cellular injury while overall oxygen delivery remains high. Areas at risk include deep proximal tubule as well as the medullary thick ascending limb of Henle's loop. 

12203233
Some properties of ion trajectories in the radial plane of an axially symmetric ion trap. 
In this article we analyse the trajectories of externally generated ions injected in the radial plane into the ion trap. The shape of the envelope curves for two-dimensional (2D) ion trajectories is determined. Conditions under which these envelope curves can be transformed into circles are found. We show that the amplitude of ion oscillations is a minimum in this case and that this mode corresponds to optimised ion trapping conditions. Also we discuss a ring-shaped ion trap mass spectrometer electrode system which consists of two ring electrodes, and which utilises ion trajectories with circular envelope curves. 

15344438
Nonsurgical endodontic retreatment. 
The purpose of this clinical article is to emphasize that although there is enormous potential for endodontic success, clinicians are, at times, confronted with post-treatment disease. A rationale for endodontic treatment is followed by the goals of nonsurgical retreatment. The focus of this article is to identify the various nonsurgical retreatment categories and provide an overview of the concepts, armamentarium and techniques available to disassemble roots, address deficiencies or repair defects that are pathological or iatrogenic in origin. 

7960758
[Angioimmunoblastic lymphadenopathy accompanied by Duhring disease-like lesions ] 
A 62-year-old female patient presented with bullous, intensely itching cutaneous lesions, which clinically and histopathologically resembled dermatitis herpetiformis (Duhring's disease). Therapy with DADPS was unsuccessful. Because of associated cervical lymph node enlargement and splenomegaly, a lymph node biopsy was taken. Histopathology of a lymph node and of the bone marrow confirmed the diagnosis: angioimmunoblastic lymphadenopathy (AILD)-type T-cell lymphoma. Intensely pruritic associated skin eruptions are typical for this peculiar kind of lymphoma. These skin lesions are due to inflammatory cells and not to neoplastic infiltrations. This case report is the first report of AILD with bullous skin lesions to appear in the literature. 

10407151
Biosensor measurement of the interaction kinetics between insulin-like growth factors and their binding proteins. 
The binding kinetics of human insulin-like growth factor binding protein (IGFBP) 1-6 for recombinant human insulin-like growth factor (IGF) I and II were measured and compared in the present study using surface plasmon resonance biosensor technique. Different concentrations of IGFBPs (5-100 nM) were allowed to interact with the immobilized IGF-I or IGF-II on sensor chip surface. Both des(1-3)IGF-I and insulin are known to bind weakly to the IGFBPs and therefore are used as negative controls for the binding experiments. The resultant sensorgrams were analyzed by using simple 1:1 binding model to derive both the association rate (k(a)) and dissociation rate (k(d)) constants for IGFBP-IGF interactions. The k(a) values of IGFBPs are in the range of 1x10(4) to 9x10(5) M(-1) s(-1) for IGF-I and 7x10(3) to 1.7x10(6) M(-1) s(-1) for IGF-II, respectively. The orders of k(a) for both IGF-I and IGF-II are IGFBP-3>IGFBP-5>IGFBP-6>IGFBP-4>IGFBP-2>++ +IGFBP-1. The k(d) values of IGFBPs are in the range of 1.5x10(-5) to 2x10(-4) s(-1) for IGF-I and 3.6x10(-5) to 3.7x10(-4) s(-1) for IGF-II, respectively. The order of k(d) for IGF-I is IGFBP-6>IGFBP-5>IGFBP-4>IGFBP-3>IGFBP-2>++ +IGFBP-1 and that for IGF-II is IGFBP-5>IGFBP-6>IGFBP-2>IGFBP-4>IGFBP-3>++ +IGFBP-1, respectively. The equilibrium affinity constants (K(A)) were calculated based on the ratio of k(a)/k(d) and were more precise than the published literature values based on competitive radioligand binding assays. The systematic study enables a direct comparison on the IGF-binding properties among the various IGFBPs, and the kinetic data provide additional information to delineate the physiological role of different IGFBPs in vivo. 

698819
Specific glycine uptake by identified neurons of Aplysia californica. I. Autoradiography. 
The identified giant neurons R3-R14 in the Aplysia parietovisceral ganglion (PVG) have a rapid, Na+-dependent and Hg2+-sensitive uptake system for glycine not found in neighboring neurons. In autoradiographs of PVG incubated in [3H]glycine (glutaraldehyde fix), the cytoplasms of R3-R14 have 3--4 times more silver grains (No./100 sq.micrometer) than other neurons. The glycine uptake system in R3-R14 is selective (alanine, serine, leucine, and proline are taken up equally by all neurons) and is unaffected by reserpine and anisomycin. Neurons R3-R14 contain 2 times less label when ganglia are fixed in formaldehyde than when glutaraldehyde is used as a fixative. Because formaldehyde fixes free amino acids poorly, much of the glycine taken up by R3-R14 is, therefore, not incorporated into protein. In autoradiographs of PVG incubated in [3H]glycine, silver grains are distributed randomly throughout the cytoplasm and nucleus of R3-R14; no association of the grains with the dense core granules characteristic of these neurons7 or other cellular components was found. In contrast, grains in the neurosecretory "bag cells" of the PVG were clustered in numerous discrete areas of the cytoplasm (Golgi complex areas) and the nucleus was only sparsely labeled. The existence of a rapid and selective glycine uptake system in R3-R14, together with their high endogenous glycine concentrations17, suggests that glycine may be a neurotransmitter in these neurons. 

16856099
Antiepileptic drugs for the primary and secondary prevention of seizures after intracranial venous thrombosis. 
BACKGROUND: Intracranial venous thrombosis (ICVT) commonly presents with seizures in the acute period, and some patients may develop recurrent seizures in the long term. The prophylactic use of antiepileptic drugs (AEDs) for the management of post-ICVT seizures is controversial and there is currently no consensus on the optimal management of post-ICVT seizures. OBJECTIVES: To assess the effects of AEDs for the primary and secondary prevention of seizures related to ICVT. (1) Do AEDs reduce the likelihood of seizures in patients who have had an ICVT but have not had a seizure? (2) Do AEDs reduce the likelihood of further seizures in patients who have had an ICVT and at least one seizure? SEARCH STRATEGY: We aimed to identify relevant studies in the Cochrane Epilepsy Group and Cochrane Stroke Group Trials Registers. We also undertook specialised searches of the Cochrane Central Register of Controlled Trials (CENTRAL) and MEDLINE, and checked the reference lists of articles retrieved from the searches. SELECTION CRITERIA: We considered all randomised and quasi-randomised controlled trials in which patients were assigned to a treatment group (that is, receiving at least one AED) or control group (receiving placebo or no drug). DATA COLLECTION AND ANALYSIS: Both review authors independently screened and assessed the methodological quality of the studies. If studies had been included, then one review author would have extracted the data and the other would have checked the extracted data. MAIN RESULTS: No relevant studies were found. AUTHORS' CONCLUSIONS: There is no evidence to support or refute the use of antiepileptic drugs for the primary or secondary prevention of seizures related to intracranial venous thrombosis. Well-designed randomised controlled trials are urgently needed to inform practice. 

8507117
Long-term fate of the aortic root and aortic valve after ascending aneurysm surgery. 
OBJECTIVE: The authors determined in which patients tube graft replacement could be used. SUMMARY BACKGROUND DATA: Tube graft replacement of ascending aortic aneurysms requires no coronary anastomoses and preserves the native aortic valve, but aortic insufficiency or aortic root aneurysms may develop requiring reoperation. Use of Bentall or Cabrol composite valve graft procedures obviates these problems but requires prosthetic valve replacement and coronary reattachment, both of which are associated with complications. These two procedures have been applied increasingly but because of renewed interest in aortic valve preservation and reconstruction, the authors determined in which patients tube replacement could be used. METHODS: The authors analyzed the fate of 277 patients, mean age 49 +/- 14 years, operated on between 1953 and 1992 by techniques that preserved the aortic root. The most common pathology was atherosclerosis in 104 patients. Perioperative mortality since 1975 was 14%. RESULTS: Fifteen patients required reoperation on the ascending aorta or aortic root; ascending aneurysm reoperation (6 patients); aortic valve replacement (8 patients), and a combined procedure (1 patient). Of these 15 patients, 8 had Marfan's syndrome, 10 had dissections, and 5 had medial degeneration/necrosis. CONCLUSIONS: Simple tube graft replacement of the ascending aorta was a durable technique in patients without Marfan's syndrome or medial degeneration/necrosis and allowed preservation of the native aortic valve in many patients. 

11330986
Adiabatic dipolar recoupling in solid-state NMR: the DREAM scheme. 
A theoretical treatment of the DREAM adiabatic homonuclear recoupling experiment is given using Floquet theory. An effective Hamiltonian is derived analytically and the time evolution of the density operator in the adiabatic limit is described. Shape cycles are proposed and characterized experimentally. Application to spin-pair filtering and as a mixing period in a 2D correlation experiment is explored and the experimental results are compared to theoretical predictions and exact numerical simulations. 

12441066
A new parvovirus genotype persistent in human skin. 
Parvovirus B19 is the exclusive human pathogen of the Erythrovirus genus. In classical view, the B19 DNA sequence shows little variability, with no disease-specific or tissue type specific associations. We examined skin biopsies from patients with B19-unrelated skin disease or from constitutionally healthy adults by polymerase chain reaction assays for four different genomic regions of the B19 virus. Sequencing showed that the skin-derived viral DNA differed within the protein-coding region from the B19 reference sequences by 10.8% and from the V9 variant by 8.6% and within the noncoding region (covering nucleotides 189-435 of the promoter region) by 26.5 and 17.2%, respectively. Despite this sequence difference, the promoter region was shown by a luciferase gene expression assay to be biologically active. We have detected a new B19 virus genotype, K71, which differs extensively from the known B19-virus genotypes and is persistently carried in human skin. 

15788597
Micro-CT arthrography: a pilot study for the ex vivo visualization of the rat knee joint. 
OBJECTIVE: In our study, we evaluated the potential of micro-CT for the assessment of the rat knee joint using ex vivo micro-CT arthrography. The aims of the study were to introduce the technique of micro-CT arthrography and to visualize the normal anatomy of the rat knee. The secondary aims were the quantification of retropatellar cartilage thickness and the analysis of microstructural cancellous bone parameters within the tibial epiphysis. CONCLUSION: Micro-CT arthrography is a novel technique for the indirect visualization of the distinct features and structural analysis of the rat knee joint. This technique represents an additional imaging and analysis tool in small-animal research. 

11606624
Paired-pulse plasticity at the single release site level: an experimental and computational study. 
CA3-CA1 glutamatergic synapses in the hippocampus exhibit a large heterogeneity in release probability (p) and paired-pulse (PP) plasticity, established already in the early neonatal period when the CA3-CA1 connections consist of only a single release site. At such a site two factors decide initial release probability: the number of immediately releasable vesicles (preprimed pool) and the vesicle release probability (P(ves1)). Depletion and replenishment of this pool, an alteration in P(ves), and desensitization of postsynaptic receptors may contribute to PP plasticity. A model based on data from single neonatal CA3-CA1 synapses has been used to address the relative importance of these factors for the heterogeneity in PP plasticity. At a 20 msec PP interval, the PP ratio (P(2)/P(1)) varied from 0.1 to 4.5 among the synapses. At this interval desensitization and replenishment were of little importance. The heterogeneity was explained mostly by the variation in P(ves1), whereas the preprimed pool size was of minor importance. P(ves) altered from the first to the second stimulus such that P(ves2) was rather uniform among the synapses. Its variation thus contributed little to the heterogeneity in PP ratio. The model also shows that the relationship between alterations in release probability and PP ratio is complex. Thus, an increase in release probability can be associated with an increase, a decrease, or no change at all in PP ratio, depending on the original values of P(ves1) and the preprimed pool and on which one of these factors is altered to produce the increase in release probability. 

17986656
Perfectionism and the five-factor model of personality. 
In this study of the discriminant, convergent, and incremental validity of the Almost Perfect Scale-Revised (APS-R), university students completed the APS-R, additional measures of perfectionism, the NEO Five-Factor Inventory-Form S, and measures of self-esteem and depression. The results revealed expected significant, but not completely overlapping, associations between the APS-R Discrepancy subscale scores and the Five-Factor Model of Personality (FFM) dimension of Neuroticism, and between the APS-R High Standards and Order subscales and the FFM dimension of Conscientiousness. The incremental validity of APS-R scores over FFM dimensions was supported in analyses of self-esteem but not depression. The implications of these findings for further psychometric and clinical studies of perfectionism and facets of FFM dimensions are discussed. 

1956050
Gossypol and derivatives: a new class of aldose reductase inhibitors. 
Gossypol and 17 derivatives were tested as inhibitors of aldose reductase from human placenta. Gossypol and a number of the derivatives were potent inhibitors. The order of inhibitory activity was interpreted in relation to the Kador-Sharpless pharmacophor model for the aldose reductase inhibitor site. The structural but not the electronic aspects of the model were found to apply to this series of compounds. 

8582368
Highly repetitive DNA sequence elements from Orseolia oryzae (Wood-Mason) discriminate between the Indian isolates and the Asian rice gall midge and the paspalum midge. 
We described multicopy DNA clones isolated from a partial genomic library of Orseolia oryzae, based on reverse genomic hybridization, suitable for studying genetic variation in the Asian rice gall midge and other isomorphic species. Three clones produced monomorphic DNA band patterns between biotypes of O. oryzae but polymorphic patterns were produced between O. oryzae and O. fluvialis, the paspalum midge. These probes detect changes in the repetitive sequence structure between species and constitute the first genetic markers for distinguishing between field isolates of rice gall midge and related species of Orseolia. These will be useful in identifying and perhaps eradicating alternative hosts for this pest, and detecting early-season outbreaks of O. oryzae from light trap collections. 

1157533
Cardiac involvement and prognosis in acute mucocutaneous lymph node syndrome. 
Cardiac involvement and prognosis were studied in the acute febrile mucocutaneous lymph node syndrome which recently has been found among Japanese infants and younger children. The reason for its particular predilection for the main coronary arteries and the pathologic process are discussed in relation to the pathogenesis and nutrient of the main coronary arteries. 

7523509
Cell surface P- and E-selectin support shear-dependent rolling of bovine gamma/delta T cells. 
The vascular selectins P- and E-selectin are inducible adhesion proteins expressed by endothelial cells that have been shown to support shear-dependent rolling of myeloid cells. This interaction is thought to be a prerequisite event for subsequent steps, such as tight adhesion/aggregation and transendothelial cell migration, involved in the accumulation of leukocytes into tissues. Certain lymphocyte subsets have also been shown to bind the vascular selectins, but the importance of this interaction in mediating shear-dependent rolling, as described for myeloid cells, has not been demonstrated. We expand on our earlier observation that bovine gamma/delta T cells bind E-selectin by showing that this interaction leads to a reproducible rolling event in assays done under shear forces that approximate those that occur in vivo. E-selectin, expressed by L cell transfectants or cytokine-stimulated human and bovine endothelial cells, equally supports the shear-dependent rolling interaction. The lymphocyte adhesion proteins L-selectin, CD44, and CD2 do not contribute to this event. Neuraminidase treatment of the gamma/delta T cells or addition of EDTA to the assay completely blocks the rolling interaction. We further show for the first time that P-selectin expressed by thrombin-activated platelets or a soluble P-selectin/human Ig chimera specifically binds gamma/delta T cells. The P-selectin interaction is similar to the rolling event mediated by E-selectin--it requires divalent cations and sialic acid on the lymphocyte, it lacks involvement of L-selectin and CD44, and rolling occurs under physiologic shear conditions. These results provide the documentation that the vascular selectins can support shear-dependent rolling of a lymphocyte subset and that P-selectin mediates the adhesion of gamma/delta T cells. 

14605952
New surgical technique for primary and secondary voice restoration using a free ileocecal patch graft after total laryngectomy. 
PURPOSE: We devised a new surgical technique to restore the voice after laryngectomy. This procedure is designed to repair the hypopharyngeal defect by using a free ileocecal patch for voice rehabilitation. METHODS: We performed this procedure in seven patients; for primary voice restoration in six and for secondary voice restoration in one. The technique involved resecting an ileocecal segment containing the ileocecal valve and cutting a patch from the cecum, the size of which was equalized with the hypopharyngeal defect. After patch repair of the defect, the tracheopharyngeal shunt was completed by an anastomosis between the ileum and trachea. RESULTS: One patient died from sudden rupture of the carotid artery, but all six survivors were able to speak and swallow without aspiration, achieving fair to good articulation. CONCLUSIONS: The advantages of our method are as follows. (1) The operative procedure is simple and does not require complicated remodeling of the intestinal graft for voice production. (2) The ileocecal valve can prevent aspiration. (3) The patch expands the pharynx and prevents narrowing. (4) Using this procedure, it is possible to achieve voice restoration even in patients who have undergone total laryngectomy in the past. 

7168263
[Treatment of habitual shoulder dislocation with the Bruckner binding method] 
101 patients with recurrent dislocation of the shoulder joint, who had undergone the Bruckner-plasty between 1974 and 1981 were followed up. Good and very good results were obtained in 33.7%, moderate ones in 13.8% and poor ones in 52.8%. When following-up 135 operations, 49.0% of redislocations could be observed. Despite of its many advantages this method should in future only be practised in old people and children or in cases without the Hill-Sachs- and the Bankart-lesion. 

2442278
Effects of 4,4'-di-isothiocyano-2,2'-stilbene disulphonate on iodide uptake by primary cultures of turtle thyroid follicular cells. 
Iodide uptake by primary cultures of turtle thyroid follicular cells is directly proportional to the Na+ concentration and is inversely proportional to the HCO3- concentration in culture medium, but is not affected by the Cl- concentration. Addition of 4,4'-di-isothiocyano-2,2'-stilbene disulphonate (DIDS; 10 mumol/l and higher doses) to medium containing different concentrations of Na+ (5-140 mmol/l), HCO3- (0-40 mmol/l) and Cl- (120 mmol/l) generally enhanced iodide uptake by the cultured cells; however, there was no significant effect in Na+-free and in low Cl- (90 mmol/l and less) medium. The inhibitory effects on iodide uptake of ouabain, frusemide and perchlorate were attenuated by DIDS which also antagonized the stimulatory effects on iodide uptake of TSH, although both DIDS and TSH increased the 125I- cell/medium ratio when they were given alone. At doses of 100 mumol/l and higher, DIDS lowered the intracellular pH of cultured cells when the pH of the medium was maintained at a constant level. It also increased the intracellular Cl- concentration, but had no effect on intracellular Na+ or K+. The input and specific resistances of cell membranes in cultured thyroid cells and in isolated thyroid slices increased (decreased conductance) after adding DIDS to the perfusion fluids. Both Na+/K+- and HCO3(-)-ATPase activities in homogenates of turtle thyroid tissue were inhibited by DIDS. Results from this investigation demonstrate (1) that in addition to preventing the leak of iodide from thyroid cells, DIDS may act to increase the sensitivity of the Na+-anion carrier to I- and thereby increases iodide uptake, and (2) that a HCO3(-)-Cl- exchange system is present in the thyroid cell membrane and appears to be linked to the transport of iodide into thyroid cells. 

17599719
Ethical issues in clinical neuroscience research: a patient's perspective. 
A patient-centered paradigm for clinical research and medical care is presented as a solution to the problem of declining innovation and increasing costs and development time in the pipeline for new therapies. Fundamental differences in values and motivations among scientists, clinicians, industry sponsor, and patients in neurotherapeutics provide a framework for analysis of ethical conflicts and the loss of public confidence in medical research. Parkinson advocates' views on clinical trial participation, perceived risks and benefits, placebo controls, and sham surgery are presented. These views reflect the sense of urgency and the unique perspective that comes from living with this progressive, debilitating condition full time. A patient-centered paradigm that includes authentic voices of patients as collaborators at every stage of development will help to resolve conflicts, build trust, recruit trial participants, and accelerate new therapies. Key elements are adaptive clinical trial methods and the development of information technology for the assessment of outcomes and surveillance of safety over the life cycle of a medical product. Supported by the Parkinson's Disease Foundation, the Parkinson Pipeline Project is a grassroots group of Parkinson's patients whose goal is to represent an authentic voice for patients in the treatment development process. This group promotes education and communication between members of the Parkinson's community and active stakeholders in medical research, industry, and regulatory agencies. Its members are an example of a new breed of knowledgeable consumers, armed with first-hand access to research findings and reinforced by on-line connections to like-minded peers throughout the world. 

2346456
Correlation of umbilical cord whole blood viscosity and the presence of fetal distress at birth: a mathematical modelling study. 
This study was designed to investigate the relationship between umbilical cord blood viscosity and clinical parameters such as maternal parity, maternal smoking, mode of delivery, sex of infant and the incidence of fetal distress at birth using mathematical modelling. The results demonstrated vaginal delivery, male infants, infants of primigravidas and low cord whole blood viscosity at a high shear rate were covariables and were associated with an increased incidence of fetal distress and low Apgar scores. 

12683744
Transient kinetic approach to the study of acetylcholinesterase reversible inhibition by eseroline. 
The kinetic rate constants for interaction of (-)-eseroline-(3aS-cis)-1,2,3,3a,8,8a-hexahydro-1,3a,8-trimethylpyrrolo-[2,3-b]indol-5-ol with electric eel acetylcholinesterase (EC 3.1.1.7, acetylcholine acetylhydrolase) were measured at a low substrate concentration according to a transient kinetic approach by using a rapid experimental technique. The measurements were carried out on a stopped-flow apparatus where pre-incubated samples of enzyme with various inhibitor concentrations were diluted with a buffer solution containing the substrate. The experimental data in the form of sigmoid-shaped progress curves were analysed by applying an explicit progress curve equation that described the time dependence of product released during the reaction. The kinetic parameters were evaluated by non-linear regression treatment and the values of the corresponding constants showed approximately the equal affinities of eseroline and eserine (cf. Stojan, J. and Zorko, M. (1997) Biochim. Biophys. Acta, 1337, 75-84.) for binding into the active centre of the enzyme. On the other hand, the kinetic rates for association and dissociation of eseroline were two grades of magnitude higher than those of eserine. The explanation appears to be a substantionally impaired gliding of eserine into the active site gorge by the great mobility of the carbamoyl tail as well as by its numerous possible interactions with the residues lining the gorge. Additionally, a study of the dependence of the transition phase information on the inhibitor concentration was carried out using our experimental data. 

15575373
Outbreak of Mycobacterium bovis in a conditioned colony of rhesus (Macaca mulatta) and cynomolgus (Macaca fascicularis) macaques. 
We describe a tuberculosis outbreak caused by Mycobacterium bovis in a conditioned colony of rhesus (Macaca mulatta) and cynomolgus (Macaca fascicularis) macaques. Animals in five rooms were exposed, but most (16/27) infections were confined to the room that housed a mixed population of cynomolgus and rhesus macaques. In this room, rhesus (8/8) and cynomolgus (10/11) macaques naturally exposed to M. bovis were infected at nearly identical rates (Fisher exact test, 2-tailed P = 1). The clinical signs of disease and pathologic lesions in infected macaques, however, were moderately different between the two species. Rhesus macaques were more likely (5/8) to exhibit clinical signs of persistent coughing and inappetance, and had more severe pulmonary lesions. By contrast, clinical signs of disease were seen in only 1 of 19 cynomolgus macaques, and overall, the pulmonary lesions were often focal and less severe, although some still had severe involvement of the lungs similar to that seen in rhesus macaques. These differences should be taken into consideration when developing or evaluating a tuberculosis-screening program. On the basis of observations made during this outbreak, we recommend that alternative screening methods such as the PRIMAGAM test and the ESAT-6 ELISA, be incorporated into the screening program to aid in the identification of infected animals. 

8480736
Endogenous sex hormones and cholesterol gallstones: a case-control study in an echographic survey of gallstones. 
In a population survey of gallstones, the serum levels of hormones of the pituitary-gonadal axis and the sex hormone-binding globulin (SHBG) were compared in subjects with cholesterol gallstones and in a control group. In 84 subjects who entered the survey, echographic gallstones that had been identified at the survey, turned out to be radiolucent or mixed (predominantly of cholesterol) at subsequent x-ray. The controls were without gallstones at echography, matched to the cases for potential confounders of the association sex hormones-cholelithiasis. Testosterone (T) 17-beta-estradiol (E2), 17-OH progesterone (P), and SHBG were dosed by radioimmunoassay; follicle-stimulating hormone (FSH), luteinizing hormone (LH), and prolactin (Prl) by dissociation-enhanced lanthanide fluoro immunoassay (DELFIA). Men with gallstones had lower LH than controls (n = 34, median difference = -0.62 mU/ml, 95% confidence interval (CI) -1.20 to -0.26 mU/ml, paired sign test, p = 0.003). Premenopausal women in the luteal phase of the menstrual cycle with gallstones had higher E2 than controls (n = 7, median difference: +117, pg/ml, 95% CI: +10 to +218 pg/ml, p = 0.008). Postmenopausal women had lower LH than controls (n = 35, median difference = -4.57 mU/ml, 95% CI -9.5 to -1.0 mU/ml, p = 0.04). No other hormones showed statistically significant differences between cases and controls, in either males or females. The findings of this exploratory study in subjects with radiolucent and mixed gallstones suggest that men and postmenopausal women have lower LH, and premenopausal women in the luteal phase of the cycle have higher E2, than controls. 

9732553
H19 and Igf2 are expressed and differentially imprinted in neuroectoderm-derived cells in the mouse brain. 
Igf2 and H19 are reciprocally imprinted genes that are closely linked and coexpressed in tissues of mesodermal and endodermal origin. Here we report that coexpression of these genes is also found in specific fetal tissues of neuroectodermal origin, that is in the ventral midline region of both the hindbrain and spinal cord. For cells of neuroectodermal origin, complete absence of Igf2 and H19 transcription was previously described. Analysis of allele-specific expression of both Igf2 and H19 in the ventral midline region of the hindbrain shows that H19 is expressed monoallelically, with the paternal allele being silent, whereas Igf2 is expressed biallelically. Furthermore, we observed a strong influence of the parental species background, in that the Mus musculus allele was always expressed at higher levels than the M. spretus allele. This was observed when the M. spretus allele was contributed by the mother or by the father. An analysis of Igf2 methylation by bisulphite genomic sequencing provided no clear answer as to whether Igf2 expression and methylation are linked in a tissue of neuroectodermal origin. Taken together, our results provide novel information on H19 and Igf2 expression and imprinting patterns in the fetal mouse brain. In addition, they indicate that some aspects of Igf2 regulation in cells of neuroectodermal origin do not follow the pattern that exists in mesoderm- and endoderm-derived tissues. Apart from the ventral midline region, H19 and Igf2 were found to be coexpressed in the ectodermally derived Rathke's pouch and in some circumventricular organs of the brain, such as the organum vasculosum of the lamina terminalis (OVLT) and the pineal gland. 

7082027
Actinic reticuloid via persistent light reaction from photoallergic contact dermatitis. 
Photoallergic contact dermatitis developed in a patient who had used deodorant soaps containing tribromsalan. He persistently reacted to light, since the dermatitis persisted long after cessation of contact with the causative chemical. During this period, he experienced generalized, eczematous dermatitis on several occasions. On testing, the patient showed extremely severe photosensitivity extending through the ultraviolet to the visible spectrum. At that time, a skin biopsy specimen showed the microscopic findings of eczematous dermatitis. A diagnosis of actinic reticuloid was first made histologically nine years after the initial examinations, when the patient was 56 years old. This long-term follow-up study may support the view that photoallergic contact dermatitis, persistent light reaction, and actinic reticuloid could constitute various phases of a single disease. 

2472130
Measurement of alpha-fetoprotein and fetal erythrocyte levels for detecting fetomaternal hemorrhage. 
This study was designed to measure changes in AFP levels and increases in fetal red cells in maternal blood before and after delivery to detect fetomaternal hemorrhaging in 41 full-term singleton deliveries. Discrepancy was noted between the increase in fetal red cells and the elevation of AFP levels. Six cases (14.6%) showed both elevation of AFP levels and an increase in fetal red cells. Six showed elevation of HbF concentration with stable AFP levels, and another 6 showed an increase in maternal serum AFP levels with stable HbF concentration. The measurements of maternal serum AFP levels seem highly useful for detecting FMH in the presence of fetomaternal blood incompatibility. 

3728409
Depressed parents and their children. General health, social, and psychiatric problems. 
Two hundred twenty children (aged 6 to 23 years) from families with either depressed or normal (nonpsychiatrically ill) parents of comparable sociodemographic backgrounds were studied. The children from families in which at least one parent had experienced a major depression were reported to have had more adverse perinatal events; were later in achieving some developmental landmarks; had more convulsions, head injuries, operations, and psychiatric disorders (particularly major depression); and made more suicide attempts. Overall, there were no significant differences in IQ between children in both groups. Mothers in families with a depressed parent reported more medical problems during pregnancy and labor, and the children were reported to have experienced more distress at birth. Since major depression is a highly prevalent disorder in women of childbearing ages, these findings have direct clinical implications for pediatricians. Their specificity for major depression, as contrasted with other psychiatric disorders or chronic illnesses in the parents, requires further study. 

11295728
Celiac disease presenting with microcephaly. 
A 15-month-old girl with celiac disease presented with microcephaly and developmental delay. Head growth resumed during a gluten-free diet. Subsequent gluten ingestion resulted in no head growth, areflexia, and increased celiac antibodies. All resolved with gluten elimination. Poor head growth may precede other clinical manifestations of celiac disease. 

11084952
Neuroendocrine manifestations in Sjogren's syndrome. 
Molecular biology has had a major impact on our concepts of the immune system and its relation to neuroendocrine axes, in particular, the adrenal, gonadal, and thyroid axes. It is now well established that not only are the biosynthetic and catabolic pathways of glucocorticoids and sex hormones (estrogen, progesterone, and testosterone) closely related but that the receptors for these hormones are part of a supergene family of receptors which include (in addition to these hormone receptors) the mineralocorticoid receptor, thyroid hormone receptor, retinoic acid receptors, and vitamin D receptors. This suggests a complex network of steroid hormones and receptors for the control and integration of a multitude of physiologic functions at a systemic level. The immune system seems to be tightly integrated into this homeostatic neuroendocrine regulatory network. The neurophysiologic and biochemical events that promote successful adaptation during stressful situations are now identified for illnesses that seem to occur as a result of or are associated with dysregulation of the stress response. One difficulty in interpreting the mechanisms of HPA axis dysfunction in autoimmune-inflammatory syndromes arises from the plasticity of the hormonal systems involved. Levels of hormones produced and receptors reset rapidly with changes in the hormonal milieu (deficiency or excess) and have likely changed during the course of the chronic immune disorder. This, in turn, is further confounded by the pleomorphic natural history of most autoimmune-inflammatory diseases such as SS. The levels of sex hormones and their receptors are tightly linked to HPA axis function. It may be that significant changes in the estrogen-to-androgen ratio or the ratio of their receptors alter the activity of steroid-sensitive cells such as the individual immune cells or epithelial cells, thus providing a means for endocrine regulation of the immune response in SS. Studies in the closely related disorder RA support this hypothesis. Taken together, adrenal and gonadal steroid hormone deficiency plus elevated PRL levels probably greatly facilitate cellular immunity in SS patients. This hypothesis in SS is supported by a growing body of data indicating that RA develops as a consequence of a deficiency in adrenal and gonadal steroid hormone production. It is noteworthy that the findings in female SS patients indicated a central deficiency in all three neuroendocrine axes: adrenal, gonadal, and thyroid. At present, it is not clear if any one system plays a primary role in the expression of the disease. Rather, it is likely that the net effect involves the synergistic and antagonistic effects of multiple hormones, making the specific effects of individual hormones difficult to discern. 

9059752
HELLP syndrome in a pregnant patient with a past history of splenectomy for idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura. Case report. 
Case: We present a case of HELLP syndrome occuring in a patient who at the age of 8 years had undergone a splenectomy for idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura. She was diagnosed as having HELLP syndrome 37 weeks of gestation and had a cesarean section. 

15120909
Application of bacterial artificial chromosome array-based comparative genomic hybridization and spectral karyotyping to the analysis of glioblastoma multiforme. 
Identification of genetic losses and gains is valuable in analysis of brain tumors. Locus-by-locus analyses have revealed correlations between prognosis and response to chemotherapy and loss or gain of specific genes and loci. These approaches are labor intensive and do not provide a global view of the genetic changes within the tumor cells. Bacterial artificial chromosome (BAC) arrays, which cover the genome with an average resolution of less than 1 MbP, allow defining the sum total of these genetic changes in a single comparative genomic hybridization (CGH) experiment. These changes are directly overlaid on the human genome sequence, thus providing the extent of the amplification or deletion, reflected by a megabase position, and gene content of the abnormal region. Although this array-based CGH approach (CGHa) seems to detect the extent of the genetic changes in tumors reliably, it has not been robustly tested. We compared genetic changes in four newly derived, early-passage glioma cell lines, using spectral karyotyping (SKY) and CGHa. Chromosome changes seen in cell lines under SKY analysis were also detected with CGHa. In addition, CGHa detected cryptic genetic gains and losses and resolved the nature of subtle marker chromosomes that could not be resolved with SKY, thus providing distinct advantages over previous technologies. There was remarkable general concordance between the CGHa results comparing the cell lines to the original tumor, except that the magnitude of the changes seen in the tumor sample was generally suppressed compared with the cell lines, a consequence of normal cells contaminating the tumor sample. CGHa revealed changes in cell lines that were not present in the original tumors and vice versa, even when analyzed at the earliest passage possible, which highlights the adaptation of the cells to in vitro culture. CGHa proved to be highly accurate and efficient for identifying genetic changes in tumor cells. This approach can accurately identify subtle, novel genetic abnormalities in tumors directly linked to the human genome sequence. CGHa far surpasses the resolution and information provided by conventional metaphase CGH, without relying on in vitro culture of tumors for metaphase spreads. 

190317
The direct antiviral cytotoxicity by bovine lymphocytes is not restricted by genetic incompatibility of lymphocytes and target cells. 
Experiments were designed to determine if in the ox a requirement for genetic compatibility between antiviral cytotoxic cells and target cells was needed for cytotoxicity to occur. Unrelated bovine animals were immunized with vaccinia or IBR virus (a herpesvirus), and PBL were collected at various times for measurement of their cytotoxicity against autologous or heterologous uninfected or virus-infected fibroblasts. In all instances, cytotoxicity was expressed against heterologous as well as autologous targets and in most cases there was no evidence of enhanced killing of autologous cells. The cytotoxicity was shown to be direct, presumably T cell mediated, and was not attributable to ADCC. The likelihood of the animals under investigation sharing histocompatibility antigens was considered extremely remote but was not formally excluded. 

1904837
Detection of novel sequence heterogeneity and haplotypic diversity of HLA class II genes. 
Nucleic acid sequences of the second exons of HLA-DRB1, -DRB3/4/5, -DQB1, and -DQA1 genes were determined from 43 homozygous cell lines, representing each of the known class II haplotypes, and from 30 unrelated Caucasian subjects, comprising 60 haplotypes. This systematic sequence analysis was undertaken in order to a) determine the existence of sequence microheterogeneity among cell lines which type as identical by methods other than sequencing; b) determine whether direct sequencing of class II genes will identify the presence of more extensive sequence polymorphism at the population level than that identified with other typing methods; c) accurately determine the molecular composition of the known class II haplotypes; and d) study their evolutionary relatedness by maximum parsimony analysis. The identification of seven previously unidentified haplotypes carrying five new allelic amino acid sequences suggests that sequence microheterogeneity at the population level may be more frequent than previously thought. Maximum parsimony analysis of these haplotypes allowed their evolutionary classification and indicates that the higher mutation rate at DRB1 compared to DQB1 loci in most haplotypic groups is inversed in specific haplotype lineages. Furthermore, the extent and localization of gene conversions and point mutations at class II loci in the evolution of these haplotypes is significantly different at each locus. Identification of additional HLA class II molecular microheterogeneity suggests that direct sequence analysis of class II HLA genes can uncover new allelic sequences in the population and may represent a useful alternative to current typing methodologies to study the effects of sequence allelism in organ transplantation. 

3051413
Postoperative jaundice. 
Jaundice in the postoperative patient is a common complication of surgery that may be a confusing and potentially serious problem. The surgical patient is subjected to a variety of stresses, such as hypotension, infection, drugs, and anesthetic agents, many of which are potentially hepatotoxic. Management of the patient with postoperative jaundice can be difficult because the precise cause of the hepatic insult is frequently indeterminate. It is important for the clinician to recognize the patterns of liver injury that may occur in the postoperative period in order to initiate appropriate management. 

120163
Response of peritoneal cells to horseradish peroxidase and aldehyde-fixed erythrocytes in the mouse: an electron microscope study. 
In adult dd-mice, response of peritoneal free cells to either horseradish peroxidase (HRP) or glutaraldehyde-fixed erythrocytes were examined by electron microscopy. As reported previously (ABE et al., 1979), peritoneal free cells are classified into three types: type I, II and III cells. Type I cells are small lymphocytes, type II cells are medium-sized mononuclear cells, and type III cells are macrophages. The amount of HRP taken up is very large in type III cells. The cells contain numerous vacuoles filled with HRP. Type I and II cells also have vesicles containing HRP. The vesicles are fewer in type I cells than in type II. Type III cells rapidly enclose erythrocytes by thin cytoplasmic flaps and then ingest several erythrocytes. In type III cells, a labyrinth of ramifying tubes seen in the peripheral cytoplasm may serve as a reserve of the membrane system for allowing a rapid coverage and internalization of large foreign materials. A part of type II cells attach to erythrocytes and take them by a varying depth of invagination. Type I cells do not respond to erythrocytes at all. In conclusion, the three types of peritoneal cells can be differentiated by their response to foreign materials as well as by their cytologic features. 

1507752
[Radical surgical treatment of patients with cancer of the stomach] 
The results of surgical treatment of 158 patients with gastric cancer, using the original techniques for the esophago-gastric and esophago-intestinal anastomoses formation, have been summarized. Gastrectomy was performed in 65.2%, subtotal proximal reaction of the stomach--in 8.9%, subtotal distal resection--in 25.9% of the patients. The postoperative lethality was 3.2%. At late complex examination, I stage reflux esophagitis after gastrectomy was observed in 3 (3.4%) patients, after proximal gastric resection--in 1 (8.3%). After the operation, 32 (20.3%) patients are alive for 5 and more years. 

7770955
Trypanosomosis and reproduction: II. Effect of Trypanosoma vivax infection on pregnancy and post-partum cyclicity in ewes. 
The effect of infection with Trypanosoma vivax on pregnancy and post-partum cyclicity in ewes was investigated. Of the 5 ewes infected in the first trimester, 3 died without aborting and 2 after aborting. Intrauterine infection occurred in 2 of the foetuses removed at post mortem. Of the 5 infected in the third trimester, one ewe died without aborting, one lambed prematurely and 3 at term. Intrauterine infection occurred in one of the lambs born at term. None of the lambs were viable. The termination of pregnancy may be as a result of stress. The ewes infected in the third trimester commenced irregular cyclicity 13 to 23 days post partum. 

12358575
Hormone replacement therapy after a diagnosis of breast cancer: cancer recurrence and mortality. 
OBJECTIVE: To determine whether hormone replacement therapy (HRT) after treatment for breast cancer is associated with increased risk of recurrence and mortality. DESIGN: Retrospective observational study. PARTICIPANTS AND SETTING: Postmenopausal women diagnosed with breast cancer and treated by five Sydney doctors between 1964 and 1999. OUTCOME MEASURES: Times from diagnosis to cancer recurrence or new breast cancer, to death from all causes and to death from primary tumour were compared between women who used HRT for menopausal symptoms after diagnosis and those who did not. Relative risks (RRs) were determined from Cox regression analyses, adjusted for patient and tumour characteristics. RESULTS: 1122 women were followed up for 0-36 years (median, 6.08 years); 154 were lost to follow-up. 286 women used HRT for menopausal symptoms for up to 26 years (median, 1.75 years). Compared with non-users, HRT users had reduced risk of cancer recurrence (adjusted relative risk [RR], 0.62; 95% CI, 0.43-0.87), all-cause mortality (RR, 0.34; 95% CI, 0.19-0.59) and death from primary tumour (RR, 0.40; 95% CI, 0.22-0.72). Continuous combined HRT was associated with a reduced risk of death from primary tumour (RR, 0.32; 95% CI, 0.12-0.88) and all-cause mortality (RR, 0.27; 95% CI, 0.10-0.73). CONCLUSION: HRT use for menopausal symptoms by women treated for primary invasive breast cancer is not associated with an increased risk of breast cancer recurrence or shortened life expectancy. 

903048
Accidental fatal drug poisoning with particular erference to dextropropoxyphene. 
A rapid increase in fatal accidental dextropropoxyphene poisonings which is proportional to the increased use of the drug is reported. In 30 accidental poisonings dextropropoxyphene was responsible for 50% of the cases, and is the most common accidental medical poisoning at the present time. This is probably due to the unappreciated narrow margin between therapeutic and fatal dose and the simultaneous intake of alcohol which increases the resorbtion speed from the gastro-intestinal tract. In Denmark a slow-release preparation is frequently used. which is especially dangerous because of repeated dosage by the patient attempting to induce the therapeutic effect more quickly. 

14518293
[Selective bradykinin B1 receptor block in ischemia/reperfusion of the rat pancreas] 
The selective bradykinin B1-receptor-antagonist CP-0298 reduces ischemia/reperfusion induced enhanced leukocyte adherence in postcapillary venules of the pancreas, but has no influence on the microvascular perfusion failure. The postischemic enzyme release will effectively attenuated by the antagonist. Wether the activation of the B1-receptor under pathophysiological conditions exerts protective effects to maintain the integrity of the pancreas, has to be evaluated in further experiments. 

503303
Interhemispheric and sex differences in the visual evoked response recovery cycle. 
The recovery cycle of the flash-evoked response was studied in 6 female and 6 male right-handed subjects of comparable age. The aim of the study was to evidence possible interhemispheric differences between occipital leads. Two flashes, presented at graded time intervals between 20 and 150 msec, allowed the computation of an amplitude ratio between the second and the first evoked response, considering the III--IV peak-to-peak amplitude. A faster recovery was found for the left hemisphere, with more pronounced interhemispheric differences in male than in female subjects. Women showed a more reduced amplitude recovery than men and a somewhat different time-course of the recovery function. Women also showed less waveshape similarity between evoked responses elicited by the second of a pair of flashes in the right and left hemisphere. These findings are discussed in terms of differences in speed of information processing by both cerebral hemispheres. It is suggested that recovery cycle studies may contribute to brain laterality research and be of particular relevance to psychiatric studies involving assumptions about differential hemispheric excitability. 

10571394
Retrospective study of macular holes treated with pars plana vitrectomy. 
BACKGROUND: Tangential vitreo-foveal traction resulting in full-thickness macular hole is an important cause of visual loss. PURPOSE: To determine, correlate and evaluate the factors that affect the anatomical and visual outcome of macular hole surgery. METHOD: Retrospective analysis of all cases of macular hole surgery undertaken by a single surgeon (RDB) between 1995 and 1998. RESULTS: One hundred eyes were analysed with a minimum follow-up of 3 months. One operation anatomical success rate was 95%. Anatomically successful eyes had visual acuity improvement of one or more lines in 73.4% and two or more lines in 66.3%. Failure to remove diaphanous contractile 'epiretinal' membranes (presumably the internal limiting membrane) around the macular hole was significantly associated with anatomical failure (P < 0.001). Improvement of two or more lines of visual acuity was significantly associated with successful anatomical closure of the macular hole (P = 0.001). The success rate was highest in the more recent cases, suggesting a learning curve effect. Postoperatively, cataract developed or progressed in 96% of phakic eyes. Retinal detachment occurred in 6%, with all eyes having the retina reattached following subsequent surgery. Gross retinal pigment epithelial changes at the macula region developed in 3%. CONCLUSION: Meticulous rapid dissection of adherent, diaphanous 'epiretinal' membrane around the macular hole, combined with gas tamponade and postoperative posturing, result in successful anatomical closure with improved visual acuity. 

17996686
1,25-dihydroxyvitamin D3 and dexamethasone increase interleukin-10 production in CD4+ T cells from patients with Crohn's disease. 
BACKGROUND AND AIM: In Crohn's disease (CD), epidemiological data and animal studies suggest that vitamin D (vitD) has protective immune-modulating properties. 1,25-dihydroxyvitamin D3 and dexamethasone (DEX) induce interleukin (IL)-10 productions in healthy controls (HC) T cells. We studied if 1,25-dihydroxyvitamin D3 with and without DEX could induce IL-10 production, downregulate pro-inflammatory Interferon (IFN)-gamma and Tumor Necrosis Factor (TNF)-alpha production, and influence cell kinetics in peripheral CD4+ T cells from CD patients. METHODS: CD4+ T cells were separated from peripheral blood from CD patients and HC. Cells were activated by anti-CD3 and anti-CD28 in the presence of 1,25-dihydroxyvitamin D3 and/or DEX. Cytokine levels, proliferation, and apoptosis were measured following 7 days of culture. RESULTS: In T cells from CD patients, 1,25-dihydroxyvitamin D3 and DEX increased IL-10 production from a median of 0.08 ng/ml to 0.2 ng/ml (p<0.01) and downregulated IFN-gamma production from 8.3 ng/ml to 3.1 ng/ml (p<0.01). The induced IL-10 increase in cultures from HC (0.2 ng/ml to 1.0 ng/ml, p<0.01) was significantly higher than in CD patients (p<0.05). In CD cultures, the IL-4 production increased from 0.3 ng/ml to 0.5 ng/ml (p<0.01) and IL-6 production from 2.5 ng/ml to 6.1 ng/ml (p<0.05). Similar changes in cytokine levels were observed with 1,25-dihydroxyvitamin D3 independently of DEX. In addition, 1,25-dihydroxyvitamin D3 and DEX decreased proliferation and reduced viability of T cells. CONCLUSION: We found that 1,25-dihydroxyvitamin D3 with and without DEX stimulation increased IL-10 and reduced IFN-gamma production. These findings suggest that vitD may play a therapeutic role in CD. 

7535927
Fate of a redundant gamma-globin gene in the atelid clade of New World monkeys: implications concerning fetal globin gene expression. 
Conclusive evidence was provided that gamma 1, the upstream of the two linked simian gamma-globin loci (5'-gamma 1-gamma 2-3'), is a pseudogene in a major group of New World monkeys. Sequence analysis of PCR-amplified genomic fragments of predicted sizes revealed that all extant genera of the platyrrhine family Atelidae [Lagothrix (woolly monkeys), Brachyteles (woolly spider monkeys), Ateles (spider monkeys), and Alouatta (howler monkeys)] share a large deletion that removed most of exon 2, all of intron 2 and exon 3, and much of the 3' flanking sequence of gamma 1. The fact that two functional gamma-globin genes were not present in early ancestors of the Atelidae (and that gamma 1 was the dispensible gene) suggests that for much or even all of their evolution, platyrrhines have had gamma 2 as the primary fetally expressed gamma-globin gene, in contrast to catarrhines (e.g., humans and chimpanzees) that have gamma 1 as the primary fetally expressed gamma-globin gene. Results from promoter sequences further suggest that all three platyrrhine families (Atelidae, Cebidae, and Pitheciidae) have gamma 2 rather than gamma 1 as their primary fetally expressed gamma-globin gene. The implications of this suggestion were explored in terms of how gene redundancy, regulatory mutations, and distance of each gamma-globin gene from the locus control region were possibly involved in the acquisition and maintenance of fetal, rather than embryonic, expression. 

11212420
A validated calibration method for hydrogen peroxide vapour sensors. 
A method of calibrating hydrogen peroxide vapour sensors is described which is based on the well-defined saturated vapour pressures of hydrogen peroxide over its aqueous solutions at fixed temperatures. The calibration technique was developed for use with amperometric gas sensors but could be applied to other sensor types. The method can be used over the entire range of vapour pressures that are likely to be of practical interest in the context of isolator sterilisation and has been reliably validated by quantitative volumetric analysis. The method depends not only on the well understood underlying principles but also on the solution of practical problems associated with ensuring full saturation of the carrier gas stream and, simultaneously, the elimination of aerosol droplets which might otherwise interfere with the calibration. 

12777379
Peptides induce ATP hydrolysis at both subunits of the transporter associated with antigen processing. 
The transporter associated with antigen processing (TAP) plays a key role in the adaptive immune response by pumping antigenic peptides into the endoplasmic reticulum for subsequent loading of major histocompatibility complex class I molecules. TAP is a heterodimer consisting of TAP1 and TAP2. Each subunit is composed of a transmembrane domain and a nucleotide-binding domain, which energizes the peptide transport. To analyze ATP hydrolysis of each subunit we developed a method of trapping 8-azido-nucleotides to TAP in the presence of phosphate transition state analogs followed by photocross-linking, immunoprecipitation, and high resolution SDS-PAGE. Strikingly, trapping of both TAP subunits by beryllium fluoride is peptide-specific. The peptide concentration required for half-maximal trapping is identical for TAP1 and TAP2 and directly correlates with the peptide binding affinity. Only a background level of trapping was observed for low affinity peptides or in the presence of the herpes simplex viral protein ICP47, which specifically blocks peptide binding to TAP. Importantly, the peptide-induced trapped state is reached after ATP hydrolysis and not in a backward reaction of ADP binding and trapping. In the trapped state, TAP can neither bind nor exchange nucleotides, whereas peptide binding is not affected. In summary, these data support the model that peptide binding induces a conformation that triggers ATP hydrolysis in both subunits of the TAP complex within the catalytic cycle. 

6089444
[Lymphatic diseases specific to the tropics (Burkitt's lymphoma, tropical splenomegaly and Mediterranean lymphoma)] 
Certain lymphoproliferative disorders (Burkitt's lymphoma, tropical splenomegaly, and Mediterranean lymphoma) are more frequently observed in the tropical or subtropical areas than in other parts of the world. The polymicrobial exposure of human beings in those areas to viral, bacterial and protozoal infections led to the assumption of a specific connection between these conditions and the lymphoproliferative disease. Some evidence has accumulated that the Epstein-Barr virus might be an oncogenic virus connected with the development of Burkitt's lymphoma. Repeated plasmodial infections were more tenuously thought to be associated with tropical splenomegaly and, similarly, Giardia lamblia or Vibrio cholerae infections with immunoproliferative small-intestinal disease. However, those connections are only speculative and by no means proven. Small-intestinal lymphoma represents an example of a wide spectrum of manifestations covering autonomous pre-malignant immunoproliferative stages, als well as the full-blown malignant stages. Polyclonal activation and proliferation of B-lymphocytes, as well as concomitant immunosuppression are the characteristic features of the pre-malignant situation and may be the basis for the malignant transformation of single cells. Thus, the final clinical picture resembles that of a malignant non-Hodgkin lymphoma. 

9384151
Development of an ostomy competency. 
Staff educators and staff nurses developed an ostomy competency, with the guidance and expertise of the advanced practitioner and enterostomal nurse at a large teaching hospital. The competency improved the quality of care for surgical ostomy patients. Care was standardized and staff nurses' clinical knowledge was enhanced. Following the sessions, staff nurses verbalized increased confidence in working with patients with ostomies and demonstrated increased autonomy and problem-solving abilities. No variances in educational aspects of care were noted on clinical pathways. 

1582186
Some chemical properties of the HCl-methanol extract from the puparial cuticle of Drosophila melanogaster. 
1. The HCl-methanol (HCl-MeOH) soluble fraction from the puparial cuticle of yellow, black and ebony of D. melanogaster was hydrolyzed in hydrochloric acid and examined for beta-alanine, ketocatechol, and acetic acid. 2. Between beta-alanine and ketocatechol and between beta-alanine and acetic acid, a quantitatively inverse relationship was found, respectively. The former relationship was further confirmed by the feeding experiment of beta-alanine to black. 3. Of total beta-alanine in the HCl-MeOH extract, the proportion of those having free amino group was 74.8 per cent. 4. All these results indicate that the HCl-MeOH soluble fraction of the puparial cuticle may be useful for investigating the cross-link structure of the cuticle. 

6247314
The polymyxin sensitivity and the phosphatidyl ethanolamine content of the Vibrio cholerae membranes. 
The phospholipid composition of three different strains of Vibrio cholerae was determined by quantitative two-dimensional thin-layer chromatography. The polymyxin sensitivity of the whole organisms or of the liposomes derived from the total phospholipids of these organisms depended solely on the phosphatidyl ethanolamine content of the system concerned and could be quantitatively related by the equations Y1 = 1.074 X1 - 9.828 and Y2 = 1.22 X2 - 34.47 where Y represents the maximum lysis (%)/hr and X, the % phosphatidyl ethanolamine content of the system concerned, the suffix 1 and 2 corresponding to the liposomal and the whole organisms respectively. The analysis revealed the requirement of a threshold amount of phosphatidyl ethanolamine for the expression of polymyxin action on the system concerned. 

6262347
A terminal labelling assay using 3H-uridine to measure cell-mediated cytotoxic responses against parainfluenza type 3 infected target cells. 
The standardisation of a terminal labelling cytotoxicity assay which used the incorporation of 3H-uridine to measure target cell survival of the effector phase is described. This assay was applied to a preliminary study of the cell-mediated responses of sheep following intravenous inoculation of Pi-3 virus. The assay provided a simple, accurate, and reproducible method to measure cytotoxic responses against Pi-3 infected target cells. The experimental data did not require mathematical corrections for non-specific effects as in the 51Cr-release assay. When cytotoxicity could be detected in uninfected target cell cultures it was low and statistically insignificant. 

8804431
Molecular cloning of rat phosphatidylinositol synthase cDNA by functional complementation of the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae pis mutation. 
Phosphatidylinositol synthase (CDP-1,2-diacyl-sn-glycerol: 3-phosphatidyltransferase, EC 2.7.8.11) catalyzes the formation of phosphatidylinositol and CMP from CDP-diacylglycerol and myo-inositol. We have cloned a phosphatidylinositol synthase cDNA from rat brain by functional complementation of the yeast pis mutation, which is defective in phosphatidylinositol synthase. The deduced protein comprised 213 amino acids with a calculated molecular mass of 23,613 Da. The predicted protein sequence is highly homologous to the previously determined yeast phosphatidylinositol synthase sequence. The cDNA hybridized to a 1.7-kb mRNA that was abundantly expressed in rat brain and kidney. 

17167471
Mechanisms linking obesity to insulin resistance and type 2 diabetes. 
Obesity is associated with an increased risk of developing insulin resistance and type 2 diabetes. In obese individuals, adipose tissue releases increased amounts of non-esterified fatty acids, glycerol, hormones, pro-inflammatory cytokines and other factors that are involved in the development of insulin resistance. When insulin resistance is accompanied by dysfunction of pancreatic islet beta-cells - the cells that release insulin - failure to control blood glucose levels results. Abnormalities in beta-cell function are therefore critical in defining the risk and development of type 2 diabetes. This knowledge is fostering exploration of the molecular and genetic basis of the disease and new approaches to its treatment and prevention. 

12626403
Characterization of the rat alpha(1,3)galactosyltransferase: evidence for two independent genes encoding glycosyltransferases that synthesize Galalpha(1,3)Gal by two separate glycosylation pathways. 
The important xenoepitope Galalpha(1,3)Gal was thought to be exclusively synthesized by a single alpha(1,3)galactosyltransferase. However, the cloning of the distant family member rat iGb3 synthase, which is also capable of synthesizing Galalpha(1,3)Gal as the glycolipid structure iGb3, challenges the notion that alpha(1,3)galactosyltransferase is the sole Galalpha(1,3)Gal-synthesizing enzyme. We describe the cloning of the rat homolog of alpha(1,3)galactosyltransferase, showing that indeed the rat expresses two distinct alpha(1,3)galactosyltransferases, alpha(1,3)GT and iGb3 synthase. Rat alpha(1,3)galactosyltransferase shows a high amino acid sequence identity with the alpha(1,3)galactosyltransferase of mouse (90%), pig (76%), and ox (75%), in contrast to the low amino acid sequence identity (42%) with iGb3 synthase. The rat alpha(1,3)galactosyltransferase is expressed in heart, brain, spleen, kidney, and liver and has a similar intron/exon structure to the mouse alpha(1,3)galactosyltransferase. Transfection studies show that in contrast to the iGb3 synthase, rat alpha(1,3)galactosyltransferase can synthesize Galalpha(1,3)Gal on glycoproteins but cannot synthesize the glycolipid iGb3, defining two separate glycosylation pathways for the synthesis of Galalpha(1,3)Gal. Furthermore iGb3 synthase was found to be distinct from alpha(1,3)GT with its ability to synthesize poly-alpha-Gal glycolipid structures. 

17293547
Differential response to an exclusive breastfeeding peer counseling intervention: the role of ethnicity. 
The authors analyzed data from a trial assessing the efficacy of breastfeeding peer counseling (PC) for increasing exclusive breastfeeding (EBF) to (1) examine whether different ethnic groups responded differently to the intervention and (2) document the determinants of EBF. At 2 months postpartum, the prevalence of EBF in the intervention group was 11.4% among Puerto Ricans compared to 44.4% among non-Puerto Ricans (P = .008). Multivariate logistic regression analyses showed that women who had the intention prenatally to engage in EBF were more likely to do so and those whose mothers lived in the United States were less likely to engage in EBF at hospital discharge. At 2 months postpartum, mothers who were breastfed as children were more likely to engage in EBF, whereas non-Puerto Ricans had a significantly greater response to the intervention than Puerto Ricans (odds ratio, 6.40; 95% confidence interval, 1.45-28.33). There is a need for further studies to determine why different ethnic groups respond differently to EBF promotion interventions. 

976498
Pregnancy during the hysterogram cycle. 
Because of potential mutagenic effects of radiation on the soon-to-be fertilized ovum, we questioned whether we should advise against conception during the cycle in which a hysterosalpingogram is performed. Our results do not suggest any increase in the incidence of spontaneous abortion or congenital anomalies in these patients. Therefore, we see no need to advise against conception during the cycle in which a hysterosalpingogram is performed. 

12338595
Teenage pregnancy and neonatal behavior: effects in Puerto Rico and Florida. 
The purpose of this study was to examine the relationship between neonatal behavior and prenatal and perinatal risk factors in infants of teenage and older mothers in Puerto Rico and Mainland United States. The sample included approximately 300 newborn infants; half were examined in Puerto Rico, the other half in Florida, using the Brazelton Neonatal Behavioral Assessment Scale. Comparisons by maternal age and the number of obstetrical complications show that for the Puerto Rican group, infants with fewer obstetrical complications are better able to regulate their crying and active states. Infants of teenage mothers with fewer complications had a higher level of arousal than infants of older mothers with fewer complications. Infant behavior in the Mainland sample did not vary by maternal age or complications. Multiple regression analysis indicates that the combination of biomedical variables significantly predicts neonatal behavior in both cultures. Mother's age is not separately correlated with neonatal behavior, but is repeatedly combined with other variables in the significant regressions. The findings suggest that infants of teenage mothers may differ from infants of older mothers, particularly in the organization of state behavior, and that the effects of maternal age on neonatal behavior are increased in the presence of biological outcome factors. 

16341949
Treatment of gastroesophageal reflux disease. 
AIM OF THE REVIEW AND METHODS: This review brings together information on the treatment of gastroesophageal reflux disease. Published manuscripts were identified from Medline. The articles were then screened for relevance prior to inclusion in the review. RESULTS AND CONCLUSION: Up to 40% of people in Western countries are estimated to regularly experience heartburn, the most characteristic symptom of gastroesophageal reflux disease (GERD). Treatment options available for GERD range from over-the-counter (OTC) antacids to proton pump inhibitors (PPIs) and anti-reflux surgery. Many patients self-medicate with OTC medications such as antacids and low-dose histamine H2-receptor antagonists (H2RA) to relieve episodic or food-related symptoms of GERD, and may not seek medical advice unless symptoms persist or worsen. However, GERD is a chronic disease that frequently affects health-related quality of life and, if not properly managed, the complications of GERD may include erosive oesophagitis (EO), Barrett's oesophagus and adenocarcinoma. Adequate control of acid secretion is key to the successful treatment of the condition. OTC medications provide effective symptom relief to about one quarter of patients suffering from GERD. H2RAs can also provide effective symptomatic relief, particularly in patients with milder GERD, but become less-effective over time. PPIs are the agents of choice for the suppression of gastric acid production and have become the mainstay of therapy for acid-related diseases. PPIs produce significantly faster and more complete symptomatic relief, significantly faster and more complete healing of erosive GERD compared with H2RAs and are also significantly more effective at preventing relapse of EO. There are a number of existing guidelines for the treatment of GERD. Recommendation for initial therapy consist of general measures, such as lifestyle advice in combination with antacids and/or alginates. When general measures fail, the next step is empirical therapy. Two options exist for the expirical treatment of GERD, so-called "step-up" or "step-down" therapy. There are no clear data to support either treatment strategy as a universal approach to all patients; consequently, physicians must always choose the course best suited to the individual patient. 

2573846
Does compliance predict ventricular reduction after shunting for normal pressure hydrocephalus. 
Ventricular reduction after shunting for normal pressure hydrocephalus (NPH) was classified on the basis of magnitude and rate of reduction in 35 adult patients. Brain compliance and resistance to outflow of cerebrospinal fluid (RCSF) were determined before shunting. Rapid and marked ventricular reduction (n = 11) was associated with a significantly lower compliance than slow and moderate to marked (n = 16) or minimal to mild (n = 8) reduction. Otherwise ventricular size before as well as after shunting did not correlate with compliance or RCSF. It is concluded that both rate and magnitude of ventricular reduction after shunting for NPH vary widely. Reduced compliance seems to be the best predictor of rapid and marked reduction. 

16099160
Adaptations in interlimb and intralimb coordination to asymmetrical loading in human walking. 
The purpose of this study was to examine both the intralimb (within a limb) and interlimb (between the right and left limbs) adaptations that occur in response to a unilaterally applied leg load as subjects walked at their preferred walking speed. It was hypothesized that this adaptation would alter interlimb coordination while intralimb coordination remained invariant. Subjects (n = 12) were required to walk on a treadmill at preferred walking speed. Bilateral 3-D kinematic data were collected while a load placed on the leg was increased. Gait adaptations to leg-loading were assessed through changes in coordination patterns between specific limb couplings. Continuous relative phase (CRP) was used to evaluate changes in limb coordination under each experimental load condition compared to a no load baseline condition. Both changes in magnitude of CRP (root-mean-square (RMS) analysis) as well as temporal changes in CRP across the stride cycle (cross-correlation) were assessed. Cross-Correlation values changed with load for all interlimb couplings assessed suggesting alterations in interlimb coordination across the stride cycle. CRP cross-correlation values were close to 1.0 in all the intralimb couplings examined, showing a relative invariance in intralimb coordination. Coordination changes in RMS were also observed for the interlimb couplings. RMS changes were also observed in the intralimb couplings on the loaded side. It appears that gait adaptations to a unilaterally applied leg load appear both at the intralimb and interlimb level. However, the majority of changes did appear at the interlimb level, where CRP as assessed through both cross-correlation and RMS measures changed. This study supports previous results that suggested a tighter coupling exists at the intralimb level, leaving the majority of gait adaptations to occur at the interlimb level. The observed adaptation in differences between interlimb and intralimb coordination may provide insight into gait adaptations in pathological gait. 

11281736
The association of bone marrow lesions with pain in knee osteoarthritis. 
BACKGROUND: The cause of pain in osteoarthritis is unknown. Bone has pain fibers, and marrow lesions, which are thought to represent edema, have been noted in osteoarthritis. OBJECTIVE: To determine whether bone marrow lesions on magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) are associated with pain in knee osteoarthritis. DESIGN: Cross-sectional observational study. SETTING: Veterans Affairs Medical Center. PATIENTS: 401 persons (mean age, 66.8 years) with knee osteoarthritis on radiography who were drawn from clinics in the Veterans Administration health care system and from the community. Of these persons, 351 had knee pain and 50 had no knee pain. MEASUREMENTS: Knee radiography and MRI of one knee were performed in all participants. Those with knee pain quantified the severity of their pain. On MRI, coronal T(2)-weighted fat-saturated images were used to score the size of bone marrow lesions, and each knee was characterized as having any lesion or any large lesion. The prevalence of lesions and large lesions in persons with and without knee pain was compared; in participants with knee pain, the presence of lesions was correlated with severity of pain. RESULTS: Bone marrow lesions were found in 272 of 351 (77.5%) persons with painful knees compared with 15 of 50 (30%) persons with no knee pain (P < 0.001). Large lesions were present almost exclusively in persons with knee pain (35.9% vs. 2%; P < 0.001). After adjustment for severity of radiographic disease, effusion, age, and sex, lesions and large lesions remained associated with the occurrence of knee pain. Among persons with knee pain, bone marrow lesions were not associated with pain severity. CONCLUSIONS: Bone marrow lesions on MRI are strongly associated with the presence of pain in knee osteoarthritis. 

17151923
The adhesion between a microvillus-bearing cell and a ligand-coated substrate: a Monte Carlo study. 
In biology, specific cell adhesion is mediated by receptor-ligand interactions. Consequently, its strength correlates with the strength of single receptor-ligand bonds that can be measured with a variety of techniques. However, whether single receptor-ligand bonds are truly present in an experiment is often a concern. In this paper, we present a Monte Carlo simulation of the adhesion between a microvillus-bearing cell and a ligand-coated substrate. In the simulation, ligands were immobilized on the substrate either uniformly or in clusters of three and seven, while receptors were distributed uniformly on the microvillus tip and they moved randomly on the cellular surface. How ligand clustering affects the adhesion frequency and forward rate constant was studied. Other factors that were studied include receptor aggregation on the microvillus tip, ligand density, receptor density, contact time, and binding pocket size. In the case of uniformly distributed ligands, our simulation results agree well with those obtained from probabilistic analysis. We found that, even with clustered ligands on the substrate, most of the adhesion events were mediated by a single bond if the total adhesion frequency was less than 20%. Besides, ligand clustering decreased the total adhesion frequency and forward rate constant, but increased the single-bond adhesion frequency under comparable conditions. These findings should lend us some assistance in identifying single bonds in cell-substrate or cell-bead adhesion measurements and in illustrating some biological mechanisms that involve clustered ligands. 

7608204
A 43-kDa protein related to c-Erb A alpha 1 is located in the mitochondrial matrix of rat liver. 
In order to characterize Sterling's triiodothyronine (T3) mitochondrial receptor using photoaffinity labeling, we observed two specific T3-binding proteins in the inner membrane (28 kDa) and in the matrix (43 kDa) of rat liver mitochondria. Western blots and immunoprecipitation using antibodies raised against the T3-binding domain of the T3 nuclear receptor c-Erb A alpha 1 indicated that at least the 43-kDa protein was c-Erb A alpha 1-related. In addition, gel mobility shift assays demonstrated the occurrence of a c-Erb A alpha 1-related mitochondrial protein that specifically binds to a natural or a palindromic thyroid-responsive element. Moreover, this protein specifically binds to a direct repeat 2 sequence located in the D-loop of the mitochondrial genome. Furthermore, electron microscopy studies allowed the direct observation of a c-Erb A-related protein in mitochondria. Lastly, the relative amounts of the 43-kDa protein related to c-Erb A alpha 1 were in good correlation with the known mitochondrial mass in three typical tissues. Interestingly, expression of a truncated form of the c-Erb A alpha 1 nuclear receptor in CV1 cells was associated with a mitochondrial localization and a stimulation of mitochondrial activity. These results supply evidence of the localization of a member of the nuclear receptor superfamily in the mitochondrial matrix involved in the regulation of mitochondrial activity that could act as a mitochondrial T3-dependent transcription factor. 

17929290
Light microscopic and ultrastructural observations on the vomeronasal organ of Anoura (Chiroptera: Phyllostomidae). 
The vomeronasal organ (VNO) is known to be present in bats of the family Phyllostomidae, but in most species this is inferred from the presence of accessory olfactory bulbs. Like primates, bats have profound intergroup variations in the vomeronasal system. Of the family Phyllostomidae (49 genera, 143 species) the VNO of approximately 60 species has been studied. Here, we report light microscopic observations of the VNO of Anoura geoffroyi (fetus and adult), A. caudifer, and A. cultrata, as well as ultrastructural observations of the VNO in adult A. geoffroyi. The organ is crescent-shaped, with a wide lumen encroached by a "mushroom body" that contains a venous sinus. In adults, the vomeronasal cartilage is reduced, being longer in absolute length in fetal A. geoffroyi compared with the adult. In the neuroepithelium, the receptor cell microvilli are dark, distinct, and short, emerging from a vesicular tuft; the supporting cell microvilli are relatively much longer. Large paravomeronasal ganglia are observed. The receptor-free epithelium is undulating and lacks cilia or microvilli. Some characteristics of the VNO in Anoura have not been reported in other chiropterans to date, such as the marked reduction of the vomeronasal cartilage and absence of cilia in the receptor-free epithelium. Moreover, if A. geoffroyi is representative, the genus has an adult neuroepithelial volume similar to other mammals of its body size. Further examination of uninvestigated phyllostomid VNOs may elucidate a phylogenetic history of the family, as well as ecological or social correlates of the VNO in the order Chiroptera. 

6125333
The combined effect of DDT and polychlorinated biphenyls on the blood and heart rate of the white leghorn cockerel (Gallus domesticus). 
1. The joint action of DDT and PCB (Aroclor 1254) on blood parameters and heart rate was studied in the White Leghorn cockerel (Gallus domesticus). 2. PCB alone or combined with DDT reduced heart rate, this change being non-permanent since it returned to normal values when the contaminated diet was replaced by normal diet. 3. PCB alone or combined with DDT had a detrimental effect on packed cell volume, hemoglobin concentration and total erythrocyte count. Hemoglobin concentrations from the experimental group remained lower than control values after removal of the contaminated diet. 4. An antagonistic action rather than a synergistic or additive effect in blood parameter was observed in birds after being exposed to PCB-DDT mixture. 

11448446
Quality of life before and after laparoscopic Heller myotomy for achalasia. 
BACKGROUND: Because the surgical treatment of achalasia is directed at the palliation of chronic symptoms, it is important to assess how surgery affects patients' health-related quality of life (HRQL). METHODS: We evaluated upper gastrointestinal symptoms, satisfaction, and HRQL in 19 patients with achalasia before and after undergoing a laparoscopic Heller myotomy and partial fundoplication. HRQL was assessed using the Medical Outcomes Study 36-item short form health survey (SF-36). RESULTS: The mean age of the patients was 40 years (range 16 to 74), and 58% were men. After a median follow-up of 21 months (range 2 to 35), 12 of 16 patients were satisfied with the results of their surgery. Liquid and solid dysphagia scores were improved after surgery, and the prevalence of heartburn symptoms did not change. Although all the health concepts measured by the SF-36 instrument showed some improvement, statistically significant increases (on a 0 to 100 scale) were detected in physical functioning (11.1, P = 0.02), role-physical (25.0, P = 0.05), bodily pain (12.2, P = 0.01), vitality (13.7, P = 0.02), and social functioning (18.4, P = 0.02). CONCLUSIONS: Most aspects of HRQL improve after a laparoscopic Heller myotomy and partial fundoplication for achalasia. 

11913888
Management of peri-ocular skin tumours by laissez-faire technique: analysis of functional and cosmetic results. 
AIM: The role of wound healing by secondary intention in the treatment of peri-ocular skin tumours is not well established. The object of this retrospective analysis was to evaluate the functional and cosmetic outcome of patients treated by the Laissez-faire technique in situations where primary closure would not have been possible. METHODS: Skin defects following excision of lid and peri-ocular tumours in 24 Caucasian patients were allowed to heal by granulation. The locations included lower eyelid (n = 10), upper lid (n = 6), medial canthus (n = 5), nasojugal fold (n = 2), lateral canthus (n = 1) and brow (n = 1). Four patients had lid margin involvement. The size of the initial defect, time taken to heal, discomfort during healing, the functional and cosmetic results-both from the surgeon and patient perspective, complications, secondary intervention if any and patient satisfaction were studied. RESULTS: A good functional and cosmetic result was obtained in 23 of the 25 lesions (92%). Of these 23 patients, two patients had slightly hypertrophied scars, which responded well to massage and two patients had some degree of ectropion. Of the two patients who did not have a good cosmetic result, only one needed secondary intervention. One had an exuberant granulation tissue, which responded to topical steroids and massage, but left behind a distorted lateral canthus. CONCLUSION: Healing by secondary intention of large defects following excision of peri-ocular tumours is an effective alternative to primary or staged reconstruction in selected cases. 

10651874
L-type Ca2+ channels and purinergic P2X2 cation channels participate in calcium-tyrosine kinase-mediated PC12 growth cone arrest. 
During development and regeneration of the nervous system, growth cones of the various nerve cells navigate and direct neurite elongation by detecting and responding to cues in the environment. To investigate changes in growth cone behaviour due to calcium influx we used nerve growth factor (NGF)-induced growth cones of PC12 (rat pheochromocytoma cells) cells as a model. High external concentrations of potassium and ATP depress growth cone motility, induce club-shaped growth cones and reduce filopodia length and the number and relative F-actin contents of single growth cones (r.a.c.), respectively. The cellular responses are mediated by a sustained increase in the intracellular free Ca2+ concentrations ([Ca2+]i) as monitored by calcium-sensitive fluorescent dyes and confocal microfluorimetry. The responses are not detectable in the presence of the protein tyrosine kinase inhibitor genistein. Immunocytochemistry revealed an increased level of tyrosine-phosphorylated proteins in cell bodies and growth cones but not in cell nuclei. Paxillin, a cytoskeleton-associated protein located in neurites and growth cones, was detected among the phosphotyrosine proteins. The sustained (> 30 s) Ca2+ influx through voltage-gated L-type but not N- or P-type Ca2+ channels induced the F-actin loss and tyrosine phosphorylation. Ca2+ entry through P2X2 ligand-gated channels caused the same effects. Our data suggest the following mechanism: increased [Ca2+]i levels activate tyrosine kinases located close to the ion channels which then leads to changes in morphology due to tyrosine phosphorylation of proteins, e. g. paxillin. 

7612189
Selective recognition of the activated form of transcription factor NF-kappa B by a monoclonal antibody. 
Transcription factor NF-kappa B is a central regulator of inflammatory, immune and acute phase reactions. It rapidly initiates the transcription of a wide variety of target genes in response to various pathogenic stimuli. Because NF-kappa B is predominantly controlled at a posttranscriptional level through association with the inhibitory I kappa B subunits, its activation cannot be monitored directly at a cellular level by means of detecting new mRNA or protein synthesis. In this study, we describe a monoclonal antibody, designated alpha-p65MAb, that recognizes an epitope which includes the nuclear location signal (NLS) of p65, the DNA binding subunit mainly responsible for the strong gene-inductory potential of NF-kappa B. alpha-p65MAb recognized human and rodent p65 only when I kappa B alpha was not bound to p65. Thus, the IgG3 selectively stained the activated, nuclear form of NF-kappa B in cultured cells. Unlike I kappa B, the MAb and its Fab fragments did not inhibit the DNA binding activity of NF-kappa B in mobility shift assays. We show that alpha-p65MAb is suitable to study the activation state of NF-kappa B in cryosections of tissues. 

6357517
CCNU in combination chemotherapy for advanced histologically unfavorable non-Hodgkin's lymphoma. 
During a 3-year period 39 evaluable patients with stage III and IV non-Hodgkin's lymphomas and unfavorable histologies were treated with a unique chemotherapeutic regimen based on a modified CHOP combination to which was added the nitrosourea, CCNU. Complete response was observed in six of 15 (40%) patients with diffuse poorly differentiated lymphocytic lymphoma (DPDL), four of 11 (36%) with diffuse mixed histiocytic lymphocytic (DML), and seven of 13 (54%) with diffuse histiocytic lymphoma (DHL). Of the 17 patients who achieved complete response, nine (53%) have remained continuously disease-free for greater than 2.5 years (2.7-4.1 years) from the onset of therapy: four of six with DPDL, two of four with DML, and three of seven with DHL. Median survival was 18.9 months for all patients, 18.9 months for those with DPDL, 17.4 months for those with DML, and 9.7 months for those with DHL. The median survival has not been reached for patients who attained a complete response, and will exceed 3.3 years. Central nervous system relapse was observed in three patients. In general, toxicity was moderate and consisted primarily of leukopenia, nausea, vomiting, and neurotoxicity. There were no drug-related deaths. The addition of CCNU to a modified CHOP combination resulted in an effective, generally well-tolerated out-patient regimen. However, it did not appear to decrease the rate of CNS relapse or improve current treatment results observed with other adriamycin-containing regimens for similar patients. 

14521099
The great transition. 
As China's economy grows and opens further, the opportunity it presents to multinationals is changing. Foreign companies are moving to country development and new strategic choices. Now, foreign firms can actually go after the Chinese domestic market, and it's worth going after. Improvements in China's infrastructure, workforce, and regulatory environment are making it possible for companies to lower their costs to reap new competitive advantages. Multifaceted and often-shifting risks accompany this shifting opportunity. The reforms required for admission into the WTO will be politically difficult for China to implement, and its progress will be slowed by the scarcity of resources for the country's shaky banking system, the inadequacy of the social safety net, environmental problems, and local governments' cash shortage. China's breathtaking 9% average annual GDP growth rests on an unsteady foundation of overcapitalized state-owned enterprises, which have oversupplied many markets, and fiercely protectionist regional government officials pursuing growth-at-almost-all-costs policies. Frequent changes in regulations, bureaucracies, and reporting relationships will continue to make planning difficult, and, as the SARS epidemic demonstrated, there is always the potential for serious disruptions. But for at least the next ten years, multinationals should be the biggest winners in China. To reap the benefits, a multinational must properly nest its effort into its overall organization, show "one face to China" at the national level but also tailor local strategies, be wary of joint ventures, and mitigate risk, in particular the theft of intellectual property. China is a major opportunity for companies that forthrightly face its complexities. It will remain largely inscrutable--and unprofitable--for the rest. 

932024
The plasma membrane of human placenta. Isolation of microvillus membrane and characterization of protein and glycoprotein subunits. 
A microvillus plasma membrane-enriched fraction of human placenta was obtained by a combination of differential, isopycnic, and rate-zonal centrifugation techniques. Assays for enzyme markers from mitochondria, lysosomes, peroxisomes, endoplasmic reticulum, and plasma membrane indicated a relative enrichment of plasma membrane between 10- and 20-fold over the most prominent contaminating enzyme markers. Electron microscopy verified the microvillus ultrastructure of the isolated placental membrane and the lack of significant contamination by identifiable organelles. Sodium dodecyl sulfate-polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis of the microvillus membrane fraction revealed a protein and glycoprotein subunit composition. There were 16 major protein subunits and 10 major glycoprotein subunits, and apparent molecular weights are assigned to these subunits. 32P-labeling of the microvillus membrane-associated alkaline phosphatase indicated that this enzyme is one of the major glycoproteins of the human placental microvillus membrane. 

10416688
p53 overexpression in lymph node metastases predicts clinical outcome in ductal pancreatic cancer. 
In this study, we evaluated the prognostic significance of both p53 overexpression and proliferating activity in 133 primary ductal pancreatic carcinomas and in their regional synchronous lymph node metastases by immunohistochemistry, by using DO7 and MIB1 monoclonal antibodies, respectively. Tumor samples and lymph nodes were obtained from formalin-fixed, paraffin-embedded archival material of patients operated on between 1976 and 1996. Patients had a well-documented clinical history and were given accurate follow-up. p53 accumulation was observed in 77 (54%) of 133 primary tumors and in 22 (44%) of 50 patients with nodal metastases. The p53 overexpression was directly related to proliferating activity (p = 0.01) in the primary tumors. A significant direct correlation was present between the p53 expression in the primary tumor and in nodal metastases (p = 0.01); the same occurred for proliferating activity by MIB1 (p = 0.002). The patients' overall survival was affected by the presence of nodal (p = 0.02) and distant (p = 0.0001) metastases. The p53 immunoreactivity in nodal metastases was associated with a statistically significant decrease in the postoperative survival period (p = 0.005). Multivariate analysis confirmed these results, and the only two parameters that maintained statistical significance were M1 status (p = 0.0006) and p53 overexpression in nodal metastases (p = 0.01). 

18059499
Soil fungal abundance and diversity: another victim of the invasive plant Centaurea maculosa. 
Interactions between plants and soil microbes are important determinants of both above- and belowground community composition, and ultimately ecosystem function. As exotic plants continue to invade and modify native plant communities, there has been increasing interest in determining the influence of exotic invasives on native soil microbial communities. Here, using highly sensitive molecular techniques, we examine fungal abundance and diversity in the soil surrounding a particularly aggressive invasive plant species in North America, Centaurea maculosa Lam. In mixed stands, we show that this invasive weed can alter the native fungal community composition within its own rhizosphere and that of neighboring native plants. At higher densities, the effect of C. maculosa on native soil fungal communities was even greater. Our results demonstrate that this invasive weed can have significant effects not only on visible aboveground biodiversity but also on the native soil microbial community that extends beyond its rhizosphere. The ISME Journal (2007) 1, 763-765; doi:10.1038/ismej.2007.81; published online 11 October 2007. 

7034744
[The cybernetic circuit of the regulation of antibody formation] 
The current theory concerning the formation of antibodies is no more sustainable against the recent view on the formation of complex structures, that involves, together with a random variability, also an ordered variability derived from information interactions. This paper aims at showing that the formation of antibodies requires the existence of a complex sensor which can be excited by the presence of antigenic structures of any shape. The stimulation of this sensor originates both a mass type feedback and a form type feedback; the latter consisting in the activation of a conformational genetic variability that turns into a form variability of the immunoglobulinic active site. This site can thus take a form capable to react with the antigen. The reaction with the antigen acts back negatively upon the sensor and causes the permanent acquisition in repertory of the active form for the subsequent disappearance of the form variability in the immunoglobulinic active site. 

3663799
Neurofunctional assessment of schizophrenia: a preliminary investigation of the presence of eye-tracking (SPEMs) and quality extinction test (QET) abnormalities in a sample of schizophrenic patients. 
This preliminary study evaluated the simultaneous presence of abnormalities in the regulation of eye-tracking and neuropsychological tests performance (tactile extinction) in a sample of schizophrenic patients. Both those measures of central malfunctioning appears to be quite specific to schizophrenic disorders and more related to the trait, rather than state characteristics. Even though preliminary, the results indicate a significant relationship between abnormalities in SPEM regulation and the distribution of tactile abnormalities, with more left-side extinguishing patients showing abnormal SPEMs. Some interpretations of the findings are given in the context of current hypotheses on the neurofunctional abnormalities of schizophrenics. 

1825107
Cytokine release syndrome induced by the 145-2C11 anti-CD3 monoclonal antibody in mice: prevention by high doses of methylprednisolone. 
The hamster mAb 145-2C11 specific for the CD3 complex of murine T lymphocytes shares many properties with OKT3, including the induction of T cell activation. In vivo, the injection of 145-2C11 entails a variety of pathologic changes in relation to the systemic release of cytokines. We tested the effects on this cytokine release syndrome of different doses of methylprednisolone (m-PDS) given at various intervals of time before the 145-2C11 mAb. The administration of high doses of m-PDS (50 mg/kg) 2 to 3 h before the mAb resulted in an almost complete inhibition of the systemic release of TNF-alpha, IL-2, and IL-6. As far as the pathologic changes are concerned, the hypothermia, the acute renal tubular necrosis, and the fatty infiltration of the liver were completely prevented whereas the hypoglycemia was only partially attenuated. The protective effect of m-PDS on the toxicity of 145-2C11 was confirmed by the reduction of the mortality rate among galactosamine-sensitized mice. The inhibition of the release of cytokines by m-PDS did not affect the immunosuppression triggered by 145-2C11 as assessed by the CTL activity against alloantigens measured 48 h after the injection of the mAb. We conclude that the administration of very high doses of glucocorticoids 2 to 3 h before 145-2C11 prevents the release of cytokines and attenuates the acute toxicity of the mAb. Similar protocols could allow mitigation of the cytokine-release syndrome induced by the OKT3 mAb in man. 

17557115
The Fas ligand intracellular domain is released by ADAM10 and SPPL2a cleavage in T-cells. 
Fas ligand (FasL) is a type II transmembrane protein belonging to the tumor necrosis factor family. Its binding to the cognate Fas receptor triggers the apoptosis that plays a pivotal role in the maintenance of immune system homeostasis. The cell death-inducing property of FasL has been associated with its extracellular domain, which can be cleaved off by metalloprotease activity to produce soluble FasL. The fate of the remaining membrane-anchored N-terminal part of the FasL molecule has not been determined. Here we show that post-translational processing of overexpressed and endogenous FasL in T-cells by the disintegrin and metalloprotease ADAM10 generates a 17-kDa N-terminal fragment, which lacks the receptor-binding extracellular domain. This FasL remnant is membrane anchored and further processed by SPPL2a, a member of the signal peptide peptidase-like family of intramembrane-cleaving proteases. SPPL2a cleavage liberates a smaller and highly unstable fragment mainly containing the intracellular FasL domain (FasL ICD). We show that this fragment translocates to the nucleus and is capable of inhibiting gene transcription. With ADAM10 and SPPL2a we have identified two proteases implicated in FasL processing and release of the FasL ICD, which has been shown to be important for retrograde FasL signaling. 

8971156
Mutations in the arginine-rich protein gene, in lung, breast, and prostate cancers, and in squamous cell carcinoma of the head and neck. 
Arginine-rich protein (ARP) is a highly conserved gene that maps to human chromosomal band 3p21.1. This gene contains an imperfect trinucleotide repeat which encodes a string of arginines. We previously detected a specific mutation (ATG50-->AGG) within this region of the gene in 10 of 21 sporadic renal cell carcinomas. Here, we report the detection of the same mutation in 5 of 21 squamous cell carcinomas of the head and neck, 1 of 2 small cell lung cancer cell lines, 6 of 18 non-small cell lung carcinomas, 9 of 22 breast tumors, and 5 of 13 prostate tumors. This mutation was seen in several early stage tumors and may thus be an early event in tumorigenesis. We also detected a mutation at codon 53 of this gene in both primary and metastatic tumors from one patient. Other nucleotide changes were observed in a few PCR subclones, but their frequency was the same in both tumor and control samples, suggesting that many of these changes were PCR or subcloning artifacts rather than mutations in the tumor cells themselves. 

12388939
[Adolescence and sickle cell disease] 
Sickle cell disease adds relevant problems to the physical, emotional and social changes that normally occur during adolescence. Specific physical characteristics and complications of the disease can hinder the social and emotional adjustment of the affected teenagers. The cooperation between the physician and the parents is essential in order to assist the teenager to the difficulties of this critical phase of adolescence. Recommendations are best offered in the form of education of the adolescent about the disease, education of the family and the school about the needs of the adolescent, and the preparation of the adolescent for the transition to the adult life and adult medical care. 

15279958
Identification of a mitochondrial superoxide dismutase with an unusual targeting sequence in Plasmodium falciparum. 
The intraerythrocytic stages of Plasmodium falciparum are exposed to oxidative stress and require functional anti-oxidant systems to survive. In addition to the parasite's known iron-dependent superoxide dismutase PfSOD1, a second SOD gene (PfSOD2) interrupted by 8 introns was identified on chromosome 6. Molecular modelling shows that the structure of PfSOD2 is similar to other iron-dependent SODs and phylogenetic analysis suggests PfSOD1 and PfSOD2 are the result of an ancestral gene duplication. The deduced amino acid sequence of PfSOD2 is similar to PfSOD1 but has a long N-terminal extension. Immunofluorescence studies show that PfSOD1 is cytosolic, whereas the N-terminal extension of PfSOD2 targets a green fluorescent protein fusion into the parasite's mitochondrion. Both SOD genes are transcribed during the erythrocytic cycle with PfSOD1 mRNA levels up to 35-fold higher than those of PfSOD2. Northern blots demonstrated that the mRNA levels of both SOD genes are up-regulated upon exposure to oxidative stress. 

7018102
[Circadian variations in insulin concentrations and blood glucose in non-diabetics as well as insulin requirements in insulin-dependent diabetics.] 
On the basis of the estimation of the plasma glucose and the insulin concentrations in 10-minute intervals during 24 hours by the mathematical analysis (multiple regression) over relations between the behaviour of plasma glucose and insulin concentration insulin secretion rates independent of plasma glucose can be calculated. In non-diabetics a circadian rhythm of the disposal of insulin - independent of food - is established. Thus the secretion rate increases in the early morning hours still before before the first meal and is maintained in different size up to nearly 18 o'clock. Then it established itself to the level of the nocturnal basal rate. Adequate changes of the insulin need during night are proved in diabetics without endogenic residual insulin secretion by means of the artificial B-cell Biostator. The circadian rhythm of the disposal of insulin take place parallel with adequate changes of other biological parameters and is of importance for the practice of the conventional insulin therapy as well as in the future use of non-measuring value-regulated insulin infusions (open-loop system). 

15231849
Regulation of the nitric oxide system in human adipose tissue. 
Nitric oxide (NO) is involved in adipose tissue biology by influencing adipogenesis, insulin-stimulated glucose uptake, and lipolysis. The enzymes responsible for NO formation in adipose cells are endothelial NO synthase (eNOS) and inducible NO synthase (iNOS), whereas neuronal NO synthase (bNOS) is not expressed in adipocytes. We characterized the expression pattern and the influence of adipogenesis, obesity, and weight loss on genes belonging to the NO system in human subcutaneous adipose cells by combining in vivo and in vitro studies. Expression of most of the genes known to belong to the NO system (eNOS, iNOS, subunits of the soluble guanylate cyclase, and both genes encoding cGMP-dependent protein kinases) in human adipose tissue and isolated human adipocytes was detected. In vitro adipogenic differentiation increased the expression level of iNOS significantly, whereas eNOS expression levels were not influenced. The genes encoding eNOS, iNOS, and cGMP-dependent protein kinase 1 were expressed at higher levels in obese women. Expression of these genes, however, was not influenced by 5% weight loss. Insulin and angiotensin II (Ang II) increased NO production by human preadipocytes in vitro. Increased eNOS and iNOS expression in adipocytes and local effects of insulin and Ang II may increase adipose tissue production of NO in obesity. 

9570497
Platelet-activating factor receptor-antagonist (BN 52021) stabilizes the oxidative-antioxidative balance and attenuates the morphological changes in the gastrointestinal tract in experimental hemorrhagic shock. 
The influence of the platelet-activating factor receptor-antagonist (BN 52021) and polyelectrolyte solution (PES) on the morphology and oxidant-antioxidant equilibrium in the gastrointestinal wall in hemorrhagic shock was examined in rats. The animals were divided into five groups: I - control, II - sham operation, III - untreated hemorrhagic shock lasting 75 minutes, IV - shock treated with PES, and V - shock treated with BN 52021 and PES. The most expressed morphological changes were found in the small intestine in group IV (shock treated with PES) and in group III (untreated shock). Morphological changes were well correlated with the malondialdehyde (MDA) level reflecting oxidative tissue injury and with the antioxidative potential: sulfhydryl compounds (-SH) level, and superoxide dismutase (SOD) activity. The signs of morphological and biochemical injury to the gastrointestinal tract in animals from group V (treated with BN 52021 and PES) were significantly less expressed than those in groups III and IV. The results suggest an essential role of PAF in oxygen radicals-mediated gastrointestinal injury and a beneficial effect of the early application of BN 52021 in hemorrhagic shock. 

15656632
Synthesis of dicyclopenta[a,e]pentalenes via a molybdenum carbonyl mediated tandem allenic Pauson-Khand reaction and the X-ray crystal structure of a planar dicyclopenta[a,e]pentalene. 
Two 14 pi cross-linked annulenes which belong to the family of dicyclopenta[a,e]pentalenes have been synthesized, 14 pi bis enol triflate ester 27 and the 3,7-diisopropylsilyl substituted 14 pi dicyclopenta[a,e]pentalene 30. The new allenic tandem Pauson-Khand reaction mediated by Mo(CO)(6) was employed as the key process to construct the core of the tetracycles. The two linear dicyclopenta[a,e]pentalenes 27 and 30 underwent significant electronic delocalization, perhaps even aromaticity, as revealed by the X-ray structure of 27. The tetracyclic rings in 27 assumed a flat geometry (Figure 4); the bond lengths of the tetracycle in 27 also fit well into the criteria for aromatic compounds. A comparison of the NMR and UV spectra of both 27 and 30 demonstrated that they both exhibited similar electronic properties, therefore, the purple colored 14 pi cross linked annulene 30 is planar as well as delocalized. 

1498140
Reversal of acute fulminant lymphocytic myocarditis with combined technology of OKT3 monoclonal antibody and mechanical circulatory support. 
Reported is a case of acute fulminant lymphocytic myocarditis with profound circulatory compromise that was successfully reversed by treatment with OKT3 monoclonal antibody. The patient was supported with biventricular assist devices while being treated with the monoclonal antibody. The patient had remarkable recovery of ventricular function, which allowed for the removal of the device after 8 days of support. This case shows the success of combined technologies of monoclonal antibody and mechanical circulatory support to treat a potentially fatal disease process. 

11599829
Does simultaneous antegrade and retrograde cardioplegia improve functional recovery and myocardial homeostasis? 
BACKGROUND: The purpose of our research was to evaluate the functional recovery and homeostasis of myocardium during simultaneous continuous retrograde and antegrade cardioplegia versus continuous retrograde cardioplegia. METHODS: Forty patients who underwent elective coronary artery bypass grafting (CABG) were prospectively assigned to two clinically matched groups and analyzed in respect to cardioplegia protocol. Group I consisted of 24 patients who received continuous retrograde blood cardioplegia; Group II consisted of 16 patients who received simultaneous continuous ante- and retrograde cardioplegia. Hydrogen ion release, carbon dioxide, lactate concentration oxygen content, and oxygen extraction were measured from coronary sinus effluent and from the arterial line before and after cross-clamping of the aorta. Median changes of these parameters were reported. Cardiac output was measured and left and right ventricle stroke works were calculated. Incidence of low cardiac output, ventricular fibrillation, raised cardiac enzymes, and ischemic changes on electrocardiogram (ECG) were noted. RESULTS: In the simultaneous group, oxygen content and oxygen extraction recovered well after cross-clamping. The same parameters did not recover to the same extent in the retrograde group. These changes were notable between groups. Hydrogen ion, carbon dioxide, and lactate releases were comparable between groups. Trend toward better recovery of left ventricle stroke work index was encountered in the simultaneous group. CONCLUSIONS: Viability of myocardium measured with oxygen utilization and functional recovery is better preserved with simultaneous antegrade and retrograde cardioplegia. However, there is no difference in anaerobic metabolism markers. Thus simultaneous ante- and retrograde cardioplegia is probably advantageous over retrograde alone. 

9309798
Differential responses of rat aorta and mesenteric artery to norepinephrine and serotonin in vitro. 
The differences in the responses of isolated ring segments of aorta and mesenteric artery of rat have been investigated. The aortic rings showed higher sensitivity to norepinephrine than the mesenteric artery rings. On the other hand, the sensitivity of the mesenteric artery to serotonin was 17 times greater than that of the aortic ring segments. However, there was no difference between the sensitivity of the aorta and the mesenteric artery to potassium chloride stimulation. There was also no difference in the contractile responses of the aorta and the mesenteric artery to calcium chloride either during norepinephrine stimulation or during stimulation with serotonin. The phasic contraction of the aorta to norepinephrine was greater than the phasic contraction of the mesenteric artery to this agonist while the magnitude of phasic contraction of the aorta to serotonin was lower than that of the mesenteric artery. These results suggest that the differences in the contractile responses of the rat aorta and the mesenteric artery to norepinephrine and serotonin are dependent on the ability of these agonists to mobilise calcium from intracellular stores. 

16945427
Oligoclonal bands in multiple sclerosis cerebrospinal fluid: an update on methodology and clinical usefulness. 
Two or more oligoclonal IgG bands (OB) detected by separation of cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) proteins while not demonstrable in corresponding serum reflect a local B-cell response accompanying central nervous system (CNS) inflammation. Using optimized, standardized methodology, preferentially protein separation by isoelectric focusing followed by immunoblotting, more than 95% of patients with multiple sclerosis (MS) have CSF OB of IgG class not detectable in serum, thereby providing powerful evidence for the diagnosis of MS. Once present, CSF OB persists in the individual patient irrespective of MS course or therapy. Because of the high sensitivity of CSF OB in MS as well as its high specificity in the appropriate clinical setting, examination of CSF for OB of IgG class can be strongly recommended to obtain support for the diagnosis of MS and identify patients with clinically isolated syndrome (CIS) at increased risk of developing MS. The IgG index equal to CSF/serum IgG:CSF/serum albumin is elevated in about 70% of MS patients, but rarely in CSF OB-negative MS. Because of lower diagnostic sensitivity, IgG index cannot be recommended as replacement of CSF OB in the diagnosis of MS but, when elevated, as additional evidence for an augmented B-cell response within the CNS that is compatible with MS. Although the clinical picture as well as findings from magnetic resonance imaging of the brain and spinal cord are essential for an MS diagnosis, this should be re-evaluated in CSF OB-negative patients, keeping in mind the many disease entities imitating MS. Recommended diagnostic criteria for MS must include definitions of the role of lumbar puncture and of clearly specified, optimized and standardized routine CSF investigations including for the presence of CSF IgG OB. There is a need for concerted long-term follow-up studies of the subgroup of MS patients without CSF OB regarding e.g. prognostic and immunologic features. For inclusion in trials of disease-modulating drugs, it is recommended that patients with MS or CIS are selected regarding presence vs. absence of CSF OB. Development and evaluation of new technologies to define local vs. systemic B-cell responses in patients with MS or CIS vs. patients with other inflammatory neurological diseases should shed new light on the role of CSF OB, which remains enigmatic. 

8657885
[Titanium aneurysm clips and their advantages in diagnostic imaging] 
Aneurysms clips made of a titanium alloy (TiAl6V4) were used in clinical practice for the first time. The design of the clips is identical to the routinely used Yasargil series. In 30 patients, 38 symptomatic and asymptomatic aneurysms were fixed with 45 clips. Metallurgical advantages of the new alloy are better biocompatibility, less magnetic susceptibility, and lower X-ray density. The postoperative imaging results are superior to the conventionally used alloys with respect to artifact reduction in computed tomography, angiography, and magnetic resonance imaging. With a follow-up period of 7 months, a statement on biocompatibility cannot yet be given. 

1435380
Problem-based learning in distance education: a first exploration in continuing medical education. 
The Wellcome Tropical Institute has assisted countries in the tropics to establish viable systems of continuing medical education, particularly for young doctors practising in rural areas. As part of this strategy the Institute has developed material for use in distance learning. The first attempt to apply the problem-based learning approach to written material for use by an individual learner in the absence of a tutor led to a trial in Ghana, Kenya and Pakistan to compare a conventionally designed module with a problem-based learning module on the same topic for their respective acceptability, effectiveness and efficiency. The design, implementation and results of these three comparative trials are presented. 

12268195
Cigarette smoking in pregnancy: relationship to perinatal outcomes in six Italian centres. 
In this study the relationship of maternal smoking in pregnancy to low birth weight, fetal growth retardation, preterm delivery, and perinatal deaths has been investigated in a sample of 36,544 women with their single newborns, from 6 Italian centers (Triese, Milan, Parma, Rome, Naples, Bari), where a multicenter survey of perinatal preventive medicine (MPPI) was carried out, between 1973 and 1979, with the financial support of the Consiglio Nazionale dell Ricerche. The proportions of babies weighing 2500 g or less, and of babies with birth weight, head circumference or crown-heel length below the 10th centile were similar among nonsmokers and "stopped" smoker mothers, while they increased with increasing smoking levels. As regards head circumference and crown-heel length below the 10th centile, odds ratios are essentially the same before and after adjustment for age, parity, and socioeconomic class (about 1.5 for "1-10CGT" and up to 2.5 for "11+CGT"). Only slight increases have been observed in the odds ratios concerning low birthweight below the 10th centile (about 1.5 for "1-10CGT" and up to 3.5 for "11+CGT") after adjusting for the socioeconomic demographic variables (i.e. mainly removing the favourable effect of high socioeconomic class or low parity, which more frequently characterize smoker mothers). Owing to the lower smokers' frequencies, cigarette smoking estimated attributable risks concerning low birth weight and "small for dates" babies in the MPPI centres (between 4% and 19%) are considerably lower than those estimated in studies carried out in the US or Canada. Data analyzed in the present study do not indicate any relationship between maternal smoking and preterm delivery or perinatal deaths. 

11254896
The impact of phospholipid transfer protein (PLTP) on HDL metabolism. 
High-density lipoproteins (HDL) play a major protective role against the development of coronary artery disease. Phospholipid transfer protein (PLTP) is a main factor regulating the size and composition of HDL in the circulation and plays an important role in controlling plasma HDL levels. This is achieved via both the phospholipid transfer activity of PLTP and its capability to cause HDL conversion. The present review focuses on the impact of PLTP on HDL metabolism. The basic characteristics and structure of the PLTP protein are described. The two main functions of PLTP, PLTP-mediated phospholipid transfer and HDL conversion are reviewed, and the mechanisms and control, as well as the physiological significance of these processes are discussed. The relationship between PLTP and the related cholesteryl ester transfer protein (CETP) is reviewed. Thereafter other functions of PLTP are recapitulated: the ability of PLTP to transfer cholesterol, alpha-tocopherol and lipopolysaccharide (LPS), and the suggested involvement of PLTP in cellular cholesterol traffic. The discussion on PLTP activity and mass in (patho)physiological settings includes new data on the presence of two forms of PLTP in the circulation, one catalytically active and the other inactive. Finally, future directions for PLTP research are outlined. 

6871381
Studies of nucleotides of growth-plate cartilage: evidence linking changes in cellular metabolism with cartilage calcification. 
The objective of this study was to examine the nucleotides of chick growth-plate cartilage and to measure the concentration of adenine nucleotides in the pre-mineralizing and mineralizing zones. Nucleotides were isolated from the two regions using a rapid-freezing technique and the concentration of individual components was ascertained by HPLC. The actual values of ATP, ADP, and other nucleotides in cartilage was low. The lowest values were recorded in the mineralized zone. In this latter zone the energy charge ratio and the ATP/ADP ratio were depressed. This was probably due to 02-related inhibition of mitochondrial oxidative activity. Additionally, the percentage of octanoate, a short-chain fatty acid that accumulates when aerobic metabolism is disturbed, was found to have increased in the calcifying zone. These findings suggest that calcification of cartilage is associated with hypoxia-related modulation of chondrocyte metabolism. 

8605084
Lead-catalyzed peroxidation of essential unsaturated fatty acid. 
In the present study, the reaction mixtures (lead compounds with essential unsaturated fatty acids) were preincubated at 37 degrees C for 24 h prior to the measurement of malondialdehyde (MDA) by HPLC. The metal-catalyzed reactions were also compared in the presence of butylated hydroxytoluene (BHT), a free radical scavenger. Our results showed that according to the difference in the number of double bonds of essential unsaturated fatty acids, the kinds of lead compounds, and the concentrations of lead compounds, the extent of lipid peroxidation was different. The addition of BHT to the reaction mixtures significantly reduced the production of MDA (P < 0.01). These in vitro studies support prior in vivo reports that the important mechanism of the acute toxic effects of the lead compounds is owing at least in part, to metal-catalyzed peroxidation of polyunsaturated fatty acids. 

6301833
Characterisation of membrane vesicles from Paracoccus denitrificans and measurements of the effect of partial uncoupling on their thermodynamics of oxidative phosphorylation. 
1. Vesicles from Paracoccus denitrificans were prepared by applying an osmotic shock to spheroplasts derived from cells that had been grown anaerobically with succinate as carbon source and nitrate as electron acceptor. In the presence of either phenazinemethosulphate or N,N,N' N',-tetramethyl-p-phenylenediamine, the oxidation of isoascorbate supported the uptake of both S14CN- and 86Rb+ (in the presence of valinomycin), whereas NADH and succinate oxidation resulted only in S14CN- uptake. These observations show that the preparations contain both right-side-out and inside-out vesicles, and are related to the earlier proposal that the stimulation of an NADH-2,6-dichloroindophenol reductase activity by bee venom is an indicator of the proportion of right-side-out vesicles present. The implications impinge on previous conclusions [Burnell, J. N., John. P. and Whatley, F. R. (1975) Biochem. J. 150, 527-536 and FEBS Lett. 58, 215-218] about the mechanisms of sulphate and phosphate transport in P. denitrificans. 2. The relationship between the protonmotive force (delta p; transmembrane proton electrochemical gradient expressed in mV) and the phosphorylation potential (delta Gp) generated by vesicles from P. denitrificans has been studied as a function of the concentration of an uncoupler of oxidative phosphorylation. With either NADH or succinate as substrate, the uncoupler had a more pronounced effect on delta p than on delta Gp, so that the ratio delta Gp/F x delta p increased within a limited range of values of delta p close to the maximum. delta Gp/F x delta p was, however, approximately constant over the remaining range of delta p that was titrated. A fraction of 'highly coupled' vesicles, separated from the initial preparation by centrifugation through a Ficoll pad, showed similar titration behaviour. This demonstrated that heterogeneity within a vesicle preparation was not responsible for significant distortion of the true relationship between delta p and delta Gp. Values of delta p and delta Gp/F x delta p (H+/ATP) from 143-108 mV and 3.9-4.4, respectively, were determined when NADH was substrate, whereas with succinate, delta p ranged from 123-88 mV and delta Gp/F x delta p (H+/ATP) from 4.5-5.6. The variation in the value of delta Gp/F x delta p, which can be equated with a minimum value for the H+/ATP of the ATP synthase enzyme, is similar to, but less pronounced than, some of the data previously reported for mitochondria. Thus the observations with these bacterial vesicles, which represent an experimentally simpler system than mitochondria, might be taken as further evidence that measurements of the bulk phase delta p might not truly reflect the driving force for ATP synthesis sensed by the ATP synthase enzyme. However, other explanations that would make the data consistent with a chemiosmotic mechanism cannot be eliminated... 

214156
Effect of urethan on the induction of ornithine decarboxylase in regenerating rat liver. 
The effect of urethan on the induction of ornithine decarboxylase in the early stage of the regeneration of rat liver was studied. The induced activity of ornithine decarboxylase was suppressed by administration of urethan immediately after partial hepatectomy. Although ornithine decarboxylase was induced biphasically by partial hepatectomy, a single intraperitoneal injection of urethan resulted in the reduction of both phases. However, the ornithine decarboxylase activity induced by glucocorticoids and growth hormone was not suppressed by urethan. The increased level of 3',5'-cyclic adenosine monophosphate induced by partial hepatectomy was also reduced by urethan and this suppression was proportional to the suppression of ornithine decarboxylase activity. Reversal of the urethan-induced suppression of ornithine decarboxylase by administration of dibutyryl 3',5'-cyclic adenosine monophosphate was also observed. 

12280254
The how and why of natural family planning. 
For Catholics who relied on calendar rhythm for their family planning method in the 1950s and 1960s, natural family planning provides an alternative which is more effective, moral, and without the harmful side effects of other forms of contraception. Natural family planning refers to methods of avoiding or achieving pregnancy that cooperate with rather than suppress a couple's fertility through the use of drugs or contraceptive devices. Where the rhythm method simply used mathematical calendar calculations to predict ovulation, natural family planning carefully observes the signs and symptoms of fertile and infertile periods. By monitoring these symptoms and abstaining from intercourse during the women's fertile period, a couple can effectively practice natural family planning. Most studies by the World Health Organization have rated the method 98 to 99% effective. Positive side effects are also experienced by many couples. The challenge of abstinence requires the husband's cooperation and often improves a couple's sexual relationship by providing opportunities for more communication, new and creative ways of showing affection, and mental, physical, and spiritual enrichment. 

10868931
Independent development of pancreatic alpha- and beta-cells from neurogenin3-expressing precursors: a role for the notch pathway in repression of premature differentiation. 
The nature and identity of the pancreatic beta-cell precursor has remained elusive for many years. One model envisions an early multihormonal precursor that gives rise to both alpha- and beta-cells and the other endocrine cell types. Alternatively, beta-cells have been suggested to arise late, directly from the GLUT2- and pancreatic duodenal homeobox factor-1 (PDX1)-expressing epithelium, which gives rise also to the acinar cells during this stage. In this study, we have identified a subset of the PDX1+ epithelial cells that are marked by expression of Neurogenin3 (Ngn3). Ngn3, a member of the basic helix-loop-helix (bHLH) family of transcription factors, is suggested to act upstream of NeuroD in a bHLH cascade. Detailed analysis of Ngn3/paired box factor 6 (PAX6) and NeuroD/PAX6 co-expression shows that the two bHLH factors are expressed in a largely nonoverlapping set of cells, but such analysis also suggests that the NeuroD+ cells arise from cells expressing Ngn3 transiently. NeuroD+ cells do not express Ki-67, a marker of proliferating cells, which shows that these cells are postmitotic. In contrast, Ki-67 is readily detected in Ngn3+ cells. Thus, Ngn3+ cells fulfill the criteria for an endocrine precursor cell. These expression patterns support the notion that both alpha- and beta-cells develop independently from PDX1+/Ngn3+ epithelial cells, rather than from GLU+/INS+ intermediate stages. The earliest sign of alpha-cell development appears to be Brain4 expression, which apparently precedes Islet-1 (ISL1) expression. Based on our expression analysis, we propose a temporal sequence of gene activation and inactivation for developing alpha- and beta-cells beginning with activation of NeuroD expression. Endocrine cells leave the cell cycle before NeuroD activation, but re-enter the cell cycle at perinatal stages. Dynamic expression of Notch1 in PDX+ epithelial cells suggests that Notch signaling could inhibit a Ngn-NeuroD cascade as seen in the nervous system and thus prevent premature differentiation of endocrine cells. 

16173931
Sheng mai san, a Chinese herbal medicine, protects against renal ischaemic injury during heat stroke in the rat. 
1. There is evidence that the induction of inducible nitric oxide synthase (iNOS) and peroxynitrite by ischaemia/reperfusion may lead to renal cell injury. Herein, we investigated whether Sheng mai san (SMS), a Chinese herbal medicine, protects against renal ischaemic injury during heat stroke by reducing iNOS-dependent nitric oxide (NO) and peroxynitrite formation. 2. Urethane-anaesthetized rats were exposed to heat stress (ambient temperature 43 degrees C) to induce heat stroke. Control rats were exposed to 24 degrees C. Mean arterial pressure and renal blood flow after the onset of heat stroke were significantly lower in heat stroke rats than in control rats. However, both colonic temperature and renal damage score were greater in heat stroke rats compared with control rats. Similarly, plasma NO, creatinine and blood urea nitrogen (BUN), as well as the renal immunoreactivity of iNOS and peroxynitrite, were significantly higher in heat stroke rats compared with their normothermic controls. 3. Pretreatment with SMS (1.2 g/day per rat for 7 consecutive days before the initiation of heat stress) significantly attenuated the heat stroke-induced arterial hypotension, hyperthermia, renal ischaemia and damage, the increased renal immunoreactivity of iNOS and peroxynitrite and the increased plasma levels of NO, creatinine and BUN. Pretreatment with SMS resulted in a prolongation of survival time in heat stroke. 4. The results of the present study suggest that SMS protects against renal ischaemic damage by reducing iNOS-dependent NO and peroxynitrite production during heat stroke. 

6134718
Depot pipotiazine 1970-1982: a review. 
In the past 14 years pipotiazine palmitate, the second oldest depot neuroleptic, has proven to be effective and safe in reducing and preventing resurgence of symptoms of acute and chronic psychoses, chiefly in schizophrenia. It is particularly valuable in the management of erratic ingestors and unreliable absorbers of oral neuroleptics. Clinical experience substantiates that pipotiazine palmitate therapy is best initiated at low doses (25 mg), and that the most effective maintenance dosage is 25 to 200 mg once a month. Pipotiazine palmitate has a low propensity to evoke extrapyramidal reactions; in fact, it causes the lowest incidence of EPS of all depot neuroleptics. Patients receiving pipotiazine palmitate seldom require concomitant antiparkinsonian medication. This review highlights other assets and liabilities of depot pipotiazine therapy. 

392771
Pregnancy and lactation in relation to breast cancer risk. 
In the past, numerous efforts have been made to define risk and protective factors of breast cancer. Among these, pregnancy and lactation have been extensively discussed in connection with breast cancer. Unfortunately, many of the reports on the protective effects of pregnancy and lactation are equivocal; caution needs to be exercised when interpreting the results of a single publication. Development of breast cancer is often preceded by the occurrence of preneoplastic mammary lesions, which may be the result of long-term exposure to estrogens and prolactin. Since endogenous estrogen levels regulate pituitary prolactin secretion to some extent, it has been postulated that a hormonal imbalance exists in early mammary carcinogenesis. Exogenous estrogens directly increase pituitary prolactin secretion. During gestation, greatly increased levels of endogenous sex steroids efficiently stimulate pituitary prolactin secretion; during lactation, the stimulus of suckling is responsible for hyperprolactinemia. However, most studies did not reveal a cause-effect relationship between prolactin levels and enhanced risk of breast cancer. At present, the role of pregnancy and lactation in the development and prognosis of breast cancer is not determined. 

281243
Mandibulo-facial aspects of the cervical cystic lymphangioma (cystic hygroma). 
Sixteen cases of cervical cystic lymphangioma are reported; all but two were present at birth. Intra-oral extensions were detected in five and three of these caused macroglossia resulting in partial respiratory obstruction. Mal-development of the jaws and consequent dental malocclusion is a possible complication of the condition. In planning the treatment of such patients, maxillo-facial surgeons and orthodontists should be consulted at an early stage. The treatment of choice is complete excision, but where vital structures are involved repeated sub-total excisions are advocated. 

15358026
Sublingual nitroglycerin used in routine tilt testing provokes a cardiac output-mediated vasovagal response. 
OBJECTIVES: We set out to determine the effect of sublingual nitroglycerin (NTG), as used during routine tilt testing in patients with unexplained syncope, on hemodynamic characteristics and baroreflex control of heart rate (HR) and systemic vascular resistance (SVR). BACKGROUND: Nitroglycerin is used in tilt testing to elicit a vasovagal response. It is known to induce venous dilation and enhance pooling. Also, NTG is lipophilic and readily passes cell membranes, and animal studies suggest a sympatho-inhibitory effect of NTG on circulatory control. METHODS: Routine tilt testing was conducted in 39 patients with suspected vasovagal syncope (age 36 +/- 16 years, 18 females). Patients were otherwise healthy and free of medication. Before a loss of consciousness set in, oncoming syncope was cut short by tilt-back or counter-maneuvers. Finger arterial pressure was monitored continuously (Finapres). Left ventricular stroke volume (SV) was computed from the pressure pulsations (Modelflow). Spontaneous baroreflex control of HR was estimated in the time and frequency domains. RESULTS: During tilt testing, 22 patients developed presyncope. After NTG administration but before presyncope, SV and cardiac output (CO) decreased (p < 0.001), whereas SVR and HR increased (p < 0.001) in all patients. Arterial pressure was initially maintained. Baroreflex sensitivity decreased after NTG. On Cox regression analysis, the occurrence of a vasovagal response was related to a drop in SV after NTG (hazard ratio 0.86, p = 0.005). CONCLUSIONS: The cardiovascular response to NTG is similar in vasovagal and non-vasovagal patients, but more pronounced in those with tilt-positive results. The NTG-facilitated presyncope appears to be CO-mediated, and there is no evidence of NTG-induced sympathetic inhibition. 

8991080
APRT: a versatile in vivo resident reporter of local mutation and loss of heterozygosity. 
We describe an in vivo mutagenesis model that utilizes reverse mutation and forward mutation at the endogenous Aprt locus. Reverse mutation provides an in situ method for detecting environments or agents that cause point mutations. Forward mutation detects large chromosomal events, including mitotic recombination, chromosome loss, and large multilocus deletion, all of which can lead to loss of heterozygosity. Detection of reverse mutation in vivo is based on the differential capacity of Aprt and Aprt cells to sequester radiolabeled adenine by catalyzing its conversion to adenosine monophosphate with subsequent incorporation into nucleic acids. Cells lacking APRT activity cannot accumulate exogenously administered, tagged adenine, whereas Aprt+ cells can and will thereby become marked. Thus, genetically modified mice with mutant but revertible Aprt alleles should be a useful vehicle for in situ detection of mutagenic activity in the whole animal. the feasibility of this model has been illustrated, first, by showing that APRT-deficient mice are viable and, second, by demonstrating that the minority of Aprt+ cells within a chimeric tumor growing in an Aprt+ mouse can be selectively labeled following IP injection of [14C]-adenine and can be identified by autoradiography. Forward mutation, detected by growth in selective medium of primary cells derived from Aprt+/- heterozygous mice, provides on independent estimate of in vivo mutation frequency. The frequency with which Aprt colonies arise provides a measure of the frequency of Aprt(-)-negative cells in the tissue at that point in time. Culture of skin fibroblasts in 2,6-diaminopurine (DAP) produced Aprt+ colonies with a frequency of about 10(-4). This frequency is similar to that found for human T lymphocytes from individuals heterozygous at the Aprt locus. In both cases, the majority of mutagenic events involved allele loss. Polymerase chain reaction with linked polymorphic microsatellites on mouse chromosome 8 demonstrated that allele loss was mediated mostly by mitotic recombination, as was the case for human T lymphocytes. The high frequency of mitotic recombination and allele loss at a neutral locus has significant implications for the process of tumorigenesis and argues that spontaneous or induced mitotic recombination may play a causal role in the progression to cancer. 

8709122
The properties of known drugs. 1. Molecular frameworks. 
In order to better understand the common features present in drug molecules, we use shape description methods to analyze a database of commercially available drugs and prepare a list of common drug shapes. A useful way of organizing this structural data is to group the atoms of each drug molecule into ring, linker, framework, and side chain atoms. On the basis of the two-dimensional molecular structures (without regard to atom type, hybridization, and bond order), there are 1179 different frameworks among the 5120 compounds analyzed. However, the shapes of half of the drugs in the database are described by the 32 most frequently occurring frameworks. This suggests that the diversity of shapes in the set of known drugs is extremely low. In our second method of analysis, in which atom type, hybridization, and bond order are considered, more diversity is seen; there are 2506 different frameworks among the 5120 compounds in the database, and the most frequently occurring 42 frameworks account for only one-fourth of the drugs. We discuss the possible interpretations of these findings and the way they may be used to guide future drug discovery research. 

6435654
A comparative study of the relative enzyme inducing properties of anticonvulsant drugs in epileptic patients. 
The antipyrine clearance and the urinary excretion of D-glucaric acid (D-GA) were determined in 122 patients receiving chronic anticonvulsant drug treatment and in 21 drug-free control subjects. Patients treated with carbamazepine (CBZ), phenytoin (DPH), primidone (PMD) and phenobarbitone (PB), either alone or in combination, showed higher values of antipyrine clearance and excreted larger amounts of D-GA as compared to controls. While antipyrine clearance values did not differ significantly from one drug group to another, D-GA excretion was significantly higher in patients treated with CBZ than in those treated with DPH. In patients treated with sodium valproate antipyrine clearance did not differ from control values. There was a trend for D-GA excretion to be higher in these patients but the difference was not statistically significant. Significant positive correlations were found between the dosage of CBZ, DPH, PMD and PB and both indices of enzyme induction. These data demonstrate a dose-dependent degree of enzyme induction in patients receiving therapeutic doses of these anticonvulsants. The relative potency at average dose levels for antipyrine clearance was PB (1), DPH (0.92), CBZ (0.84), PMD (0.82) and for log D-GA excretion was PB (1), CBZ (0.96), PMD (0.95), DPH (0.90). 

2221708
Fluorescein angiography using ultra-high speed film. 
We used a new ultra-high speed black-and-white film, Kodak T-MAX P3200 (ASA 3200), in routine fluorescein angiography on 51 patients and one normal volunteer. The increased film speed permitted a lower flash intensity than with other available films. Photophobia was improved subjectively in 25% of patients who had undergone prior angiography at a higher flash setting. In addition, patient cooperation was improved as evidenced by a decrease in the frequency of photographic artifacts and uninterpretable photographs compared with prior angiograms done using Kodak TRI-X Pan film (ASA 400). T-MAX yielded excellent resolution, but its grain size was slightly greater than that of TRI-X Pan. The use of ultra-high speed film and reduced light intensity may benefit the patient and improve photographic quality in some individuals with photophobia. 

10051060
Valproate monotherapy in juvenile myoclonic epilepsy: dose-related effects on electroencephalographic and other neurophysiologic tests. 
A neurophysiologic test battery (consisting of a 24-hour, seven-channel electroencephalogram [EEG], EEG spectral analysis, multiple sleep latency test, visual evoked potentials, critical flicker fusion, and visual contrast sensitivity) was administered twice to 16 patients with juvenile myoclonic epilepsy (JME) in a double-blind, randomized, crossover study comparing two daily doses of sodium valproate (VPA), 1000 mg and 2000 mg. Clinical observation time was 6 months for each dose. Mean total VPA concentration during low-dose treatment was 470.4 mmol/L and during high-dose treatment was 700.0 mmol/L. Ten patients had seizures during low-dose treatment, but only three of these showed spike-wave activity on EEGs. During high-dose treatment, nine patients had seizures; five of these had spike-wave activity. EEG power spectrum did not change between doses. The other tests also showed no change between doses. Our results suggested that EEG and our selection of other neurophysiologic tests were of limited value for monitoring seizure frequency and clinical effects of VPA. 

1300304
Acanthamoeba keratitis--a report of two cases. 
Two cases of unilateral corneal ulcers caused by Acanthamoeba are reported. Neither of the patients had contact lenses at any time. The diagnosis was confirmed by Giemsa stain and cultures of the corneal scrapings. 

7232871
[Acute effects of low carbon monoxide concentrations on blood rheology, platelet fuction, and the arterial wall in the minipig (author's transl)] 
While investigating the initial effects of low carbon monoxide concentrations on haemorheology and the arterial wall, minipigs were exposed to CO-air mixtures with 160, 185, and 420ppm CO. The daily exposure time was 4h. Exposure to 160 and 185 ppm CO led to a significant increase of platelet aggregation. Four hundred twenty parts per million CO caused an increase in haematocrit, blood and plasma viscosity, and in platelet aggregation. When examined by light microscopy, there were no changes in the arterial wall, whereas scanning electron-microscopic examinations revealed adhesions of shape-changed platelets on the arterial endothelium in some cases already after a single 4-h exposure to 160 or 185 ppm CO. After 4 x 4-h exposures to 420ppm CO there were mixed microthrombi on the arterial endothelium. According to preliminary transmission electron-microscopic studies these adhesions of platelets and also adhesions of mononuclear elements can always be related to foci of degeneration in the endothelial cells. These examinations showed that low concentrations of carbon monoxide can cause both haemorheological and morphological changes in the arterial wall. The further development of these changes under chronic CO exposure and a possible significance of the environmental hygiene beyond cigarette smoking has to be clarified by long-term experiments. 

2158402
Alterations in polyunsaturated fatty acid composition of cardiac membrane phospholipids and alpha 1 adrenoceptor mediated phosphatidylinositol turnover. 
STUDY OBJECTIVE - The aim of the study was to investigate the steps at which polyunsaturated fatty acids are involved in alpha 1 adrenoceptor mediated phosphatidylinositol turnover. DESIGN - Phosphatidylinositol turnover rates were investigated after preincubating neonatal rat ventricular myocytes with culture media enriched with linoleic acid (18:2n-6) or eicosapentaenoic acid (20:5n-3) to change the polyunsaturated fatty acid composition of their membrane phospholipids. EXPERIMENTAL MATERIAL - Cardiomyocytes were isolated from ventricles of 2-4 d old Wistar rats by trypsinization and were then cultured. Experiments were started 48 h after seeding, when there was a confluent monolayer of beating cardiomyocytes. MEASUREMENTS and RESULTS - In 18:2n-6 treated cells the 18:2n-6 content in the total phospholipid fraction rose from 45 to 68 nmol.mg-1 protein; in 20:5n-6 treated cells the 20:5n-3 content rose from 1.5 to 12.5 nmol.mg-1 protein, and the docosapentaenoic acid (22:5n-3) content rose from 5.1 to 14.7 nmol.mg-1 protein. The major n-3 fatty acid, 22:6n-3 (11.4 nmol.mg-1 protein), did not change after 20:5n-3 treatment. Although the phosphatidylinositol fraction showed changes paralleling those in the total phospholipids, none were significant. In this fraction the major n-3 fatty acid appeared to be 22:5n-3 (0.4 nmol.mg-1 protein). The fatty acid treated cells were prelabelled with [3H]-inositol to estimate the rate of phosphatidylinositol-4,5-bisphosphate turnover. There were no differences in the rate of [3H]-inositolphosphate formation between control, 18:2n-6 treated cells, and 20:5n-3 treated cells. Prolonged alpha 1 adrenergic stimulation of control and treated cells did not change the polyunsaturated fatty acid composition of the total phospholipid and phosphatidylinositol fractions. CONCLUSIONS - The alpha 1 adrenoceptor mediated phosphatidylinositol turnover rate is not affected by changes in polyunsaturated fatty acid composition of membrane phospholipids, neither does prolonged alpha 1 adrenergic stimulation lead to significant depletion of any specific or total polyunsaturated fatty acids in the phosphatidylinositol lipids. 

2177314
[Non-A, non-B hepatitis: hepatitis C] 
Non-A, non-B hepatitis (NANB), whether following the transfusion of blood products or occurring sporadically without percutaneous exposure, is complicated in approximately 50% of cases by the development of chronic hepatitis. Emerging as a consistent observation is the insidious progression of such cases of chronic NANB hepatitis to cirrhosis. Among patients with chronic NANB hepatitis followed for up to 10 years, cirrhosis is demonstrable in 20%. In May, 1988, the identification of the agent of NANB hepatitis was described by Houghton and colleagues of the Chiron Corporation. Hepatitis C, a 10,000 nucleotide single-stranded RNA virus with properties similar to those of flavivirus, was identified by developing a cDNA library from the genetic material in a chimpanzee inoculum of high infectivity and locating a clone which elaborated a virus-specific protein. Serologic evidence for HCV infection can be detected in 60-90% of cases of transfusion-associated hepatitis and 50% of cases of sporadic NANB hepatitis. Antibody to HCV (anti-HCV) can be detected in 30% of chronic hepatitis B, in 10-46% of alcoholic cirrhosis, in 40-70% of cases of hepatocellular carcinoma HBsAg negative and in 0-83% of patients with auto-immune chronic active hepatitis. Assays for HCV antigen will require technology more sensitive such than current immunoassays, such as the polymerase chain reaction. The introduction into blood banks of a screening test for anti-HCV is expected to reduce the risk of transfusion-associated NANB hepatitis and is highly recommended. 

15892350
[Claudication and pulmonary embolism can be caused by venous aneurysm. A case report illustrates difficulties with this unusual diagnosis] 
A 19 year old male patient is described with a large popliteal venous aneurysm causing pulmonary embolism and intermittent claudication. It was resected and replaced with a saphenous vein graft. 

7259649
Termination of early pregnancy in ewes by use of a prostaglandin analogue and subsequent fertility. 
Of 87 Dorset ewes injected at 20 to 60 days of pregnancy with either 125 micrograms or 250 micrograms of the prostaglandin F2 alpha analogue, cloprostenol, 72 (83%) were detected in oestrus by teaser rams within 7 days. A total of 60 ewes mated with fertile rams 14 to 28 days after treatment and 36 of these (60%) subsequently lambed. Thirty-eight ewes mated with fertile rams 29 to 56 days after treatment and 30 of these (79%) subsequently lambed. The difference in fertility between the 2 periods was not significant. Six additional ewes which did not respond to the cloprostenol lambed normally within 6 weeks. They were more than 100 days pregnant when treated. In ewes which first exhibited oestrus by 7 days of treatment, plasma progesterone concentrations fell from near 4 ng/ml to 0.6 ng/ml within 48 h of treatment. In ewes not detected in oestrus progesterone concentrations did not decrease to similar low levels (1.4 ng/ml; t-test p less than 0.005). Concentrations in the 6 ewes treated near 100 days of pregnancy dropped from 7.4 to 4.4 ng/ml over 48 h. Overall, the progesterone concentrations indicated that 92% of ewes treated at 20 to 60 days of pregnancy experienced rapid luteolysis in response to the cloprostenol. There were no differences between the 2 doses of cloprostenol in the responses or subsequent fertility of the ewes. 

12146730
Evidence for knowledge-based category discrimination in infancy. 
Two studies examined whether infants' category discrimination in an object-examination task was based solely on an ad hoc analysis of perceptual similarities among the experimental stimuli. In Experiment 1A, 11-month-olds examined four different exemplars of one superordinate category (animals or furniture) twice, followed by a new exemplar of the familiar category and an exemplar of the contrasting category. Group A (N = 39) explored natural-looking toy replicas with low between-category similarity, whereas group B (N = 40) explored artificial-looking toy models with high between-category similarity. Experiment 1B (N = 40) tested a group of 10-month-olds with the same design. Experiment 1C (N = 20) reversed the order of test trials. For Experiment 2 (N = 20), the same artificial-looking toy animals as in Experiment 1 (group B) were used for familiarization), but no category change was introduced at the end of the session. Infants' responses varied systematically only with the presence of a category change, and not with the degree of between-category similarity. This supports the hypothesis that performance was knowledge based. 

11470442
Seasonal variation of phosphatidylcholine hydroperoxides in blood of sweet smelt Plecoglossus altivelis. 
Sweet smelt was reared at two fishery experimental stations for 5 months from June to October. Every 2 weeks blood was collected from the caudal vessels and, subsequently, the phosphatidylcholine hydroperoxide contents and the fatty acid compositions in the blood were determined by high-performance liquid chromatography and gas chromatography, respectively. The seasonal variation of the contents of accumulated hydroperoxides and fatty acids in the sweet smelt blood were observed in both experimental stations. Sweet smelt started performance of cucumber-like or watermelon-like aroma in the middle of July and the aroma was enhanced in August. The content of phosphatidylcholine hydroperoxides and the amount of total fatty acid in the fish blood, in terms of possible precursors of volatile compounds, were also extremely high in the same period. According to lipid peroxidation mechanisms, the strong characteristic aroma of sweet smelt during July to August might be due to the high contents of accumulated lipid hydroperoxides and polyunsaturated fatty acids in their tissues. 

2019719
[The reality and usefulness of Halban's fascia] 
The authors, in this article, have reviewed the different proofs that confirm that Halban's fascia does exist. The authors have been able to find, separate out and use Halban's fascia in a series of 263 vaginal operations for genital prolapse taking the anatomo-surgical approach. From the histological approach, they have shown that Halban's fascia is constituted by fibro-connective tissue strips between which there are large numbers of blood vessels and muscles and nerve endings. From the point of view of embryogenesis, they believe that Halban's fascia comes from the same mesenchyme layer as that which gives rise to the corpus spongiosus of the penis. As far as sexual physiology is concerned, the authors review the various clinical experiments that have been carried out throughout the world medical literature which shows that there is an erogenous zone in the upper anterior part of the vagina and they believe that Halban's facia, which is homologous with the corpus spongiosus, is the site of origin of vaginal orgasm. Finally, as far as physiology and biology of reproduction is concerned, they believe that the vaginal fluid that is secreted by Halban's fascia during intercourse plays an important role for the survival of spermatozoa. 

1992087
Ivermectin inhibits molting of Wuchereria bancrofti third stage larvae in vitro. 
The effect of ivermectin or diethylcarbamazine (DEC) on Wuchereria bancrofti molting from the third to the fourth larval stage (L3 to L4) was evaluated in vitro. L3 larvae were harvested from laboratory-reared Aedes togoi 2 wk after feeding upon a microfilaremic human volunteer. The larvae were kept in an artificial medium (Franke's NI medium) with 10% human serum under an atmosphere of 5% CO2 for 20 days. Experimental tubes also contained ivermectin (0.1-1,000 ng/ml) or DEC (0.1-10,000 ng/ml). An estimated concentration of 50 ng/ml ivermectin inhibited molting in 50% of the larvae expected to molt. For DEC, this value was roughly 1,000 ng/ml. In this in vitro culture system, ivermectin inhibited the L3 to L4 molt of W. bancrofti and was roughly 20-fold more potent in this activity than DEC. 

11455901
Impact of postovulatory food deprivation on the ova transport, hormonal profiles and metabolic changes in sows. 
The effect of food deprivation on ova transport, hormonal profiles and metabolic changes was studied in 20 crossbred multiparous sows during their second oestrus after weaning. To determine the time of ovulation, transrectal ultrasonographic examination was performed. The sows were divided into 2 groups, one control group (C-group), which was fed according to Swedish standards, and one experimental group (E-group). The E-group sows were deprived of food from the first morning meal after ovulation until slaughter. Blood samples were collected every second hour from about 12 h before expected ovulation in the second oestrus after weaning until slaughter and were analysed for progesterone, prostaglandin F2 alpha-metabolite, insulin, glucose, free fatty acids and triglycerides. All sows were slaughtered approximately 48 h after ovulation and the genital tract was recovered. The isthmic part of the oviduct was divided into 3 equally long segments and flushed separately with phosphate buffered saline (PBS). Uterine horns were also flushed with PBS. A significantly greater number of ova were found in the first and second part of the isthmus in the E-group (p = 0.05) while in the C-group most of the ova were found in the third part of the isthmus or the uterus (p = 0.01). The level of prostaglandin F2 alpha-metabolite was significantly higher in the E-group compared with the C-group. The concentration of progesterone increased in both groups after ovulation but there were no significant differences between the groups. The other blood parameters showed that the food-deprived sows were in a catabolic state. The 48 h period of fasting results, directly or indirectly in an delayed ova transport, which may be due to a delayed relaxation in the smooth circular muscle layer of the isthmus. 

7649537
Selective monitoring for a Chernobyl effect on pregnancy outcome in Kiev, 1969-1989. 
The aim of this investigation was to determine the frequency of adverse pregnancy outcomes in Kiev during the period surrounding the Chernobyl accident on April 26, 1986. Additional effective equivalent doses resulting from the catastrophic irradiation in 1986-1991 was 8.04 mSv for Kiev inhabitants. We retrospectively analyzed the archives of the two largest obstetric hospitals between 1969 and 1990. Spontaneous miscarriages, congenital anomalies, and perinatal mortality varied during the two decades without any pronounced changes in any direction. Additional long-term follow-up is needed to determine mutagenic or carcinogenic effects. 

11408150
Human hepatocyte culture systems for the in vitro evaluation of cytochrome P450 expression and regulation. 
Primary cultures of human hepatocytes have been used extensively by both academic and industrial laboratories for evaluating the hepatic disposition of drugs and other xenobiotics. Their primary utility has been for assessing the induction potential of new chemical entities (NCEs) and they continue to serve as the gold standard. Primary considerations for conducting in vitro drug testing utilizing cultures of human hepatocytes, such as the effects of culture and study conditions, are discussed. The maintenance of normal cellular physiology and intercellular contacts in vitro is of particular importance for optimal phenotypic gene expression and response to drugs and other xenobiotics. Significant advances in our understanding of cytochrome P450 (CYP450) enzyme regulation have been made with the recent identification of the nuclear receptors mediating the induction of CYP2B and CYP3A enzymes. In particular, the activation of pregnane X receptor (PXR) by prototypical inducers of CYP3A has been found to correlate well with the species-specific modulation of CYP3A by various drugs and other xenobiotics. Concomitant with the discovery of PXR has been the identification of compounds that may act synergistically or antagonistically on multiple receptors (e.g., co-repressors and/or co-activators of the receptor) introducing novel mechanisms of drug-drug interactions. Differential expression of the individual isoforms of the major CYP450 enzymes over time in culture suggest that this model system is not reflective of in vivo profiles and, therefore, may be limited in its application for drug metabolism studies. Overall, primary cultures of human hepatocytes can serve as a sensitive and selective model for predicting the regulation of CYP450 modulation by drugs and other xenobiotics. Considerations and recommendations for standardizing testing conditions and choosing relevant endpoint(s) are presented. 

862229
Farmer's lung: immunological response to a group of extracellular enzymes of Micropolyspora faeni. An experimental and field study. 
Potent immunogenicity of certain extracellular 'chymotrypsin-like' enzymes of Micropolyspora faeni are demonstrated. One of them, Enzyme 1 seems particularly active in stimulating the formation of percipitins after intratracheal exposure in rabbits. Man or cattle exposed naturally to mouldy hay, either with or without clinical farmer's lung symptoms show a rather constant immunological reaction against Enzyme 1 and partly also against others of the same group. The detection of specific percipitins against these enzymes is not likely to improve the diagnostic value of the standard farmer's lung serology. Possible implications of these proteolytic enzymes in the pathogenesis of farmer's lung are discussed. 

3490028
Infusion of autologous alloactivated lymphocytes in melanoma patients: toxicity and immunologic monitoring. 
Previous work has shown that infusion of autologous helper-enriched, alloactivated lymphocytes in melanoma patients may induce, in addition to other mild signs of toxicity, a transient but sharp elevation of blood pressure. To avoid such a disturbing symptom, the in vitro protocol of peripheral blood lymphocyte activation has been modified. In the present study we show that such a modification has led to a lower toxicity of autologous lymphocyte infusion in 4 melanoma patients; in particular, hypertension was no longer observed. In addition, an immunologic monitoring was carried out in these patients. In 1 of 4 patients the treatment enhanced the in vitro cytotoxic activity of peripheral blood lymphocytes against autologous tumor cells. Other parameters such as NK activity and T4/T8 ratio did not show significant trends. The possible implications of these findings for clinical trials of adoptive immunotherapy with lymphocytes are discussed. 

12845547
Experience with two different techniques of percutaneous dilational tracheostomy in 54 neurosurgical patients. 
We report 54 patients with critical neurosurgical diseases (16 females, 38 males, age 21-84 years, mean 63.2 years) who were treated with bedside percutaneous dilational tracheostomy (PDT) because of respiratory insufficiency due to their cerebral disease. Bronchoscopically guided PDT was performed after stabilisation of the acute stage of neurosurgical disease. In 15 cases, Ciaglia's multiple dilation technique was used, and in 39 patients the dilational forceps technique according to Griggs was performed. In 14 cases (five Ciaglia's method, nine Griggs technique), intracranial pressure (ICP) was monitored throughout the procedure. Fifty-two procedures were completed. In two cases, PDT had to be aborted because of inability to puncture the trachea. No death occurred. There was a total complication rate of 16.7%, including the aborted procedures, with 3.7% of the complications classified as severe. No increase in ICP was noted. We conclude that bedside PDT, especially with the Griggs system, is safe and effective if done under bronchoscopic control. With the standard narcotic regimen used in our patients, no increase in ICP occurred. 

3299192
Pseudophakic keratoplasty: posterior chamber lens implantation in the presence of ruptured capsule. 
A technique is described for implantation of a posterior chamber intraocular lens during keratoplasty for bullous keratopathy when a large capsulotomy and vitreous prolapse are present. Seven cases of pseudophakic or aphakic bullous keratopathy with anterior chamber, iris-fixated, or no intraocular lens in place are reported. A completely intact posterior capsule is not necessary to support safely a sulcus-fixated posterior chamber lens. Anterior segment reconstruction, careful removal of existing intraocular lenses (except a posterior chamber lens), vitrectomy through the ruptured posterior capsule, and assessment of the remaining posterior capsule rim are important surgical objectives. 

2843648
Interstrand crosslinks due to 4,5',8-trimethylpsoralen and near ultraviolet light in specific sequences of animal DNA. Effect of constitutive chromatin structure and of induced transcription. 
We have used low-level photocrosslinkage to study chromatin effects on psoralen intercalation at specific DNA sequences of various complexities in intact, cultured, Drosophila cells. Alkali-denatured DNA connected in both strands to a 4,5',8-trimethylpsoralen (TMP) interstrand crosslink is insensitive to digestion by the single strand-specific nuclease S1 and does not hybridize to complementary DNA. Crosslink number at any ultraviolet light exposure increases in proportion to the concentration [PS] of TMP dark binding sites that are occupied. The crosslinking constant, K, is the increase in crosslink number per length DNA per increment [PS]. Many factors influence K, including sequence composition and ionic strength. We show here that the ratio of K at any specific sequence (Kh, from hybridization measurements) to Kh at any other specific sequence or to K of total DNA (Kf, from fluorimetry measurements) can be calculated from measurements of crosslinkage, the mass fraction of the sequence in question or of total DNA that is connected in both strands to a crosslink. When crosslinked and uncrosslinked DNAs fragmented by mechanical shear were mixed in known proportions, Kf exceeded Kh of a single-copy gene by 15%. We treated cells with TMP plus near ultraviolet light, then tested for crosslinkage and for hybridization. A single-copy, larval gene at 70D, and a 250-copy type 1 ribosomal DNA intervening sequence, neither of which is transcribed in these cells, were as sensitive to crosslinkage as total, cell DNA. However, single-copy, heat shock gene sequences from loci 63BC and 95D, and the 180-copy ribosomal DNA coding sequence were more sensitive to crosslinkage than total DNA in the same preparations. The excess was largest in the shortest fragments, indicating a localized effect. The same sequences were crosslinked less readily than total DNA in vitro; we calculate a 3.4 to 3.8-fold excess crosslink number in these sequences due to chromatin microenvironment. We tested for effect of transcriptional induction on crosslink sensitivity in the heat shock genes. At low [TMP], heat shock stimulated crosslinkage at or very near heat shock genes in cells, but not in other sequences or in naked DNA. However, overall crosslink sensitivity was unaffected by heat shock. This suggests that transcription increased the affinity of some heat shock gene DNA binding sites for TMP without increasing the number of such sites. 

2480952
Orientation of dioxygen bound to cobalt(II) bleomycin-DNA fibers. 
The molecular oxygen adduct of Co(II)-bleomycin is stable for long periods when bound to salmon sperm DNA at large ratios of polymer to drug. According to ESR studies of orientation of the paramagnetic complex associated with DNA fibers, the oxygen-oxygen bond is restricted to a plane perpendicular to the fiber axis. Thus, one can define three g values for the adduct 2.104, 2.016, and 2.000, one parallel to the fiber axis and two orthogonal to it. There is no change in orientation over the range of 77 K to ambient temperature. Furthermore, there is no difference in results at a series of relative humidities ranging from less than 76% where bulk DNA alone assumes an A conformation to 95% where it is primarily B DNA. A structural model is presented for the geometry of the metal binding domain of O2-Co-bleomycin in relationship to the fiber axis of DNA. 

16441097
Exo-coordination-based supramolecular silver(I) complexes of S2O macrocycles: effect of ligand isomerism on the structural diversity. 
An isomeric series of S2O macrocycles incorporating a xylyl group at the ortho (L1), meta (L2), and para (L3) positions were employed to examine the influence of the ring rigidity on silver(I) coordination modes in resulting supramolecular complexes (1-3); L1 and L3 afforded sandwich (1; Ag:L1 = 1:2) and infinite 1-D (3) complexes, respectively; otherwise, L2 gave the 1-D polymer (2a), 2:3 club sandwich (2b), and unique 2:4 bridged dinuclear complex (2c) complexes, in which their topologies vary with the solvent used. 

3145991
[In vitro combination effects of astromicin and beta-lactam antibiotics against CFS-sensitive and CFS-resistant Pseudomonas aeruginosa. In vitro synergistic activity] 
We investigated in vitro synergistic activity of astromicin (ASTM) combined with beta-lactam antibiotics (cefsulodin (CFS), cefoperazone (CPZ), ceftazidime (CAZ), piperacillin (PIPC) and fosfomycin (FOM) against fresh clinical isolated Pseudomonas aeruginosa, which consisted of 13 CFS sensitive (MIC less than or equal to 3.13 micrograms/ml) and 19 CFS resistant (MIC greater than or equal to 400 micrograms/ml) strains according to the FIC index. Against CFS-sensitive P. aeruginosa, ASTM showed good synergistic activities when combined with PIPC (54%), CAZ (38%), CPZ (23%) and CFS (8%). Against CFS-resistant P. aeruginosa, ASTM also showed high synergistic activities when combined with CAZ (63%), CPZ (47%), PIPC (37%) and CFS (11%). Among the CFS-resistant P. aeruginosa, one clinical isolate showed a high sensitivity (MIC0.78 micrograms/ml) against ASTM alone. 

3199170
International criteria for diagnosis, staging, and response to treatment in patients with neuroblastoma. 
Neuroblastoma is one of the most common tumors in childhood. However, it often has been difficult to compare clinical and laboratory studies of this disease due to a lack of uniform criteria for diagnosis, staging, and response. An international group of conferees addressed each of these issues and reached a consensus. Specific criteria for making a diagnosis of neuroblastoma are defined. A new neuroblastoma staging system is proposed that takes into account the most important elements of current but incompatible systems. Finally, criteria for response to treatment are standardized. The criteria proposed herein represent an international consensus of essentially every major pediatric oncology group or organization in the United States, Europe, and Japan. The staging system should be referred to as the International Neuroblastoma Staging System, and the response criteria as the International Neuroblastoma Response Criteria. Implementation of these criteria will greatly facilitate the comparison of clinical and laboratory studies by different groups and countries. Furthermore, these criteria should serve as a foundation on which future modifications or improvements can be based. 

7742997
Spreadsheet method for determining sample sizes for heart valve studies. 
Grunkemeier, Johnson, and Naftel have given a method for computing sample size requirements for a clinical study of a new heart valve. This paper gives an implementation of the method on a computer spreadsheet. Moreover, it computes the sample size for the most powerful test with exactly the prescribed level of significance and power; all other tests will necessarily have smaller power and will need larger sample sizes. All graphs and tables are produced on the spreadsheet, and no use of special statistical functions is necessary. 

185287
Age-specific incidence of neutralization antibodies of Herpes simplex virus. 
Sera of 1255 individuals from Novi Sad, varying in age from less than 1 month to 69 years, have been tested for neutralization antibodies to Herpes implex virus type 1. The eight newborns tested and 97% of the 507 adults were positive, with titres ranging from 1/4 to 1/256. The titres in newborns were significantly lower than the titres in adults. After birth the maternal antibodies declined rapidly and 94% of infants at the age of greater than 6 months and less than 2 years were negative. After the first year infants in Novi Sad start to acquire herpes-neutralizing antibodies actively, reaching a 50% incidence of positives between the 2nd and 3rd year of age. Age-specific incidence rates of herpes positives found in Novi Sad have been compared with those reported from Edinburgh, Freiburg i. Br. and Louisiana. Possible influences of several circumstances upon the incidence rate of positives detected by the neutralization test are discussed. 

8847456
[Differentiation of extravillous trophoblast during normal pregnancy] 
The implantation site in 25 pregnant uteri was studied morphologically and immunohistochemically to clarify the developmental process of extravillous trophoblasts (EVTs). 1. Dense trophoblastic invasion of the decidua was observed. Multinuclear trophoblasts appeared in the deciduo-muscular junction from the 10th week. Trophoblasts infiltrated decidual vessel walls, where extensive perivascular degeneration existed. EVTs may be indispensable for construction of the placenta. 2. In villous trophoblasts (VTs) the location of hCG and hPL was limited to multinuclear cells, whereas in EVTs hCG was present in a few mononuclear cells and hPL was observed in most mononuclear and multinuclear cells. The immunoreactivity of trophoblast-related monoclonal antibodies also differed: neither anti-Tropl (reactive with cytotrophoblasts (CTs)) nor NDOG1 (reactive with syncytiotrophoblasts (STs)) was reactive with EVTs. 3. The absence of hCG and hPL in mononuclear trophoblasts of the cell column indicates that EVTs differentiate after invading the decidua. Kurman et al. proposed the term intermediate trophoblast, indicating cells in transition from CTs to STs and EVTs, and this is based on the concept that the developmental processes of EVTs and VTs are identical. But the results of this study suggested an independent developmental process for EVTs and therefore it seemed that the term intermediate trophoblast should not be employed for EVTs. 

2440068
Effects of deoxycorticosterone acetate on the electrical properties of rat large intestine: segmental differences. 
The functional heterogeneity of different segments of the rat large intestine was investigated by means of transepithelial potential difference (PD), short-circuit current (Isc) and transepithelial resistance (Rt) measurements in control rats and after deoxycorticosterone acetate (DOCA) pretreatment. Rt and PD were low in caecum and proximal colon but higher in the distal colon and rectum. Isc was highest in the distal colon, lower in the caecum, proximal colon, and rectum. None of the electrical properties was sensitive to amiloride in control conditions. DOCA increased PD and Isc in the caecum, distal colon and rectum but had no effect in the proximal colon. The increase of the Isc after DOCA in the distal colon and rectum was reached by induction of the amiloride-sensitive Isc associated with reduction of the amiloride-insensitive Isc. The effect of DOCA could be completely prevented by concurrent spironolactone treatment. The results suggest that the epithelia of the proximal parts of the large intestine are "leaky" whereas those of the distal colon and rectum are relatively "tight". It is concluded that there is a marked quantitative and qualitative segmental heterogeneity along the rat large intestine. 

12477818
Disulfide-linked integrase oligomers involving C280 residues are formed in vitro and in vivo but are not essential for human immunodeficiency virus replication. 
The human immunodeficiency virus type 1 integrase (IN) forms an oligomer that integrates both ends of the viral DNA. The nature of the active oligomer is unclear. Recombinant IN obtained under reducing conditions is always in the form of noncovalent oligomers. However, disulfide-linked oligomers of IN were recently observed within viral particles. We show that IN produced from a baculovirus expression system can form disulfide-linked oligomers. We investigated which residues are responsible for the disulfide bridges and the relationship between the ability to form covalent dimers and IN activity. Only the mutation of residue C280 was sufficient to prevent the formation of intermolecular disulfide bridges in oligomers of recombinant IN. IN activity was studied under and versus nonreducing conditions: the formation of disulfide bridges was not required for the in vitro activities of the enzyme. Moreover, the covalent dimer does not dissociate into individual protomers on disulfide bridge reduction. Instead, IN undergoes a spontaneous multimerization process that yields a homogenous noncovalent tetramer. The C280S mutation also completely abolished the formation of disulfide bonds in the context of the viral particle. Finally, the replication of the mutant virus was investigated in replicating and arrested cells. The infectivity of the virus was not affected by the C280S IN mutation in either dividing or nondividing cells. The disulfide-linked form of the IN oligomers observed in the viral particles is thus not required for viral replication. 

1783024
Sexual dimorphism in the mossy fiber synapses of the rat hippocampus. 
The presence of sexual dimorphism in the hippocampal formation has long been recognized. Differences between male and female rats have been detected with respect to the number of dentate granule cells and branching patterns of dentate granule and hippocampal pyramidal cell dendrites. Groups of 6 male and 6 female Sprague-Dawley rats were studied at 180 days of age. Based on light microscopical Timm-staining and Golgi-impregnation and electron microscopy, and applying morphometric techniques, we now report that the total number of synapses between mossy fibers and the apical dendritic excrescences of CA3 pyramidal cells is the same in male and female rats, despite a higher numerical density in the latter. Moreover, the volume of the mossy fiber system was found to be smaller in females. Because the number of dentate granule cells is smaller in females than in males, the increased numerical density of synapses may be thought of as a compensatory mechanism to equalize the number of synaptic contacts between dentate granule and CA3 pyramidal cells in the two sexes. We demonstrate that an increase in the number of mossy fiber boutons in female rats is a determining factor for the sexual differences found. 

9258282
Plasma total homocysteine concentrations in epileptic patients taking anticonvulsants. 
Plasma total homocysteine (tHcy) and serum folate (FA) concentrations were measured in 130 epileptic patients taking anticonvulsant drugs. A significant inverse correlation was found between FA and tHcy. This was greater in the older group (> or = 15 years) than in the younger group (1 to 14 years). There were four FA-deficient patients (FA concentration < 3 ng/mL regardless of symptoms), including three patients in the older group and one in the younger group. All FA-deficient patients had received long-term treatment (> 7 years) with multiple anticonvulsants. Their tHcy levels were higher than the 90th percentile of those in control subjects. Two patients showed extremely high levels of tHcy (57.9 and 29.1 mumol/L) and subnormal plasma methionine levels. After FA therapy, their tHcy decreased to levels the same as or less than those of control subjects and FA increased to above the normal range. Based on these findings, we conclude that measuring FA and tHcy concentrations may be useful for preventing thrombosis due to hyperhomocysteinemia in epileptic patients taking anticonvulsants, particularly those who receive long-term treatment with multiple agents. 

7762395
Pharyngeal airflow during sleep. 
This study was conducted to investigate the effects of sleep and nasal resistance on pharyngeal airflow in a group of healthy male adults without complaint of habitual snoring. Twelve subjects aged 21 to 60 years were studied in a sleep laboratory during exclusive nasal breathing. Nasal and pharyngeal airflow variables were measured concomitantly at different stages of sleep. Awake pharyngeal resistance averaged 0.02-0.03 Pa/cm3/s in recumbency. In stage 2 sleep and quiet breathing resistance increased by a factor of 3-4 and by a factor of 7-8 during snoring. Increased nasal loading did not increase pharyngeal resistance further or induce snoring. Mostly, increased pharyngeal resistances were of similar magnitude in both phases of respiration, but in a few instances inspiratory resistance exceeded that in expiration, and in a similar number the reverse was found. Overall, compliance of the pharyngeal airway was not a prominent feature in this group of subjects. The relationship between transpharyngeal pressure and resistance should be studied further in order to simplify future studies of airflow during sleep. 

7681127
Endothelial cell adhesive receptors. 
Endothelial cells express a variety of adhesive receptors that regulate their adhesion to extracellular matrix and organization of cell-cell junctions. Most of the endothelial cell receptors for matrix proteins, characterized so far, belong to the integrin superfamily. Endothelial cells, as many other cell types, have many different integrins on their surface. This indicates that the interaction with matrix proteins is a complex phenomenon that requires multiple (and possibly redundant) recognition mechanisms. We have only a limited knowledge of the structures involved in endothelial cell-cell junctions. Integrins have been found to be localized in these structures too. This suggests that they can play a role also in this homotypic type of cell interaction. Other molecules, however, that are structurally and functionally distinct from integrins have been found in endothelial cell-to-cell contacts. The reciprocal role of these proteins remains to be fully defined. 

11945140
AMPA receptor antagonists with additional mechanisms of action: new opportunities for neuroprotective drugs? 
Ischaemic stroke of the brain accounts for about one third of all deaths in industrialized countries. Many of the patients who survive are severily impaired. Thus, there is an enormous need for pharmacotherapy for the treatment of ischaemic stroke. Why is such a treatment not available yet? Are the pathophysiological sequelae of brain ischaemia not well understood? Have there been no attempts for clinical development of neuroprotective drugs? Everyone who is engaged in stroke research knows that the opposite is true: The cellular processes occuring after brain ischaemia have been studied for a long time, and we have a thorough understanding of the cellular processes which are involved. Many compounds underwent clinical trials, but most of them failed. One hypothesis to explain this disappointing fact might be that the cellular consequences of stroke are manyfold, but that the clinically tested compounds were selective for only one molecular mechanism. The aim of this review is to give a summary of the pathophysiological mechanisms which occur during and after an ischaemic stroke, and to comment on the preclinical studies where multiple disease-related mechanisms were targeted pharmacologically. Moreover, a novel class of neuroprotective compounds, the oxadiazole derivatives, will be presented. Compounds of this chemical class target two key mechanisms which are important for the pathophysiology of stroke, namely voltage-gated sodium channels, as well as glutamate receptors of the alpha-amino-3-hydroxy-5-methyl-4-isoxazolepropionic acid (AMPA) subtype. 

1354645
Extension of the physical map in the region of the mouse X chromosome homologous to human Xq28 and identification of an exception to conserved linkage. 
We have extended our pulsed-field gel map of the region of the mouse X chromosome homologous to human Xq28 to include the loci Gdx (DXS254Eh), P3 (DXS253Eh), G6pd, Cf-8, and F8a. Gdx, P3, and G6pd are demonstrated to be physically linked to the X-linked visual pigment locus (Rsvp) within a maximal distance of 340 kb, while G6pd and Cf-8 are approximately 900 kb apart. These studies favor a gene order of cen-Rsvp-Gdx-P3-G6pd-(Cf-8)-tel and extend the physical map of this region to 5 million bp. In conjunction with previous physical mapping studies in both mouse and human, the results suggest conserved linkage for loci in this region of the mouse X chromosome and human Xq28. However, employing pulsed-field gel electrophoresis and genetic pedigree analysis of interspecific backcross progeny, we have found close linkage of a clone encoding a mouse homolog for human factor VIII-associated gene A (F8A) to DXPas8, thus revealing the first exception to conserved gene order between murine and human loci in the region. 

8702454
All-trans-retinoic acid in POEMS syndrome. Therapeutic effect associated with decreased circulating levels of proinflammatory cytokines. 
Chronically elevated serum levels of proinflammatory cytokines is a feature of the syndrome known as POEMS (plasma cell dyscrasia with polyneuropathy, organomegaly, endocrinopathy, monoclonal [M] protein, skin changes). A patient had a POEMS syndrome with thrombocytosis and biclonal gammopathy and was treated as follows: all-trans-retinoic acid (tretinoin) at 90 mg/day for 50 days, no treatment for 70 days, readministration of tretinoin at 75 mg/day for 180 days. Focal bone lesion irradiation was performed from day 26 to day 50. Serum levels of interleukin-6 (IL-6), tumor necrosis factor alpha (TNF alpha), and IL-1 beta normalized within 7 days after the first administration of tretinoin, transiently increased at the time of radiotherapy, increased again after withdrawal of the tretinoin, and decreased again after its reintroduction. The platelet count and gammopathy paralleled the changes in the cytokine levels. This study documents in vivo the ability of all-trans-retinoic acid to down-regulate the release of IL-6, IL-1 beta, and TNF alpha, and illustrates its potential as a therapeutic agent in conditions associated with chronic overproduction of proinflammatory cytokines. 

8882969
Cutaneous monoblastic leukemia as a first sign of relapse six years after autologous bone marrow transplantation for acute leukemia. 
A patient with acute monoblastic leukemia (AML, M5A) was treated successfully in December 1987. In 1993 after 6 years in complete remission, she presented with an intracutaneous nodular mass on her right upper arm which was resected in toto and shown to be undifferentiated monoblastic leukemia. Two further chloroma lesions were excised in July 1994 and March 1995 respectively. Bone marrow cytology and histology always showed a continuing complete remission with no evidence of leukemia relapse. In July 1995 she presented with a disseminated skin infiltrate and a relapse with 80% monoblasts in the bone marrow. After one course of chemotherapy (Idarubicin/Ara-C), a second complete remission was achieved and her leukemic skin infiltrate disappeared completely. This case illustrates that chloromas of the skin can occur as late as 6 years after treatment for AML and also emphasizes that the occurrence of a chloroma does not necessarily mean immediate leukemia relapse. It also stresses that a second complete remission can be achieved with standard AML-induction therapy despite widespread leukemic skin infiltrates in such patients. 

16148820
Hemolytic characteristics of three commercially available centrifugal blood pumps. 
OBJECTIVE: As compared with traditional extracorporeal roller-occlusion blood pumps, nonocclusive centrifugal pumps offer the benefits of requiring a smaller circuit surface area and, thus, a smaller prime volume. However, centrifugal blood pumps have been reported to generate unacceptable levels of hemolysis. We hypothesize that the newer generation centrifugal pumps have an incidence of hemolysis similar to the traditional roller head pumps and, thus, could be used for extracorporeal membrane oxygenation circuits. DESIGN: Randomized, prospective, bench study. SETTING: University research laboratory. INTERVENTIONS: Three centrifugal blood pumps (Cobe Revolution, Jostra Rotaflow, and Medtronic BioMedicus) were compared with a roller occlusion blood pump (Cobe Century). Hemolysis generation was examined during 6 hrs of continuous use. Two test runs per group were randomly performed on three consecutive days for a total of six test runs for each of the four pumps (n = 24). MEASUREMENTS AND MAIN RESULTS: Plasma free hemoglobin values were determined using a Spectra MaxPlus spectrophotometer. A normalized index of hemolysis was calculated to compare the individual trials. The Cobe Revolution and the Jostra Rotaflow compared favorably with the Cobe Century roller occlusion blood pump in the amount of hemolysis produced. CONCLUSIONS: These data are encouraging for the development of a low-prime, mobile neonatal extracorporeal membrane oxygenation circuit using centrifugal pump technology. 

2288197
Pattern formation of the sensible nerves in the hand of mouse embryos with special reference to the posterior-anterior developmental gradient. 
The development of the sensible innervation of the hand was investigated. For this reason normal forelimbs and limb bud cultures from 12- to 14-day-old mouse embryos were stained in toto using the cholinesterase technique. The dorsal side of the hand is mainly innervated by sensible branches of the radial and the musculocutaneous nerve, which penetrate the fascia in the region of the elbow. From here they grow in a distal direction forming the dorsal digital nerves. On the ventral side the median nerve grows in a subfascial compartment towards the palmar side of the hand. While passing the wrist the median nerve exhibits a frayed appearance. A net of branching and anastomosing small nerve fibre bundles is visible. This implies that on the palmar side of the metacarpal region of the hand-plate no specific highways for the growing nerve fibres exist. From late day 12 to early day 14 of embryonic development this diffuse nerve net is organized. In a posterior-anterior (ulnoradial) developmental gradient the common palmar digital nerves were formed, and these nerves divide at their tip into the proper digital nerves. However, the proper digital nerves again follow special pathways during their outgrowth. 

16162092
Survival outcomes in glioblastoma multiforme, including the impact of adjuvant chemotherapy. 
Glioblastoma is an uncommon cancer, but one that is disproportionately represented in mortality rates. Recent developments in adjuvant chemotherapy have regenerated enthusiasm for the treatment of this tumor. Ongoing translational and clinical research has led to a greater understanding of the biologic and molecular behavior and heterogeneity of this tumor. Recent shifts in treatment standards, as well as further selective individualizing of therapies based on molecular information, promise progress for this difficult-to-treat neoplasm. 

6379586
Bronchiectasis in childhood. 
Although bronchiectasis is relatively uncommon, it should be considered in a child with any of the following findings that persist: infiltrate on x-ray cough, purulent sputum, crackles or harsh breath sounds on auscultation of the chest, or hemoptysis. It is very likely that a pediatrician will encounter one or more children with this condition. This article deals with the pathogenesis, diagnosis, and treatment of bronchiectasis in childhood. 

17069179
Dermally adhered soil: 1. Amount and particle-size distribution. 
The risk associated with the dermal absorption of chemicals from contaminated soil is, in part, a function of particle size distribution, as determined by either dry or wet sieving techniques. For the soils tested, the adhered soil fractions were shown to be independent of organic matter content and soil origin. Soil moisture content becomes a factor only for very moist soils. Results show that the adhered fractions of dry or moderately moist soils with wide distributions of particle sizes generally consist of particles of diameters <63 microm. Consequently, dermal absorption experiments using larger size fractions may be of limited relevance to actual situations of soil exposure. 

334273
Enzyme immunoassay for the serodiagnosis of parasitic infections. 
A review of some applications of the Enzyme-Linked Immunosorbent Assay (ELISA) for the serodiagnosis of parasitic infections is presented. Examples are given of applications with trichinellosis, hydatidosis, schistosomiasis, toxoplasmosis, african trypanosomiasis and amoebiasis. ELISA is believed to be a valuable addition to existing serological tools, especially due to its sensitivity and ease of performance. 

6639285
[Echographic diagnosis of a cachexia-inducing diencephalic tumor] 
In a 2 month-old girl presenting with severe cachexia, ultrasonography of the brain through the fontanella showed a diencephalic tumor. Ultrasonographic pictures were compared with those obtained with CT scan. This report emphasizes the value of ultrasonography in such a syndrome with little neurologic symptoms. 

188488
[Complex formation of spin-labeled trideoxyadenylate with polyribouridylic acid] 
It is shown that the ESR spectra of triple-stranded complex formed by the polyribouridylic acid with the trideoxyadenylate spin-labelled on terminal phosphate is a superposition of the signals with strongly different width of HFS-components. This result is a structural support of the early proposed supposition about the irregular relative orientations of the oligomers in the triple-stranded complexes of oligoadenylates with poly-U. 

6151970
The solubility of 17 beta-oestradiol in aqueous polyethylene glycol 400. 
The solubility of 17 beta-oestradiol (E2) in aqueous solutions of polyethylene glycol (PEG) 400 has been measured at 35 degrees C. Up to 80% w/w PEG the solubility data conform to a log linear equation ln S = ln Sw + f sigma where S is the E2 concentration in the water/cosolvent mixture, Sw is E2 solubility in water, f is the weight fraction of PEG 400 and sigma is a parameter representing the solubilizing power of the cosolvent for the drug. Above 80% PEG the relationship becomes less convincing, with significant deviation from anticipated values. Reasons for these aberrations are discussed. It is suggested that conformational changes may be induced in the PEG by the addition of small quantities of water. Deviations noted for the melting point, viscosity and density data of PEG 400-water solutions may also confirm this suggestion. 

2970982
Effect of L-carnitine treatment on lipid metabolism and cardiac performance in chronically diabetic rats. 
The beneficial effects of L-carnitine administration were studied in vivo in isolated perfused working hearts from control and diabetic rats. Control and streptozocin-induced diabetic (STZ-D) rats were treated daily for 6 wk with high-dose L-carnitine (3 g.kg-1.day-1 i.p.). STZ-D results in loss of body weight and hypoinsulinemia. These effects were not altered by L-carnitine treatment. Myocardial free-carnitine levels were decreased in the untreated diabetic rats. L-Carnitine treatment of the diabetic rats increased myocardial free-carnitine levels, which were comparable with those of control rats. Six weeks after STZ administration, hearts from untreated diabetic animals exhibited depressed left ventricular developed pressure, cardiac contractility, and ventricular relaxation rates compared with control animals. However, this depression was not seen in the L-carnitine-treated diabetic animals. L-Carnitine treatment of diabetic rats significantly reduced plasma glucose and lipid levels but had no effect on control rats. Furthermore, thyroid hormone levels were higher in the L-carnitine-treated diabetic rats than in the untreated diabetic group. The data suggest that high-dose L-carnitine treatment may reduce the severity of diabetes and result in improved cardiac performance. 

17441387
[Gastric Crohn's disease as a cause of gastrointestinal bleeding after gastroscopy--diagnostic difficulties] 
Crohn's disease is a chronic, idiopathic inflammatory bowel disease localized most commonly in the terminal ileum, but it may involve any site of the gastrointestinal tract. Stomach location is extremely rare. Usually this process is confused by the presence of fistulas and intraabdominal abscesses in the typical emplacement, which are the consequences of penetration of the inflammatory process through the whole thickness of the large intestine's wall. In the case of ithe upper part of the gastro-intestinal tract location (commonly distal part of stomach or proximal of duodenum) bleeding is the most dangerous complication. In the diagnostics of this disease the combination of endoscopy and immunobiochemical tests of taking fragments has the basic importance. Pharmacological immunosupression with protection of the stomach mucosa is still the treatment's method of choice. We report the case of isolated gastroduodenal Crohn's disease of the stomach complicated with bleeding. 

7037793
Role of proteoglycans in endochondral ossification: immunofluorescent localization of link protein and proteoglycan monomer in bovine fetal epiphyseal growth plate. 
The hypothesis is widely held that, in growth plate during endochondral ossification, proteoglycans in the extracellular matrix of the lower hypertrophic zone are degraded by proteases and removed before mineralization, and that this is the mechanism by which a noncalcifiable matrix is transformed into a calcifiable matrix. We have evaluated this hypothesis by examining the immunofluorescent localization and concentrations of proteoglycan monomer core protein and link protein, and the concentrations of glycosaminoglycans demonstrated by safranin 0 staining, in the different zones of the bovine fetal cartilage growth plate. Monospecific antibodies were prepared to proteoglycan monomer core protein and to link protein. The immunofluorescent localization of these species was examined in decalcified and undecalcified sections containing the zones of proliferating and hypertrophic chondrocytes and in sections containing the zones of proliferating and hypertrophic chondrocytes and the metaphysis, decalcified in 0.5 M EDTA, pH 7.5, in the presence of protease inhibitors. Proteoglycan monomer core protein and link protein are demonstrable without detectable loss throughout the extracellular matrix of the longitudinal septa of the hypertrophic zone and in the calcified cartilage of the metaphysis. In fact, increased staining is observed in the calcifying cartilage. Contrary to the prevailing hypothesis, our results indicate that there is no net loss of proteoglycans during mineralization and that the proteoglycans become entombed in the calcified cartilage which provides a scaffolding on which osteoid and bone are formed. Proteoglycans appear to persist unaltered in the calcified cartilage core of the trabeculae, until at last the entire trabeculae are eroded from their surfaces and removed by osteoclasts, when the primary spongiosa is replaced by the secondary spongiosa. 

12947384
The role of the ubiquitin/proteasome system in cellular responses to radiation. 
In the last few years, the ubiquitin(Ub)/proteasome system has become increasingly recognized as a controller of numerous physiological processes, including signal transduction, DNA repair, chromosome maintenance, transcriptional activation, cell cycle progression, cell survival, and certain immune cell functions. This is in addition to its more established roles in the removal of misfolded, damaged, and effete proteins. This review examines the role of the Ub/proteasome system in processes underlying the classical effects of irradiation on cells, such as radiation-induced gene expression, DNA repair and chromosome instability, oxidative damage, cell cycle arrest, and cell death. Furthermore, recent evidence suggests that the proteasome is a redox-sensitive target for ionizing radiation and other oxidative stress signals. In other words, the Ub/proteasome system may not simply be a passive player in radiation-induced responses, but may modulate them. The extent of the modulation will be influenced by the functional and structural diversity that is expressed by the system. Cell types vary in the Ub/proteasome structures they possess and the level at which they function, and this changes as they go from the normal to the cancerous condition. Cancer-related functional changes within the Ub/proteasome system may therefore present unique targets for cancer therapy, especially when targeting agents are used in combination with radio- or chemotherapy. The peptide boronic acid compound PS-341, which was designed to inhibit proteasome chymotryptic activity, is in clinical trials for the treatment of solid and hematogenous tumors. It has shown some efficacy on its own and in combination with chemotherapy. Preclinical studies have shown that PS-341 will also potentiate the cytotoxic effects of radiation therapy. In addition, other drugs in common clinical use have been shown to affect proteasome function, and their activities may be valuably reconsidered from this perspective. 

6281195
In vitro effect of asbestos fibers on polymorphonuclear leukocyte function. 
Incubation of chrysotile and amphibole asbestos fibers with normal human peripheral blood polymorphonuclear leukocytes (PMN) resulted in a significant stimulation of PMN metabolic activity and generation of toxic oxygen by-products as measured by chemiluminescence (CL). Although all asbestos fibers tested were cytotoxic to PMN, cytotoxicity and CL varied disproportionately with fiber type. Anthophyllite asbestos produced the greatest PMN cytotoxicity. It also depressed PMN phagocytosis of latex beads the most and induced the greatest PMN CL response of the fiber types examined. We postulate that asbestos-induced release of toxic oxygen by-products from PMN which have infiltrated into the pulmonary alveoli may contribute to disease pathogenesis in asbestosis. 

3120205
Growth hormone releasing factor in human cerebrospinal fluid. 
Growth hormone releasing factor (GHRF) was determined by radioimmunoassay in cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) from 37 unmedicated healthy volunteers (mean +/- SD = 23.4 +/- 7.2 pg/ml). A second lumbar puncture in 11 of these subjects suggested that the CSF GHRF levels were stable over time. High performance liquid chromatography revealed that the CSF immunoreactivity co-eluted with the 1-44NH2 and 1-4ONH2 forms of GHRF. Measurements of GHRF in sequential CSF aliquots revealed no evidence of a rostro-caudal gradient, an observation that is compatible with the hypothesis that GHRF has a long half-life in CSF. A significant negative correlation with body weight was found in the 37 subjects. Levels of CSF GHRF were determined in 24 lithium-treated euthymic bipolar patients, 13 of whom provided a second CSF sample during the unmedicated state. No group differences or effects of lithium were noted. 

8839574
The potential impact of cancer survivors on Native American cancer prevention and treatment. 
Cancer has recently become a major health problem for American Indians and Alaska Natives. Surveillance, Epidemiology, and End Results data showed that Native American survival rates at 1, 3, and 5 years from cancer diagnosis are the poorest of any minority population studied. The causes for this finding are multifactorial and include a lack of awareness of cancer risks and symptoms, fatalism, and lack of access to screening services. Cancer survivors in native communities can be invaluable resources to educate others, raise cancer awareness, and most importantly prove that cancer is not always fatal. 

10632648
Five-day regimens containing ranitidine bismuth citrate plus high-dose clarithromycin and either amoxycillin or tinidazole for Helicobacter pylori infection. 
BACKGROUND: Ranitidine bismuth citrate (RBC)-based triple therapies for a period of 7 days have proved to be an effective treatment for Helicobacter pylori. AIM: To investigate the eradication efficacy, safety profile and patient compliance of two RBC-based triple therapies given for 5 days. METHODS: Eighty H. pylori-positive patients with dyspeptic symptoms, referred to us for gastroscopy, were consecutively enrolled in this prospective, randomized, open-label study. These patients were randomly assigned to receive a 5-day course of RBC 400 mg b.d. plus clarithromycin 500 mg b.d. and either tinidazole 500 mg b.d. (RBCCT group) or amoxycillin 1 g b.d. (RBCCA group). The H. pylori status was assessed by means of histology and rapid urease test at entry, and by 13C-urea breath test 8 weeks after the completion of treatment. RESULTS: All enrolled patients completed the study. Thirty-seven of 40 patients treated with RBCCT (both PP and ITT analysis: 93%; 95% CI: 80-98%) and 35 of 40 in the RBCCA group (both PP and ITT analysis: 88%; 95% CI: 73-96%) returned H. pylori-negative. Slight or mild side-effects occurred in 4/40 patients (10%) in the RBCCT group and in 5/40 (12%) in the RBCCA group. CONCLUSIONS: This is the first study demonstrating the efficacy of RBC-based triple therapies given for only 5 days. RBC regimens containing high-dose clarithromycin and either amoxycillin or tinidazole prove to be well tolerated, safe and preserve good eradication rates even when administered for a shorter than conventional duration. 

2186066
Placebo-controlled evaluation of abbreviated progressive muscle relaxation and of relaxation combined with cognitive therapy in the treatment of tension headache. 
Sixty-six tension headache patients were randomly assigned to one of four conditions for 8 weeks: (a) progressive muscle relaxation (PMR) alone; (b) PMR plus cognitive therapy (PMR + Cog); (c) pseudomeditation, a credible attention-placebo control; or (d) continued headache monitoring. A comparison of overall headache activity (headache index), derived from a daily headache diary, for 4 weeks before treatment to 4 weeks after treatment, revealed that active treatment (PMR and PMR + Cog) was superior to either control condition. Moreover, level of headache medication consumption decreased significantly for the active treatment groups. Although headache-index comparisons of the two active treatments showed no advantage for adding cognitive therapy to PMR, a measure of clinically significant change showed a trend for PMR + Cog to be superior to PMR alone. 

3932337
Crystallization and preliminary x-ray investigation of purine-nucleoside phosphorylase from Escherichia coli. 
Crystals of purine-nucleoside phosphorylase from Escherichia coli have been grown from solutions of ammonium sulfate. The crystals are hexagonal with space group P6(1)22 or P6(5)22; the axes are alpha = 106.5 A and c = 241.3 A. The crystals are moderately stable to x-rays and diffract beyond 3.0-A resolution. It appears that the molecule, which is a hexamer, utilizes the 2-fold symmetry of the space group, resulting in three subunits/asymmetric unit. 

10110076
Choosing a hospital: analysis of consumer tradeoffs. 
In today's competitive health care industry, hospital administrators and marketers must determine how important various product/service attributes are to potential consumers and how those attributes influence consumer choice decisions. The authors outline an approach (the analytic hierarchy process) that can be used to assess or predict health care choice decisions by consumers. The analytic hierarchy process is a method for analyzing consumer choice behavior whereby a hierarchical structure is used to determine the relative preferences of consumers for health care alternatives. Marketing strategies based on the study findings are suggested. 

6675285
[High-frequency tonal threshold hearing changes in diabetes mellitus] 
Hypoacusis diabetic neuro-sensorica was established in 45 per cent of 100 patients with diabetes mellitus examined by high frequency audiometry, whereas by a standard audiometry (a frequency range to 8 kHz), the affection was established in 21 per cent of the cases. That indicates the high significance of high frequency audiometry in the early detection of the complication of diabetes mellitus. The diabetic hypoacusis is more frequently found in patients that had had manifestations of neuropathies as well as in patients with insulin-independent diabetes, to a certain extent in patients with frequent decompensations of the basic disease. No correlation was established between the origination of hypoacusis and patients' age, the duration of the diabetes and the presence of vascular degenerative syndrome. 

11431144
Interleukin-6 inhibits the expression of luteinizing hormone receptor mRNA during the maturation of cultured rat granulosa cells. 
Interleukin-6 (IL-6) and its receptor components have been shown to be present in rat follicular granulosa cells. The present study was designed to examine the effect of this cytokine on changes in expression of the luteinizing hormone receptor (LHR) messenger RNA and of the steroidogenic enzyme, CYP11A1 (cytochrome P450 scc) in an in vitro model of granulosa cell maturation. Ovarian granulosa cells harvested from immature rats 2 days after treatment with equine chorionic gonadotropin were cultured for 48 h in media containing 10% fetal bovine serum. They were then transferred to a chemically defined serum-free medium and cultured for an additional 72 h. Within 24 h of transfer, the expressions of LHR and CYP11A1 mRNA increased significantly and remained increased for 72 h. The cells responded to exposure to FSH, but not LH, by an increase in production of cAMP before the additional 72 h of culture. The cAMP response to LH was attained within 24 h and persisted for 72 h, whereas the response to FSH decreased continuously with time. Inclusion of IL-6 in the culture medium caused a dose-dependent decrease in expression of LHR mRNA, in addition to a decrease in the cAMP response to LH. Immunoneutralization of endogenous granulosa cell IL-6 resulted in an increase in expression of LHR mRNA, but not CYP11A1 mRNA. The results are consistent with the view that IL-6 may have a physiological role in the maturation of ovarian follicles by modulating the attainment of the LHR in granulosa cells. 

9209983
Topography after repair of full-thickness corneal laceration. 
PURPOSE: To characterize corneal topography after repair of full-thickness corneal laceration. SETTING: Ophthalmic emergency room serving as a trauma referral center. METHODS: Twenty-two eyes with full-thickness corneal lacerations were prospectively studied after standardized surgical repair. Computerized videokeratography was done 2 and 14 weeks after surgery, with the latter measurement corresponding to 6 to 8 weeks after all sutures were removed. Fellow uninjured eyes served as the control group. RESULTS: Twenty eyes (91%) had a significant reduction in topographic distortion after suture removal. Mean corneal astigmatism, measured by simulated keratometry, was 10.70 diopters (D) +/- 5.90 D (SD) with sutures in place and 2.25 +/- 4.90 D after their removal (P < .005). Eighteen patients (82%) had 2.00 D or less of corneal astigmatism 6 to 8 weeks after all sutures were removed. The final distribution of topographic patterns was bow tie (50%), spherical/oval (36%), and irregular (14%). There was no significant correlation between laceration configuration (curvilinear, jagged, branched wound margins) and final topography. Lacerations that passed within 2.0 mm of the line of sight, however, were significantly more likely to have more than 2.00 D of final astigmatism. Mean central corneal power was 42.40 +/- 3.20 D in the injured eyes and 42.40 +/- 2.40 D in the uninjured fellow eyes. CONCLUSION: Although high astigmatism is frequently produced by corneal sutures used to repair full-thickness lacerations, the cornea has a substantial topographic memory that results in a marked normalization of contour after suture removal. 

17287251
R1R2R3-Myb proteins positively regulate cytokinesis through activation of KNOLLE transcription in Arabidopsis thaliana. 
G2/M phase-specific gene transcription in tobacco cells is mediated by R1R2R3-Myb transcriptional activators, NtmybA1 and NtmybA2, which bind to mitosis-specific activator (MSA) elements. We show here that two structurally related genes, MYB3R1 and MYB3R4, which encode homologs of NtmybA1 and NtmybA2, play a partially redundant role in positively regulating cytokinesis in Arabidopsis thaliana. The myb3r1 myb3r4 double mutant often fails to complete cytokinesis, resulting in multinucleate cells with gapped walls and cell wall stubs in diverse tissues. These defects correlate with the selective reduction of transcript levels of several G2/M phase-specific genes, which include B2-type cyclin (CYCB2), CDC20.1 and KNOLLE (KN). These genes contain MSA-like motifs in their promoters and were activated by MYB3R4 in transient expression assays in tobacco cells. The KN gene encodes a cytokinesis-specific syntaxin that is essential for cell plate formation. The cytokinesis defects of myb3r1 myb3r4 double mutants were partially rescued by KN gene expression from heterologous promoters. In addition, a kn heterozygous mutation enhanced cytokinesis defects resulting from heterozygous or homozygous mutations in the MYB3R1 and MYB3R4 genes. Our results suggest that a pair of structurally related R1R2R3-Myb transcription factors may positively regulate cytokinesis mainly through transcriptional activation of the KN gene. 

2445618
Distributions of neuropeptides in the human esophagus. 
The distributions of nerve cells and fibers with immunoreactivity for the peptides substance P, somatostatin, enkephalin, vasoactive intestinal peptide, gastrin-releasing peptide, and neuropeptide Y and the enzyme tyrosine hydroxylase were examined in 25 samples of human esophagus. These were compared with samples of stomach and intestine. In the smooth muscle of the muscularis externa, the muscularis mucosae, and beneath the epithelium, the most abundant nerve fibers contained vasoactive intestinal peptide and neuropeptide Y, in contrast to the scarcity of substance P, enkephalin, somatostatin, and gastrin-releasing peptide. Gastric and intestinal samples contained dense populations of fibers containing vasoactive intestinal peptide, neuropeptide Y, substance P, and enkephalin in the equivalent layers, but somatostatin- and gastrin-releasing peptide-immunoreactive fibers were scarce. Complete coexistence of vasoactive intestinal peptide and neuropeptide Y in nerve fibers within the muscle layers was demonstrated in the esophagus, but not in gastric and intestinal samples. The myenteric plexus along the length of the esophagus contained cell bodies and fibers reactive for vasoactive intestinal peptide, neuropeptide Y, enkephalin, and substance P. Somatostatin-immunoreactive cell bodies were very rare in the myenteric plexus, no gastrin-releasing peptide-immunoreactive cell bodies were seen, and both somatostatin and gastrin-releasing peptide-immunoreactive fibers were rare. In the upper esophagus, striated muscle bundles did not contain nerve fibers reactive for these peptides but immunoreactive fibers were seen in the muscularis mucosae and subepithelium. It is concluded that the esophagus has a different pattern of innervation by peptide-containing neurons than the stomach and intestines. Esophageal neurons can be classified into separate classes on the basis of their peptide content. 

9484800
Cholesteryl ester hydroperoxide formation in myoglobin-catalyzed low density lipoprotein oxidation: concerted antioxidant activity of caffeic and p-coumaric acids with ascorbate. 
Two diet-derived phenolic acids, caffeic and p-coumaric acids, interplayed with ascorbate in the protection of low density lipoproteins (LDL) from oxidation promoted by ferrylmyoglobin. Ferrylmyoglobin, a two-electron oxidation product from the reaction of metmyoglobin and H2O2, was able to oxidize LDL, degrading free cholesterol and cholesteryl esters. Upon exposure to ferrylmyoglobin, LDL became rapidly depleted of cholesteryl arachidonate and linoleate, which turn into the corresponding hydroperoxides. Cholesteryl oleate and cholesterol were, comparatively, more resistant to oxidation. Caffeic (2 microM) and p-coumaric (12 microM) acids efficiently delayed oxidations, as reflected by an increase in the lag times required for linoleate hydroperoxide and 7-ketocholesterol formation as well as for cholesteryl linoleate consumption. At the same concentration, ascorbate, a standard water-soluble antioxidant, was less efficient than the phenolic acids. Additionally, phenolic acids afforded a protection to LDL that, conversely to ascorbate, extends along the time, as inferred from the high levels of cholesteryl linoleate and cholesteryl arachidonate left after 22 hr of oxidation challenging. Significantly, the coincubation of LDL with ascorbate and each of the phenolic acids resulted in a synergistic protection from oxidation. This was inferred from the lag phases of cholesteryl linoleate hydroperoxide (the major peroxide found in LDL) formation in the presence of mixtures of ascorbate with phenolic acids longer than the sum of individual lag phases of ascorbate and the phenolic acids. A similar description could be drawn for the accumulation of a late product of oxidation, 7-ketocholesterol. It is concluded that ferrylmyoglobin induces a typical pattern of LDL lipid peroxidation, the oxidation rate of cholesteryl esters being a function of unsaturation; furthermore, there is a synergistic antioxidant activity of diet-derived phenolic acids with ascorbate in the protection of LDL from oxidation, a finding of putative physiological relevance. 

6767466
Combined gentamicin-tobramycin-corticosteroid treatment. II. Effect on gentamicin-resistant Pseudomonas keratitis. 
In an experimental model of Pseudomonas keratitis produced by a gentamicin sulfate-resistant, tobramycin sulfate-sensitive strain of P aeruginosa, the results of two treatment regimens-(1) with gentamicin and tobramycin alone and (2) with gentamicin, tobramycin, and a steroid-were evaluated. All of the animals exhibited ultimately the same amount of corneal inflammation and corneal scarring. In the group receiving the antibiotic-steroid combination, the corneal lesions healed more slowly. 

15989843
["Seronegative" myasthenia gravis and antiMuSK positive antibodies: description of Spanish series] 
BACKGROUND AND OBJECTIVE: Recently, the presence of antibodies to a muscle-specific tyrosine kinase (MuSK) has been reported in some patients with seronegative generalized myasthenia gravis. Our objective was to describe a group of patients who were positive for anti-MuSK antibodies. PATIENTS AND METHOD: Detection of antibodies using a radioimmunoassay was performed in the serum of 26 patients with generalized myasthenia gravis. We identified 9 patients with anti-MuSK antibodies (MuSK+). Clinical and therapeutic data from these patients were reviewed. RESULTS: Eight of nine patients were women aged between 20 and 40 years. Clinically, all of them showed prevalent bulbar signs, initially or during the progression of the disease. 77% of patients showed ocular involvement and 44% had symptoms of fatigability involving limbs. None of them improved upon thymectomy. Response to acetylcholinesterase inhibitors was variable. All of them responded to immunotherapy, although 30% required polytherapy. CONCLUSIONS: The study of anti-MuSK antibodies defines a subgroup of patients, 34,61% in our series, with seronegative generalized myasthenia. This group is characterized by an homogenous clinical presentation with prevalent bulbar symptoms. The knowledge of the immunopathogenic mechanisms of anti-MuSK antibodies will allow a better understanding of both the variable response to acetylcholinesterase inhibitors and the absence of response to thymectomy in these patients. 

7488086
Effect of diabetic duration on the secondary structures of the human lens capsules in diabetic cataracts. 
The decrease in triple helix content from 16% to 9% and in beta-turn content from 45% to 33%, combined with markedly increased random coil structure (16%) can be found in the secondary structure contents of lens capsule of the premature cataractous patients with longer diabetic history. However, almost the same peak position and secondary structure content are observed in the curve-fitted IR amide I band of lens capsules of both non-diabetic controls and premature cataractous patients with shorter diabetic history, even if the cataracts are senile. The present study emphasizes the duration of diabetes as a major cause to alter the secondary conformation of the cataractous human lens capsules in diabetic patients. 

17954666
Quantification and detectability of in-stent stenosis with CT angiography and MR angiography in arterial stents in vitro. 
OBJECTIVE: The purpose of this study was to compare CT angiography (CTA) and MR angiography (MRA) for the detectability of 75% and 95% stenoses in phantoms using six different stents. MATERIALS AND METHODS: Six different stents (Expander, Hemobahn, SelfX, Smart, Symphony, and Wallstent) were inserted into tubes filled with contrast agent (ioversol or gadoteric acid). To mimic stenoses of 75% and 95% of the patent lumen, 8-mm-diameter nylon cylinders were bored in the central axis (2 mm and 4 mm, respectively) and placed into the stent lumen. Intensity profiles across stenoses on 2-mm coronal reformatted sections of CTA or MRA were compared, and the detectability of the residual lumen was assessed using a subjective score. RESULTS: CTA showed relative in-stent signal attenuation for the in-stent stenoses of the tested stents ranging from 75% to 100% of the signal intensity of the control. SelfX and Symphony showed further shading of the residual lumen due to beam-hardening artifacts. Overestimation of stenosis was associated with low-grade stenoses in which the border of the lumen was closer to the stent struts. MRA showed relative in-stent signal attenuation of the in-stent stenoses ranging from 30% to 100% of the signal intensity of the control. Strut thickness tended to correlate with higher attenuation at CT. CONCLUSION: CTA may be more suitable for differentiation between 95% stenosis and occlusion; MRA has higher sensitivity in detecting 75% stenoses. Strut thickness and mesh size did not prove to be significant predictors for signal attenuation or overall image quality. 

17657690
[Acute retinal necrosis] 
Acute retinal necrosis (ARN) is a rare entity caused by Herpes viruses. An immunocompromised background and the complications of ARN mostly lead to a poor visual outcome. Confirmation of the early diagnosis through polymerase chain reaction and antibody detection from aqueous or vitreous taps is recommended to improve the medical management and prevent disease progression with an increased risk of complications. Favourable outcomes are possible by means of combined antiviral systemic and intravitreal strategies with Acyclovir, Foscarnet and Ganciclovir. We report on the relevant literature recommendations and our own experience. 

2129578
Reassessment of external insulin infusion pumps. 
Continuous subcutaneous insulin infusion (CSII) therapy using external infusion pumps provides an alternative to multiple daily injections (MDI) for insulin-dependent diabetics who require intensive insulin therapy. CSII allows for the delivery of regular insulin continuously at preset basal rates and at bolus doses, which can be varied in response to insulin needs of the patient. Intensive insulin therapy by CSII or MDI was administered to diabetics to improve control of their blood glucose levels and to assess its effects on the development of complications such as retinopathy and nephropathy. CSII appeared to be as effective as MDI in attaining near-normoglycemia and improving metabolic control in patients with insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus who required intensive insulin therapy. It was not clear, however, whether the improved control of the blood glucose levels resulted in the prevention or progression of the diabetic complications. The risks of having adverse effects, such as diabetic ketoacidosis or hypoglycemia, were higher with CSII as compared with MDI; both methods having higher risks of these complications in comparison to conventional insulin therapy. CSII may be beneficial for patients requiring intensive insulin therapy who may need greater lifestyle flexibility with regard to meal timing, work, and recreational scheduling. 

1965440
Plasma clearance of radiolabelled IGF-1 in the late gestation ovine fetus. 
We investigated the distribution of radiolabelled IGF-1 in the late gestation ovine fetus by exclusion gel chromatography following intravenous injection of 125I rh (recombinant human) met-IGF-1 into the chronically instrumented fetal lamb (120-130 days, n = 7). One minute after injection of 125I rh met-IGF-1 into the fetal femoral vein, 20.9 +/- 3.1% of the counts circulated in the 150K binding protein region, 55.0 +/- 3.7% in the 50K binding protein region and 18.7 +/- 0.6% in the free or 7K region. The chromatographic profiles obtained in the fetus were in general similar to those previously seen in the adult sheep. After an initial equilibration phase the half life of IGF-1 associated with the 150K binding fractions were 412.1 +/- 103.6 min. Two phases of clearance were observed for IGF-1 in association with the 50K binding fractions, an initial phase with a half life of 30.6 +/- 4.5 min followed by a second phase with a half life of 202.3 +/- 10.3 min. The 7K or 'free' form of IGF-1 had an initial half life of 12.6 +/- 5.1 min. Chromatography of samples of fetal tracheal fluid, fetal urine, amniotic fluid, maternal uterine venous plasma and maternal systemic plasma showed no movement of intact IGF-1 out of the fetal circulation into the fetal fluids or into the maternal circulation. However, when simultaneous samples were obtained from the fetal femoral artery and umbilical vein, higher radioactivity was consistently observed in the fetal femoral artery raising the possibility of placental uptake of IGF-1. (ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS) 

11500948
Regulatory role of endogenous regucalcin in the enhancement of nuclear deoxyribonuleic acid synthesis with proliferation of cloned rat hepatoma cells (H4-II-E). 
The role of endogenous regucalcin in the regulation of deoxyribonuleic acid (DNA) synthesis in the nuclei of the cloned rat hepatoma cells (H4-II-E) with proliferative cells was investigated. Cells were cultured for 6-96 h in a alpha-minimum essential medium (alpha-MEM) containing fetal bovine serum (FBS; 1 or 10%). Cell number was significantly increased between 24 and 96 h after culture with 10% FBS; cell proliferation was markedly stimulated by culture with 10% FBS as compared with that of 1% FBS. In vitro DNA synthesis activity in the nuclei of cells was significantly elevated 6 h after culture with 10% FBS and its elevation was remarkable at 12 and 24 h after the culture. Nuclear DNA synthesis activity was significantly reduced in the presence of various protein kinase inhibitors (PD98059, staurosprine, or trifluoperazine) in the reaction mixture containing the nuclei of cells cultured for 12 and 24 h with FBS (1 and 10%). The addition of regucalcin (10(-7) and 10(-6)M) in the reaction mixture caused a significant inhibition of nuclear DNA synthesis activity. The presence of anti-regucalcin monoclonal antibody (25-100 ng/ml) in the reaction mixture containing the nuclei of cells cultured for 24 h with 10% FBS resulted in a significant increase in nuclear DNA synthesis activity. This increase was completely blocked by the addition of regucalcin (10(-6) M). The effect of anti-regucalcin antibody (100 ng/ml) in increasing nuclear DNA synthesis activity was significantly inhibited in the presence of various protein kinase inhibitors. DNA synthesis activity was significantly enhanced in the presence of anti-regucalcin antibody (100 ng/ml) in the reaction mixture containing the nuclei of cells cultured for 24 h with 10% FBS in the presence of Bay K 8644 (2.5 x 10(-6) M). Culture with Bay K 8644 did not cause a significant increase in DNA synthesis activity in the absence of anti-regucalcin antibody. The present study demonstrates that endogenous regucalcin plays a suppressive role in the enhancement of nuclear DNA synthesis with proliferative cells. 

4003724
Immunological investigation of possible structural similarities between pollen antigens and antigens in apple, carrot and celery tuber. 
Crossed line immunoelectrophoresis (CLIE) was used to show that a minor allergen present in birch pollen and another present in timothy pollen shared common epitopes with antigens in apple, carrot and celery tuber. Major pollen allergens were not involved. Structural similarities were also noticed in some mugwort pollen antigens and antigens in apple, carrot and celery, but none of these mugwort antigens acted as an allergen. In crossed immunoelectrophoresis (CIE) of samples of apple, carrot or celery extracts towards antibodies against birch pollen, grass pollen or mugwort pollen, four to 14 distinct precipitates were observed and shown to be specific. In crossed radioimmunoelectrophoresis (CRIE) none of the precipitates could be shown to act as an allergen. Using allergen detection on nitrocellulose paper, the apple, carrot and celery extracts were shown to possess IgE-binding capacity. 

683457
Histoenzymology of the developing rat spinal cord. 
Using histochemical methods the activity of acetycholinesterase, acid phosphatase and various dehydrogenases was investigated in the developing rat spinal cord. At the ninth embryonic day (E9) only the activity of the lactate dehydrogenase slow-moving isoenzymes was prominent in spinal neurons. Between E13 and E15 an increase was observed in the activity of most of the dehydrogenases and of acid phosphatase in motoneurons and posterior root ganglion cells. Between E15 and E17 acetylcholinesterase activity increased markedly. On E17 and E20, this enzyme was also detectable in anterior and posterior roots and in neurons of the intermediate grey matter. On E20, although all grey matter neurons were cytologically fully differentiated, their enzymatic content was found to be still incomplete. The prominent acid phosphatase reaction within laminae I and II, which is characteristic of the adult rat, was absent in the fetal spinal cord. These findings indicate that the spinal cord metabolism is predominantly anaerobic during the first two-thirds of gestation. The histoenzymological maturation of grey-matter neurons is delayed in comparison to their cytological differentiation. Furthermore, the ontogenesis of motoneuronal acetylcholinesterase activity correlates well with the development of motor activities in the rat fetus. 

15501181
Fructose-2,6-bisphosphate: a traffic signal in plant metabolism. 
Fructose-2,6-bisphosphate (Fru-2,6-P(2)) regulates key reactions of the primary carbohydrate metabolism in all eukaryotes. In plants, Fru-2,6-P(2) coordinates the photosynthetic carbon flux into sucrose and starch biosynthesis. The use of transgenic plants has allowed the regulatory models to be tested by modifying the Fru-2,6-P(2) levels and the enzymes regulated by Fru-2,6-P(2). Genes for the bifunctional plant enzyme that synthesizes and degrades Fru-2,6-P(2) have been isolated and molecular characterization has provided new insight into structure and molecular regulation of the enzyme. Advances in Fru-2,6-P(2) physiology and molecular biology are discussed. These advances have not only enlightened in vivo operation of Fru-2,6-P(2) but also revealed that the Fru-2,6-P(2) regulatory system is highly complex and interacts with other regulatory mechanisms. 

2295895
Evaluation of long sampling tubes for remote monitoring by mass spectrometry. 
The long sampling tubes required for remote mass spectrometry alter the sampling system's performance characterized by sample flow, residence time, and 10 to 90% response time. We searched for an easy-to-handle tube with (1) a length of 30 m, (2) sample flow less than 50 ml.min-1, and (3) residence and response times approaching those predicted by our mathematical model. We tested tubes of various geometries and various commercially available materials by using them as inlet catheters for a quadrupole mass spectrometer (Centronic 200 MGA, Centronic Ltd, Craydon, UK). We measured their responses at 0 to 10% (on transients) and 10 to 0% (off transients) step changes in gas concentration for nitrogen, argon, nitrous oxide, oxygen, and carbon dioxide and 0 to 3% and 3 to 0% for halothane, enflurane, and isoflurane. With 5 polyethylene tubes, halothane response times were up to 38 times longer than predicted. One 30-m polyethylene tube combined a 158-ms response time for nitrogen and argon with a 2,205-ms response time for halothane. Teflon, polyvinyl chloride, and stainless steel also proved to be unsuitable because of unacceptable signal distortion: the carbon dioxide response time for a 30-m Teflon tube was 2,600 ms. A glass tube showed the least signal distortion but was hard to handle. Our requirements were fulfilled by a 29.77-m tube made from nylon with a 1.00-mm inside diameter to which a 0.23-m length of nylon with a 0.25-mm inside diameter was added at the patient end. It offers (1) sample flow equals 46 ml.min-1, (2) residence time equals 11.1 seconds, and (3) response times approaching our theoretical predictions, that is, 159, 164, 180, 159, 188, 302, 298, and 300 ms (means of on and off transients) for nitrogen, argon, nitrous oxide, oxygen, carbon dioxide, halothane, enflurane, and isoflurane, respectively. This tube allows the accurate monitoring of breathing frequencies up to 25 and 50 breaths/min for volatile agents and gases, respectively. 

10872196
Transplantation of renal precursor cells: a new therapeutic approach. 
The number of kidney transplantations performed per year is limited due to availability of donor organs. One possible solution to the organ shortage is the use of renal xenografts. However, the transplantation of xenografts is complicated by hyperacute and acute rejection. It has been postulated that the host immune response might be attenuated following the transplantation of renal precursor cells or embryonic kidneys (metanephroi) instead of developed (adult) kidneys. Transplanted metanephroi become chimeric organs in that their blood supply originates, at least in part, from the host. It is possible to transplant a developing metanephros, without the use of immunosuppression, from one rat to another. Transplanted metanephroi grow, develop, become vascularized, and function in host rats. Transplantation of metanephroi may be a promising novel therapeutic approach for the treatment of chronic renal failure. 

8981782
Natural occurrence of gliotoxin in turkeys infected with Aspergillus fumigatus, Fresenius. 
Thirteen samples of infected turkey lung tissue from cases of 'airsacculitis' were collected either at the processing plant or from a local turkey farm and subjected to cultural and gliotoxin analysis. Aspergillus fumigatus was isolated from 6 of the 13 samples; all isolates were determined to be gliotoxin producers when grown in laboratory culture and assayed by HPLC procedures. Gliotoxin was isolated from 5 of the 13 tissue but was not isolated from all tissues that were infected with A. fumigatus. Gliotoxin was isolated from which no A. fumigatus was isolated and it was not detected in three tissues from which gliotoxin-producing isolates of A. fumigatus were obtained. The ability of this pathogenic fungs to produce this immunomodulating compound in naturally infected turkeys provides further evidence that gliotoxin may be involved in the pathogenesis of the disease, aspergillosis of turkeys. 

1900828
Pituitary and testicular responses of beef bulls to active immunization against inhibin alpha. 
Prepubertal crossbred beef bulls served as controls or were actively immunized against the N-terminal, 30-amino acid synthetic fragment of porcine inhibin alpha, pI alpha (1-30). Antibody titers were detected in sera (greater than 40% B/BO in sera diluted 1,000-fold) but not in rete testis fluid of 390-d-old bulls. Serum FSH and inhibin remained static during a 5-h intensive bleed; inhibin was not acutely affected by a 15-fold LH rise and a threefold FSH rise induced by exogenous GnRH. Serum FSH, but not LH or testosterone, was consistently elevated (P less than .05) in immunized bulls compared with control bulls. Neither pituitary weight, pituitary gonadotropin content nor pituitary FSH/LH ratios were affected (P greater than .10) by pI alpha(1-30) active immunization. Testicular sperm density was greater (60 x 10(6) vs 45 x 10(6) sperm/g testis; P less than .10) in immunized bulls, but testes weight, epididymides weight and total daily sperm production remained unchanged. These results suggest that inhibin is important for regulation of FSH secretion and testicular function. Immunization with suitable inhibin vaccines may improve bull fertility. 

16056077
Biomechanical stability of intramedullary nailed high proximal third tibial fractures with cement augmented proximal screws. 
OBJECTIVE: Intramedullary nailing of nonarticular proximal tibia fractures can be affected by bone density resulting in loss of stability, fixation, and malalignment in osteopenic bone. This study was designed to quantify the biomechanical effects of augmenting proximal screws with cement in intramedullary nailing of high proximal third tibial fractures. DESIGN: In vitro biomechanical study using anatomic specimens. METHODS: Reamed nails were inserted into seven pairs of fresh-frozen cadaveric proximal tibiae and secured using two oblique and two transverse proximal screws. Paired tibiae were randomly assigned into two groups: cemented and noncemented proximal screw-holes. Bone cement was injected into the screw-holes before screw insertion in the cemented tibiae. Specimens were then tested in flexion/extension and varus/valgus to 12 Nm and in torsion to 7 Nm. Physical measurements of bone density were obtained to determine the effect of density on stability. MAIN OUTCOME MEASURES: Stability of the construct in both groups was analyzed and compared statistically using paired t tests. RESULTS: Cement augmentation of the proximal screws significantly increased mechanical stability in torsion and varus/valgus load configurations, with average decreases in rotational motion of 5.4 degrees +/- 1.6 degrees and 5.1 degrees +/- 5 degrees respectively. No change in stability was observed in flexion/extension loading. A trend toward decreased stability was seen in the uncemented construct in varus/valgus; cement augmentation of the proximal screws eliminated this effect. CONCLUSIONS: Lower bone density decreased the stability of the uncemented construct; however, cement augmentation of the proximal screws showed a trend to eliminate this effect in the varus/valgus loading configuration and should be considered when nailing proximal third tibial fractures in osteoporotic patients. 

2079697
Injuries to the elbow. 
Presented is an outline of the anatomy, biomechanics and function of the elbow joint, as it relates to normal and sporting activities. A variety of elbow injuries, including fractures of the olecranon, radial head and distal humerus are presented with appropriate methods of treatment. The aim to return patients to early functional activity is stressed. Soft tissue and more chronic over-use problems are briefly discussed, and a treatment regimen presented. In general, elbow injuries which involve acute fractures, dislocations and ligament injuries should be treated aggressively, in order to achieve early functional mobility. The more chronic over-use elbow problems should be viewed with a certain caution, and results are not as predictable following treatment of such injuries and over-use problems. 

1943673
Cardiac tagging in the rat using a DANTE sequence. 
We demonstrate the application of a DANTE tagging sequence to in vivo imaging of the rat heart. This sequence generates narrow parallel tag lines in a short space of time and is combined with cardiac gating to image the heart wall at eight points throughout the cycle. 

8736542
STAB-SD: a Shine-Dalgarno sequence in the 5' untranslated region is a determinant of mRNA stability. 
Transcription of the Bacillus thuringiensis cryIIIA toxin gene is initiated at nucleotide position -558 (relative to the cryIIIA start codon). However, the major cryIIIA transcript is an mRNA with its 5' end at nucleotide position -129. Fusions to the lacZ reporter gene revealed that the cryIIIA 5' untranslated region downstream of nucleotide position -129 acts as a 5' mRNA stabilizer. Deletion and mutation analysis suggest that the determinant of stability is a Shine-Dalgarno (SD) sequence close to the 5' end of the stable transcript. This SD sequence, designated STAB-SD, does not direct translation initiation. However, mutations predicted to weaken the putative interaction between the SD sequence and the 3' end of 16S rRNA lead to reduced mRNA stability. The binding of a 30S subunit to STAB-SD may be required for stabilization of cryIIIA mRNA as a transcript with a 5' end at nucleotide position -129. Similar STAB-SD sequences are found in the 5' untranslated regions of other cryIII genes, and in the 5' untranslated regions of genes from Gram-positive bacteria other than B. thuringiensis and may therefore be a widespread determinant of mRNA stability. 

10704332
Detection of an RNA-dependent RNA polymerase in mitochondria from a mitovirus-infected isolate of the Dutch Elm disease fungus, Ophiostoma novo-ulmi. 
RNA-dependent RNA polymerase (RdRp) activity has been detected in mitochondria from an isolate of Ophiostoma novo-ulmi infected with O. novo-ulmi mitovirus 6 (OnuMV6). The reaction products corresponded to the double-stranded and single-stranded forms of OnuMV6 RNA. Western blot analysis using antibodies raised against a conserved RdRp region has detected a protein of ca. 80 kDa in OnuMV6-infected mitochondria, close to the predicted size of the OnuMV6 RdRp. No RdRp activity or protein was detected in mitochondria from an uninfected O. novo-ulmi isolate. This is the first detection of a virus RdRp in fungal mitochondria and the results are consistent with the use of UGA tryptophan codons in its synthesis. 

17640871
A novel ADP-forming succinyl-CoA synthetase in Thermococcus kodakaraensis structurally related to the archaeal nucleoside diphosphate-forming acetyl-CoA synthetases. 
We have identified and characterized a structurally novel succinyl-CoA synthetase (SCS) from the hyperthermophilic Archaea Thermococcus kodakaraensis. The presence of an SCS completes the metabolic pathway from glutamate to succinate in Thermococcales, which had not been clarified because of the absence of classical SCS homologs on their genomes. The SCS from T. kodakaraensis (SCS(Tk)) is a heteromeric enzyme (alpha(2)beta(2)) encoded by TK1880 (alpha-subunit) and TK0943 (beta-subunit). Although both SCS(Tk) and classical SCSs harbor the five domains present in enzymes of the acyl-CoA synthetase (nucleoside diphosphate-forming) superfamily, the domain order and distribution among subunits in SCS(Tk) (alpha-subunit, domains 1-2-5; beta-subunit, domains 3-4) are distinct from those of classical SCSs (alpha-subunit, domains 1-2; beta-subunit, domains 3-4-5) and instead resemble the acetyl-CoA synthetases from Pyrococcus furiosus (ACSs I(Pf) and II(Pf)). Comparison of the four Thermococcales genomes revealed that each strain harbors five alpha- and two beta-subunit homologs. Sequence similarity suggests that the beta-subunit of SCS(Tk) is also a component of the presumed ACS II from T. kodakaraensis (ACS II(Tk)). We coexpressed the alpha/beta-genes of SCS(Tk) (TK1880/TK0943) and of ACS II(Tk) (TK0139/TK0943). ACS II(Tk) recognizes a broad range of hydrophobic/aromatic acid compounds, as is the case with ACS II(Pf), whereas SCS(Tk) displays a distinct and relatively strict substrate specificity for several acids, including succinate. This indicates that the alpha-subunits are responsible for the distinct substrate specificities of SCS(Tk) and ACS II(Tk). 

3390927
Total creatine kinase (CK) and CK-B activity in maternal blood and cord-blood samples after vaginal and cesarean births. 
We studied variations in the activity of total creatine kinase (CK; EC 2.7.3.2) and of CK-B in maternal and cord-blood samples, comparing data obtained for vaginal and cesarean births. CK-B activity was determined with an immunoinhibition assay. In all cases, there was a significant postpartum increase in total CK and in CK-B activity in maternal sera, whereas cord-blood samples showed no significant differences between activities in arterial and venous blood for either vaginal or cesarean births. Statistically significant differences were found in CK-B activity, but not in total CK, between cord-blood samples from vaginal births and those from cesareans. 

2521361
Polyurethane-coated Dacron mesh tray for temporary mandibular reconstruction following resection of oral cancer: clinical results of 27 cases. 
During a 3-year period from 1983 to 1986, a polyurethane-coated Dacron mesh tray (Xomed Inc, Jacksonville, FL) was used in 27 cases for temporary mandibular reconstruction in patients who had undergone jaw resection for oral carcinoma. Delayed mandibular reconstruction using the Dacron mesh tray combined with rib grafts was performed in three cases. The Dacron mesh tray technique provides good functional and esthetic results and offers several advantages when compared with metal trays. The success rate was 74%; intraoral perforation was the main reason for early removal of the tray. 

10716314
Use of 99mTc-furifosmin scintigraphy--planar and SPECT--to evaluate suggestive palpable and nonpalpable breast lesions. 
Our objective was to evaluate the role of 99mTc-furifosmin scintigraphy--planar and SPECT--in discriminating benign from malignant breast disease. METHODS: The trial was prospective, open, and diagnostic. We recruited 30 consecutive patients with 14 palpable and 16 nonpalpable breast lesions. After receiving informed consent, we injected 555-640 MBq 99mTc-furifosmin intravenously in the arm contralateral to the breast lesion. Planar imaging and SPECT were performed. All patients underwent excision of the tumor within 2 wk. Using histology as the gold standard, we calculated sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values for 99mTc-furifosmin in planar and SPECT technique. RESULTS: For 18 malignant and 12 benign breast lesions, a sensitivity of 50% for planar imaging and 72% for SPECT was seen. Specificity and positive and negative predictive values were 83%, 82%, and 53%, respectively, for planar imaging and 50%, 68%, and 55%, respectively, for SPECT. For the 14 palpable tumors (10 malignant, 4 benign), which averaged 17+/-10 mm in size (size range, 4-45 mm), a sensitivity of 60% for planar imaging and 80% for SPECT was achieved. Sixteen lesions were not palpable (median size, 9+/-3 mm [size range, 4-13 mm]). In this subgroup, 99mTc-furifosmin scintigraphy yielded a sensitivity of 37% for planar and 62% for SPECT technique (P>0.05). CONCLUSION: 99mTc-furifosmin scintigraphy is not a potent competitor to established scintigraphic procedures. In comparing this tracer with 99mTc-sestamibi and 99mTc-tetrofosmin, we cannot recommend 99mTc-furifosmin for the diagnosis of breast cancer. 

8037366
[Pharyngeal lipoma] 
We present a 40-year-old male patient with a lump in the parapharyngeal space protruding in the oro- and hypopharynx and obstructing the airway. Diagnosis lipoma. The pathology is reviewed and the surgical approach is commented upon. 

15286807
Integrin engagement regulates monocyte differentiation through the forkhead transcription factor Foxp1. 
The precise signals responsible for differentiation of blood-borne monocytes into tissue macrophages are incompletely defined. "Outside-in" signaling by integrins has been implicated in modulation of gene expression that affects cellular differentiation. Herein, using differential display PCR, we have cloned an 85-kDa forkhead transcription factor (termed Mac-1-regulated forkhead [MFH] and found subsequently to be identical to Foxp1) that is downregulated in beta(2)-integrin Mac-1-clustered compared with Mac-1-nonclustered monocytic THP-1 cells. MFH/Foxp1 is expressed in untreated HL60 cells, and its expression was markedly reduced during phorbol ester-induced monocyte differentiation, but not retinoic acid-induced granulocyte differentiation. Overexpression of MFH/Foxp1 markedly attenuated phorbol ester-induced expression of c-fms, which encodes the M-CSF receptor and is obligatory for macrophage differentiation. This was accompanied by decreased CD11b expression, cell adhesiveness, and phagocytosis. Using electromobility shift and reporter assays, we have established that MFH/Foxp1 binds to previously uncharacterized sites within the c-fms promoter and functions as a transcriptional repressor. Deficiency of Mac-1 is associated with altered regulation of MFH/Foxp1 and monocyte maturation in vivo. Taken together, these observations suggest that Mac-1 engagement orchestrates monocyte-differentiation signals by regulating the expression of the forkhead transcription repressor MFH/Foxp1. This represents a new pathway for integrin-dependent modulation of gene expression and control of cellular differentiation. 

12866919
HIV-1 p24 antigen testing in blood banks: results from Saudi Arabia. 
HIV-1 p24 antigen testing was introduced to increase sensitivity in the early detection of HIV infection in blood donors. Since the introduction of HIV-1 p24 antigen testing in Saudi Arabia, we have failed to detect a single positive case. Over a three-year period, only four indeterminates were detected out of 24,654 blood donors. All four proved negative by confirmatory testing. Based on this experience, we believe that resources would be better directed to pooled nucleic acid testing and that p24 serological testing should be abandoned. 

12164096
Serum IgE levels in Korean patients with human immunodeficiency virus infection. 
BACKGROUND: Human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection results in a selective CD4+ T cell depletion and an impairment of T cell regulation. Despite the immune depletion, the progression of HIV infection is accompanied by the stimulation of antibody synthesis. Thus, the prevalence and amplitude of the increase of total serum IgE level and the relationship between the IgE levels and the degree of immunodeficiency were evaluated in patients with HIV infection. METHOD: Twenty-six Korean adults infected with HIV, in different stages, were evaluated for serum IgE level and CD4+ T cell count. Serum IgG, IgM and IgA levels were also determined. All subjects enrolled in this study denied an individual and familial history of atopic diseases. The possibility of parasitic infestation was also excluded by history and stool examination. RESULTS: The mean serum IgE level was 473.5 IU/L with a standard deviation of 671.4 IU/L (range: 15.9-2000 IU/L) and increased serum IgE levels (> 200 IU/L) were found in 38.5% of the study population. The mean serum IgG, IgA and IgM levels were 1,939.5 +/- 588.6 mg/dL (normal: 751-1,560 mg/dL), 388.9 +/- 216.7 mg/dL (normal: 82-453 mg/dL) and 153.6 +/- 75.3 mg/dL (normal: 46-304 mg/dL), respectively. The CD4+ T cell count was inversely correlated to the serum IgE level (r = -0.429, p < 0.05), but not to the other isotypes of immunoglobulin. CONCLUSION: Serum IgE levels are increased in adults with HIV infection and could be useful as a marker of disease progression. Further study is needed to elucidate the causes and clinical significance of these findings. 

2222521
Metabolism of ethyl 2-carbamoyloxybenzoate (4003/2), a prodrug of salicylic acid, carsalam and salicylamide. 
The metabolites of 4003/2 observed in vivo have been produced by incubation in vitro of 4003/2 with liver post-mitochondrial supernatants from rat, rabbit and dog. The metabolites were characterized by UV, i.r., NMR, MS and HPLC. All the metabolites detected have been or are in use as drugs for the relief of pain and inflammation. Hence, the new drug 4003/2 is a pro-drug of salicylic acid, carsalam and salicylamide. 

4066726
Biocompatibility of Delrin 150: a creep-resistant polymer for total joint prostheses. 
A thermoplastic polymer, Delrin 150 (polyoxymethylene homopolymer), with creep resistance ten times that of ultrahigh-molecular-weight polyethylene, is used as a material for total joint prostheses. A study was made of the local and systemic host response to this polymer when implanted in three different mammalian species. 316 LC stainless steel was used as a control. The materials were implanted into muscle and bone as solid cylinders. A total of 446 samples were implanted into 74 animals. The duration of implantation ranged from 2 weeks to 2 years. A semi-quantitative evaluation of local tissue reaction was performed. For each implant, 16 histological criteria were graded for severity of host tissue reaction. The liver, spleen, kidneys, pancreas, and lungs from each animal were also studied for evidence of systemic toxicity. The polymer implants exhibited a mild tissue reaction with the same characteristics as the control. Local tumor formation, bone osteolysis, and surrounding muscle necrosis were not seen. No pathological changes compatible with systemic toxicity by Delrin 150 were observed in the study of the organs. Delrin 150 in solid form did not exhibit local or systemic toxicity and is therefore biocompatible by this study. Powder implantation studies should be performed to simulate tissue response to wear particles. 

2527465
The frequency and management of uterine perforations during first-trimester abortions. 
The frequency and management of uterine perforation during first-trimester abortions remain a matter of continuing debate among gynecologists. The rate of uterine perforations was 1.3/1000 procedures (eight cases) in 6408 women undergoing first-trimester abortions at our clinic. We also performed 706 first-trimester abortions at the time of laparoscopic sterilization. Two perforations (2.8/1000 procedures) were reported before laparoscopy. Twelve (15.6/1000 procedures) unsuspected perforations were discovered during direct laparoscopic visualization. This represents a 19.8/1000 procedure rate of perforation (14 cases). All 22 patients with perforations were managed conservatively, and no immediate or late complications were noted. Our data suggest that the true incidence of uterine perforations is significantly underestimated and serious complications caused by perforations are rare. Conservative therapy is recommended rather than early surgical intervention. 

8547631
Opposing effects of the basic helix-loop-helix transcription factor SCL on erythroid and monocytic differentiation. 
The SCL gene (also called Tal-1 or TCL5) was identified because of its association with chromosomal translocations in childhood T-cell lymphoid leukemias. SCL codes for a basic helix-loop-helix (bHLH) factor that can function as a transcriptional activator or repressor. In the adult, SCL expression is restricted to hematopoietic cells and tissues, but its function in the process of lineage commitment is unknown. The present study was designed to address the role of SCL in hematopoietic cell differentiation. SCL expression was determined in primary hematopoietic cells through the screening of cDNA samples obtained by reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) from single cells at different stages of differentiation. SCL RNA expression was highest in bipotential and committed erythroid precursors and diminished with subsequent maturation to proerythroblasts and normoblasts. In contrast, SCL mRNA was low to undetectable in precursors of granulocytes and monocytes and their maturing progeny. The same pattern of expression was observed after erythroid or monocytic differentiation of a bipotent cell line, TF-1, in that SCL mRNA levels remained elevated during erythroid differentiation and were downregulated with monocytic differentiation. Accordingly, TF-1 was chosen as a model to investigate the functional significance of this divergent pattern of SCL expression in the two lineages. Four independent clones stably transfected with an SCL expression vector exhibited enhanced spontaneous and delta-aminolevulinic acid-induced erythroid differentiation as measured by glycophorin expression and hemoglobinization, consistent with the view that SCL is a positive regulator of erythroid differentiation. Furthermore, constitutive SCL expression interfered with monocytic differentiation, as assessed by the generation of adherent cells and the expression of Fc gamma RII in response to TPA. These results suggest that the downregulation of SCL may be required for monocytic differentiation. 

7707421
Similarity of folate receptor expression in UMSCC 38 cells to squamous cell carcinoma differentiation markers. 
BACKGROUND: The folate receptor is a 38 to 39 kd glycoprotein attached to the cell membrane via a glycosylphosphatidylinositol anchor. It serves as the initiation point for receptor-coupled transport of folate in a process known as potocytosis. The receptor is overproduced by a number of malignant cell lines in vitro and in a large percentage of ovarian and uterine malignancies. Immunohistochemistry has shown the receptor to be expressed primarily in normal differentiated tissues such as choroid plexus, placenta, thyroid, and kidney. The receptor gene(s) has been mapped to the human chromosomal locus 11q13. PURPOSE: In order to better understand regulation of the synthesis of the receptor, we studied the expression and accumulation of the folate receptor in UMSCC 38 cells, a human malignant squamous cell carcinoma line with a karyotype that is amplified at the folate receptor gene locus. METHODS: Western blot analysis of octylglucoside-solubilized cell membranes was used to analyze expression of several proteins by UMSCC 38 cells grown in culture under varied conditions. Bands on autoradiographs, representing electrophoresed proteins detected by indirect antibody labeling and an enhanced chemiluminescence reaction, were quantitated by densitometry. RESULTS: The expression of the folate receptor was found to increase approximately fourfold as UMSCC 38 cells were grown to higher cell densities over increasing lengths of time, ranging from 3 to 9 days, in culture. The expression of K1 keratin protein, a known marker of differentiation in squamous cell carcinomas, was elevated to a similar degree (3.2-fold) between day 5 and day 9 in cultures of these cells. Expression of folate-receptor protein in UMSCC 38 cells was also found to be reduced approximately 10-fold when cells were exposed to 1 microM retinoic acid for 48 hours and increased approximately eightfold after a 5-day exposure to 3 microM hydrocortisone. CONCLUSIONS: We present evidence that synthesis of the folate receptor in UMSCC 38 cells is affected by the same pathway that changes the expression of some markers of differentiation in squamous cell carcinomas. IMPLICATIONS: The fact that folate receptor expression in these malignant cells can be manipulated using retinoids and steroids suggests that these hormones could modulate the efficiency of folate and antifolate uptake via the folate receptor and may enhance the usefulness of the receptor as a target for immunotherapy. 

10980956
New causes and treatments for infectious diarrhea in children. 
Infectious diarrhea is a universal and important health problem in the pediatric population. An expanding number of potential viral, bacterial, and parasitic pathogens have been associated with diarrheal disease. However, the epidemiologic association of a microorganism with diarrhea is only one step in the process of identifying new pathogens. Once the virulence mechanisms of these organisms are elucidated, a causal relationship can be more readily defined. This article reviews the etiologic agents of diarrhea in the pediatric population and focuses on the newer treatment and prevention modalities, including probiotics and vaccinations, which are used increasingly to combat these diseases. 

1817462
Split-thickness plantar skin grafts for coverage in the hand and digits. 
The instep of the foot is an excellent donor site for split-thickness skin grafts to cover soft tissue defects of the palm and digits. The technique is described and three illustrative clinical cases are presented. The unique, specialized characteristics of plantar skin are described, emphasizing similarities to palmar skin. The indications for this technique are hyperpigmentation, hair growth, ulceration, hyperkeratosis, marginal scarring, or recurrent breakdown of a preexisting graft, but we have also employed it for primary reconstructions in selected circumstances. The instep graft provides ideal color and texture match and long durability for a palmar graft, with the added advantage of an inconspicuous donor site. 

2286465
Fosfomycin trometamol versus ofloxacin/co-trimoxazole as single dose therapy of acute uncomplicated urinary tract infection in females: a multicentre study. 
20 urologists took part in a single blind, randomized study. Female patients with acute uncomplicated UTI were recruited. The patients received either a single dose of 3 g fosfomycin trometamol versus 200 mg ofloxacin or 1.92 g co-trimoxazole. Follow-up examinations were carried out after one and four weeks. Of 562 patients 446 could be evaluated for efficacy and 496 for tolerance. Patients were analysed according to the amount of bacteriuria: "significant" (greater than or equal to 10(5)/ml), "low count" (10(2) - 10(4) ml) and "no bacteriuria" (less than or equal to 10(1)/ml), as well as according to the sensitivity of the infecting organisms: sensitive (resistant): fosfomycin trometamol less than or equal to 16 mg/l (greater than or equal to 128 mg/l), ofloxacin less than or equal to 1 mg/l (greater than or equal to 8 mg/l), co-trimoxazole less than or equal to 2/38 mg/l (greater than or equal to 16/304 mg/l). Up to one week the following results could be achieved: clinical improvement was attained in patients with "significant" bacteriuria (fosfomycin trometamol-150, ofloxacin-89, co-trimoxazole-69) in 94.7% for fosfomycin trometamol, in 95.4% for ofloxacin, and in 94% for co-trimoxazole; in patients with "low count" bacteriuria (fosfomycin trometamol-44, ofloxacin-18, co-trimoxazole-30) in 95.2% for fosfomycin trometamol, in 93.7% for ofloxacin, and in 96.4% for co-trimoxazole; and in patients with no bacteriuria (fosfomycin trometamol-11, ofloxacin-6, co-trimoxazole-4) in 81.8% for fosfomycin trometamol, in 100% for ofloxacin and in 100% for co-trimoxazole. (ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS) 

12567471
[The protective immunity in mice immunized with FhGST or AsGST against Schistosoma japonicum cercariae] 
OBJECTIVE: To study the protective immunity against Schistosoma japonicum (Sj) cercariae challenge in mice immunized with FhGST or AsGST. METHODS: There groups of Kunming mice were immunized three times with rSjGST, FhGST and AsGST, respectively. Then 30 cercariae of Schistosoma japonicum were given per mouse by abdominal skin inoculation. Six weeks later, all mice were killed to collect adult worms, liver, spleen and large intestine for worm count and egg count. RESULTS: The worm burden was reduced by 27.8%-36.4% in the three immune groups compared with the two control groups (P < 0.05). rSj26GST, FhGST and AsGST significantly decreased the number of eggs deposited in the tissues. CONCLUSION: FhGST and AsGST could induce protection against S. japonicum cercariae infection. 

9720279
Measuring spontaneous deleterious mutation process. 
Parameters of the deleterious mutation process can be estimated using the data on genotypes, phenotypes, or fitnesses. These data can be on long-term evolution, on short-term changes, or on the properties of equilibrium populations. The two most important parameters at the genomic level, the total deleterious mutation rate U and the mutational pressure on fitness P, remain poorly known. Reliable data on the rates of presumably neutral evolution, together with less certain estimates of the functionally important fraction of the genome, suggest that in mammals U > 1. The magnitudes of inbreeding depression in populations of selfers imply U approximately 1 in flowering plants. The straightforward way to estimate P is to assay the decline of fitness in populations with relaxed selection. The relevant data are contradictory, possibly because the results of the measurement of fitness depend strongly on the environmental conditions. 

4004880
T-kininogen--the major plasma kininogen in rat adjuvant arthritis. 
Total kininogen in plasma of Freund's adjuvant treated rats increased 20-fold 7 days following the injection. Analysis of the kininogens demonstrated that increases in T-kininogen was the major reason for the rise in kininogen. High molecular weight and low molecular weight kininogens showed little or no change. The increase in T-kininogen paralleled the inflammatory condition. Anti-inflammatory agents which reduced paw swelling also reduced plasma T-kininogen levels. Unidentified peaks on HPLC of kinin following plasma treatment by trypsin were shown to be oligopeptides containing T-kinin (Ile-serbradykinin). The relationship of T-kininogen to the inflammatory response is discussed. 

6204483
Psoriasis in first-degree relatives of psoriatic twins. 
Analysis of the presence of psoriasis in all first-degree relatives of psoriatic twin probands, 38 monozygotic (MZ) and 24 dizygotic (DZ), has been performed in order to clarify if genetic heterogeneity might be present (the twin-family method). The probands were derived from a population based sample of like-sexed twin pairs. An almost identical frequency of psoriasis in parents, siblings and children, with no sex difference, was found. By comparisons of empirical risk figures for psoriasis in first-degree relatives of concordant as compared with discordant MZ probands and HLA-B 13 and/or HLA-B 17 positive MZ probands compared with MZ probands lacking these antigens, no clue to the presence of genetic heterogeneity was found. An almost identical risk in co-twins and ordinary siblings of DZ-probands was found. The data were incompatible with autosomal recessive or X-linked inheritance, but not incompatible with autosomal dominant inheritance with reduced penetrance or with multifactorial inheritance. 

6585394
A rater training program in removable prosthodontics. 
Four faculty members in removable prosthodontics participated in a three-phase rater training program. Nine complete dentures were given an overall rating by three outside experts to obtain an accuracy measure. A three-point rating scale was used: R (cannot be appreciably improved), S (clinically acceptable), and T (clinically unacceptable). During the pretraining phase, the average interrater reliability was .57 as estimated by intraclass correlation, and the mean accuracy correlation was .76. The rater training phase consisted of a four-hour session including presentations and discussions of rating terminology and formats, observer accuracy, and related issues. In the post-training phase, the same nine complete dentures were rated by the four faculty members, using the same three-point rating scale and a five-point scale. The average post-training interrater reliabilities were .56 and .76 on the three- and five-point scales, respectively. The mean accuracy correlation was .78. 

11026593
A family competition evolutionary algorithm for automated docking of flexible ligands to proteins. 
In this paper, we study an evolutionary algorithm for flexible ligand docking. Based on family competition and adaptive rules, the proposed approach consists of global and local strategies by integrating decreasing mutations and self-adaptive mutations. To demonstrate the robustness of the proposed approach, we apply it to the problems of the first international contests on evolutionary optimization. Following the description of function optimization, our approach is applied to a dihydrofolate reductase enzyme with the anti-cancer drug methotrexate and with two analogs of the antibacterial drug trimethoprim. Our numerical results indicate that the proposed approach is robust. The docked lowest energy structures have rms derivations ranging from 0.72 A to 1.98 A with respect to the corresponding crystal structure. 

17077011
[High level expression of recombinant human sCD40L-IZ and identification of its biological activation] 
AIM: To clone and express the recombinant human soluble CD40 ligand(CD40L) with biological activation. METHODS: The isoleucine zipper (IZ) gene was fused at N-terminal of CD40L gene coding E107-L261 contributing to form trimer. The gene coding hexahistidine was fused at the N-terminal of IZ because the sCD40L-IZ fusion protein could be purified by affinity chromatography. Then the fusion gene was amplified and cloned into expression plasmid pET30a. RESULTS: The protein sCD40L-IZ with His-tag at the N-terminal was effectively expressed in E. coli BL21 (DE3) as inclusion bodies and a denaturation and refolding procedure was performed to acquire soluble sCD40L-IZ. The fusion protein sCD40L-IZ was conveniently purified using HiTrap affinity column with above 95% purity. The gel filtration chromatography and non-reduced SDS-PAGE identified the trimeric structure of the recombinant protein. The microscope analysis showed the sCD40L-IZ interacted with the membrane CD40 on XG2, a multiple myeloma cell line. CONCLUSION: The recombinant human trimeric CD40L-IZ was expressed in prokaryotic cells successfully, which has provided a basis for further study of the relationship between CD40L and apoptosis, CD40L and pathogenesis of illness. It is also useful to clinical treatment. 

3032101
Lactobacilli as effectors of host functions: no influence on the activities of enzymes in enterocytes of mice. 
Preparations of lactobacilli are often used as dietary supplements to improve the growth and efficiency in utilizing food of animals of commercial value. We tested in an experimental model whether the effects of lactobacilli on growth of and food utilization by animals may be due to alteration of the activities of absorptive enzymes in the small bowel. Germfree mice housed in isolators under tightly controlled conditions were monoassociated with one of four strains of indigenous Lactobacillus spp. From 1 to 5 weeks later, the activity of alkaline phosphatase was assayed in homogenates of segments of the upper small intestines of the associated animals and of matched germfree controls. The specific activity of the enzyme was the same in the mice in the two groups. In other experiments, epithelial cells were isolated from the upper small intestines of mice associated with eight Lactobacillus strains (octa-associated) and from those of matched germfree mice and assayed for alkaline phosphatase, phosphodiesterase, and thymidine kinase activities. The epithelial cells were harvested sequentially from the tips of the villi toward the crypts of Lieberkuhn of the intestines. In all preparations, mice of both types yielded an equivalent mass (wet weight) of cells. The protein content of the cells reflected the mass. The activities of the microvillous membrane enzymes alkaline phosphatase and phosphodiesterase and the cytosol enzyme thymidine kinase were the same whether or not the animals contained the bacteria. Therefore, any effects on animal growth and food utilization observed when lactobacilli are used as dietary supplements may not be due to a direct alteration by the bacteria of the absorptive enzymes of the host animal. (ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS) 

2467698
Continuum model of voltage-dependent gating. Macroscopic conductance, gating current, and single-channel behavior. 
It is assumed that the conformational change of the voltage-gated channel is continuous, characterized by movement along a generalized one-dimensional reaction coordinate, x, varying from 0 to 1. This large conformational change is coupled to the movement of most of the gating charge. Superimposed on this large movement is a smaller, very fast conformational change that opens or closes the channel. The large conformational change perturbs the channel so that opening is favored near x = 1 and closing is favored near x = 0. The movement along the x axis is described by a generalized Nernst-Planck equation, whereas the open-close transition is modeled as a discrete reaction-rate process. The macroscopic conductance, gating current, and single-channel behavior of a simple, linearized version of the model is described. Although the model has only seven adjustable constants (about the same as would be required for a conventional three-state model), it can mimic the behavior of the delayed rectified K+ channel with 12 or more closed states. The single-channel behavior of the model can have bursts of rapid openings and closings, separated by long closed times. If the conformational change is assumed to correspond to the rotation and translation of charged helices, then this model can be used to estimate the effective rotational diffusion coefficient of the helix. Such calculations for the delayed rectifier K+ channel indicate that the motion must be very restricted. 

16569416
Alternate structural conformations of Streptococcus pneumoniae hyaluronan lyase: insights into enzyme flexibility and underlying molecular mechanism of action. 
Streptococcus pneumoniae hyaluronan lyase is a surface enzyme of this Gram-positive bacterium. The enzyme degrades several biologically important, information-rich linear polymeric glycans: hyaluronan, unsulfated chondroitin, and some chondroitin sulfates. This degradation facilitates spreading of bacteria throughout the host tissues and presumably provides energy and a carbon source for pneumococcal cells. Its beta-elimination catalytic mechanism is an acid/base process termed proton acceptance and donation leading to cleavage of beta-1,4 linkages of the substrates. The degradation of hyaluronan occurs in two stages, initial endolytic cuts are followed by processive exolytic cleavage of one disaccharide at a time. In contrast, the degradation of chondroitins is purely endolytic. Structural studies together with flexibility analyses of two streptococcal enzymes, from S.pneumoniae and Streptococcus agalactiae, allowed for insights into this enzyme's molecular mechanism. Here, two new X-ray crystal structures of the pneumococcal enzyme in novel conformations are reported. These new conformations, complemented by molecular dynamics simulation results, directly confirm the predicted domain motions presumed to facilitate the processive degradative process. One of these new structures resembles the S.agalactiae enzyme conformation, and provides evidence of a uniform mechanistic/dynamic behavior of this protein across different bacteria. 

10192162
Acne neonatorum: a study of 22 cases. 
BACKGROUND: Acne is not uncommon in the neonatal period. Acne neonatorum is characterized by a mainly facial eruption of inflammatory and noninflammatory lesions. It is most commonly mild and transient. Hyperactivity of sebaceous glands, stimulated by neonatal androgens, has been implicated as the underlying pathogenetic mechanism. MATERIALS AND METHODS: All patients diagnosed with acne neonatorum in "A. Sygros" Hospital, Athens, Greece, during the years 1993-1996, were evaluated clinically and epidemiologically. Histologic examination and smears for Propionibacterium acnes and Pityrosporum ovale were performed in selected cases. RESULTS: Of the 22 patients studied, 18 were male (81.8%) and 4 were female. The mean age at onset was 3 weeks and the mean duration of the disease was 4 months. Papules and pustules were the most frequent types of lesions (72.7%), followed by comedones only (22.7%). The cheeks were the most common site of predilection (81.8%). A family history of acne was reported in only three patients. Histologic examination showed hyperplastic sebaceous glands with keratin-plugged orifices. Smears for P. ovale were negative. CONCLUSIONS: Our findings are consistent with previous experience, although inflammatory lesions were encountered more often than previously reported. Hereditary factors did not seem to play a significant role in our series. Topical treatment hastened the resolution of this self-limited condition. Recalcitrant cases warrant investigation for underlying androgen excess. 

4944955
[Growth hormone during oral contraceptive treatment] 
Growth hormone levels were studied in 18 women aged 19-34 years, of whom 7 were being treated with oral contraceptives (Lyndiol, Ovulen, Anovlar, Conluten). A significant increase was observed in the treated women; the range was also larger in these cases. During menstruation, control subjects showed a similar pattern. Free fatty acid levels are also higher in the treated group. There is no evidence that the change in growth hormone levels is of clinical significance, although the changes in glucose tolerance and lipid metabolism observed during contraceptive treatment may be caused by growth hormone. This hormone imbalance is of unknown etiology. It has been suggested that it may be due to increased prolactin synthisis (inhibition of the hypothalamic prolactin releasing inhibitor) when follicle stimulating hormone levels are low, as during treatment with oral contraceptives and during the early part of the menstrual period. 

10242140
[Guidelines to productivity bargaining in the health care industry.] 
A potential conflict exists between the recent growth of unionization in the health care industry and management efforts to increase productivity. One method of managing this conflict is to link employee rewards to employee productivity through productivity bargaining. 

11763355
Clustered DNA damages as dosemeters for ionising radiation exposure and biological responses. 
Clustered DNA damages--two or more lesions (oxidised bases. abasic sites, or strand breaks) within a few DNA helical turns on opposing strands--are induced in DNA in solution and in vivo in human cells by ionising radiation. They have been postulated to be difficult to repair, and thus of potentially high biological significance. Since the total of clustered damages produced by ionising radiation is at about 3 to 4 times higher levels than double-strand breaks and are apparently absent in unirradiated cells, levels of clustered damages present immediately alter radiation exposure could serve as sensitive dosemeters of radiation exposure. Since some clusters may not be repairable and may accumulate in cells, they might also be useful as integrating dosemeters of biological effects of radiation damage. 

6411939
Long-term fate of 90 patients with superficial bladder cancer randomly assigned to receive or not to receive thiotepa. 
We assigned randomly 90 patients treated previously for superficial transitional cell carcinoma to conventional followup or prophylactic treatment. This followup study details the late incidence of recurrence (29 of 45 patients in the prophylactic group and 34 of 45 controls), the progression of tumor grade and stage, the deaths and causes (24 patients), and the influence of initial stage, grade, carcinoma in situ and positive cytology on the outcome of treatment. 

11407236
[Treatment of anaphylactic shock] 
Anaphylaxis is a life-threatening allergological emergency: it has to be recognized and treated immediately by the physician. Most often anaphylaxis is caused by drugs, foods and insect stings. Emergency treatment consists in intramuscular application of adrenaline and volume substitution. Only afterwards antihistamines and corticosteroids should be administered. All patients have to be hospitalized immediately and treated on an intensive care unit. After anaphylaxis the following preventive measures are most important: consultation with an allergist, including instruction for allergen avoidance and emergency medications. In anaphylaxis induced by insect stings specific immunotherapy should be started. 

2419526
Differentiation of NTERA-2 clonal human embryonal carcinoma cells into neurons involves the induction of all three neurofilament proteins. 
Monoclonal antibodies were used in indirect immunofluorescence and immunoblot studies to examine the expression of four different classes of intermediate filaments, namely, neurofilaments, glial filaments, cytokeratin, and vimentin, in NTERA-2 cl.D1 (NT2/D1) pluripotent human embryonal carcinoma (EC) cells, and in the neurons derived from these cells by differentiation induced with retinoic acid. In the EC cell cultures, grown in the absence of retinoic acid, cytokeratin was the predominant intermediate filament detected by immunofluorescence; only a few cells expressed vimentin, and none expressed glial filament protein or any of the three neurofilament proteins (NF195, NF170, and NF70). Immunoblot analyses of cytoskeletal extracts of these cells supported these data. Two days after exposure to retinoic acid, all three neurofilament subunits were detected in a few cells with a non-neuronal morphology and, by double indirect immunofluorescence, were observed to colocalize with cytokeratin. The number of neurofilament-positive cells increased with time after initial exposure to retinoic acid, and although 95% of these cells contained cytokeratin initially, less than 5% of the neurofilament-positive cells retained cytokeratin 2 weeks later. By this time, many of the cells expressing all three neurofilaments but no cytokeratin exhibited a neuronal morphology. Vimentin was evident in a large number of cells in the cultures, but it was not detected in the neurofilament-positive cells. Also, many of the neurofilament-negative cells continued to express cytokeratin. No cells expressing glial filament proteins were found. Immunoblot analysis of the differentiated cultures also revealed all three neurofilament subunits, and vimentin and cytokeratin, but no glial filament protein. (ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS) 

11357148
Cancer epidemiology in the last century and the next decade. 
By the early 1980s, epidemiologists had identified many important causes of cancer. They had also proposed the 'multi-stage' model of cancer, although none of the hypothesized events in human carcinogenesis had then been identified. The remarkable advances in cell and molecular biology over the past two decades have transformed the scope and methods of cancer epidemiology. There have been a few new discoveries based purely on traditional methods, and many long-suspected minor risks have been estimated more precisely. But modern epidemiological studies often depend on genetic, biochemical or viral assays that had not been developed 20 years ago. 

17217957
Physical responses of bacterial chemoreceptors. 
Chemoreceptors of the bacterium Escherichia coli are thought to form trimers of homodimers that undergo conformational changes upon ligand binding and thereby signal a cytoplasmic kinase. We monitored the physical responses of trimers in living cells lacking other chemotaxis proteins by fluorescently tagging receptors and measuring changes in fluorescence anisotropy. These changes were traced to changes in energy transfer between fluorophores on different dimers of a trimer: attractants move these fluorophores farther apart, and repellents move them closer together. These measurements allowed us to define the responses of bare receptor oligomers to ligand binding and compare them to the corresponding response in kinase activity. Receptor responses could be fit by a simple "two-state" model in which receptor dimers are in either active or inactive conformations, from which energy bias and dissociation constants could be estimated. Comparison with responses in kinase-activity indicated that higher-order interactions are dominant in receptor clusters. 

659602
Somatostatin-like immunoreactivity in rat blood. Characterization, regional differences, and responses to oral and intravenous glucose. 
Somatostatin-like immunoreactivity (SLI) has been demonstrated by radioimmunoassay (RIA) in rat serum using an antiserum specific for somatostatin and cross-reacting maximally with the biologically important area on the peptide. The RIA has a sensitivity of 35 pg/ml. SLI dilutes in parallel with synthetic somatostatin standard in the RIA and shows characteristics similar to synthetic somatostatin on Sephadex G-25 (f) gel chromatography eluting largely as a single peak with 1 M acetic acid. Significant regional differences in serum SLI are present. A positive gradient was found in paired samples from aorta (mean+/-SEM, 0.304+/-0.024 ng/ml) and portal vein (0.495+/-0.047 ng/ml) consistent with the known presence of somatostatin in gut and pancreas, and a negative gradient was noted between paired samples from portal vein (0.523+/-0.076 ng/ml) and hepatic vein (0.290+/-0.048 ng/ml) indicating hepatic clearance. No significant differences were demonstrated between aorta and confluence of cerebral venous sinuses or between aorta and inferior vena cava (IVC). After intragastric glucose, a significant and marked elevation of portal SLI was observed, maximal at 5 min (0.416+/-0.137 vs. 1.55+/-0.30 ng/ml at 5 min). A significant biphasic elevation of portal SLI also occurred after intravenous glucose. After both routes of glucose administration, the patterns of portal SLI followed closely those of portal glucose and insulin. By contrast, IVC SLI failed to reflect these changes. Thus, SLI in the rat shows chromatographic similarity with synthetic somatostatin. Regional differences in serum levels are marked; the highest concentrations being found in the portal venous effluent of pancreas and gut. Furthermore, glucose causes elevation of portal SLI in a pattern similar to portal insulin and glucose and without concomitant elevation in IVC. This differential elevation of SLI after glucose is consistent with a hormonal action within the portal system as a direct effect of somatostatin on the liver has previously been demonstrated. In addition, the liver is important in the clearance of portal SLI, possibly to prevent extraportal effects in response to gut and pancreatic stimulation. Finally, it is clear that regional sampling of serum for SLI measurement may be critical in the investigation of the putative physiological roles for somatostatin. 

9291446
What can we expect from prophylactic implantable defibrillators? 
Death due to ventricular tachyarrhythmia (VT) remains an important public health problem; patients with prior myocardial infarction (MI) constitute the largest identifiable population for prophylactic interventions. Targeting of progressively higher-risk subgroups of post-MI survivors carries inevitable tradeoffs with respect to the global impact of interventions on overall mortality. Therapy with aspirin, beta blockers, and angiotensin-converting enzyme (ACE) inhibitors comprise the benchmark against which all additional interventions, including implantable defibrillators, must be measured. Initial enthusiasm for empiric amiodarone therapy has been tempered by the limited benefit demonstrated in recent randomized trials. Trials of other class III antiarrhythmic drugs, including both d,l-sotalol and d-sotalol, have also failed to demonstrate survival benefit. The Multicenter Automatic Defibrillator Implantation Trial (MADIT) demonstrated significantly improved survival associated with defibrillators in a small subgroup of post-MI survivors with a high short-term risk of death. The ultimate number and optimal criteria for selection of patients who may benefit from prophylactic defibrillator therapy after MI will undergo continued evolution as new data from current and ongoing trials become available. 

1157987
Puzzles and further explorations in the interrelationships of successive births with husband's income, spouses' education and race. 
When fertility is examined in the detail of individual parity progressions and birth-order transitions, important interactions between the effects of income and education are seen. Among the findings are: the negative effect of education on fertility is stronger at all parities for less educated compared to more highly educated women. Additional income has a more positive effect for more highly educated than for less educated women. For women with 0-8 years of education the effect of more income is positive when the family has no children but negative thereafter, but for college-educated women the effect of more income is positive. And additional income has a less positive (more negative) effect on fertility among nonwhites than among whites. 

6333893
Serum immunoglobulins in acute anterior uveitis. 
Serum levels of immunoglobulin A, G, and M were examined in 99 patients with acute anterior uveitis (AAU). The mean level of serum IgA was raised (p less than 0.001) in AAU patients when compared with healthy control subjects. The levels of serum IgG and IgM were not significantly different from those in the control group. The raised levels of serum IgA were found to occur predominantly in the HLA-B27 positive group of patients (p less than 0.001) and were highest in HLA-B27 positive patients with sacroiliitis or associated spondylarthritic diseases (p less than 0.001). The HLA-B27 negative group of AAU patients did not have a significantly raised mean serum IgA. The raised level of serum IgA in HLA-B27 positive AAU patients suggests that there has been a response to an environmental or infectious agent(s) acting across a mucosal tissue in these patients. This agent could be responsible for the initiation of the acute ocular inflammation. 

18034444
Rhodium-Complex-Catalyzed Asymmetric Hydrogenation: Transformation of Precatalysts into Active Species. 
The use of diolefin-containing rhodium precatalysts leads to induction periods in asymmetric hydrogenation of prochiral olefins. Consequently, the reaction rate increases in the beginning. The induction period is caused by the fact that some of the catalyst is blocked by the diolefin and thus not available for hydrogenation of the prochiral olefin. Therefore, the maximum reaction rate cannot be reached initially. Due to the relatively slow hydrogenation of cyclooctadiene (cod) the share of active catalysts increases at first, and this leads to typical induction periods. The aim of this work is to quantify the hydrogenation of the diolefins cyclooctadiene (cod) and norborna-2,5-diene (nbd) for cationic complexes of the type [Rh(ligand)(diolefin)]BF(4) for the ligands Binap (1,1'-binaphthalene-2,2'-diylbis(phenylphosphine)), Me-Duphos (1,2-bis(2,5-dimethylphospholano)benzene, and Catasium in the solvents methanol, THF, and propylene carbonate. Furthermore, an approach is presented to determine the desired rate constant and the resulting respective pre-hydrogenation time from stoichiometric hydrogenations of the diolefin complexes via UV/Vis spectroscopy. This method is especially useful for very slow diolefin hydrogenations (e.g., cod hydrogenation with the ligands Me-Duphos, Et-Duphos (1,2-bis(2,5-diethylphospholano)benzene), and dppe (1,2-bis(diphenylphosphino)ethane). 

15283222
Low endothelial cell count and clear corneal grafts. 
Specular microscopic study on clear corneal grafts indicates that at times surprisingly low endothelial cell density can maintain the grafted cornea in a relatively dehydrated state. The critical limit of the endothelial cell count for corneal decompensation is thought to be 700 cells/mm2. This communication reports 13 cases of clear corneal graft with endothelial cell count below 700 cells/mm2. 

17307014
High efficient ECG compression based on reversible round-off non-recursive 1-D discrete periodized wavelet transform. 
Error propagation and word-length-growth are two intrinsic effects influencing the performance of wavelet-based ECG data compression methods. To overcome these influences, a non-recursive 1-D discrete periodized wavelet transform (1-D NRDPWT) and a reversible round-off linear transformation (RROLT) theorem are developed. The 1-D NRDPWT can resist truncation error propagation in decomposition processes. By suppressing the word- length-growth effect, RROLT theorem enables the 1-D NRDPWT process to obtain reversible octave coefficients with minimum dynamic range (MDR). A non-linear quantization algorithm with high compression ratio (CR) is also developed. This algorithm supplies high and low octave coefficients with small and large decimal quantization scales, respectively. Evaluation is based on the percentage root-mean-square difference (PRD) performance measure, the maximum amplitude error (MAE), and visual inspection of the reconstructed signals. By using the MIT-BIH arrhythmia database, the experimental results show that this new approach can obtain a superior compression performance, particularly in high CR situations. 

1522269
Demonstration of subclavian steal by MR angiography. 
We present three cases of subclavian steal syndrome demonstrated by MR angiography. By using a presaturation pulse located at the bottom or at the top of the acquisition volume we demonstrated the flow direction of vertebral arteries. We used a new investigational two-dimensional time-of-flight sequence. 

7489136
[Detection of HIV virus antibodies in saliva] 
The authors evaluate the use of saliva as alternative biological material for detection of HIV antibodies. If collected properly and when using the appropriate ELISA methods, HIV antibodies can be assessed in saliva with considerable sensitivity and specificity. Testing in saliva eliminates many disadvantages found when assessing HIV antibodies in serum. It does not require trained staff for blood sampling, collection and processing of saliva reduces the risk of professional infection to a minimum and can be carried out also under field conditions. A great advantage is the easy and unpretentious transport of collected samples to the laboratory, even long distance transport at extreme temperatures (transport medium in the testing kit Omni-SAL ensures great stability of the sample as well as proper collection of the sample). Alternative testing in saliva is useful in particular for epidemiological surveillance and for screening of HIV antibodies in population groups with a high risk of infections such as drug users and commercial works where it is often very difficult to obtain blood samples for examination. 

6710958
[Phospholipid turnover of hepatic subcellular membranes in rats receiving diets with different fat content] 
The renewal (turnover) of rat liver mitochondrial an microsomal phospholipids was studied by the pulse-labeled method. As the fat content in the diet was raised (to 9, 26 and 62%), the renewal of mitochondrial phospholipids increased. In the microsomes, the renewal of phospholipids exceeded the control fed both low-fatty and high-fatty diets. The feeding of rats with the low-fatty diet had a substantial effect on the half-life of mitochondrial and microsomal phospholipids, while the half-life of phospholipids labeled in the polar part with 14C-glycerin reduced and that of phospholipids labeled in the fatty acid part by 3H-palmitate considerably rose. It is assumed that under the conditions of inadequate supply of fatty acids with food, the reutilization of fatty acids formed during degradation of membranous phospholipids is activated. As the times of the feeding with experimental diets were raised (up to 60 days), the turnover of membranous phospholipids did not differ significantly from the data obtained in experiments carried out for 30 days. The exception to the rule was the half-life of acyl chains of mitochondrial phospholipids that continued increasing dramatically under 60 days of the low-fatty diet. 

2580891
In vivo treatment with monoclonal anti-I-A antibodies: disappearance of splenic antigen-presenting cell function concomitant with modulation of splenic cell surface I-A and I-E antigens. 
A single injection of anti-I-Ak antibody (AB) into H-2k mice resulted in abrogation of splenic antigen-presenting cell (APC) function for protein antigen-primed T cells or alloantigen-specific T cells. Spleen cells from anti-I-A-treated mice are not inhibitory in cell mixing experiments when using cloned antigen-specific T cells as indicator cells, thus excluding a role for suppressor cells in the observed defect. Also, nonspecific toxic effects and carry-over of blocking Ab were excluded as causes for the defect. Experiments with anti-I-Ak Ab in (H-2b X H-2k)F1 mice showed abrogation of APC function for T cells specific for both parental I-A haplotypes. In homozygous H-2k mice, anti-I-Ak treatment not only abrogated APC function for I-Ak-restricted cloned T cells but also for I-AekE alpha k-restricted cloned T cells. FACS analysis of spleen cells from anti-I-Ak-treated (H-2b X H-2k)F1 mice revealed the disappearance of all Ia antigens (both I-A and I-E determined), whereas the number of IgM-bearing cells was unaffected. The reappearance of APC function with time after injection was correlated with the reappearance of I-A and I-E antigen expression. In vitro incubation of spleen cells from anti-I-A-treated mice led to the reappearance of Ia antigen expression and APC function within 8 hr. Thus, it appears that B cells (as determined by FACS analysis) and APC (as determined by functional analysis) behave similarly in response to in vivo anti-I-A Ab treatment. We interpret these findings as suggesting that in vivo anti-I-A treatment temporarily reduces the expression of Ia molecules through co-modulation on all Ia-bearing spleen cells, thereby rendering them incompetent as APC. Such modulation of Ia molecules does not occur when spleen cells are incubated in vitro with anti-I-A antibodies. These results imply that a primary defect purely at the level of APC in anti-I-A-treated mice may be responsible for the observed T cell nonresponsiveness when such mice are subsequently primed with antigen. 

7350170
Adhesion between liposomes mediated by the chlorophyll a/b light-harvesting complex isolated from chloroplast membranes. 
A highly purified chlorophyll a/b light-harvesting complex (chl a/b LHC; chl a/b ratio 1.2) was obtained from Triton-solubilized chloroplast membranes of pea and barley according to the method of Burke et al. (1978, Arch. Biochem. Biophys. 187: 252--263). Gel electrophoresis of the cation-precipitated chl a/b LHC from peas reveals the presence of four polypeptides in the 23- to 28-kdalton size range. Three of these peptides appear to be identical to those derived from re-electrophoresed CPII and CPII* bands. In freeze-fracture replicas, the cation-precipitated chl a/b LHC appears as a semicrystalline aggregate of membranous sheets containing closely spaced granules. Upon removal of the cations by dialysis, the aggregates break up into their constituent membranous sheets without changing their granular substructure. These membranous sheets can be resolubilized in 1.5% Triton X-100, and the chl a/b LHC particles then reconstituted into soybean lecithin liposomes. Freeze-fracture micrographs of the reconstituted chl a/b LHC vesicles suspended in a low salt medium reveal randomly dispersed approximately 80-A particles on both concave and convex fracture faces as well as some crystalline particle arrays, presumably resulting from incompletely solubilized fragments of the membranous sheets. Based on the approximately 80-A diameter of the particles, and on the assumption that one freeze-fracture particle represents the structural unit of one chl a/b LHC aggregate, a theoretical mol wt of approximately 200 kdalton has been calculated for the chl a/b LHC. Deep-etching and negative-staining techniques reveal that the chl a/b LHC particles are also exposed on the surface of the bilayer membranes. Addition of greater than or equal to 2 mM MgCl2 or greater than or equal to 60 mM NaCl to the reconstituted vesicles leads to their aggregation and, with divalent cations, to the formation of extensive membrane stacks. At the same time, the chl a/b LHC particles become clustered into the adhering membrane regions. Under these conditions the particles in adjacent membranes usually become precisely aligned. Evidence is presented to aupport the hypothesis that adhesion between the chl a/b LHC particles is mediated by hydrophobic interactions, and that the cations are needed to neutralize surface charges on the particles. 

1887506
Computer analysis and pattern recognition of Doppler blood flow spectra for disease classification in the lower limb arteries. 
In the present study, a computer processing method was developed to objectively classify disease in the lower limb arteries evaluated by noninvasive ultrasonic duplex scanning. This method analyzes Doppler blood flow signals, extracts diagnostic features from Doppler spectrograms and classifies the severity of the disease into three categories of diameter reduction (0-19%, 20-49% and 50-99%). The features investigated were based on frequency features obtained at peak systole, spectral broadening indices and normalized amplitudes of the power spectrogram computed in various positive and negative frequency bands. A total of 379 arterial segments studied from the aorta to the popliteal artery were classified using a pattern recognition method based on the Bayes model. Two classification schemes using a two-node decision rule were tested. Both schemes gave similar results, the first one provided an overall accuracy of 83% (Kappa = 0.42) and the second an overall accuracy of 81% (Kappa = 0.35) when compared with conventional biplane contrast arteriography. These performances, especially for the 0 to 19% lesion category, are better than the one obtained by the technologist (accuracy = 76% and Kappa = 0.33), based on visual interpretation of the Doppler spectrograms. To recognize hemodynamically significant stenoses (50-99% lesions), the pattern recognition system has a sensitivity and a specificity of 50% and 99%, respectively, using classification scheme I. With classification scheme II, the sensitivity and the specificity are 50% and 98%, respectively. Visual interpretation of the Doppler spectrograms leads to a sensitivity and a specificity of 50% and 98%, respectively. These results are the first to be obtained by a pattern recognition system in classifying lower limb arterial stenoses. 

17212842
The impact of food supplementation on infant weight gain in rural Bangladesh; an assessment of the Bangladesh Integrated Nutritional Program (BINP). 
OBJECTIVES: To examine the efficiency of the Bangladesh Integrated Nutritional Program (BINP) in identifying which infants should be supplemented, whether full supplementation was given for the stipulated period of time, and whether the correct exit criteria from the supplementation programme were used. To test whether targeted food supplementation of infants between 6-12 months of age resulted in enhanced weight gain. SETTING: Mallickbari Union, Bhaluka, a rural area located about 100 km north of Dhaka, Bangladesh. PARTICIPANTS: Five hundred and twenty-six infants followed for 6 to 12 months. RESULTS: Of the 526 infants studied, 368 should have received supplementation based on BINP criteria but only 111 infants (30%) did so, while a further 13% were incorrectly given supplementation. So in total over half (52.8%) of the sample was incorrectly identified for supplementation. In addition, less than a quarter of the infants received the full 90 days of supplementation and close to half of the infants exited the programme without the requisite weight gain. Infants were assigned to one of four groups: correctly supplemented, correctly non-supplemented, incorrectly supplemented or incorrectly non-supplemented. This classification provided natural controls; the correctly supplemented infants versus the incorrectly non-supplemented infants, and the correctly non-supplemented infants versus the incorrectly supplemented infants. There were no significant differences in weight gain between the correctly supplemented group and the incorrectly non-supplemented group or between the correctly non-supplemented and the incorrectly supplemented groups, nor was there any evidence of growth faltering in the incorrectly non-supplemented group. CONCLUSIONS: This study found serious programmatic deficiencies - inability to identify growth faltering in infants, failure to supplement for the full time period and incorrect exit procedures. There was no evidence that food supplementation had any impact on improving infant weight gain. 

5673446
Gaucher's disease: a genetic disease detected in skin fibroblast cultures. 
Skin fibroblasts from three adult patients with chronic noncerebral Gaucher's disease, three children of one of the patients, three parents, and six normal individuals were grown in cell culture. Giant fibroblasts containing metachromatic material were seen in all cultures derived from affected individuals and heterozygous carriers but not in those derived from normal individuals. 

8966384
[Clinical interpretation of statistical significance] 
In any clinical study which compares versus an established therapy, the results will be expressed in terms of statistical significance. For this reason, it is important that every clinician interested in a judicious interpretation of the scientific literature, understands the origin and interpretation of statistical significance. The present paper addresses physicians attempting to give practical meaning to research results by discriminative and critical reading. The main aim is to explain in a simple way the meaning of the P-value, confidence intervals, and the required number to treat. Using practical examples, the most common mistakes in the interpretation of statistical significance are analyzed. The difference between statistical and clinical significance is emphasized and a new way to express and compare the practical utility of clinical trial results and the required number to treat is given. 

1613740
From aspirin to biologics: therapeutic implications for rheumatoid arthritis. 
As effective antiinflammatory agents have been added to our armamentarium, 2 major treatment strategies for the treatment of rheumatoid arthritis have developed. The traditional pyramid strategy is based on initial, conservative measures, followed by more aggressive therapy as the disease progresses. The step-down bridge approach is an alternative, more aggressive strategy that favors earlier use of more potent agents. The longterm effects of disease modifying antirheumatic drugs (DMARD) and combination second line therapy on disease progression remain unclear. Advances in the development of more specific DMARD and in human recombinant proteins offer promising future therapies. 

9190854
Reappraisal of human CYP isoforms involved in imipramine N-demethylation and 2-hydroxylation: a study using microsomes obtained from putative extensive and poor metabolizers of S-mephenytoin and eleven recombinant human CYPs. 
Cytochrome P450 (CYP) involved in the two major pathways of imipramine (IMI) was reappraised using human liver microsomes phenotyped for S-mephenytoin 4'-hydroxylation in vitro and 11 recombinant human CYP isoforms. Individual Eadie-Hoffstee plots for IMI N-demethylation and 2-hydroxylation showed a monophasic profile in microsomes obtained from three putative S-mephenytoin poor metabolizer (PM) livers, whereas the plots gave a biphasic relationship (except for one case in 2-hydroxylation) in those from the three extensive metabolizer (EM) livers. Effects of CYP-selective inhibitor/substrate probes on the two metabolic reactions were examined at the two IMI concentrations (2 and 400 microM) with microsomes obtained from the two PM and three EM livers. S-mephenytoin inhibited IMI N-demethylation by 50% at the low concentration in microsomes from the EM livers with no discernible effect on this pathway in those from the PM livers. Furafylline inhibited the N-demethylation by about 60% at the low and high substrate concentrations in microsomes from both the EM and PM livers. Quinidine abolished the 2-hydroxylation at the low and high concentrations in microsomes from both the EM and the PM livers. Among the recombinant human CYPs, CYP2C19, 2C18, 2D6, 1A2, 3A4 and 2B6 in rank order catalyzed the N-demethylation, whereas CYP2D6, 2C19, 1A2, 2C18 and 3A4 catalyzed the 2-hydroxylation. The Km values obtained from recombinant CYP2C19 and 1A2 approximated those of the high- and low-affinity components from human liver microsomes for IMI N-demethylation, respectively. For IMI 2-hydroxylation, the respective Km values obtained from recombinant CYP2D6 and 2C19 were close to those of the high- and low-affinity components from human liver microsomes. Our human liver microsomal study using the near-therapeutic IMI concentration (2 microM) suggests that 1) CYP2C19 and 1A2 are involved in the N-demethylation and the 2-hydroxylation is mediated exclusively by CYP2D6 and partially by CYP2C19 in the EM livers, and 2) CYP1A2 and 2D6 play a major role in IMI N-demethylation and 2-hydroxylation, respectively, in the PM livers. Our recombinant human CYP isoform study, in general, supports this conclusion. 

14754470
Rationale and clinical trial design for evaluating gemcitabine as neoadjuvant and adjuvant therapy for breast cancer. 
Over the past 30 years, much progress has been made in adjuvant chemotherapy for patients with early-stage breast cancer. The introduction of anthracyclines and, recently, taxanes has significantly improved the efficacy of adjuvant chemotherapy and has provided useful insight regarding future development of even more efficacious regimens. However, despite significant progress, there remains considerable room for improvement. Although the manipulation of chemotherapy doses has not been found to be a successful strategy, manipulation of the interval of chemotherapy administration recently showed promise. It appears, nonetheless, that introducing new chemotherapy agents into the adjuvant setting is a more promising strategy than attempting to optimize the dose and schedule of existing agents. Gemcitabine has demonstrated significant antitumor activity in patients with advanced breast cancer when used either as a single agent or in combination with other active drugs (as a doublet or a triplet). Most of the available information to date has been obtained by combining gemcitabine with anthracyclines and/or taxanes. This approach has shown considerable antitumor activity and a reasonable toxicity profile, making it an important strategy for developing new adjuvant and neoadjuvant chemotherapy regimens. Several currently ongoing and planned adjuvant trials are incorporating gemcitabine (either sequentially or in combination) into anthracycline/taxane regimens. These trials will be important in establishing a role for this agent in the adjuvant setting and will hopefully lead to the development of more effective adjuvant chemotherapy regimens in the future. 

9575392
Outcome of coronary artery bypass surgery in diabetic transplant candidates. 
Insulin-dependent diabetic (IDDM) patients with end-stage renal disease and coronary artery stenoses > or = 75% have a poor prognosis. However, information is lacking on the morbidity and mortality of the coronary artery bypass operation in this group. We studied 30 consecutive IDDM transplant candidates undergoing a bypass operation to determine the incidence of complications and long-term outcome. Perioperative mortality was 3% and the complication rate was 60%. During follow-up, five patients experienced six myocardial infarctions, the majority within six months of operation. Twenty-one patients underwent successful kidney transplantation after the bypass operation. Overall patient survival was 80%, 73%, and 66% at 1, 2 and 4 yr. In summary, the coronary artery bypass procedure in IDDM transplant candidates has a high morbidity, but the long-term outcome is good. Appropriately counseled IDDM transplant candidates with coronary artery disease should be considered for coronary revascularization and subsequent transplantation. 

1383990
Distinct activation patterns of idioventricular rhythms and sympathetically-induced ventricular tachycardias in dogs with atrioventricular block. 
To investigate mechanisms of ventricular impulse formation in response to sympathetic stimulation in the healthy canine heart in situ, we compared the patterns of ventricular activation during the idioventricular rhythms arising after complete atrioventricular (AV) block and ventricular tachycardias induced by RSG or LSG stimulation. Isochronal maps were generated by computer from 116-127 unipolar electrograms recorded from the entire ventricular epicardium in 15 open chest, anesthetized dogs. In eight of these, bipolar electrograms were recorded with plunge electrodes from 11 selected endocardial sites located below epicardial breakthrough areas. Intracardiac recordings from the His-Purkinje system were made with electrode catheters. After electrograms were recorded during sinus rhythm, complete AV block was induced by injecting formaldehyde into the AV node and idioventricular rhythms occurred spontaneously at a rate of 37 +/- 12 beats/min (mean +/- SD, n = 25). During idioventricular rhythms, endocardial activation preceded the earliest epicardial breakthrough, which occurred in either the right anterior paraseptal region, antero-apical left ventricle, or postero-apical left ventricle. These sites were consistent with a focal origin in the subendocardial His-Purkinje system. Total epicardial activation times lasted for 47 +/- 13 msec (n = 40). Idioventricular rhythms were suppressed by overdrive pacing (intermittent trains of ten beats with decremental cycle length from 500 to 200 msec) or by intravenous calcium infusion (to plasma levels of 10.1-15.2 mM). Right or left stellate ganglion stimulation increased idioventricular rhythm rates (to 52 +/- 13 beats/min, n = 28) and also induced, in all preparations, ventricular tachycardias that had significantly faster rates (189 +/- 55 beats/min, n = 27, P less than 0.005). Ventricular fibrillation was induced after brief runs of ventricular tachycardia in five of the preparations. During ventricular tachycardias, epicardial activation occurred on the right ventricular outflow tract or the postero-lateral wall of the left ventricle, and preceded endocardial activation in 50% of cases. Total epicardial activation times (103 +/- 29 beats/min) were significantly longer than during idioventricular rhythms (P less than 0.005). Ventricular tachycardias displayed overdrive excitation at critical pacing cycle lengths (360-280 msec) and were not suppressed by calcium infusion. Thus, differential mechanisms of impulse formation with distinct localizations can be elicited from healthy ventricular myocardium. 

17265888
Validation of meat inspection results for Taenia saginata cysticercosis by PCR-restriction fragment length polymorphism. 
Bovine cysticercosis is a zoonosis caused by the larval stage (cysticercus) of the human tapeworm Taenia saginata. Infected cattle is an important food safety issue besides an economic concern. Humans get infected by eating raw or undercooked meat containing viable cysticerci. Visual meat inspection of bovines is the only public health measure implemented to control transmission to humans, but it lacks sensitivity and objectivity. It may underestimate the prevalence of the disease by a factor 3 to 10. Furthermore, the success of the method depends on the expertise of the meat inspector as well as on the stage of development of the cysticerci. The focus of this study was to develop and explore the usefulness of a PCR assay as an objective alternative to evaluate the meat inspector's visual inspection results. Hereto, a PCR was developed for the detection of T. saginata DNA in muscle lesions. Based on the laboratory classification of lesions, almost 97% of viable cysts were confirmed by PCR, while for dead cysts, the percentage was approximately 73%. Taken together, these data demonstrate the difficulties of visual meat inspection and their objective interpretation, emphasizing the need to improve current assays to strengthen the control of bovine cysticercosis. 

16669314
An environmental profile of brick kilns in Lucknow. 
Twenty two kilns in Lucknow were studied to identify the environmental hazards posed by the brick kilns and to quantify the environmental degradation which could be attributed to this industry. Study variables comprised SPM and RSPM levels, metal concentrations and total silica content in soil, temperature, humidity and noise levels in the work environment. Information's about the nature and type of kiln, fuel and water sources was also collected. 18.18 per cent of the kilns had moving steel chimneys with less than prescribed height. Approximately 1.89 + 0.87 acre of fertile agricultural land was used for manufacturing of clay brick per kiln, resulting in land degradation decrease in herb density and nutrient disorders in plants/trees in immediate vicinity. SPM level (93.3 mg/m3) was found to be much higher than the prescribed limit. The workers engaged in these kilns were at risk from dust and heat related diseases. 

3007669
Metal binding to angiotensin converting enzyme: implications for the metal binding site. 
Angiotensin converting enzyme interacts with the chelator, 1,10-phenanthroline (OP) to form an OP-Zn-ACE ternary complex, which subsequently dissociates to OP-Zn and apoenzyme. The association and dissociation rate constants for the reaction OP + Zn-ACE in equilibrium OP-Zn-ACE have been determined and compared with those of known OP-metal complexes. Such constants were also used to calculate the rate constant for formation of the OP-Zn complex from OP-Zn-ACE. The rate of dissociation of zinc from ACE has been measured in the presence of EDTA (which acts only as a metal scavenger) as a function of chelator concentration, at different pH values, and with different buffers. The stability constant for the binding of zinc to apoACE log Kc = 8.2, determined by equilibrium dialysis using atomic absorption spectroscopy to assess metal concentration, is much smaller than that for Zn-carboxypeptidase A. Zn-thermolysin, or Zn-carbonic anhydrase. This weak binding is attributable to the zinc dissociation rate constant of ACE, 7.5 X 10(-3) sec-1 at pH 7.0, which is much greater than that of the other zinc metalloenzymes. These results lead to inferences regarding the metal binding site of ACE. 

11367762
[Determination of clozapine and its N-demethylated metabolite in serum by gas chromatography-mass spectrometry with selected ion monitoring] 
This article reports a highly sensitive method specific for determination of clozapine(CLP) and its N-demethylated metabolite (DCLP) in serum by gas chromatography-mass spectrometry with selected ion monitoring. A 0.5 mL serum was alkalized with 0.5 mL 1.0 mol/L sodium hydroxide and was extracted with 5 mL ether, then the organic phase was transferred to another tube containing 1 mL 0.1 mol/L hydrochloric acid. After being shaken and centrifuged, the organic phase was discarded, and 10 microL 100 micrograms/L diazepam (DAP) was added to the water phase as internal standard, then 0.5 mL 1.0 mol/L sodium hydroxide and 5 mL ether were added. The extract was evaporated to dryness and then was acylated with 50 microL trifluoroacetic anhydride under 50 degrees C for 45 min. The excess of the reagent was evaporated and the residue was disolved in 20 microL acetone. Take 2 microL for gas chromatography-mass spectrometry analysis. Chromatographic conditions were: column DB-1 (30 m x 0.25 mm x 0.25 microns), injector 260 degrees C, interface 250 degrees C, column oven with temperature program: [equation: see text] Helium carrier gas flow rate was 1.8 mL/min. The mass spectrometer was adjustd to record the ion m/z352 for CLP and DCLP, and m/z 256 for DAP in quantitation. The minimum detection limits were 0.1 microgram/L for CLP and 0.2 microgram/L for DCLP. The standard curves of CLP and DCLP were linear between 1-128 micrograms/L (rCLP = 0.998, rDCLP = 0.999). Recoveries of two substances were better than 83%, and the RSD values were less than 10%. This method has been successfully used in clinical pharmacokinetic study of CLP before and after CYP1A2 inhibitor used. The results indicate that the metabolism of clozapine is strongly affected by CYP1A2 activity. 

9428682
Cytochrome ba3 from Natronobacterium pharaonis--an archaeal four-subunit cytochrome-c-type oxidase. 
Cytochrome ba3, a terminal oxidase was isolated from the haloalkaliphilic archaeon Natronobacterium pharaonis. NH2-terminal sequence information of two subunits with apparent molecular masses of 40 and 36 kDa was used to generate a DNA probe by polymerase chain reaction. Cloning and sequencing of two overlapping genomic fragments revealed four genes forming a transcriptional unit. The policystronic messenger RNA of this cbaDBAC gene locus was identified by RNA analysis. The genes cbaC and cbaD code for small hydrophobic peptides with 81 and 54 amino acids. The genes cbaB and cbaA code for cytochrome oxidase subunit II (calculated molecular mass = 18.6 kDa) and I (calculated molecular mass = 63.8 kDa) respectively. Five potential CuA ligands for subunit II and six His residues for subunit I located in conserved positions indicate cytochrome ba3 to be a c-type oxidase. Sequence comparison and phylogenetic analysis place the natronobacterial enzyme together with the archaeal quinol oxidase SoxABCD from Sulfolobus acidocaldarius and the eubacterial ba3-type oxidase from Thermus thermophilus into a distinct evolutionary group. All three members are missing residues which are functionally important for vectorial proton translocation. The four-subunit enzyme complex was also identified on the protein level using chromatographic buffers containing ethylene glycol for purification. 

9170451
Clinical evaluation of technetium-99m-L,L-ethylenedicysteine in patients with chronic renal failure. 
Technetium-99m-L,L-ethylenedicysteine (99mTc-L,L-EC), a new renal radiopharmaceutical, has been shown to have similar excretion characteristics but a higher plasma clearance than 99mTc-mercaptoacetyltriglycine (99mTc-MAG3) in normal volunteers and patients with obstructive nephropathy. This study evaluated 99mTc-L,L-EC in patients with chronic renal failure. METHODS: The clearance of 99mTc-L,L-EC was compared with that of 125l-hippuran in 26 patients with varying degrees of chronic renal impairment (serum creatine 168-1163 mumol/liter). All 26 patients also were imaged with 99mTc-L,L-EC (70-80 MBq). Fifteen patients had further imaging with 99mTc-MAG3 (100 MBq) the following day. RESULTS: A subjective analysis of the 99mTc-L,L-EC images revealed that all were of acceptable quality regardless of creatinine level. In the 15 patients who were imaged with both 99mTc-L,L-EC and 99mTc-MAG3, general image quality and target-to-background ratios were similar. Time-activity curves and mean parenchymal transit times obtained with the two agents were almost identical. Plasma clearance values (mean +/- s.d.) of 99mTc-L,L-EC and 125l-hippuran were 81 +/- 68 ml/min and 114 +/- 104 ml/min, respectively. Mean 99mTc-L,L-EC clearance was 71% of the mean 125l-hippuran value. CONCLUSION: Technetium-99m-L,L-EC provides equally high-quality images to 99mTc-MAG3 in patients with chronic renal failure. Technetium-99m-L,L-EC clearance more closely resembles that of hippuran than does 99mTc-MAG3 clearance. These features together with its ease of preparation make 99mTc-L,L-EC an attractive alternative to 99mTc-MAG3 in patients with chronic renal failure. 

9010888
Pharmaceutical care in The Netherlands. History, definition and projects. 
The evolving concept of Pharmaceutical Care knows different interpretations in different countries. In the Netherlands community pharmacists already perform several functions which may be part of the Pharmaceutical Care concept. The Dutch concept of Pharmaceutical Care is tested in the TOM and OMA-projects. Patients recognise the educational, aspects of Pharmaceutical Care and in general are content about the provision thereof. 

11840224
Sibutramine is safe and effective for weight loss in obese patients whose hypertension is well controlled with angiotensin-converting enzyme inhibitors. 
Sibutramine treatment in obesity results in significantly greater weight reduction compared with placebo, although weight loss with sibutramine may be accompanied by small but statistically significant mean increases in blood pressure (BP). This 52-week, placebo-controlled, double-blind, randomised study investigated the effects of sibutramine 20 mg once daily or placebo on body weight in 220 obese (body mass index (BMI) 27-40 kg/m2), hypertensive patients. At randomisation, hypertension was well controlled (< or = 95 mm Hg diastolic blood pressure (DBP)) with an angiotensin-converting enzyme (ACE) inhibitor, with or without concomitant thiazide diuretic therapy. Therapy for hypertension continued for the 52 weeks of the study. Sibutramine 20 mg produced significantly greater weight loss compared with placebo: 4.5 kg with sibutramine compared with 0.4 kg with placebo (last observation carried forward (LOCF); P < or = 0.05). A total of 62 patients (42.8%) treated with sibutramine lost < or = 5% of their body weight compared with six patients (8.3%) treated with placebo; 19 patients (13.1%) treated with sibutramine lost > or = 10% of their body weight compared with two patients (2.8%) treated with placebo (LOCF; P < or = 0.05 for both comparisons). Hypertension remained well controlled for the 52 weeks of the study with both sibutramine and placebo treatment. After 52 weeks, the differences between placebo treatment and sibutramine treatment for both mean supine systolic blood pressure (SBP) and DBP were approximately 3 mm Hg: mean DBP was 82.8 mm Hg with placebo treatment compared with 85.5 mm Hg with sibutramine treatment (LOCF; P = 0.004) and mean SBP was 130.4 mm Hg with placebo compared with 133.1 mm Hg with sibutramine (LOCF; P = 0.0497; both comparisons, sibutramine vs placebo). The mean increases in SBP and DBP did not appear to change the overall risk category for coronary heart disease end points. Changes in pulse rate at week 52 were a decrease of 0.3 beats per minute (bpm) for placebo treatment compared with an increase of 5.7 bpm for sibutramine treatment (P < 0.001). Mandated withdrawals from the study due to protocol-defined changes in BP were not statistically different between the two treatment groups. Greater favourable changes in lipid profile, serum glucose, and uric acid could be accounted for by greater weight losses occurring in the sibutramine treatment group. Sibutramine was well tolerated. This study indicates that in obese patients whose hypertension is well controlled at the outset with an ACE inhibitor, with or without concomitant thiazide diuretic therapy, sibutramine safely and effectively achieves weight loss without compromising good BP control. 

3737400
Antibodies to hnRNP core proteins inhibit in vitro splicing of human beta-globin pre-mRNA. 
In vitro splicing of human beta-globin pre-mRNA can be fully inhibited by treatment of the splicing extract with polyclonal antibodies against hnRNP core proteins prior to the addition of pre-mRNA. Inhibition of the first step in the splicing pathway, cleavage at the 5' splice site and lariat formation, requires more antibodies than inhibition of the second step, cleavage at the 3' splice site and exon ligation. The anti-hnRNP antibodies can also inhibit the splicing reaction after the formation of the active nucleoprotein splicing complex which is known to occur during the initial lag period. Thus, hnRNP core proteins appear to be present in the complex that performs pre-mRNA splicing. 

17036422
Ethical clinical practice and sport psychology: when two worlds collide. 
From their own practices, the authors offer insight into potential ethical dilemmas that may frequently develop in an applied psychology setting in which sport psychology is also being practiced. Specific ethical situations offered for the reader's consideration include confidentiality with coaches, administration, parents, and athlete-clients; accountability in ethical billing practices and accurate diagnosing; identification of ethical boundaries in nontraditional practice settings (locker room, field, rink, etc.); and establishment of professional competence as it relates to professional practice and marketing. 

3553551
Incidence of impression material found in the gingival sulcus after impression procedure for fixed partial dentures. 
After impression-making procedures, remnants of Xantopren impression material were found in the gingival crevices in eight of 125 patients. In three of the eight patients, remnants were only discovered subsequent to a systematic exploration with a fine curette. In all eight of the patients in which material was found in the crevice, the location corresponded with defects in the impression itself. Although eight of 125 is not a statistically significant number, it would be nonetheless prudent to consider a routine curettage of abutment sulci after impression-making. This procedure is even more strongly recommended should a defect be detected in the crevicular region of the impression. Impressions should remain in the mouth until full setting and maximum tear strength is reached. Strict adherence to the manufacturers' instructions is necessary. 

7941976
Polyglucosan bodies in the brain of a cow. 
Polyglucosan bodies (PGBs) in the brain of a 12-year-old Holstein cow exhibiting no signs of neurological abnormality were examined by light and electron microscopy and immunohistochemistry. PGBs were disseminated throughout the brain, especially in the pallidum, thalamus and cerebellum. Cow PGBs were found in the neuronal perikaryon and in the neuropil. These were round, slightly to severely basophilic, and were strongly positive for the periodic acid-Schiff reaction. The cow PGBs were immunoreactive for monoclonal antibodies raised against human polyglucosan. Electron microscopic analysis revealed that they were composed of branching filaments, glycogen granules and electron-dense material. These findings indicate that cow PGBs closely resemble human or canine PGBs in Lafora's disease and PGBs found in aged animals that have been reported previously. 

5993
Biomedical aspects of oxygen regulator performance: I. Static characteristics. 
Static performance characteristics of current-inventory USAF oxygen regulators were evaluated with the use of a specialized regulator test stand. Outlet suction pressures, flows, positive pressures, and delivered oxygen dilutions were monitored and recorded as functions of operational altitudes. General findings indicated that: 1) excessive oxygen addition occurs in all models, especially at low cabin altitudes; 2) positive pressure schedules generally conform to specifications; 3) negative suction pressures for most regulators are less than -2.54 cm H2O. The validity of static evaluation is discussed and data interpretation is considered with respect to biomedical compatibility emphasizing maintenance of crewmember physiological sufficiency. 

16005947
Improved survival in surgical stage I patients with uterine papillary serous carcinoma (UPSC) treated with adjuvant platinum-based chemotherapy. 
OBJECTIVE: Uterine papillary serous carcinoma (UPSC) is an aggressive form of endometrial cancer characterized by a high recurrence rate and a poor prognosis. Prior studies evaluating treatment of UPSC have been limited by small numbers of patients and inclusion of partially staged patients. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the efficacy of adjuvant platinum-based chemotherapy and vaginal cuff radiation in a large cohort of surgical stage I UPSC patients. METHODS: We retrospectively reviewed 74 stage I patients with UPSC who underwent complete surgical staging at our institution between 1987 and 2004. RESULTS: Stage IA patients were divided into two groups: patients with no cancer in the hysterectomy specimen (defined as no residual uterine disease) and patients with cancer in the hysterectomy specimen (defined as residual uterine disease). Stage IA patients with no residual uterine disease had no recurrences, regardless of adjuvant therapy (n = 12). Stage IA patients with residual uterine disease who were treated with platinum-based chemotherapy had no recurrences (n = 7). However, 6 of 14 (43%) stage IA patients with residual uterine disease who did not receive chemotherapy recurred. The 15 patients with stage IB UPSC who received platinum-based chemotherapy had no recurrences but 10 of the 13 (77%) stage IB patients who did not receive chemotherapy recurred. One of the 7 patients with stage IC UPSC who received platinum-based chemotherapy recurred and 4 of the 5 (80%) stage IC patients who did not receive chemotherapy recurred. Overall platinum-based chemotherapy was associated with improved disease-free survival (P < 0.01) and improved overall survival (P < 0.05) in patients with stage I UPSC. None of the 43 patients who received radiation to the vaginal cuff recurred locally, but 6 of the 31 (19%) patients who were not treated with vaginal radiation recurred at the cuff. CONCLUSIONS: Platinum-based chemotherapy improves the disease-free and overall survival of patients with stage I UPSC and vaginal cuff radiation provides local control. Stage IA UPSC patients with no residual uterine disease can be observed but concomitant platinum-based chemotherapy and vaginal cuff radiation (referred to as chemoradiation) should be offered to all other stage I UPSC patients. 

7436399
Spasms of the iris sphincter. 
A patient is described who suffered from intermittent spasms of the pupillary sphincter and ciliary muscle. Both intraocular muscles contracted several times a minute, producing sporadic darkening of vision in the affected eye. The spasms continued for eleven days, so it was possible to document them pupillographically. This curious phenomenon seems to have been the result of a transient "irritability" of the ciliary ganglion. 

7746429
Findings of a working group on chronic health effects of sustained high-G exposure. 
A Working Group of scientists from the Armstrong Laboratory, Brooks Air Force Base, met to determine the physiologic effects of repetitive high sustained G exposures over the lifetime of an exposed individual. The literature is mute on this issue. The Working Group concluded that such operational exposures have been present only since the onset of high-G aircraft (F-15/F-16); human centrifuge experience indicates no pathology, although long-term follow-up has not been accomplished; and the index of suspicion of significant clinical pathology is low, based on historical considerations. Considerations for future studies of lifetime G effects include: a determination of what organs to study; the realization that animal studies are probably not valuable; the determination that prospective longitudinal studies are optimal but costly in time and funds; and the opinion that a properly conducted cross-sectional study based on past exposure may be feasible, acceptable, and less costly. 

8026362
Changes in mean blood pressure caused by damping of the arterial pressure waveform. 
'Damping' of an intra-arterial pressure waveform theoretically affects systolic and diastolic blood pressure whilst mean blood pressure (mbp) continues to be reliable. We assessed changes in mbp associated with 79 episodes of damping in 30 infants. The average mbp in the hour just before damping occurred was compared with that in the first hour of damping. The mean change in mbp was -0.845 mmHg. In 50% of cases this change was < 2 mmHg and in 24% of episodes > or = 4.1 mmHg. Damping may produce clinically significant changes in mbp which computer trend data may help to differentiate. 

16172051
Pedunculated verrucous carcinoma of the thigh. 
Verrucous carcinoma, a variant of squamous cell carcinoma, is distinct from squamous cell carcinoma in morphology and behavior. We report an unusual case of a large pedunculated verrucous carcinoma on the right thigh of a 73-year-old male without any preceding skin lesion. Histologic examination revealed a cauliflower-like tumor consisting of deeply invaginated epidermal proliferation, and the intact basement membrane. To our knowledge the "pedunculated" cutaneous verrucous carcinoma has not been previously reported. 

3366025
Angiographic diagnosis of the degree of serosal invasion of carcinoma of the colon. 
Angiography using Prostaglandin E1 was performed on 38 patients with carcinoma of the colon in order to diagnose the degree of serosal cancer invasion. The findings at angiography were classified into four groups: 1) AG-S3, abnormal change (irregularity and/or encasement) up to marginal vessels; 2) AG-S2, abnormality up to vasa recta; 3) AG-S1, abnormality of penetrating branches of vasa recta within the wall of the colon; and 4) AG-S0, no distinct findings of above-mentioned vessels. These angiographic findings were compared with both macroscopic and microscopic serosal cancer invasion. Angiographic diagnosis is in accord with the macroscopic findings in 84.2 percent of cases. Angiographic diagnosis is in accord with the microscopic findings in 32.4 percent of cases. Macroscopic findings confirm the angiographic diagnosis precisely but the conflict with microscopic findings should not be overlooked. This may be the result of inflammatory change, adhesion, and fibrosis around carcinoma of the colon. 

17667238
Histological examination of cryopreserved rat tracheal grafts. 
It has been reported that tracheal tissue treated by cryopreservation can be used for tracheal replacement in the absence of immunosuppressants. However, the mechanism of reduced antigenicity is unclear. We investigated this issue in cryopreserved rat trachea using detailed histologic evaluation. Rat tracheal segments were preserved in a cryopreservative solution at -85 degrees C. The epithelium of tracheal segments (n = 6 in each group) was subjected to light microscopic and scanning electron microscopic examination before freezing and after cryopreservation for 1 week, 1 month, 3 months, and 6 months. The expression of major histocompatibility complex II (MHC-II) was determined using frozen sections. Ultrastructure of dendritic cells (DCs) was observed by transmission electron microscopy. Tracheal epithelium was partially intact even after 6 months in cryopreservation, although cellularity decreased with time. MHC-II antigen expression was detected even at 6 months, although expression was lower than that measured on fresh tissue. Tracheal tissue DCs displayed dilatations of perinuclear cisterna and degeneration of vacuoles. Density of the mitochondrial matrix was increased. These results suggest that damage to the epithelium and DCs during cryopreservation and concomitant loss of MHC-II expression might explain the reduction of antigenicity. 

3251525
Procedure for intraperitoneal P-32 administration. 
Details of the Intraperitoneal P-32 administration are presented. Rationale, general instructions, technique, infusion of P-32, orders and Radiation Safety instructions are discussed. 

14752125
Active and passive smoking and the risk of subarachnoid hemorrhage: an international population-based case-control study. 
BACKGROUND AND PURPOSE: This study was undertaken to better clarify the risks associated with cigarette smoking and subarachnoid hemorrhage (SAH). METHODS: The study included 432 incident cases of SAH frequency matched to 473 community SAH-free controls to determine dose-dependent associations of active and passive smoking (at home) and smoking cessation with SAH. RESULTS: Compared with never smokers not exposed to passive smoking, the adjusted odds ratio for SAH among current smokers was 5.0 (95% confidence interval [CI], 3.1 to 8.1); for past smokers, 1.2 (95% CI, 0.8 to 2.0); and for passive smokers, 0.9 (95% CI, 0.6 to 1.5). Current and lifetime exposures showed a clear dose-dependent effect, and risks appeared more prominent in women and for aneurysmal SAH. Approximately 1 in 3 cases of SAH could be attributed to current smoking, but risks decline quickly after smoking cessation, even among heavy smokers. CONCLUSIONS: A strong positive association was found between cigarette smoking and SAH, especially for aneurysmal SAH and women, which is virtually eliminated within a few years of smoking cessation. Large opportunities exist for preventing SAH through smoking avoidance and cessation programs. 

176335
Salivary gland tumors: review of 643 cases. 
643 cases of salivary gland tumors constitute two series of histological sections that were studied from hospitals and dental schools in Southeast Scotland and Southern Ontario. The Scottish series represented epithelial tumors of the parotid and intra-oral salivary glands, but the Canadian series also included tumors of the submandibular and sublingual glands. Classification was based on that recommended by the World Health Organisation (Thackray 1972). While direct statiscal comparisons between the two series are not appropriate, the differences between them suggest that malignant tumors are more common in Canada. The Scottish series contains the largest proportion of benign salivary tumors so far reported. In the Scottish series, 88.7% of parotid tumors were benign compared with 51.9% of Canadian series. In the Canadian series from the submandibular glands, 21.2% only were benign. Of the intra-oral salivary tumors, 62.2% from the Scottish series were benign compared with only 34.7% from the Canadian series. 

7558214
Gall stones in children (non hemolytic) (case reports). 
Gall bladder disease is considered rare in child hood and hence is frequently over looked in the differential diagnosis as the classical clinical picture and laboratory confirmation in adults does not apply to children. Attention must be paid to the possibility of gall stones in the evaluation of children with non specific abdominal symptoms. Ultrasonography has become a very accurate tool for the evaluation of these children. Once the diagnosis of cholelithiasis is established, elective cholecystectomy is the treatment of choice. 

2108633
[Iatrogenic coronary stenosis after angioplasty] 
Restenosis is the usual mechanism of recurrent myocardial ischaemia in the months following successful percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty (PTCA). Control coronary arteriography may occasionally show another cause: the constitution of a new stenosis near the dilated segment or in the left main coronary stem after angioplasty in a branch of this artery. The authors report 4 cases of patients who developed new coronary stenoses within a few weeks of PTCA, interpreted as traumatic complications of the initial procedure due to a lesion of the intima with a secondary fibrotic reaction and luminal narrowing. The guiding catheter was probably responsible for the trauma to the left main coronary stem whereas the tips of either the balloon catheter or the guide wire were thought to have been responsible for the endothelial effraction of the dilated vessels. 

16821901
Quantum mechanical single molecule partition function from path integral Monte Carlo simulations. 
An algorithm for calculating the partition function of a molecule with the path integral Monte Carlo method is presented. Staged thermodynamic perturbation with respect to a reference harmonic potential is utilized to evaluate the ratio of partition functions. Parallel tempering and a new Monte Carlo estimator for the ratio of partition functions are implemented here to achieve well converged simulations that give an accuracy of 0.04 kcal/mol in the reported free energies. The method is applied to various test systems, including a catalytic system composed of 18 atoms. Absolute free energies calculated by this method lead to corrections as large as 2.6 kcal/mol at 300 K for some of the examples presented. 

6628590
Spatio-temporal recoding of rapid eye movement signals in the monkey paramedian pontine reticular formation (PPRF). 
The integrity of the paramedian pontine reticular formation (PPRF) is necessary for the generation of rapid eye movements. The main saccade-related population is of the burst type with latencies between 0 and 40 ms preceding a saccade, and they can be divided into medium- and long-lead burst neurons. Burst neurons have predominantly spatially coded movement fields in the rostral PPRF, while in the caudal PPRF they increase their burst strength in temporal coding approximately in the pulling directions of extraocular eye muscles (i.e. almost horizontal or vertical). Both neuronal populations have ipsilateral on-directions and contain long-lead burst neurons. In a quantitative analysis the firing patterns of long-lead burst neurons are compared to those of medium-lead burst neurons, which form the predominant output of the saccadic pulse generator to the motoneurons. The firing patterns of temporally coded long-lead bursters are similar to those of medium-lead bursters, except for earlier on-latencies, larger statistical fluctuations, and specializations for small or large saccades in oblique directions. The spatially coded burst neurons form a motor map of saccadic vectors. The diameter of their movement field is often about the size of the saccade vector, and they encode saccadic onset and duration. These results are consistent with a model for visual saccades in eye displacement coordinates, where the spatio-temporal recording of horizontal eye movements is effected by long-lead burst neurons in the PPRF. 

1794077
Neurogenic pain syndromes and their management. 
Neurogenic pain is defined as pain due to dysfunction of the peripheral or central nervous system, in the absence of nociceptor (nerve terminal) stimulation by trauma or disease. Other terms used to describe some (but not all) forms of neurogenic pain include neuropathic pain, deafferentation pain, and central pain; all these terms are subsumed into the wider expression 'neurogenic pain'. The clinical syndromes representing this type of disorder make up at least 25% of the patients attending most pain clinics. This is undoubtedly proportionately greater than its incidence in chronic pain as a whole, and is a measure of its intractability and of the therapeutic dilemma which it presents. However, neurogenic pain syndromes are much commoner than is perhaps generally recognized: when all categories are taken into account, there are probably more than 550,000 cases in the UK population of 56 million at any one time, i.e. a prevalence of about 1%. 

1542029
Paracellular calcium transport across the small intestine. 
Concentration and voltage dependence of unidirectional 45Ca transport measurements indicated that approximately 60-70% of the mucosa-to-serosa calcium flux measured across the short-circuited rat duodenum, jejunum and ileum is paracellular, with only 30-40% of the mucosa-to-serosa calcium transport cellular. The calcium flux from serosa to mucosa was purely paracellular in all segments. Duodenal calcium serosal-to-mucosal flux was of the same order of magnitude as the mucosal-to-serosal paracellular movement. However, the serosal-to-mucosal flux of jejunum and ileum was twice as high. Therefore, net calcium absorption occurs only in the duodenum, whereas calcium is secreted in the jejunum and ileum by a passive paracellular route, presumably involving an anomalous solvent drag effect. Administration of 1,25-dihydroxycholecalciferol (1,25-(OH)2D3) led to an increase in the transcellular mucosa-to-serosa flux in the duodenum only. It also led to a stimulation of paracellular calcium flux in both directions in all three intestinal segments, with no change in net paracellular calcium absorption. Thus, the only vitamin D-related increase in calcium absorption was due to the increase in duodenal transcellular absorption. The mechanism by which 1,25-(OH)2D3 increased paracellular flux is not known but may have resulted from an osmotic effect on the intercellular spaces. 

17930560
Generalized Stern-Gerlach effect for chiral molecules. 
The Stern-Gerlach effect is well known as spin-dependent splitting of a beam of atoms with magnetic moments by a magnetic-field gradient. Here, we show that an induced gauge potential may lead to a similar effect for chiral molecules. In the presence of three inhomogeneous light fields, the center of mass of a three-level chiral molecule is subject to an optically induced gauge potential, and the internal dynamics of the molecule can be described as an adiabatic evolution in the reduced pseudospin subspace of the two lowest energy levels. We demonstrate numerically that such an induced gauge potential can lead to observable pseudospin-dependent and chirality-dependent generalized Stern-Gerlach effects for mixed left- and right-handed chiral molecules under realistic conditions. 

7853056
The clinical evaluation tool: a measure of the quality of clinical performance of baccalaureate nursing students. 
This article describes an approach to the evaluation of students' clinical performance. Specifically, the paper describes: (a) the history of the evaluation of clinical performance in nursing education; (b) the development of the Clinical Evaluation Tool (CET), an instrument designed to measure the clinical performance of nursing students across settings; and (c) the relationships between basic baccalaureate nursing students' scores on the CET and the following variables: age, college credits earned prior to entry to the program, grade point average at entry, college aptitude, and moral reasoning. 

2992660
Autoradiographic localization of beta-adrenoceptor subtypes in guinea-pig kidney. 
The distribution of beta-adrenoceptor subtypes in slide-mounted sections of guinea-pig kidney has been examined by the technique of in vitro labelling combined with autoradiography. Binding of (-)-[125I]-cyanopindolol (Cyp) to kidney sections equilibrated and dissociated slowly, was saturable and stereoselective with respect to the isomers of propranolol and pindolol. These characteristics were appropriate for binding to beta-adrenoceptors. Delineation of beta-adrenoceptor subtypes was achieved by use of betaxolol (beta 1-adrenoceptors) and ICI 118,551 (beta 2-adrenoceptors) and computer assisted curve fitting techniques. Both beta 1- and beta 2-adrenoceptors were present in the proportions 1:2. 3H-Ultrofilm images of (-)-[125I]-Cyp binding to guinea-pig kidney sections showed localized patches of binding in the cortex and concentrated binding in the outer stripe of the medulla. Cortical receptors were of the beta 1 subtype and those associated with the outer stripe of the medulla were of the beta 2-adrenoceptor subtype. beta 1-Adrenoceptors were concentrated over glomeruli and beta 2-adrenoceptors over the straight portion of the proximal tubule. 

7519145
Alpha, theta and alpha-theta coma: a clinical outcome study utilizing serial recordings. 
Alpha coma (AC), theta coma (TC) and alpha-theta coma (ATC) are transient clinical-electroencephalographic phenomena which do not differ from each other in etiology or outcome and are indicative of a severe disturbance in thalamo-cortical physiology. Although most patients do poorly, these patterns are not reliably predictive of outcome, regardless of etiology. We found that AC, TC or ATC usually change to a more definitive pattern by 5 days from coma onset. EEG reactivity in subsequent patterns is relatively favorable, while a burst-suppression pattern without reactivity is unfavorable in anoxic-ischemic encephalopathy. 

12491025
Interaction between naltrexone and oral THC in heavy marijuana smokers. 
RATIONALE: Studies in non-human animals suggest that opioid antagonists block the reinforcing effects of cannabinoids. OBJECTIVE: The present studies in humans investigated how naltrexone modulates (1) the subjective and physiological effects of oral THC in comparison to methadone, (2) the reinforcing effects of oral THC, and (3) plasma levels of oral THC. METHODS: In study 1, marijuana smokers (n=9) received naltrexone (0, 50 mg) followed 30 min later by THC (0, 15, 30 mg) or methadone (5, 10 mg). Subjective effects, task performance, pupillary diameter, and cardiovascular parameters were measured repeatedly. In study 2a, marijuana smokers (n=23) were randomly assigned to one THC dose condition (0, 15 or 30 mg). One set of color-coded capsules containing THC and active naltrexone (50 mg) was given in one session, while another set of color-coded capsules containing THC and placebo naltrexone was given in another session. In the final three sessions, participants chose which color capsules they would receive. In study 2b, a subset of participants from study 2a (n=7) received naltrexone (0, 50 mg) 30 min prior to oral THC (30 mg) administration, and blood was drawn repeatedly. RESULTS: Pretreatment with naltrexone significantly increased many of the "positive" subjective effects of oral THC (30 mg) e.g. ratings of Good Drug Effect and Capsule Liking. Naltrexone tended to increase the reinforcing effects of oral THC (30 mg), as indicated by performance in a drug choice test. Naltrexone did not alter plasma THC levels. CONCLUSIONS: These studies demonstrate that naltrexone increases the subjective effects of oral THC. Thus, oral THC's effects are enhanced rather than antagonized by opioid receptor blockade in heavy marijuana smokers. 

10928700
Cellular volume determination of alginate-entrapped hepatocytes by MRI diffusion measurements. 
Cellular volume of hepatocytes entrapped in alginate gel beads were evaluated under in vivo conditions in samples having different cell densities by applying mathematical models to the diffusion data obtained by magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). The calculated average volume is in good agreement with the values from the literature-- being closer to the data relative to living tissue than to isolated cells. The non invasive characteristics of magnetic resonance imaging make this method particularly well suited to obtain information from the intact system. 

3859837
Human X chromosome markers and Duchenne muscular dystrophy. 
Two DNA markers, a random DNA fragment 754 and the cDNA sequence encoding the gene for ornithine transcarbamylase (OTC) have been studied in kindreds segregating for Duchenne muscular dystrophy. 754 and OTC are located close physically to the mutation in the region Xp21 below the breakpoints in two Duchenne females. The genetic distance was found to be approximately 10cM between 754 and DMD (two crossovers in 26 meioses) and to be approximately 10cM between OTC and DMD (two crossovers in 26 meioses). Physical data suggest the order DMD-754-OTC. The frequency of recombination compared to physical distance between these markers and DMD suggests that there may be a hot spot of recombination. The relevance of these observations for the isolation of the DMD mutation and clinical use of these probes is discussed. 

10977159
Surrogacy, rights and duties: a partial commentary. 
In response to criticisms of proposed regulation of surrogacy, it is argued that surrogate mothers and providers of fertility services have duties which make the selling of claims to parenthood unethical and which justify regulation of surrogacy arrangements. 

2646334
Instrumentation for the dermatologic surgeon. 
Because dermatologic surgery continues to enjoy widespread popularity as a leading treatment modality for skin disease, the skill and training of the surgeon are critical to patient care. Equally important, however, are the tools the surgeon uses to perform each particular procedure. Surgical instrumentation has often been a confusing subject for the novice surgeon, one in which personal preference often outweighs technical considerations. This article will present the advantages and short-comings of several instruments that constitute the basic armamentarium of the dermatologic surgeon. 

2456299
Discrimination of determinant specificity of two encephalomyocarditis virus neutralizing monoclonal antibodies by competition, mixed neutralization and anti-idiotypic antibodies. 
To investigate the epitope(s) on encephalomyocarditis virus (EMCV) involved in neutralization, two neutralizing monoclonal antibodies (MAs) (MA UM 21.1 and MA UM 21.2) were tested in a competition binding assay (CBA), a mixed neutralization test and an enzyme immunoassay (EIA) with specificity for the detection of idiotypes on MAs. With a CBA in cell culture, using EMCV infected L cell monolayers as binding antigen, strong homologous competition was observed between unlabelled MAs and horse radish peroxidase (HRPO-) labelled MAs but considerable heterologous competition did also occur, especially between the unlabelled MA UM 21.1 and HRPO-labelled MA UM 21.2. In the mixed neutralization test (50% plaque reduction) preincubation with slightly neutralizing or nonneutralizing doses of MA UM 21.2 had no diminishing effect on the neutralizing capacity of MA UM 21.1, the PRT50 value remains in all cases -10log titre of 5.8. Furthermore rabbit polyclonal antibodies against the idiotypes of MAs UM 21.1 and UM 21.2 did not cross react in the EIA. In conclusion both MAs recognize different viral determinants as indicated by the results obtained with a CBA, a mixed neutralization test and an EIA for detection of idiotypes on MAs. 

17564242
Measurement of higher-order family dimensions across self-report and behavioral observational methods. 
This study used a community sample of 192 intact families to examine two issues related to conceptualization and measurement of family functioning. First, a confirmatory factor model supported the adequacy of using dyadic-level self-report measures (e.g., mother-child, child-father) to identify three family level constructs of Family Affect, Family Control, and Family Shared Activity. Second, data derived from behavioral observations during dyadic interactions identified two factors, Family Positivity and Family Negativity. Correlations among the self-report and behavioral observation factors indicated high Family Positivity was significantly associated with higher Family Affect and lower Family Control, and Family Negativity was significantly associated with lower Family Affect and with lower Family Shared Activity. Findings are discussed in terms of limitations and directions for research. 

8873466
Population structure of the yellow-footed rock-wallaby Petrogale xanthopus (Gray, 1854) inferred from mtDNA sequences and microsatellite loci. 
The yellow-footed rock-wallaby Petrogale xanthopus is considered to be potentially vulnerable to extinction. This wallaby inhabits naturally disjunct rocky outcrops which could restrict dispersal between populations, but the extent to which that occurs is unknown. Genetic differences between populations were assessed using mitochondrial DNA (control region) sequencing and analysis of variation at four microsatellite loci among three geographically close sites in south-west Queensland (P. x. celeris) and, for mtDNA only, samples from South Australia (P. x. xanthopus) as well. Populations from South Australia and Queensland had phylogenetically distinct mtDNA, supporting the present classification of these two groups as evolutionarily distinct entities. Within Queensland, populations separated by 70 km of unsuitable habitat differed significantly for mtDNA and at microsatellite loci. Populations separated by 10 km of apparently suitable habitat had statistically homogeneous mtDNA, but a significant difference in allele frequency at one microsatellite locus. Tests for Hardy-Weinberg equilibrium and microgeographical variation at microsatellite loci did not detect any substructuring between two wallaby aggregations within a colony encircling a single rock outcrop. Although the present study was limited by small sample sizes at two of the three Queensland locations examined, the genetic results suggest that dispersal between colonies is limited, consistent with an ecological study of dispersal at one of the sites. Considering both the genetic and ecological data, we suggest that management of yellow-footed rock-wallabies should treat each colony as an independent unit and that conservation of the Queensland and South Australian populations as separate entities is warranted. 

3272808
Acute type-A dissection of the aorta: which diagnostic modes remain for surgical indication? 
The natural course of acute type-A dissection of the aorta (AADA) implies a mortality of 50% within the initial 2 days. Preoperative diagnostic tests have to be expeditious while avoiding hypertension and direct manipulation of the aneurysm to prevent aortic rupture. Since 1979, 51 patients have been operated upon for AADA. The diagnosis was established by one or more of the following methods: transthoracic echocardiography (TTE); transesophageal echocardiography (TEE); conventional angiography (CA); intravenous digital subtraction angiography (DSA); and computed tomography with bolus injection of contrast medium (CT). TTE (n = 26) showed a dissection in 72%, suggested an intimal flap in 25%, and missed the diagnosis in 1 case. CT (n = 15) and DSA (n = 10) failed to indicate dissection in 1 case each. CA (n = 27) demonstrated dissection in every case but was the most time-consuming and stressful method. Since the introduction of combined transthoracic and transesophageal echocardiography, no other diagnostic methods have been used. On the basis of this experience, we propose the following diagnostic plan: 1. in AADA, the demonstration of an intimal flap in the ascending aorta by TTE/TEE is an indication for immediate surgery without further diagnostic measures (10 patients: no false-positive findings); 2. if a dissection is suggested by TTE/TEE, then DSA is performed if the supra-aortic branches are suspected to be compromised; CT is preferred if an extrapericardial aortic rupture is suspected; 3. the time-consuming and stressful diagnostic approach of conventional angiography is no longer indicated. 

2977273
Interim report of a randomized trial comparing Zoladex 3.6 mg depot with diethylstilbestrol 3 mg/day in advanced prostate cancer. The West Midlands Urology Research Group. 
A study comparing Zoladex 3.6 mg depot with diethylstilbestrol (DES) 3 mg/day was initiated in August 1985. One hundred ninety-three patients with histologically confirmed prostate cancer T3/4 or M1 have been randomized up to 31 March 1987: 95 to Zoladex, 98 to DES. No patient had received prior systemic therapy. There is no bias in the treatment groups in terms of baseline characteristics. Median follow-up is 11 months, and the response rate at 12 months from randomization (CR + PR) for Zoladex is 70 +/- 9.4% and 50 +/- 10.1% for DES. Median time to best response is 6 months for Zoladex and 12 months for DES (using the Kaplan-Meier life table method). Subjective responses are 56 +/- 10.2% for Zoladex and 44 +/- 10% for DES. Five increases in bone pain were found after the first Zoladex treatment, as well as one increased ureteric obstruction. None required treatment withdrawal. Seventeen patients on DES were withdrawn due to adverse reaction (chi 2 = 4.33, 1df, p less than 0.05). Overall survival at 31 March 1987 is 84% for the Zoladex group and 78% for the DES group. This study has shown that Zoladex is superior to DES in achieving early tumor response in advanced prostate cancer, without causing serious complications warranting withdrawal of treatment. 

1617223
Completion of the physical map of Xq28: the location of the gene for L1CAM on the human X chromosome. 
The gene for the neural cell adhesion molecule L1 (L1CAM) has been shown to be located close to the color vision pigment genes in mouse and man. This location has been confirmed by a number of different mapping strategies in both species. With pulsed field gel electrophoresis it has been proposed that L1CAM lies between the RCP, GCP, and GDX, G6PD loci. We report here a reinterpretation of the location of this gene, based on the physical linkage of L1CAM to the more proximal locus DXS15. This places L1CAM between this marker and the color vision genes (RCP, GCP), a region very dense in CpG islands, expected to contain a large fraction of the disease genes assigned to the Xq28 region. In combination with the physical mapping data on Xq28 described previously, this closes the last remaining gap in the map of the Xq27-Xq28 region. This removes the last contradiction between the maps of this region in the genomes of man and mouse, and confirms the close similarity of order and distances of markers between these organisms. 

11038399
Regional distribution of potassium currents in the rabbit pulmonary arterial circulation. 
The response of pulmonary arteries to hypoxia varies as a function of vessel diameter. Small intrapulmonary resistance arteries are thought to be the main site of hypoxic pulmonary vasoconstriction (HPV), with hypoxia causing minimal contraction or even dilatation in large, conduit vessels. This has been proposed to reflect a differential distribution of morphologically and electrophysiologically distinct pulmonary artery smooth muscle (PASM) cells. We investigated longitudinal heterogeneity in smooth muscle cells isolated from five regions of the rabbit pulmonary vasculature and could find no evidence of morphological heterogeneity at the level of the light microscope. PASM cells from main (8 mm outer diameter) and branch (5 mm) arteries and large ( 400 m) intrapulmonary arteries (IPA) were similar in shape and size, as indicated by cell capacitance (25 pF). PASM cells from medium (200-400 m) and small ( 200 m) IPA were significantly smaller (15 pF), but had the same classical spindle shape. Cells from all five regions also had similar resting membrane potentials and displayed voltage-activated K+ currents of similar amplitude when recorded in standard physiological solution. Longitudinal heterogeneity in K+ current became apparent when tetraethylammonium ions (TEA; 10 mM) and glibenclamide (10 M) were added. The remaining delayed rectifier current (IK(V)) doubled in amplitude upon moving down the pulmonary arterial tree from the main artery (9 pA pF-1 at 40 mV) to the large IPA (17 pA pF-1), but remained constant throughout the intrapulmonary vasculature. The O2-sensitive, non-inactivating K+ current (IK(N)) showed a similar trend, but was significantly reduced in the smallest IPA, where its amplitude was comparable with the main artery. Thus the IK(N)/IK(V) ratio was relatively constant, at around 0.14, from the main pulmonary artery to medium IPA, but fell by 50% in the smallest vessels. The amplitude of the TEA-sensitive K+ current was similar (16 pA pF-1 at 40 mV) at all levels of the pulmonary arterial tree, except in the medium sized vessels where it was 50% smaller. These variations in K+ current expression correlate with reported variations in sensitivity to hypoxia and may contribute to the regional heterogeneity of HPV in the rabbit lung. 

3547044
[Immobilization of microorganisms on latex for producing artificial flocs] 
Microorganisms belonging to the genera Pseudomonas, Micrococcus, Bacillus and Rhodotorula are flocculated with divinyl styrene latex. The process of flocculation depends on a number of physico-chemical factors but, all in all, is universal for microorganisms with different taxonomy, morphology and physiology. The structure of artificial bioflocs has been studied using optical and scanning electron microscopy. 

16935568
Afferent pathway and neuromodulation of superficial and deeper thoracic spinal neurons receiving noxious pulmonary inputs in rats. 
The occurrence of vagally mediated afferent signaling by lung irritants is well known. However, spinal visceral afferent pathways also might be relevant to pulmonary irritation. In the present study, responses and modulation of superficial and deep T3 spinal neurons were examined using inhaled ammonia, and the peripheral afferent fibers were also characterized in part. Extracellular potentials of single thoracic (T3) spinal neurons were recorded in pentobarbital anesthetized, paralyzed, and ventilated male rats. Ammonia vapor (0.5, 1.0, 2.0 ml) was injected into the inspiratory line of the ventilator for 20 s. Inhaled ammonia (IA, 1.0 ml) excited 5/6 neurons and inhibited one spinal neuron recorded in superficial laminae, whereas deeper neurons responded with excitatory (E, n = 20), inhibitory (I, n = 4) or biphasic patterns (6 E-I, 3 I-E). Electrical and chemical stimulation of C1-C2 spinal neurons primarily suppressed T3 neuronal responses to IA. Resiniferatoxin (2 microg/kg, i.v.), which desensitizes afferent fibers containing transient receptor potential vanilloid receptor-1 (TRPV-1), abolished excitatory responses of 8/8 neurons to IA. Bilateral cervical vagotomy did not affect IA responses in 5 superficial neurons while 7 deeper neurons showed variable responses. 82% (32/39) of the spinal neurons responding to IA also received convergent noxious inputs from somatic fields in the chest and back areas. These results suggested that superficial and deeper spinal neuronal activation by inhaled ammonia mainly depended upon pulmonary sympathetic afferent fibers expressing TRPV-1. Additionally, C1-C2 spinal neurons, supraspinal sites and vagal afferents modulated the thoracic spinal neuronal responses to lower airway irritation. 

3237910
A family history method for DSM-III anxiety and personality disorders. 
A family history method for DSM-III anxiety and personality disorders (FHPD) was validated by direct interview of 182 relatives. The categories of "any anxiety disorder," "panic disorder," and "any personality disorder" achieved sensitivities and specificities equivalent to currently accepted psychiatric family history methods. The family history results for the DSM-III dramatic and anxious personality disorder clusters showed good specificities, but only fair sensitivities. It is possible these cluster sensitivities could be improved in the future by using less stringent criteria. The FHPD is designed so that it can easily be integrated into the Family History-Research Diagnostic Criteria format and scoring. 

2927625
The performance on learning tasks of patients in the early stages of Parkinson's disease. 
It is known that in animals learning is disrupted by caudate lesions; but there has been no agreement about whether pathology in the basal ganglia causes a similar impairment in man. Nineteen patients in the early stages of Parkinson's disease were tested on two associative learning tasks and on the Wisconsin Card Sorting Task; and their performance was compared with that of patients with frontal or temporal lobe lesions. On the two associative learning tasks there was no overall difference between the Parkinsonian group and the controls. However, a minority of the Parkinsonian patients performed very poorly on these tasks; and it was noted that these tended to be the older patients. 

12792516
Serine proteinase inhibitor-9, an endogenous blocker of granzyme B/perforin lytic pathway, is hyperexpressed during acute rejection of renal allografts. 
BACKGROUND: Serine proteinase inhibitor (PI)-9 with a reactive center P1 (Glu)-P1' is a natural antagonist of granzyme B and is expressed in high levels in cytotoxic T lymphocytes (CTL). In view of the role of CTL in acute rejection, we explored the hypothesis that PI-9 would be hyperexpressed during acute rejection. Because PI-9 can protect CTL from its own fatal arsenal and potentially enhance the vitality of CTL, we examined whether PI-9 levels correlate with the severity of rejection as well as predict subsequent graft function. METHODS: We obtained 95 urine specimens from 87 renal allograft recipients. RNA was isolated from the urinary cells and mRNA encoding PI-9, granzyme B, or perforin and a constitutively expressed 18S rRNA was measured with the use of real-time quantitative polymerase chain reaction assay, and the level of expression was correlated with allograft status. RESULTS: The levels of PI-9 (P=0.001), granzyme B (P<0.0001), and perforin mRNAs (P<0.0001), but not the levels of 18S rRNA (P=0.54), were higher in the urinary cells from the 29 patients with a biopsy-confirmed acute rejection than in the 58 recipients without acute rejection. PI-9 levels were significantly higher in patients with type II or higher acute rejection changes compared with those with less than type II changes (P=0.01). Furthermore, PI-9 levels predicted subsequent graft function (r=0.43, P=0.01). CONCLUSIONS: PI-9 mRNA levels in urinary cells are diagnostic of acute rejection, predict renal allograft histology grade, and predict functional outcome following an acute rejection episode. 

15306997
Clinical manifestation of norovirus gastroenteritis in health care settings. 
Noroviruses are generally believed to cause relatively mild gastroenteritis of short duration in otherwise healthy adults. However, outbreaks in health care settings are common and affect vulnerable populations. During 2002-2003, a total of 4 major hospitals, 11 community hospitals, and 135 nursing homes in the county of Avon, England, were prospectively monitored for outbreaks of gastroenteritis. For 482 hospital staff, 166 nursing home staff, and 266 nursing home residents, the median duration of norovirus gastroenteritis was 2 days, with 75% achieving complete recovery within 3 days. The median duration of norovirus gastroenteritis for 730 hospital patients was 3 days (75% of the patients achieved complete recovery within 5 days), which was significantly longer than that for all other groups (P<.001). Therefore, infection in hospitalized persons may be more severe than that in other groups in the community at large. This increased duration of acute illness should be considered when implementing measures to prevent transmission in hospital settings. 

7098717
[Intratympanic pressure changes during general anaesthesia (author's transl)] 
A common observation during otologic surgery under general anaesthesia, notably with nitrous oxide, is tympanic membrane graft displacement due to elevated intratympanic pressure. It can be assumed that nitrous oxide increases the intratympanic pressure. The authors measured the intratympanic pressure changes with the Madsen Impedance measuring instrument Z073. The results of the measurements of 84 ears are discussed and the tendencies of the connection between pressure in the middle ear and the size of the mastoid bone are shown. 

12657825
[The clinical usefulness of SPIO-MRI in detection and staging of hepatocellular carcinoma] 
BACKGROUND/AIMS: It is still unclear whether Super Paramagnetic Iron Oxide-Magnetic Resonance Imaging (SPIO-MRI) is a clinically useful imaging modality for patients with hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC). This study searched for the clinical usefulness and limitations of SPIO-MRI with respect to tumor detection capacity, false positive and negative rate, and early recurrence rate. METHODS: From December 1999 to February 2001, 218 patients who were surgical candidates by 3-phase dynamic helical CT (3dHCT) were enrolled. We reviewed the medical records and radiologic findings, retrospectively, and postulated the post-operative pathologic findings and the early recurrences within 3 months as the standards for the true positive lesion. RESULTS: The mean number of nodules detected by SPIO-MRI was significantly more numerous than that of 3dHCT (p<0.01). Modifications of treatment strategy due to the discordant findings between SPIO-MRI and 3dHCT for tumor resectability were observed in 22 (10.1%) out of 218 patients. Early recurrences were observed in 10 patients (7.8%). The false positive and negative rates of SPIO-MRI were 6.3% and 13.3%, respectively. CONCLUSIONS: We demonstrated that the tumor detection rate of SPIO-MRI was better than that of 3dHCT. Given the relatively acceptable false positive and negative rates, SPIO-MRI could be an appropriate preoperative imaging modality for patients with HCCs. 

10912882
Muscle damage and resting metabolic rate after acute resistance exercise with an eccentric overload. 
PURPOSE: The purpose of this investigation was to determine whether muscle damage caused from acute resistance exercise with an eccentric overload would influence resting metabolic rate (RMR) up to 72 h postexercise in resistance-trained (RT) and untrained (UT) subjects. METHODS: Nine RT and 9 UT male subjects (mean +/- SD; age = 20.7 +/- 2.1 yr; body mass = 79.0 +/- 1.4 kg; height = 178.4 +/- 3.1 cm; and body fat = 10.2 +/- 1.6%) were measured for RMR, creatine kinase concentration ([CK]), and rating of perceived muscle soreness (RPMS) on five consecutive mornings. To induce muscle damage, after the measurements on day 2, each subject performed leg presses that emphasized the eccentric movement for 8 sets at his six-repetition maximum (6-RM). RESULTS: Compared with baseline, the RMR (kJ x d(-1) and kJ x kg FFM(-1) x h(-1) was significantly elevated for RT and UT at 24 h and 48 h postexercise. From 24 h to 48 h to 72 h postexercise, RMR significantly decreased within both groups. The UT group had a significantly higher RMR at 24 h (9,705.4 +/- 204.5 kJ x d(-1)) and 48 h postexercise (8,930.9 +/- 104.4 kJ x d(-1)) when compared with the RT group (9,209.3 +/- 535.3 and 8,601.7 + 353.7 kJ x d(-1)). Both [CK] and RPMS showed a similar time course. CONCLUSION: There was a significantly higher [CK] for the UT group at 24 h postexercise (320.4 +/- 20.1 U x L(-1)) and for both [CK] and RPMS at 48 h (1,140.3 +/- 37.1 U x L(-1) and 4.4 +/- 0.5, respectively) and 72 h postexercise (675.9 +/- 41.7 U x L(-1) and 1.67 +/- 0.5, respectively) when compared with the RT group (24 h, 201.9 +/- 13.4 U x L(-1); 48 h, 845.4 +/- 30.7 U x L(-1) and 3.7 +/- 0.5: and 72 h postexercise, 420.2 +/- 70.2 U x L(-1) and 0.89 +/- 0.3). These data indicate that eccentrically induced muscle damage causes perturbations in RMR up to 48 h postexercise. 

8132520
Lactate monooxygenase. III. Additive contributions of active site residues to catalytic efficiency and stabilization of an anionic transition state. 
Lactate monooxygenase catalyzes the conversion of L-lactate to acetate, CO2, and water with incorporation of molecular oxygen. Several amino acid residues of lactate monooxygenase had been postulated to interact in specific ways with the bound substrate (Giegel, D. A., Williams, C. H., Jr., and Massey, V. (1990) J. Biol. Chem. 265, 6626-6632). Tyrosine 44 and arginine 293 were proposed to form a hydrogen bond and a salt bridge to the carboxyl-moiety of lactate. Tyrosine 152 was suggested to form a hydrogen bond to the alpha-hydroxyl group and could be involved in stabilizing a transient carbanionic intermediate of the substrate. The tyrosine residues were replaced with phenylalanines (Y44F, Y152F), and arginine 293 was mutated to a lysine (R293K). In all cases catalysis was significantly decreased; however, the binding affinity for L-lactate did not decrease. Instead, the Kd measured for Y152F was 10-fold lower than that for the wild type enzyme. The products of turnover with Y152F were similar to those with wild type enzyme, with 70-80% of the reaction proceeding to form acetate, CO2, and H2O. The catalytic reactions with both Y44F and R293K were substantially uncoupled, with between 60 and 80% of the catalytic turnover forming pyruvate and H2O2. For all mutant forms the reoxidation of enzyme with oxygen in the absence of pyruvate occurred at a rate similar to that measured for the wild type enzyme. The most important effect of the mutations was in the ability to stabilize the transition state analog oxalate. A linear relationship was found between the rate of reduction of the enzyme flavin and the dissociation constant for the binding of oxalate, demonstrating that many individual residues contribute to the lowering of the energy of the transition state, in addition to specific functions being assignable to some specific residues. 

9467766
Human figure drawings and house tree person drawings as indicators of self-esteem: a quantitative approach. 
This study assessed the concurrent validity of Human Figure Drawings (HFD) and House-Tree-Person (HTP) drawings as measures of self-esteem. Adult subjects were requested to make HFD and HTP drawings and to complete measures of psychological adjustment which included the Coopersmith Self Esteem Inventory and Tennessee Self Concept Scale. The drawings were scored using a quantitative, composite rating scale derived from HFD and HTP empirical and theoretical literature on psychological health. Results indicated that neither the HFD nor the HTP quantitative composite ratings of psychological health related to the formal measures of self-esteem. 

11625026
[Dietetics and the health and fitness cult. The risks of dietetics in the Welfare State] 
We shall analyse the reasons why various matters related to diet have become a type of a purification ritual in the welfare society. In order to explain this circumstance three historic moments in the use of diet shall be studied: a) Diet as an explicit means in the care of the soul. Besides its function in the care of the body, diet was used in ancient times as a specific remedy to improve both the psychic and moral aspects of the mental faculties. b) Diet as an implicit remedy in moral well-being. From the Renaissance onwards diet no longer had this explicit function in curing the soul, however it tacitly retained a certain effect on the moral factors. c) Diet as an instrument of the health and fitness cult. Despite the scientific configuration of dietetics in the second half of the nineteenth century, old function of diet remained mutatis mutandis with regards to the moral sphere of the subject. Factors such as the development of how thinness or fatness was viewed at this time and the resulting explosion of interest in controlling body-weight, which acquired characteristics of pseudo-religious activity, may explain this fact. In this way the old idea of "you are what you eat" coexists with the more modern one of "you eat what you are". 

8377912
Haemorrhage in intracerebral arteriovenous malformations: detection with MRI and comparison with clinical history. 
Fifty-one patients with 59 angiographically proven cerebral arteriovenous malformations (AVMs) were examined by high-field MRI to detect blood breakdown products. Results were correlated with the history of intracranial bleeding. Evidence of previous episodes of haemorrhage was seen in 10 of 12 patients (83.3%) with verified bleeding, in 4 of 9 patients (44.4%) with symptoms which could suggest bleeding and in 6 of 30 patients (20%) with negative histories. Because of the known rebleeding rate and the increased risk of associated complications, identification of the subgroup who had had haemorrhage and should therefore be considered for surgery may be beneficial. MRI can make a contribution to management by demonstrating prior haemorrhage in patients with an inadequate clinical history. 

6425615
Pepsin-immunoregulation hypothesis. 
Pepsin exists in macrophages. Phagocytosis of foreign materials increases pepsin activity in macrophages and also causes extracellular release of pepsin from macrophages. Pepsin enhances antibody production by spleen cells against heterologous materials and suppresses that against homologous materials. Pepsin selectively decomposes immune complexes at neutral pH, and intravenous pepsin ameliorates symptoms in autoimmune disease models, such as immune complex glomerulonephritis in MRL/l mice and SLE-like syndromes of NZB/W F1 mice. These results prompted us to propose a "pepsin-immunoregulation hypothesis", according to which pepsin acts as a regulating factor in the immune system. 

1752417
Permanent rescue of a non-Mendelian mutation of Paramecium by microinjection of specific DNA sequences. 
The mutant Paramecium tetraurelia cell line d48 is unable to express the serotype A protein on its surface. Although the A gene is intact in the micronuclei of d48, the A gene copies in the macronucleus contain a large deletion eliminating virtually the entire coding sequence. Previous studies showed that microinjection of a plasmid containing the entire A gene into the macronucleus of d48 permanently restored A expression after autogamy. Together with other data, this result suggests that in wild type cells the A gene in the old macronucleus ensures the presence of a cytoplasmic factor that prevents A gene deletions at autogamy. In d48, where there are few, if any copies of the intact A gene in the old macronucleus, deletions occur during macronuclear formation. To elucidate the specific molecular mechanisms involved in this unusual phenomenon, we attempted to define the region(s) of the A gene necessary for rescuing d48. We show that microinjection of a 4.5-kb internal A gene fragment is sufficient for proper processing at autogamy and leads to permanent rescue of d48; i.e., the rescued strain is indistinguishable from wild type. Thus, rescue of d48 does not require upstream transcriptional control sequences, intact A mRNA or A serotype protein. We also show that various fragments of the A gene have the ability to rescue d48 to different extents, some being more efficient than others. We find no evidence to suggest that the A gene gives rise to a small stable RNA that might act as or encode a cytoplasmic factor. Molecular mechanisms that may be involved in the rescue of d48 are discussed. 

10837739
Delivery of imaging agents into brain. 
Delivery of diagnostic agents to the central nervous system (CNS) poses several challenges as a result of the special features of CNS blood vessels and tissue fluids. Diffusion barriers exist between blood and neural tissue, in the endothelium of parenchymal vessels (blood-brain barrier, BBB), and in the epithelia of the choroid plexuses and arachnoid membrane (blood-CSF barriers), which severely restrict penetration of several diagnostic imaging agents. The anatomy of large vessels can be imaged using bolus injection of X-ray contrast agents to identify sites of malformation or occlusion, and blood flow measured using MRI and CT, while new techniques permit analysis of capillary perfusion and blood volume. Absolute quantities can be derived, although relative measures in different CNS regions may be as useful in diagnosis. Local blood flow, blood volume, and their ratio (mean transit time) can be measured with high speed tomographic imaging using MRI and CT. Intravascular contrast agents for MRI are based on high magnetic susceptibility agents such as gadolinium, dysprosium and iron. Steady-state imaging using agents that cross the BBB including (123)I- and (99m)Tc-labelled lipophilic agents with SPECT, gives a 'snapshot' of perfusion at the time of injection. Cerebral perfusion can also be measured with PET, using H(2)(15)O, (11)C- or (15)O-butanol, and (18)F-fluoromethane, and cerebral blood volume measured with C(15)O. Recent advances in MRI permit the non-invasive 'labelling' of endogenous water protons in flowing blood, with subsequent detection as a measure of blood flow. Imaging the BBB most commonly involves detecting disruptions of the barrier, allowing contrast agents to leak out of the vascular system. Gd-DTPA is useful in imaging leaky vessels as in some cerebral tumors, while the shortening of T(1) by MR contrast agents can be used to detect more subtle changes in BBB permeability to water as in cerebral ischemia. Techniques for imaging the dynamic activity of the brain parenchyma mainly involve PET, using a variety of radiopharmaceuticals to image glucose transport and metabolism, neurotransmitter binding and uptake, protein synthesis and DNA dynamics. PET methods permit detailed analysis of regional function by comparing resting and task-related images, important in improving understanding of both normal and pathological brain function. 

7397089
Interactions of tris buffer with nucleotides: the crystal structure of tris(hydroxymethyl)methylammonium adenosine 5'-diphosphate dihydrate. 
The crystal and molecular structures of the Tris salt of adenosine 5'-diphosphate were determined from X-ray diffraction data. The crystals are monoclinic, space P21, and Z = 2 with a=9.198 (2) A, b=6.894 (1) A, c=18.440 (4) A, and beta = 92.55 (2) degrees. Intensity data were collected on an automated diffractometer. The structure was solved by the heavy-atom technique and refined by least squares to R = 0.047. The ADP molecule adopts a folded conformation. The conformation about the glycosidic bond is anti. The conformation of the ribose ring is close to a perfect C(2')-endo-C-(3')-exo puckering. The conformation about C(4')-C(5') is gauche-gauche, similar to other nucleotide structures. The pyrophosphate chain displays a nearly eclipsed geometry when viewed down the P-P vector, unlike the staggered conformation observed in crystal structures of other pyrophosphates. The less favorable eclipsed conformation probably results from the observed association of Tris molecules with the polar diphosphate chain through electrostatic interactions and hydrogen bonds. Such interactions may play an important role in Tris-buffered aqueous solutions of nucleotides and metal ions. 

8862348
Endocrine implications of human immunodeficiency virus infection. 
Endocrine abnormalities occur frequently in HIV-infected patients. Although the majority of endocrine disorders reflect chronic infection, stress, and malnutrition, some disorders are characteristic of HIV infection or AIDS and deserve particular clinical attention. Identification of HIV patients at risk of frank endocrine disorders, rapid and correct diagnosis, and appropriate management are essential steps to minimize morbidity and mortality. Finally, increasing evidence from in vitro studies suggests that various hormones may influence HIV replication as well as the course of HIV disease and associated disorders. Future studies on the molecular mechanisms of hormones on HIV action and clinical studies on the effects of hormones as adjunctives to established forms of therapy may stimulate development of novel therapeutic strategies that will benefit HIV-infected patients. 

6980963
Plasma concentrations and urinary excretion of mouse epidermal growth factor associated with the inhibition of food consumption and of wool growth in Merino wethers. 
Twenty-four adult Merino wethers were given mouse epidermal growth factor (mEGF) subcutaneously at doses ranging from 0.02 to 0.12 mg/kg body weight or intravenously in the dose range 0.10 to 0.14 mg/kg body weight for periods ranging from 3 to 48 h. Plasma concentrations of mEGF were measured by radioimmunoassay and effects of treatment on food consumption and wool growth were observed. Plasma concentrations of the protein sustained for 15-24 h at about 20 ng mEGF/ml (or exceeding this) almost invariably caused feed rejection and casting of the fleeces. This last result clearly indicated disruption of proliferative activity among the replicating cells in wool follicles which regulate wool growth. The inhibitory effects on appetite and wool growth of smaller doses of the protein and of plasma concentrations equal to those above which were sustained for shorter periods have also been examined. Approximately 10% of the dose of mEGF appeared in the urine of three sheep 1 to 3 days after the start of s.c. infusions of 5 mg for 7 h. 

10089132
The mitogen-activated protein kinase p38 is necesssary for interleukin 1beta-induced monocyte chemoattractant protein 1 expression by human mesangial cells. 
Mitogen-activated protein (MAP) kinases have been suggested as potential mediators for interleukin 1beta (IL-1beta)-induced gene activation. This study investigated the role of the MAP kinases p38 and ERK2 in IL-1beta-mediated expression of the chemokine MCP-1 by human mesangial cells. Phosphorylation of p38 kinase, which is necessary for activation, increased significantly after IL-1beta treatment. p38 kinase immunoprecipitated from IL-1beta-treated cells phosphorylated target substrates to a greater extent than p38 kinase from controls. SB 203580, a selective p38 kinase inhibitor, was used to examine the role of p38 kinase in MCP-1 expression. SB 203580 decreased IL-1beta-induced MCP-1 mRNA and protein levels, but did not affect MCP-1 mRNA stability. Because NF-kappaB is necessary for MCP-1 gene expression, the effect of p38 kinase inhibition on IL-1beta induction of NF-kappaB was measured. SB 203580 (up to 25 microM) had no effect on IL-1beta-induced NF-kappaB nuclear translocation or DNA binding activity. Our previous work showed that IL-1beta also activates the MAP kinase ERK2 in human mesangial cells. PD 098059, a selective inhibitor of the ERK activating kinase MEK1, had no effect on IL-1beta-induced MCP-1 mRNA or protein levels, or on IL-1beta activation of NF-kappaB. These data indicate that p38 kinase is necessary for the induction of MCP-1 expression by IL-1beta, but is not involved at the level of cytoplasmic activation of NF-kappaB. In contrast, ERK2 does not mediate IL-1beta induced MCP-1 gene expression. 

1138901
Triester wax: a novel neutral lipid from the skin of the rhino mutant mouse. 
A novel class of neutral lipids has been isolated from the skin of the rhino mutant mouse and has been characterized as a triester wax. The lipid, on saponification and transesterification, yielded fatty acids, omega-hydroxy fatty acids and 1,2-alkane diols. These products were identified by gas-liquid and thin-layer chromatography, infrared, nuclear magnetic resonance and mass spectroscopy, combined gas-liquid chromatography and mass spectrometry and chemical methods. Fatty acids were found to be predominantly of even chain length between C14 and C36 with highest concentration at C22 : 1. Hydroxy fatty acid methyl esters (trimethylsilyl ether derivatives) showed the presence of only three components in the relative abundance of 9: 70 : 21. The structure of the major component was established as 34-hydroxytetratricont-25-enoic acid and the other two components were characterized as 32-hydroxyditricont-23-enoic and 36-hydroxyhexatricont-27-enoic acids. In addition to these omega-9 unsaturates, other isomers having unsaturation at omega-7 and omega-8 were also present in small amounts. The 1,2-alkane diols were predominantly saturated in the range of C16-C24. 

11370530
[Histology and tumor biology of microinvasive cervix carcinoma] 
Microinvasive squamous cell carcinomas account for up to 21% of cervical carcinomas. In this early tumor stage characterized by a maximum depth of 5 mm and a horizontal growth up to 7 mm even an increase in tumor size of only a few millimeters leads to a worse prognosis. Therefore a morphology-based therapy is needed that requires additional prognostically relevant markers. Depth of invasion and capillary-lymphatic space invasion are the most important prognostic parameters. Detection of invasion-associated proteases might be helpful in searching for additional diagnostic and prognostic markers which are necessary for an optimal staging-related therapy. In future studies specific concerns must be addressed to microinvasive adenocarcinomas to ensure a correct staging and an optimal therapy. 

16024526
Cyclopiazonic acid activates a Ca2+-permeable, nonselective cation conductance in porcine and bovine tracheal smooth muscle. 
Capacitative Ca2+ entry has been examined in several tissues and, in some, appears to be mediated by nonselective cation channels collectively referred to as "store-operated" cation channels; however, relatively little is known about the electrophysiological properties of these channels in airway smooth muscle. Consequently we examined the electrophysiological characteristics and changes in intracellular Ca2+ concentration associated with a cyclopiazonic acid (CPA)-evoked current in porcine and bovine airway smooth muscle using patch-clamp and Ca2+-fluorescence techniques. In bovine tracheal myocytes, CPA induced an elevation of intracellular Ca2+ that was dependent on extracellular Ca2+ and was insensitive to nifedipine (an L-type voltage-gated Ca2+ channel inhibitor). Using patch-clamp techniques and conditions that block both K+ and Cl- currents, we found that CPA rapidly activated a membrane conductance (I(CPA)) in porcine and bovine tracheal myocytes that exhibits a linear current-voltage relationship with a reversal potential around 0 mV. Replacement of extracellular Na+ resulted in a marked reduction of I(CPA) at physiological membrane potentials (i.e., -60 mV) that was accompanied by a shift in the reversal potential for I(CPA) toward more negative membrane potentials. In addition, I(CPA) was markedly inhibited by 10 microM Gd3+ and La3+ but was largely insensitive to 1 microM nifedipine. We conclude that CPA induces capacitative Ca2+ entry in porcine and bovine tracheal smooth muscle via a Gd3+- and La3+-sensitive, nonselective cation conductance. 

1848937
Suppressive effect of delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol on herpes simplex virus infectivity in vitro. 
Delta-9-Tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) was found to reduce the infectivity of herpes simplex virus and was without effect against adenovirus type 2 or poliovirus. The effective THC concentration resulting in an 80% decrement in virus viability was dependent upon the presence or absence of serum in the incubation mixture, as a 5% serum concentration decreased the drug activity by approximately 50-fold. THC-mediated inactivation of herpes simplex virus was both time and dose dependent and did not result in virion disassembly or clumping. The THC-related effect was not influenced by the pH of the suspending medium, suggesting that the mechanism of inactivation differed from that associated with the thermal inactivation of the virus. Thus, the data suggest that THC preferentially reduces the infectivity of the enveloped herpes simplex virus, and that this activity is modulated by the presence of serum proteins. 

16445697
Identification of differentially expressed genes induced by angiotensin II in rat cardiac fibroblasts. 
1. Cardiac fibroblasts play an important regulatory role in cardiac remodelling by undergoing proliferation, differentiation and upregulating various gene products, including some cytokines and extracellular matrix (ECM) proteins. A highly potent mediator of cardiac remodelling is angiotensin (Ang) II. 2. In the present study, the suppression subtractive hybridization method was used to identify differentially expressed cDNAs in adult rat cardiac fibroblasts induced by AngII. 3. Following mRNA isolation of non-stimulated and AngII-stimulated cells, cDNAs of both populations were prepared and subtracted by suppression polymerase chain reaction. Sequencing of the partially enriched cDNAs identified 36 genes differentially expressed, including ECM proteins (pro-alpha(1) collagen type III, fibronectin), structural protein (spectrin), enzyme (GTP-specific succinyl-CoA synthetase), transcriptional regulators (glucocorticoid-induced leucine zipper, inhibitor of DNA binding 3) and proteins involved in cell division control (cdc2) or cell signalling (insulin-like growth factor binding protein-3, mutant p53-binding protein, grp75, CGI-121, protein phosphatase type 2A, tspan-2 and Sam68). 4. The diversity of genes identified in the present study further emphasises the central role of AngII in the regulation of cardiac remodelling. 

12686932
Mucocele of the glands of Blandin-Nuhn: clinical and histopathologic analysis of 26 cases. 
We investigated the clinical and histopathologic features of 26 cases of mucocele of the glands of Blandin-Nuhn. There was a female predominance, and most patients were younger than 20 years. Fifteen patients first visited a medical doctor and 9 visited a dentist before being referred to our department. The average duration from the time the lesion was first noticed to the patient's visit was 3.6 months. All lesions were located on the ventral surface of the tongue. In 17 patients, mucoceles were seen at the tip of the tongue, whereas 9 lesions occurred more posteriorly. Lesions were situated at the midline in 19 patients and laterally in 7 patients. All lesions presented as an exophytic mass, often with a polypoid appearance. All mucoceles were histopathologically of the extravasation type, suggesting that trauma may represent a frequent initiating factor. 

10627689
Double arthrodesis in the adult. 
Twenty-four double arthrodeses (24 patients) were evaluated at an average of 56 months postoperatively. Sixteen arthrodeses were performed for adult acquired flatfoot attributable to posterior tibial tendon insufficiency (16 patients), and results were compared with the results of eight patients undergoing arthrodesis for other diagnoses. The overall satisfaction rate was 83%, with 76% of patients having good and excellent results. Considerable improvements were observed in pain and function indices, with similar outcomes observed in the patients with and without acquired flatfoot. However, complications were more frequent in the patients who had flatfoot deformities. Clinical deformity was corrected reliably and radiographic parameters confirmed correction of deformity. Progression of arthrosis in the surrounding joints was common, but most patients were asymptomatic. Talonavicular nonunion was the most frequent complication, occurring in four patients. Three of the patients underwent revision arthrodesis. 

12713253
Physical growth and sexual maturation of boys in Chapaevsk, Russia. 
We characterized physical growth and sexual maturation in 2,579 boys, ages 10 through 16.99 years, residing in Chapaevsk, Russia in order to establish region-specific reference data. Age-specific norms were established for height, weight, and BMI, and compared to US reference data by z-score analysis, while mean heights and weights by age were compared to published national Russian data. Compared to US boys, height was slightly lower (overall z-score -0.18) at all ages except the oldest (16-16.99 yr), while weight and BMI were moderately lower (overall z-score -0.52 and -0.61, respectively). Chapaevsk boys were significantly taller (1.15 cm) and thinner (-1.28 kg) than the broader Russian sample. The median ages of stage 2 genitalia and pubic hair development were 11.9 and 12.7 years, respectively. In conclusion, Chapaevsk boys are thinner than both US and Russian boys, and have a later onset of puberty and attainment of sexual maturity than boys from other countries. 

16607503
[Histological findings for human tibial bone-tendon healing after hamstring transplantation. Investigation of tibial insertion after reconstruction of anterior cruciate ligaments with hamstring transplantation near joint fixation using bioresorbable interference screws] 
Ruptures of hamstring reconstructed anterior cruciate ligaments required additional surgery in five cases over a 4 year period. All transplants were primarily fixed with bioresorbable interference screws close to the joint. The average age was 31 years (range: 18-42), the average interval between primary surgery and rupture of the transplant was 13.2 months (range: 8-24) after an adequate re-trauma. After complete removal of the tibial insertion, a histological investigation was carried out. We stained the tissue-sections following the haematoxylin-eosin, Masson-Goldner and van Gieson protocols. All cases revealed direct healing with grow-over Sharpey-like fibers close to the joint, corresponding to a fibrous tendon insertion and far from the joint the formation of fibrous or cartilage callus. 

8852277
Ouabain amplifies contractile responses to phenylephrine in rat tail arteries in hypertension. 
Ouabain, a cardiac glycoside, binds to the alpha-subunits of Na+, K(+)-ATPase and inhibits Na+ pump activity. It has been proposed that endogenous ouabain, by inhibiting vascular Na+, K(+)-ATPase, can increase vascular resistance and thus may contribute to hypertension. One of the consequences of inhibition of the membrane Na+ pump is enhanced responsiveness of vascular smooth muscle to vasopressor substances. The purpose of the present study was to determine whether ouabain can enhance the responsiveness of the vasculature in hypertension. In the present study 100 microM ouabain enhanced the contractile response elicited by phenylephrine in isolated, perfused tail arteries from spontaneously hypertensive (SHR) and normotensive Wistar Kyoto (WKY) rats. The enhanced contractile response was more pronounced in the arteries of the SHR. We demonstrated that this concentration of ouabain inhibits the Na+ pump activity, measured as ouabain-sensitive 86Rb uptake, by about 65%, in isolated tail arteries. We conclude that ouabain can sensitize the vascular smooth muscle to the effects of vasopressor substances and this effect is more pronounced in genetically hypertensive rats. Endogenous ouabain may contribute to the pathophysiology of hypertension by enhancing vascular tone. 

7509371
An empirical study of Freud's penis-baby equation. 
One hypothesis of traditional psychoanalytic theory holds that a cardinal aspect of the "natural" development of femininity involves the woman's substitution of the wish for a baby in place of her original wish for a penis. The current study modified and extended earlier research examining the validity of Freud's this "penis-baby" theory. College-aged women and men were presented with either subliminal or supraliminal auditory messages concerned with either pregnancy or penetration themes. Subjects' written responses to Holtzman ink-blots, obtained both before and after exposure to an auditory message, were content-coded for phallic imagery and sexual imagery. Consistent with Freud's speculations about the phallic significance of pregnancy for women, female subjects who were exposed to the subliminal pregnancy message produced significantly more phallic imagery responses to ink-blots than did women in any of the other experimental conditions (p < .01). The phallic imagery production of males did not vary significantly as a function of message condition. Implications of these findings are discussed in the context of modern revisions to Freud's psychology of women and the current psychoanalytic conceptualization of penis envy as a highly condensed mental product with many layers of meaning. 

567072
[Effect of cesium, lithium and rubidium on several effects of morphine] 
The effect of chlorous salts of cesium, lithium, and rubidium on the analgetic action of morphine (according to the vocalization test) and also on the pattern of the dependence on it (according to the so-called "two-bottle test") was studied. As shown, the salts under investigation decreased both the algesic reaction threshold and the duration of morphine-induced analgesia; cesium chloride proved most active in this respect. All the compounds studied decrease the morphine preference coefficient. The greatest effect was found in cesium chloride which decreased the morphine preference coefficient 40-fold as compared to the control. 

9032658
A novel glutamate-mediated inhibitory mechanism linked with Ca2+/calmodulin-dependent protein kinase II in identified Euhadra neurons. 
The underlying mechanism(s) of the glutamate (Glu)-induced membrane hyperpolarizing response in identified Euhadra neurons was investigated using the voltage-clamp technique, pressure injection method, and pharmacologic agents. Under voltage-clamp conditions, bath-applied Glu elicits a slow outward potassium current (Glu current) accompanied by an increase in membrane conductance whose amplitude is dose dependent. Of the agonists tested, the Glu current was mimicked only by quisqualate (QA); its potency was approximately 10 times greater than that of Glu. Typical antagonists for the ionotropic type of Glu receptors and G protein inhibitors do not block this current. The Glu current is markedly enhanced by a specific inhibitor of Ca2+/ calmodulin-dependent protein kinase II (CaM-KII), KN-62 (1-[N,O-bis (1,5-isoquinolinesulfonyl)-N-methyl-L-tyrosyl]-4-phenylpiperazine) in a dose-dependent manner, while intracellularly injected CaM-KII suppresses the current. The potent protein kinase A inhibitors, H-8 (N-[2-(methylamino)ethyl]-5-isoquinolinesulfonamide dihydrochloride) and H-89 (N-[2-(p-bromocinnamylamino)ethyl]-5-isoquinolinesulfonamide) or the specific protein kinase C inhibitors staurosporine and K-252b had no effect on the Glu current. These results suggest the presence of a novel subtype of Glu receptor in Euhadra neurons, which may be coupled to the activation of potassium channels normally suppressed by CaM-KII. 

7848209
Vaccination for contraception. 
Vaccination for birth control has several advantages over currently available methods of family planning and should prove an attractive addition to the contraceptive armamentarium both in developing countries and in a developed country such as Australia. Concerns have been voiced by consumer health advocates that vaccines, like other long acting contraceptive methods, may be abused by health authorities in developing countries and by their use in vulnerable groups such as aborigines in our own country. These concerns need to be recognised and addressed. More difficult to accommodate are the anxieties expressed by feminist groups about the 'loss of control' and 'lack of body awareness' inherent in a method, such as a vaccine, that is relatively easily administered and has no overt side effects. There is no evidence that these concerns are shared by women in general. The antifertility vaccine that will most likely be applied first in family planning programmes is one directed against the pregnancy hormone hCG. A WHO vaccine directed against the C-terminal peptide of beta-hCG provokes a specific and safe immune response and will enter Phase 2 trials in Sweden this year. Subsequent developments with this vaccine will include the replacement of the current emulsion vehicle by a delivery system based on biodegradeable microspheres which will give a more sustained antigen release and duration of effectiveness. 

14520489
Wave intensity analysis from the common carotid artery: a new noninvasive index of cerebral vasomotor tone. 
Cerebral vasomotor tone is difficult to assess in patients. Wave intensity analysis has been applied to resolve complex upstream and downstream events within the vascular system. We hypothesized that the backward-traveling wave measured in the common carotid artery was caused by reflection from the cerebrovascular "beach", and that the magnitude of this reflected wave would be altered by changes in cerebral vasomotor tone. We measured common carotid arterial diameter and velocity of flow to calculate wave intensity in ten healthy male volunteers (age mean 31 +/- 3 years). Applying a rebreathing technique, we were able to increase the inspired carbon dioxide concentration to a mean of 5.9% +/- 1.7% and to compare baseline wave intensity readings to those recorded during hypercapnia. The magnitude of the reflected wave decreased significantly after CO(2) rebreathing, from -43.0 +/- 27.1 to -25.0 +/- 16.9 mmHg m s(-2), P = 0.02. This reduction in negative wave reflections in mid-systole during hypercapnia remained significant when it was analyzed as the reflection coefficient (the magnitude of the reflected wave normalized for the magnitude of the initiating forward wave, which fell from -2.8 +/- 1.5 to -1.6 +/- 1.4 ms (P = 0.01). Carotid wave reflection was significantly decreased during cerebral vasodilatation induced by increased arterial pCO(2). Wave intensity may provide a simple noninvasive means of assessing changes in cerebral vasomotor tone in vivo. 

11782257
The rhesus model of Lyme neuroborreliosis. 
Similarity of pathology and disease progression make the non-human primate (NHP) model of Lyme neuroborreliosis appropriate and valuable. In the NHP model of Lyme neuroborreliosis, spirochetal density in the nervous system and other tissues has been measured by polymerase chain reaction and correlated to anti-Borrelia burgdorferi antibody in the serum and cerebrospinal fluid and to inflammation in tissues. Despite the demonstrable presence of Borrelia burgdorferi, the causative agent of Lyme borreliosis, only minor inflammation of the central nervous system occurs, though inflammation can be demonstrated in other tissues. Infected animals also develop anti-Borrelia burgdorferi antibody in the serum, although increased amplitude of antibody is not predictive of higher levels of infection. The NHP model continues to provide important insight into the disease process in humans. 

8922085
Primary prevention in a high-risk group: smoking habits in adolescents with homozygous alpha-1-antitrypsin deficiency (ATD). 
The serious form of alpha-1-antitrypsin deficiency (ATD) Pi ZZ strongly predisposes the individual for pulmonary emphysema and premature death in adulthood, especially if exposed to tobacco smoking. General screening of all new-born children was conducted in Sweden during 1972-1974, the major purpose being to reduce exposure of the child to parental smoking while growing up and to prevent the child from starting to smoke. Sixty-one children with ATD neonatally identified through mass-screening, and their families, have been compared with a demographically matched control group regarding smoking habits, as studied through interviews and questionnaires on two occasions. When the children were 5-7 years old, the smoking rates among parents of the ATD children and especially among the ATD fathers exceeded smoking rates for controls. Thirteen years later no differences in parental smoking were found between the groups. At 18-20 years of age the ATD children reported smoking significantly less than the control children (p < 0.05). From the perspective of prevention, the goal of the neonatal screening to reduce the smoking rates among the parents of the ATD children was not attained, while it was achieved among the ATD children. The results indicate that a screening program with early detection of ATD effectively prevents adolescent children from starting to smoke. From ethical, medical and psychological points of view, a voluntary screening program for ATD in pre-adolescence is recommended. 

3902140
Hidradenitis suppurativa--a clinical review. 
A retrospective review of 72 patients suffering from hidradenitis suppurativa treated surgically in one plastic surgery unit has been carried out. Treatment of the axilla by excision and suture was found to result in a high rate (54%) of reoperation for recurrence at the same site when compared to the groups treated by either excision and split skin grafting (13%) or excision and local flap cover (19%). It is recommended that axillary hidradenitis suppurativa is best treated surgically by excision of the affected skin and split skin grafting of the resultant defect. 

7191908
Penile prosthesis: adjunct to treatment in patients with neurogenic bladder. 
During the last 4 years we have implanted penile prostheses in 33 patients with neurogenic bladders, primarily to manage bladder dysfunction but also to correct impotence in some cases. Although complications occurred in 6 patients urinary problems did not increase postoperatively. The 10 patients who wore condom catheters indicated that the penile prosthesis helped to keep the catheter in place and the 8 who used intermittent self-catheterization reported that the urethral meatus was more accessible with the insertion of the prosthesis. Of the 24 patients who were sexually active 19 experienced orgasm postoperatively. 

2032912
Priapism in a stallion with generalized malignant melanoma. 
A Thoroughbred stallion developed priapism that was unresponsive to medical treatment and lavage of the corpus cavernosum penis with heparinized 0.9% NaCl solution. Three weeks after onset of priapism, the penis was firm and noncompliant, and penile pain sensation and ability to retract the penis were lost. Ultrasonography confirmed thrombosis of the corpus cavernosum penis. The stallion was euthanatized because of poor prognosis for return to breeding soundness. Necropsy revealed enlargement of numerous lymph nodes. The dorsal penile nerves were demyelinated distal to the crura of the penis. A diagnosis of generalized malignant melanoma was made; however, neither metastasis to the vertebral canal nor compression of spinal nerve roots as they exited the vertebral foramen was found. Priapism is a persistent erection without sexual arousal and is initially unassociated with penile paralysis, but if prolonged, leads to irreversible venous occlusion where collecting veins join the cavernous spaces. Damage to the dorsal penile nerves may explain the long-term penile paralysis and loss of sensation that accompanied priapism in this stallion. Priapism unassociated with the use of phenothiazine-derivative tranquilizers is uncommon in horses. 

8754497
[Transient cerebral and bone marrow ischemia in patients with atrioseptal aneurysm] 
The relationship between atrioseptal aneurysm and ischemic stroke has not been clearly demonstrated. We present three patients with transient cerebrovascular events and one patient with transient medullar ischemia related with the presence of atrioseptal aneurysm. Other causes of cerebrovascular disease have been excluded. Following anticoagulation treatment all the patients remain asymptomatic. 

7699900
[Radiotherapy for myeloma] 
The quality of life, as well as the length of survival, in patients with myeloma has improved since the introduction of melphalan chemotherapy. Although myeloma is a radio-responsive disease, radiotherapy should be chosen for relapsed and refractory myeloma, because prolongation of overall survival is not improved. The aim of radiotherapy for solitary plasmacytomas is to mainly relieve pain, rather than the curative local therapy. On the other hand, total body irradiation has been used, as palliative therapy, for relapsed and refractory myeloma but treatment related toxicity is commonly. The hemibody irradiation and whole bone marrow irradiation developed to decrease radiation pneumonitis and hematologic toxicity. On the other hand, the results of radiotherapy in combination with chemotherapy shows no better survival than that of chemotherapy alone. Radiotherapy should be used for severe intractable bone pain and should be employed, using a limited field in lytic lesions. 

9800179
Fitness for duty evaluations in hazardous materials firefighters. 
We analyzed results from the medical examinations of 340 hazardous materials firefighters and applied various objective standards in simulated fitness for duty determinations. Ten percent had elevated blood pressures, 13% had far visual acuity worse than 20/30 in one or both eyes, and 38% had abnormal audiometry. The strictest standards for resting blood pressure and corrected visual acuity would have failed 2% and 1% of the cohort, respectively. For audiometry, 0%-5% of the cohort would have failed, depending on the hearing requirements set. The strictest hearing standard did not allow for corrective devices so that few failures would be reversible. Visual and audiometric testing and measurement of resting blood pressure all have significant clinical yields. Studies of simulated firefighting are needed to establish minimum hearing requirements and determine whether corrective devices can be worn safely during duty. 

12709582
Influence of heme and heme oxygenase-1 transfection of pulmonary microvascular endothelium on oxidant generation and cGMP. 
Heme is a co-factor required for the stimulation of soluble guanylate cyclase (sGC) by nitric oxide (NO) and carbon monoxide, and sGC activation by these agents is inhibited by superoxide. Because heme promotes oxidant generation, we examined the influence of rat pulmonary microvascular endothelial cells (PMECs) with a stable human heme oxygenase-1 (HO-1) transfection and heme on oxidant generation and cGMP. Culture of PMEC with low serum heme decreased cGMP and the detection of peroxide with 10 microM 2',7'-dichlorofluorescin diacetate and increased HO-1 further decreased cGMP without altering the peroxide detection under these conditions. Under conditions where heme (30 microM) has been shown to stimulate cGMP production in PMECsby mechanisms involving NO and CO, heme increased the detection of peroxide in a PMEC-dependent manner and HO-1 transfection did not markedly alter the effects heme on peroxide detection. The addition of 1 microM catalase markedly inhibited the effects of heme on peroxide detection whereas increasing (0.1 mM ebselen) or decreasing (depleting glutathione with 7 mM diethylmaleate) rates of intracellular peroxide metabolism or inhibiting the biosynthesis of oxidants (with 10 microM diphenyliodonium or 0.1 mM nitro-L-arginine) had only modest effects. The detection of superoxide by 10 microM dihydroethidium from PMECs was not increased by exposure to heme. These actions of oxidant probes suggest that intracellular oxidants have a minimal influence on the response to heme. Thus, exposure of PMECs to heme causes a complex response involving an extracellular generation of peroxide-derived oxidant species, which do not appear to originate from increases in intracellular superoxide or peroxide. This enables heme and HO to regulate sGC through mechanisms involving NO and CO, which are normally inhibited by superoxide. 

3123412
Ineffectiveness of hospital disinfectants against bacteria: a collaborative study. 
A collaborative study was undertaken to assess the degree of variability in disinfectant efficacy test results among laboratories that routinely perform the Association of Official Analytical Chemists (AOAC) Use-Dilution Method. Eighteen laboratories tested identical samples of six EPA-registered, hospital-grade disinfectants (three phenolics and three quaternaries) at the manufacturers' recommended use-dilution using only those modifications of the method approved by the AOAC Use-Dilution Task Force. Each laboratory processed 60 penicylinders for each of the 6 randomly selected disinfectants and 3 test organisms. The current EPA pass criterion for a disinfectant requires a test result of less than or equal to 1 positive penicylinder/60 replicates tested When compared with the 1 positive/60 replicate criterion, the test results of the 6 disinfectants were: 86 trials (80%) passed and 22 trials (20%) failed against Salmonella choleraesuis ATCC 10708; 71 (66%) passed and 37 (34%) failed against Staphylococcus aureus ATCC 6538; and 41 (38%) passed while 67 (62%) failed against Pseudomonas aeruginosa ATCC 15442. Four laboratories unknowingly tested their own product, and three of the four failed their product against one or more of the test organisms. These results show the inability to reproduce the manufacturers' bactericidal label claims for 6 disinfectants against the 3 AOAC test bacteria. In addition, extreme variability of test results among laboratories testing identical products questions the use of the AOAC Use-Dilution Method for enforcement action. 

3838744
Mechanisms of interaction between oxygen and granulocytes in hyperoxic lung injury. 
Hyperoxia and infused granulocytes act synergistically in producing a nonhydrostatic high-permeability lung edema in the isolated perfused rabbit lung within 4 h, which is substantially greater than that seen with hyperoxia alone. We hypothesized that the interaction between hyperoxia and granulocytes was principally due to a direct effect of hyperoxia on the lung itself. Isolated perfused rabbit lungs that were preexposed to 2 h of hyperoxia (95% O2-5% CO2) prior to the infusion of unstimulated granulocytes (under normoxic conditions) developed significant nonhydrostatic lung edema (P = 0.008) within 2 h when compared with lungs that were preexposed to normoxia (15% O2-5% CO2) prior to granulocyte perfusion. The edema in the hyperoxic-preexposed lungs was accompanied by significant increases in bronchoalveolar lavage (BAL) protein, BAL granulocytes, BAL thromboxane and prostacyclin levels, perfusate chemotactic activity, and lung lipid peroxidation. These findings suggest that the synergistic interaction between hyperoxia and granulocytes in producing acute lung injury involves a primary effect of hyperoxia on the lung itself. 

11434663
Inhibition of 5alpha-reductase enzyme or GABA(A) receptors in the VMH and the VTA attenuates progesterone-induced sexual behavior in rats and hamsters. 
Progesterone (P) to the ventromedial hypothalamus (VMH) and the ventral tegmental area (VTA) of ovariectomized (OVX), estradiol benzoate (EB)-primed rats and hamsters produces female sexual behavior similar to that seen in proestrous, receptive rodents. Because P's 5alpha-reduced metabolites can have facilitative effects on female sexual receptivity through actions at GABA(A)/benzodiazepine receptor complexes (GBRs), the role of 5alpha-reductase and GBRs in the VMH and the VTA was investigated. In Experiment 1, 5alpha-reductase immunoreactivity (5alpha-red-IR) and GBR immunoreactivity (GBR-IR) in the VMH and the VTA of OVX, EB (10 microg) and P (500 microg)-primed rats and hamsters was examined. More 5alpha-red-IR and GBR-IR was seen in the VMH and the VTA of receptive (EB and P-primed) compared to non-receptive (sesame oil vehicle) rodents. In Experiment 2, OVX, EB and P-primed rats and hamsters received implants of finasteride, a 5alpha-reductase inhibitor, or no implants to the VMH and the VTA and were tested for sexual receptivity with a male. Ovariectomized EB and P-primed rats and hamsters receiving finasteride to the VMH and the VTA had decreased lordosis compared to rodents receiving control implants to the VMH and the VTA. In Experiment 3, OVX, EB and P-primed rats and hamsters received infusions of picrotoxin, a GBR antagonist, or vehicle infusion to the VMH and the VTA and were tested for sexual receptivity with a male. Ovariectomized EB and P-primed rats and hamsters receiving picrotoxin to the VMH and the VTA had decreased lordosis compared to rodents receiving vehicle infusions to the VMH and the VTA. These data suggest that 5alpha-reductase and GBRs are present in the VMH and VTA, and that inhibiting 5alpha-reductase activity or blocking GBRs in the VMH and the VTA attenuates EB+P-primed sexual receptivity of OVX rats and hamsters. 

7497537
Vasculitis. 
The systemic vasculitides are a group of rare inflammatory conditions resulting in inflammation and necrosis of blood vessel walls. They are somewhat commoner than previously believed with an annual incidence approaching 40 per million. Furthermore the annual incidence of rheumatoid vasculitis is 12.5 per million and Wegener's granulomatosis is 8.5 per million. The first useful classification system for systemic vasculitis was published in 1952, since then a number of different schemes have been published. The major changes have been the recognition of the importance of dominant blood vessel size, the distinction between primary and secondary vasculitis and the incorporation of pathogenetic markers such as ANCA (see Table 6). Until relatively recently there were no widely agreed diagnostic or classification criteria. In 1990 the ACR published criteria for the diagnosis of polyarteritis nodosa, Churg-Strauss syndrome, Wegener's granulomatosis, hypersensitivity vasculitis, Henoch-Schonlein purpura, giant cell arteritis and Takayasu's arteritis. The criteria were provided in both traditional and tree format. Sensitivity and specificity rates varied considerably: 71.0-95.3% for sensitivity and 78.7-99.7% for specificity. The criteria were not tested against the general population or against patients with other connective tissue diseases or rheumatic conditions. In 1993/94 the Chapel Hill Consensus Conference developed and published definitions for the nomenclature of systemic vasculitis based on clinical features. These have not met with universal acceptance. However, they are a useful addition, since their use should result in different centres studying more homogeneous populations of patients and facilitate comparison of data between different centres. Assessment of vasculitis comprises an activity score (BVAS), damage index and quality of life/health status (SF-36). These are recent developments which are still undergoing validation. 

16092709
The NDNQI-Adapted Index of work satisfaction. 
The valid measurement of nurses' job satisfaction is critical because job satisfaction is important for the retention of qualified nurses to provide patient care in hospitals. Two studies were conducted to adapt the Stamps Index of Work Satisfaction (1997b) to measure work satisfaction at the patient care unit level for use by the National Database of Nursing Quality Indicators (NDNQI). In Study 1 (n = 918 RNs) exploratory factor analysis of data obtained using the NDNQI-Adapted Index replicated the conceptual dimensions of the Stamps measure. Associations with scores on Job Enjoyment were evidence that the Index measured the intended construct. Using theta, the reliability of the composite subscales was .91. The adapted Work Satisfaction subscale scores explained 46% of the variance in Job Enjoyment, with each subscale contributing uniquely (p < .001). In Study 2 (n = 2277 RNs) confirmatory factor analysis using structural equation modeling supported the 7-subscale structure for the Adapted Index (CFI [719] = .88; RMR = .05). Replication of associations between scores on the Index subscales and Job Enjoyment provided further evidence regarding validity of the data, since the Work Satisfaction subscales explained 56% of the variance in Job Enjoyment. The feasibility of using an on-line version of the Adapted-Index for data collection was demonstrated. The findings from the two studies indicate that the adapted Index of Work Satisfaction has a structure similar to the original instrument and is a reliable and valid measure of work satisfaction at the patient care unit level. 

4698217
Nucleotide pools and adenylate energy charge in balanced and unbalanced growth of Chromatium. 
Adenine nucleotide pools and their energy charge were measured during balanced and unbalanced growth of photoheterotrophic Chromatium cultures. The methods used involved rapid sampling, accurate to within 1 s, from isotopically labeled cultures followed by chromatographic separation of individual nucleotides. During balanced growth, both energy charge and adenosine triphosphate (ATP) concentrations, whether expressed as a function of cell protein or intracellular water, were slightly higher in limiting light intensities than in cultures growing at their maximal rate in bright light. The ATP found corresponded to 4.67 +/- 0.08 nmol/mg of protein or 1.34 +/- 0.57 mM for low-light cells and to 4.41 +/- 0.58 mmol/mg of protein or 0.85 +/- 0.12 mM for high-light cells. Corresponding energy charges were 0.85 +/- 0.02 and 0.81 +/- 0.02. Illumination shifts caused differential synthesis of photosynthetic pigments lasting 2 to 3 h without corresponding perturbation of adenine nucleotide levels. Cultures in intermittent illumination were severely affected by some cycle durations; they had abnormal morphology and very high bacteriochlorophyll-to-protein ratios. In such cultures, energy charge and nucleotide concentrations were within normal limits and relaxed to the dark steady state during the dark periods. Arsenate at AsO(4) (3-) to PO(4) (3-) ratios of 10:1 in the medium retarded growth, but no abnormality of charge or quantity of phosphate-containing nucleotides was found. These experiments therefore suggest that, within experimental error, neither the size nor the charge of the adenylate pools governs growth rate in Chromatium. Moreover, these parameters do not appear to be concerned in regulating the synthesis of photosynthetic apparatus in this organism. 

1420269
Phase behaviour and molecular species composition of oat root plasma membrane lipids. Influence of induced dehydration tolerance. 
Tolerance to dehydration induced by repeated water-deficit stress is well correlated to changes in the lipid composition of oat root cell plasma membranes. The molecular species of the two dominant phospholipids phosphatidylcholine and phosphatidylethanolamine were determined. The four major species were 16:0/18:2, 16:0/18:3, 18:2/18:2 and 18:2/18:3. In contrast to the large changes in plasma membrane lipid composition in other respects, induced tolerance resulted in very weak alterations concerning the phospholipid molecular species pattern. Only minor alterations, appearing as a decrease in the 18:3-containing lipids, occurred. Total lipids of microsomes and isolated plasma membranes of root cells were analysed by X-ray crystallography at different degrees of hydration. The lipid phase behaviour at different degrees of hydration was further confirmed by polarization microscopy. In the presence of excess water all membrane lipids adopted a reversed micellar configuration. The plasma membrane lipids from root cells with induced dehydration tolerance formed upon dehydration two coexisting lamellar structures. The importance of the phase behaviour at different degrees of hydration for the membrane properties and the relation to membrane composition is discussed. 

11287310
Lymphocyte DNA damage in bus manufacturing workers. 
To study the effect of occupational exposure, smoking, and drinking on lymphocyte DNA damage in bus manufacturing workers, 346 employees (106 women and 240 men) from six job categories (welders, mechanics, painters, and assembling, auxiliary and managerial workers) in a bus manufacturing factory in Guangzhou were included. Significant differences of tail moment among the six job categories were found (P=0.003) with adjustment for age and gender. Smoking increased tail moment significantly (3.14 (2.89-3.40) versus 2.79 microm (2.63-2.97), P=0.023). Analysis of covariance showed that occupational exposure (P=0.001) and smoking (P=0.019) had significant effect on tail moment after adjusting for all factors, whereas age and gender had no effect on DNA damage. Stratified analysis showed that painters (P=0.002), auxiliary workers (P=0.011), and mechanics (P=0.044) had larger tail moments than managerial workers after adjusting for age, gender, smoking, and drinking. 

2876339
Do we need informed consent? 
A British surgeon contends that the requirement of informed consent for randomized, controlled clinical trials of alternative therapies would result in a double standard, because physicians are free to conduct informal, unreliable comparisons of different treatments without such a requirement. He asserts that patients' rights are not seriously endangered in trials that are scrutinized by award-granting bodies and local ethics committees to ensure that their aims are to improve quality of care and to increase knowledge. Baum argues that, while informed consent promotes respect for patient autonomy and increases understanding of the illness and treatment, it is chiefly a legalistic device to shift unpleasant physician responsibilities onto the patient and will result in fewer patients entering clinical trials because of negative attitudes induced by uncertainty of treatment and diminished confidence in the physician. 

16911360
Gene and protein expression of protease-activated receptor 2 in structural and inflammatory cells in the nasal mucosa in seasonal allergic rhinitis. 
BACKGROUND: Protease-activated receptor 2 (PAR 2) has been shown to be responsible for trypsin and mast cell tryptase-induced airway inflammation. Here, the present study aimed to explore the expression of PAR 2 in the nasal mucosa of seasonal allergic rhinitis (SAR). METHODS: Study subjects were recruited for the study by medical history, physical examination and laboratory screening tests. Using immunohistochemistry, laser-assisted cell picking and subsequently real-time PCR, nasal mucosa biopsies of SAR patients were investigated for PAR 2 gene and protein expression in complex tissues of the nasal mucosa. RESULTS: Gene and protein expression of PAR 2 was firstly detected in nasal mucosa of SAR patients. The relative gene expression level of PAR 2 was significantly increased in complex tissues of the nasal mucosa of SAR (6.21+/-4.02 vs. controls: 1.38+/-0.86, P=0.004). Moreover, PAR 2 mRNA expression in epithelial cells (SAR: 4.78+/-4.64 vs. controls: 0.84+/-0.61, P=0.003) but not in mucus (SAR: 1.51+/-1.15 vs. controls: 1.35+/-1.02, P=0.78) and endothelial cells (SAR: 1.20+/-0.57 vs. controls: 1.73+/-1.30, P=0.5) was found to be significantly changed in the nasal mucosa in SAR. Using double immunohistochemistry the present study demonstrated that the total numbers of mast cells (P=0.0003) and eosinophils (P=0.03) and the numbers of eosinophils expressing PAR 2 (P=0.006) were significantly elevated in the nasal mucosa of SAR compared with the controls. CONCLUSION: The abundant presence and distribution of gene and protein expression of PAR 2 in different cell types in the nasal mucosa under normal situation, the increased expression of PAR 2 in epithelial cells and the increased number of eosinophils with PAR 2 suggest that PAR 2 may contribute to the pathogenesis of allergic diseases such as SAR. 

8542069
The critical period for repair of CNS of neonatal opossum (Monodelphis domestica) in culture: correlation with development of glial cells, myelin and growth-inhibitory molecules. 
A comparison was made of neurite growth across spinal cord lesions in the isolated central nervous system (CNS) of newborn opossums (Monodelphis domestica) at various stages of development. The aim was to define the critical period at which growth after injury ceases to occur, with emphasis on growth-inhibitory proteins, myelin and glial cells. In postnatal opossums 3-6 days old (P3-6), repair was observed 5 days after lesions were made in culture at the cervical level (C7) by crushing with forceps. Through-conduction of action potentials was re-established and axons stained by Dil grew into and beyond the crush. In a series of 66 animals 29 showed repair. In 28 animals at P11-12 with comparable lesions repair was observed in five preparations. At P13-14, the CNS was still viable in culture, but none of the 25 preparations examined showed any axonal growth into the crush or conduction through it. The rostro-caudal gradient of development permitted lesions to be made in mature cervical and immature lumbar regions of P11-12 spinal cord. Growth across crushes occurred in lumbar but not in cervical segments of the same preparation. The development of glial cells and myelin was assessed by electron microscopy and by staining with specific antibodies (Rip-1 and myelin-associated glycoprotein) in cervical segments of neonatal P6-14 opossums. At P8, oligodendrocytes and thin myelin sheaths started to appear followed at P9 by astrocytes stained with antibody against glial fibrillary acidic protein. By P14, astrocytes, oligodendrocytes and well-developed myelin sheaths were abundant. The cervical crush sites of P12 cords contained occasional astrocytes but no oligodendrocytes. Specific antibodies (IN-1) to neurite growth-inhibiting proteins (NI-35/250) associated with oligodendrocytes and myelin in the rat CNS cross-reacted with opossum proteins. Assays using the spreading of 3T3 fibroblasts and IN-1 showed that by P7 inhibitory proteins became apparent, particularly in the hindbrain and cervical spinal cord. The concentrations of NI-35/250 thereafter increased and became abundant in the adult opossum. Our finding of a well-defined critical period, encompassing only 5 days, in CNS preparations that can be maintained in culture offers advantages for analysing mechanisms that promote or prevent CNS repair. 

6740571
Fibronectin and coagulation factor XIII increases blood platelet adhesion to fibrin. 
Fibronectin is covalently linked to fibrin during clot formation by coagulation factor XIII and has been suggested as a possible mediator of platelet adhesion to collagen. Fixed human platelets were found to adhere to fibrin. This adhesion was significantly increased when fibronectin was incorporated into the fibrin network, and was supported by factor XIII. 

17165417
Perceived verbal aggressiveness of coaches in volleyball and basketball: a preliminary study. 
This study examined verbal aggressiveness of coaches as perceived by their athletes, 108 senior athletes (57 boys and 51 girls) ages 15-19 years. Participants were basketball players (56 athletes) and volleyball players (52 athletes) who completed questionnaires. The scale of verbal aggressiveness showed high internal consistency. A two-way analysis of variance, conducted using sex and sport as independent variables to examine interactions, yielded significant differences between adolescent volleyball and basketball athletes. Volleyball athletes had lower scores on the Verbal Aggressiveness Scale than basketball players. Research with larger samples and other sports is recommended. 

1719179
Identification of germ tube cell wall antigens of Candida albicans. 
The reactivity of affinity-purified antibody to two components of germ tube cell wall extracts of Candida albicans showed that the components shared a common determinant(s). Surface expression of at least one of these determinants was demonstrated by indirect immunofluorescence where antibody binding was observed only on the hyphal extension of the organism. 

10982052
Isolated heterotopic pancreas causing intussusception. 
Pediatric intussusception is usually idiopathic in origin, and a pathological lesion at the leadpoint is identified in only a small proportion of cases. Meckel's diverticulum is the most common location when such a lesion is found. Heterotopic pancreas has been seen most frequently in the stomach or duodenum; however, ileal lesions are rare. In the ileum, heterotopic pancreas is usually associated with Meckel's diverticulum and may cause intestinal obstruction by intussusception. However, isolated heterotopic pancreas in the ileum is distinctly rare and usually discovered incidentally during surgery for other conditions. In a review of English language literature, there were only a few pediatric cases of isolated ileal heterotopic pancreas causing intussusception. We report three additional pediatric cases and discuss the clinical significance of this unexpected rare entity. 

8661345
Paradoxical increase in peroxisomal cyanide-insensitive respiration following dietary exposure to WY-14,643 in the perfused liver. 
WY-14,643, a lipid-lowering drug, increases basal rates of oxygen uptake in perfused livers. Because peroxisomes consume oxygen for H2O2 production and are induced by WY-14,643 treatment, it is possible that peroxisomal beta-oxidation can account for some of this increase in cellular respiration. Therefore, cyanide, an inhibitor of mitochondrial cytochrome oxidase, was infused into livers of WY-14,643-fed rats (0.1% WY-14,643 in laboratory rat chow for 1, 21, and 105 days) to assess peroxisomal cyanide-insensitive respiration. As expected, the addition of cyanide abolished oxygen uptake nearly completely; however, after approximately 20 min oxygen consumption unexpectedly returned to basal levels in 105-day WY-14,643-treated animals but not in untreated controls. Urea synthesis, a process dependent upon ATP, was decreased and remained low during cyanide infusion in livers from both groups, indicating that mitochondria were not responsible for this unusual increase in oxygen uptake in the presence of cyanide. Methanol metabolism, which requires oxygen to form H2O2, was decreased from 37 +/- 5 to 6 +/- 1 micromol/g/hr in all groups treated with cyanide; however, it was increased significantly about 20 min later to 25 micromol/g/hr in livers from WY-14,643-treated rats, indicating that oxygen for peroxisomal H2O2 production is involved in cellular respiration in the presence of cyanide. Fasting abolished the recovery of both oxygen uptake and methanol metabolism in WY-14,643-fed rats, suggesting that ATP for acyl CoA synthetase, an enzyme which metabolizes fatty acids to acyl CoA compounds, is provided by glycolysis. Indeed, oleate significantly increased methanol metabolism in fed control rats from 8 +/- 4 to 26 +/- 3 micromol/g/hr in the presence of cyanide, indicating that fatty acid supply is necessary for peroxisomal respiration. Taken together, these experiments demonstrate that when mitochondrial respiration is inhibited, livers from rats fed WY-14,643 chronically have the unique ability of metabolizing fatty acids through the peroxisome using glycolytic ATP. 

9477331
Coordinated expression of Hoxa-11 and Hoxa-13 during limb muscle patterning. 
The limb muscle precursor cells migrate from the somites and congregate into the dorsal and ventral muscle masses in the limb bud. Complex muscle patterns are formed by successive splitting of the muscle masses and subsequent growth and differentiation in a region-specific manner. Hox genes, known as key regulator genes of cartilage pattern formation in the limb bud, were found to be expressed in the limb muscle precursor cells. We found that HOXA-11 protein was expressed in the premyoblasts in the limb bud, but not in the somitic cells or migrating premyogenic cells in the trunk at stage 18. By stage 24, HOXA-11 expression began to decrease from the posterior halves of the muscle masses. HOXA-13 was expressed strongly in the myoblasts of the posterior part in the dorsal/ventral muscle masses and weakly in a few myoblasts of the anterior part of the dorsal muscle mass. Transplantation of the lateral plate of the presumptive wing bud to the flank induced migration of premyoblasts from somites to the graft. Under these conditions, HOXA-11 expression was induced in the migrating premyoblasts in the ectopic limb buds. Application of retinoic acid at the anterior margin of the limb bud causes duplication of the autopodal cartilage and transformation of the radius to the ulna, and at the same time induces duplication of the muscle pattern along the anteroposterior axis. Under these conditions, HOXA-13 was also induced in the anterior region of the ventral muscles in the zeugopod. These results suggest that Hoxa-11 and Hoxa-13 expression in the migrating premyoblasts is under the control of the limb mesenchyme and the polarizing signal(s). In addition, these results indicate that these Hox genes are involved in muscle patterning in the limb buds. 

14726277
Effects of heating procedures on deoxynivalenol, nivalenol and zearalenone levels in naturally contaminated barley and wheat. 
The influence of heating temperature and time on deoxynivalenol (DON), nivalenol (NIV) and zearalenone (ZEA) contents in naturally co-contaminated barley and wheat was investigated intending to establish the basis for a decontamination model of Fusarium mycotoxins in cereals. The standard toxins and whole barley powder samples were heated in a convection oven at 140, 160, 180, 200, or 220 degrees C, and kernel subsamples (200 g each) were roasted in an experimental rotary gas-fired roaster at 150, 180 or 220 degrees C. All treatments resulted in a time-temperature-dependent decomposition of the toxins; the logarithm of the toxin remaining % presented a linear relationship with heating time. The lines equations were used to estimate the half (H) and decimal (D) decomposition times (time required to destroy 50 or 90% of the toxin, respectively). DON and NIV H and D decomposition times were similar and 50% shorter for heated standards than for whole barley powder. ZEA standard values were considerably longer, while whole barley powder values were comparable with those of DON and NIV. At 220 degrees C, D decomposition times of DON, NIV and ZEA heated standards were 11, 10 and 85 min, respectively, while the values obtained in whole barley powder were the same for the three toxins (25 min). The determination of H and D decomposition values constitutes a basis to understand the heating stability nature of each toxin. 

15315245
Upper-limb injections of botulinum toxin-A in children with cerebral palsy: a critical review of the literature and clinical implications for occupational therapists. 
This paper provides a review of the research literature that reports on the effectiveness of botulinum toxin-A (BtA) to reduce tone and improve functional use of the upper limbs of children who have cerebral palsy. Evaluation of the findings suggest that injections of BtA have demonstrated promising short-term results by reducing tone and increasing active range of motion in some children. Positive changes in function were also reported, however, only four studies used valid functional outcome measures. Children appropriate for BtA injections may be those with moderate tone, adequate grip strength, some distal voluntary control, intact sensation, and motivation to participate in postinjection training. Future research examining functional outcomes and the effect of repeated injections is needed. Active involvement of occupational therapists in the development and investigation of the most appropriate postinjection upper-limb training may help ensure optimal outcomes for children with cerebral palsy. 

16234005
Capsule endoscopy versus enteroclysis in the detection of small-bowel involvement in Crohn's disease: a prospective trial. 
BACKGROUND & AIMS: The aim of this study was to prospectively compare the diagnostic yield of wireless capsule endoscopy (WCE) and enteroclysis in evaluating the extent of small-bowel involvement in Crohn's disease (CD). METHODS: Thirty-one patients (20 men; mean age, 43 y) with endoscopically and histologically proven CD underwent enteroclysis as their initial examination, followed by WCE. The radiologist who performed the small-bowel enema was blinded to the results of standard index endoscopy, which included retrograde ileoscopy. Gastroenterologists were blinded to the results of enteroclysis at the time of interpretation of the WCE video. RESULTS: Abnormal findings were documented in 8 of 31 patients by using enteroclysis and in 22 of 31 patients by using WCE (25.8% vs. 71%, P < .001). In 16 patients with known involvement of the terminal ileum, the diagnostic yield of WCE vs enteroclysis was significantly superior (89% vs 37%, P < .001). In 15 patients without lesions in the terminal ileum, abnormal findings in the proximal small bowel were detected in 7 (46%) patients by WCE and only in 2 (13%) patients by enteroclysis (P < .001). The capsule detected all but 2 lesions diagnosed by enteroclysis. WCE detected additional lesions that were not detected by enteroclysis in 45% of cases. CONCLUSIONS: WCE is superior to enteroclysis in estimating the presence and extent of small-bowel CD. WCE may be a new gold standard for diagnosing ileal involvement in patients with CD without strictures and fistulae. 

10564621
Exposure to brand-specific cigarette advertising in magazines and its impact on youth smoking. 
BACKGROUND: Despite the potential influence of cigarette advertising on youth smoking, few studies have characterized brand-specific magazine advertising exposure among youths or examined its impact on youth smoking behavior. METHODS: A longitudinal youth survey was conducted to assess baseline exposure to brand-specific cigarette advertising in magazines and to measure subsequent smoking behavior. The sample comprised 1,069 Massachusetts youths, ages 12-15 years at baseline in 1993, and 627 of these youths who were interviewed after 4 years. RESULTS: Five brands accounted for 81.8% of the gross impressions for magazine advertising among Massachusetts youths. These same brands accounted for 88.4% of the brand market share among 12- to 15-year-old smokers nationally in 1993. The levels of brand-specific advertising exposure in the sample were highly correlated with these national brand market shares (r = 0.96, P = 0. 0002). Among the cohort, baseline brand-specific exposure to cigarette advertising in magazines was highly correlated with brand of initiation among new smokers (r = 0.93, P = 0.0001), brand smoked by current smokers (r = 0.86, P = 0.0004), and brand whose advertisements attracted attention the most (r = 0.87, P = 0.0002). CONCLUSION: By documenting a relationship between brand-specific magazine advertising exposure and brand of smoking initiation among new smokers, this study provides strong new evidence that cigarette advertising influences youth smoking. 

3526330
yes-related protooncogene, syn, belongs to the protein-tyrosine kinase family. 
An src/yes-related novel gene named syn (SYN in human gene nomenclature) has been identified in the human genome on chromosome 6 and characterized by molecular cloning. Nucleotide sequence analysis of cDNA clones showed that the c-syn gene could encode a protein-tyrosine kinase that is very similar in primary structure to the v-yes and human c-src proteins. A 2.8-kilobase transcript of the c-syn gene, which differs in size from those of the c-yes, c-src, and c-fgr genes, was observed in various cell types. These results show that syn is a new member of the tyrosine kinase oncogene family. 

17392156
Therapeutic targeting of CC ligand 21 or CC chemokine receptor 7 abrogates pulmonary fibrosis induced by the adoptive transfer of human pulmonary fibroblasts to immunodeficient mice. 
Idiopathic interstitial pneumonias (IIPs) are a collection of pulmonary fibrotic diseases of unknown etiopathogenesis. CC chemokine receptor 7 (CCR7) is expressed in IIP biopsies and primary fibroblast lines, but its role in pulmonary fibrosis was not previously examined. To study the in vivo role of CCR7 in a novel model of pulmonary fibrosis, 1.0 x 10(6) primary fibroblasts grown from idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis/usual interstitial pneumonia, nonspecific interstitial pneumonia, or histologically normal biopsies were injected intravenously into C.B-17 severe combined immunodeficiency (SCID)/beige (bg) mice. At days 35 and 63 after idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis/usual interstitial pneumonia fibroblast injection, patchy interstitial fibrosis and increased hydroxyproline were present in the lungs of immunodeficient mice. Adoptively transferred nonspecific interstitial pneumonia fibroblasts caused a more diffuse interstitial fibrosis and increased hydroxyproline levels at both times, but injected normal human fibroblasts did not induce interstitial remodeling changes in C.B-17SCID/bg mice. Systemic therapeutic immunoneutralization of either human CCR7 or CC ligand 21, its ligand, significantly attenuated the pulmonary fibrosis in groups of C.B-17SCID/bg mice that received either type of IIP fibroblasts. Thus, the present study demonstrates that pulmonary fibrosis is initiated by the intravenous introduction of primary human fibroblast lines into immunodeficient mice, and this fibrotic response is dependent on the interaction between CC ligand 21 and CCR7. 

6633659
Severe plasmalogen deficiency in tissues of infants without peroxisomes (Zellweger syndrome). 
The Zellweger syndrome is a lethal hereditary disease characterized by the absence of peroxisomes (microbodies) in liver and kidney, and variable abnormalities in mitochondria. We show here that tissues from five infants that had died of this syndrome contain less than 10% of the normal levels of phosphatidylethanolamine plasmalogen (pPE), a major phospholipid component of cellular membranes. Heart and muscle, but not other tissues, also contain a substantial fraction of phosphatidylcholine plasmalogen (pPC), and this fraction is also strongly reduced in the Zellweger patients. No other abnormalities in cellular phospholipids were detected. Key enzymes of the biosynthesis of plasmalogens have previously been shown to be exclusively located in the peroxisomes of rodent liver and the microperoxisomes of rodent brain. We infer that the corresponding enzymes are also located in peroxisomes in man and that the absence of peroxisomes in Zellweger patients leads to their inability to synthesize plasmalogens. Our results support the notion that the biosynthetic role of peroxisomes in mammals has thus far been underestimated. We suggest that the defect in plasmalogen synthesis and possibly as yet unknown peroxisomal reactions are responsible for the diverse abnormalities observed in Zellweger patients. 

17699785
Localized hyperthermia combined with intratumoral dendritic cells induces systemic antitumor immunity. 
Prostate adenocarcinoma, treated with localized tumor hyperthermia (LTH), can potentially serve as a source of tumor antigen, where dying apoptotic/necrotic cells release tumor peptides slowly over time. In addition, LTH-treated cells can release heat shock proteins that can chaperone antigenic peptides to antigen-presenting cells, such as dendritic cells. We attempted to discern whether sequential LTH and intratumoral dendritic cell and/or systemic granulocyte macrophage colony-stimulating factor (GM-CSF) would activate antitumor immune response in a syngeneic murine model of prostate cancer (RM-1). Palpable RM-1 tumors, grown in the distal appendage of C57BL/6 male mice, were subjected to LTH (43.7 degrees C for 1 h) x 2, separated by 5 days. Following the second LTH treatment, animals received either PBS or dendritic cells (2 x 10(6)) intratumorally (every 3 days for three injections). Separate cohorts also received i.v. injection of recombinant adenovirus-expressing murine GM-CSF (AdGMCSF), 1 day after LTH. Control animals received AdenoLacZ or AdenoGFP. Intratumoral dendritic cell injection induced tumor-specific T-helper cell activity (IFNgamma ELISPOTS) and CTL activity, which was further augmented by AdGMCSF, indicating amplification of tumor-specific TH1 immunity. The combination of LTH, AdGMCSF, and intratumoral dendritic cell injection resulted in significant tumor growth delays when compared with animal cohorts that received LTH alone. These results support an in situ autovaccination strategy where systemic administration of GM-CSF and/or intratumoral injection of autologous dendritic cells, when combined with LTH, could be an effective treatment for local and systemic recurrence of prostate cancer. 

8846869
Study of tumour ploidy in early stages of buccal mucosa cancer. 
The purpose of this study was to determine whether a tumour's DNA content is a prognostic factor in screening out the biologically aggressive varieties of early buccal mucosa cancer. Seventy-eight cases of early squamous cell carcinoma of the buccal mucosa were studied, including 73 with aneuploid and diploid tumours. T1 and T2 tumours, pathological differentiation, vascular and perineural invasion, and the recurrence and disease-free survival rate in relation to aneuploid and diploid content were ascertained. The recurrence rate in aneuploid tumours is 72%, whereas in diploid tumours it is 6% (P<0.001). A Cox regression analysis demonstrated that tumour ploidy was a prognostic factor in disease-free survival, independent of other clinico-pathological characteristics examined. Aneuploidy is the most accurate predictor of biological aggressiveness of cancer of the buccal mucose. Aneuploid early buccal mucosa cancers should be treated by multimodal therapy to achieve a cure. 

11868132
Videoendoscopic Assessment of Uncommon Sites of Upper Airway Obstruction during Sleep. 
Patients with sleep-disordered breathing (SDB) suffer from repetitive upper airway occlusion. Various techniques have been described to assess the site of upper airway collapse. In most cases the soft palate or the base of tongue, or both, are the major levels of obstruction; rarely, the larynx, including the epiglottis, are found to be involved. We present five cases in which sleep videoendoscopy finally revealed the true mechanism of the inspiratory airway behavior. Two patients were sent to our service because of inefficacy of nasal ventilation therapy. One had a floppy epiglottis that was being sucked into the glottis. The other had a normal larynx during videoendoscopy. Instead, common pharyngeal collapse could be detected. Increasing the pressure normalized sleep, breathing, and videoendoscopy. The third patient showed apneas due to the adduction of the lateral parts of his omega-shaped epiglottis. In another case, inspiratory fluttering of the vocal cords caused snoring and arousals. The last case came in for bilateral vocal cord palsy with heavy nocturnal desaturations suggesting airway closure. Yet, the pharynx and larynx remained open throughout the night. Sleep videoendoscopy is a convenient method to define the level and mechanism of occlusion in obstructive SDB, particularly if the larynx is involved. It is useful to rule out airway compromise in case of recurrent nocturnal hypoxemias. Thus the results of sleep videoendoscopy have a strong therapeutical impact. 

2494247
Ascorbic acid, HDL cholesterol, and apolipoprotein A-I in an elderly Chinese population in Boston. 
The relationships between plasma HDL cholesterol, apolipoprotein A-I, and plasma ascorbic acid were examined in 146 women and 92 men in a Chinese population in Boston, aged 60 and above. A significant partial correlation (r = 0.21, p = 0.015) between plasma ascorbic acid and plasma HDL cholesterol was observed among (predominantly nonsmoking) females after the effects of potentially confounding variables were taken into account. A similar relationship among 26 nonsmoking men was suggestive but inconclusive; there was no evidence of a relationship among 66 male smokers. The partial correlation between plasma apolipoprotein A-I and plasma ascorbic acid was marginally significant for women (r = 0.22, p = 0.057, n = 87) but was highly significant for men (r = 0.43, p = 0.007, n = 51). The correlation coefficient for men was highly dependent on smoking status, being 0.80 for those who never smoked and almost zero for current smokers. 

1814247
Peripheral beta-endorphin and pain modulation. 
Beta-endorphin is a peptide with morphine-like effects produced primarily in the anterior lobe of the pituitary gland. After its cleavage from the parent molecule, proopiomelanocortin, beta-endorphin is circulated via the blood stream to interact with specific opioid receptors located throughout the body. The peptide produces analgesia by inhibiting the firing of peripheral somatosensory fibers. It also affects other senses, such as vision, hearing, and smell. Whereas the ability to increase beta-endorphin secretion during times of surgical stress is positively correlated with amelioration of pain, the administration of exogenous opioids, such as fentanyl, reduces plasma beta-endorphin. Decreased beta-endorphin concentrations may play a role in trigeminal neuralgia, migraine headache, and rheumatoid arthritis. 

12814679
Safety and tolerability of the dual 5alpha-reductase inhibitor dutasteride in the treatment of benign prostatic hyperplasia. 
OBJECTIVE: The objective of this paper is to examine safety and tolerability data from a number of recently completed clinical trials with the novel, dual 5alpha-reductase inhibitor, dutasteride. METHODS: Intent-to-treat analyses were conducted on data for dutasteride 0.5 mg/day for drug-related adverse events, clinical laboratory test results, and prostate-specific antigen (PSA) levels derived from four large, randomised, double-blind clinical trials (n=5655). Further data were derived from a randomised, double-blind combination study of dutasteride 0.5 mg/day and tamsulosin 0.4 mg/day (n=327), and several safety studies conducted in healthy volunteers. RESULTS: Data from two-year blinded clinical studies demonstrate that dutasteride is well tolerated, with a profile comparable with that of placebo. The exception is a modestly elevated incidence of impotence, decreased libido, ejaculation disorders, and gynaecomastia. Clinical laboratory test abnormalities were reported by <1% of patients treated with dutasteride, and abnormal values occurred with similar frequency versus placebo-treated patients. In a healthy volunteer study, when dutasteride was administered daily for 1 year, it did not significantly affect bone metabolism markers, bone mineral density or lipid profiles. Dutasteride reduced total serum PSA concentrations by approximately 50% following 6, 12, and 24 months of treatment but had no effect on free-to-total PSA levels. The safety profile of dutasteride did not differ from that of finasteride in a large, parallel-group, comparator trial. Additionally, when dutasteride was used in combination with an alpha(1)-blocker, the drug-related adverse event profiles were as would be expected for the individual agents. CONCLUSIONS: Considered together, these data demonstrate dutasteride to be well-tolerated. 

15928540
Sternal split approach to the cervicothoracic junction in children. 
STUDY DESIGN: We present a descriptive case series outlining the surgical technique and outcome in six patients managed with a combined anterior neck and sternal splitting approach. OBJECTIVES: To describe a surgical approach used in the management of severe cervicothoracic kyphosis and/or scoliosis in pediatric patients. SUMMARY OF BACKGROUND DATA: There are few reports in the literature that address the problem of accessing multileveled spinal deformities around the cervicothoracic junction requiring stabilization in the pediatric population. METHODS: A detailed chart and radiographic review was completed of six consecutive patients managed at our center with a combined anterior neck and sternal splitting approach. The indications, surgical technique, and outcome are reviewed for each case. This technique was employed in 6 pediatric patients, aged 3-15 years, at the authors' institution. Diagnoses included Klippel-Feil Syndrome (2 patients), Proteus Syndrome, Larsen Syndrome, and neurofibromatosis type I (2 patients). All patients had severe cervicothoracic kyphosis requiring surgical instrumentation. This technique allowed surgical access from C5-T6. RESULTS: This approach was invaluable in gaining access to the cervicothoracic junction to address complex spinal deformities in pediatric patients. In one patient, a separate thoracotomy was performed to access the lower thoracic spine. The only significant complication related to the approach was recurrent laryngeal nerve palsy experienced by one patient. This approach allowed stabilization of severe scoliotic and/or kyphotic deformities to impede curve progression. CONCLUSIONS: This approach was invaluable in gaining multileveled access to the cervicothoracic junction to address complex spinal deformities in pediatric patients. 

12430836
Thinking of critical words during study is unnecessary for false memory in the Deese, Roediger, and McDermott procedure. 
Do participants in the Deese, Roediger, and McDermott (DRM) procedure demonstrate false memory because they think of nonpresented critical words during study and confuse them with words that were actually presented? In two experiments, 160 participants studied eight visually presented DRM lists at a rate of 2 s or 5 s per word. Half of the participants rehearsed silently: the other half rehearsed overtly. Following study, the participants' memory for the lists was tested by recall or recognition. Typical false memory results were obtained for both memory measures. More important, two new results were observed. First, a large majority of the overt-rehearsal participants spontaneously rehearsed approximately half of the critical words during study. Second, critical-word rehearsal at study enhanced subsequent false recall, but it had no effect on false recognition or remember judgments for falsely recognized critical words. Thinking of critical words during study was unnecessary for producing false memory. 

8406945
Development and utilization of a new simple assay for DNA-protein crosslinks as a biomarker of exposure to welding fumes. 
A new method for DNA-protein crosslinks involving selective precipitation of DNA containing crosslinked proteins by K+ sodium dodecyl sulfate was utilized in the peripheral white blood cells of 21 male metal arc welders and in 26 male controls of similar age and racial characteristics who were not exposed to welding fumes. DNA was quantitated by Hoescht fluorescence. Although the concentration of nickel and chromium in the peripheral blood was low and did not differ between subjects in the two groups, one-fourth of the welders had levels of DNA-protein crosslinks that were above the upper limit of the controls. Mean crosslink values were 1.85% (+/- 1.14) among the welders and 1.17% (+/- 0.46) among the controls, a 58%, statistically significant difference (P = 0.01). Thus, many welders appeared to be burdened with an excess of DNA-protein crosslinks suggesting exposure to crosslinking agents and, possibly, a detectable biologic effect of potential genotoxic consequences. 

2240137
Cholesterol localization in ultrathin frozen sections in Schnyder's corneal crystalline dystrophy. 
We examined a 57-year-old woman who had bilateral corneal crystalline deposits associated with xanthelasma. The patient's son had bilateral stromal haze. Plasma cholesterol and apolipoprotein A-I and B levels were normal. Histopathologic examination disclosed lipid deposits, particularly in the superficial stroma and Bowman's layer. These deposits stained with oil red O and filipin, a fluorescent probe that specifically detects unesterified cholesterol. Cryoultramicrotomy disclosed more specific ultrastructural localization of unesterified cholesterol with an array of crystals resembling multiple plates in extracellular corneal tissue. 

1529535
Mutational analysis of the tobacco etch potyviral 35-kDa proteinase: identification of essential residues and requirements for autoproteolysis. 
The tobacco etch potyvirus (TEV) polyprotein is processed by three virus-encoded proteinases, termed Nla, HC-Pro, and the 35-kDa proteinase. The 35-kDa proteinase is derived from the amino-terminal region of the polyprotein. Analysis of polyproteins containing beta-glucuronidase fused to the expected carboxy terminus of the 35-kDa proteinase confirmed the previously identified Tyr304-Ser305 dipeptide as the cleavage site between the 35-kDa proteinase and HC-Pro. The 35-kDa proteinase of TEV was unable to catalyze proteolysis when synthetic substrate polyproteins were supplied in a bimolecular or trans reaction, suggesting that processing occurs by an autolytic mechanism. The results of a mutational analysis within the 35-kDa proteolytic domain indicated that His214, Asp223, Ser256, and Asp288 were required for optimal autoproteolytic activity. Replacement of Ser256 with either Thr or Cys resulted in low but detectable proteinase activity, as did substitution of Asp223 and Asp288 with Glu. These results are consistent with the hypothesis that the 35-kDa proteinase resembles cellular serine-type proteinases, with Ser256 functioning as the nucleophilic residue within the active site. Cleavage mediated by the 35-kDa proteinase has been shown previously to occur after polyprotein synthesis in wheat germ extracts and transgenic plants, but not in rabbit reticulocyte lysate. We were able to demonstrate that processing in vitro may require a heat-labile factor present in wheat germ extracts. 

9061515
Altered patterns of subchondral bone mineralization in Kienbock's disease. 
The pattern of subchondral bone density, which is supposed to reflect the long-term distribution of stress, was investigated in both wrist joints of nine healthy young subjects and seven patients suffering from Kienbock's disease by means of CT osteoabsorptiometry. Two density maxima were found on the distal articular surface of the radius in the healthy subjects, corresponding to the position of the scaphoid and the lunate. Our relative quantitative results showed three different physiological types of stress indicated by the predominantly monocentric density maxima either on the scaphoid or the lunate surface of the radius and the symmetrical distribution of the mineralization. In Kienbock's disease no type of mineralization predominated. In the progressive stages the lunate density maximum was absent. The overall mineralization was generally less than in controls. Changes in the pattern of mineralization were also found on the contralateral side. 

17575033
Identification and cardiotropic actions of sulfakinin peptides in the American lobster Homarus americanus. 
In arthropods, a group of peptides possessing a -Y((SO3H))GHM/LRFamide carboxy-terminal motif have been collectively termed the sulfakinins. Sulfakinin isoforms have been identified from numerous insect species. In contrast, members of this peptide family have thus far been isolated from just two crustaceans, the penaeid shrimp Penaeus monodon and Litopenaeus vannamei. Here, we report the identification of a cDNA encoding prepro-sulfakinin from the American lobster Homarus americanus. Two sulfakinin-like sequences were identified within the open-reading frame of the cDNA. Based on modifications predicted by peptide modeling programs, and on homology to the known isoforms of sulfakinin, particularly those from shrimp, the mature H. americanus sulfakinins were hypothesized to be pEFDEY((SO3H))GHMRFamide (Hoa-SK I) and GGGEY((SO3H))DDY((SO3H))GHLRFamide (Hoa-SK II). Hoa-SK I is identical to one of the previously identified shrimp sulfakinins, while Hoa-SK II is a novel isoform. Exogenous application of either synthetic Hoa-SK I or Hoa-SK II to the isolated lobster heart increased both the frequency and amplitude of spontaneous heart contractions. In preparations in which spontaneous contractions were irregular, both peptides increased the regularity of the heartbeat. Our study provides the first molecular characterization of a sulfakinin-encoding cDNA from a crustacean, as well as the first demonstration of bioactivity for native sulfakinins in this group of arthropods. 

12064203
[Clinical management of cleft lip and palate in university hospital of Montpellier] 
Management of labio-maxillo-palatine clefts has two major requirements: to constitute a multidisciplinary staff (surgical, phonological, orthodontical) intervening as soon as possible and determination of a precise therapeutical chronology not only for primary surgery but also for sequellae. Primary surgical protocol is in cases of total clefts these defined by Malek and Psaume; and for pure labial or incomplete clefts, we perform a neonatal surgery. Integration of interceptive correction of sequellae into thus protocol appears basic: correction of alveolar cleft by gingivoplasty (5 to 7 years) associated with secondary home-graft between 11 to 13 years; early nasal revision since 2 years for functional and aesthetic reasons. Early control of speech development, otologic problems and their management appears a very important point. Introduction of the concept of maxillary distraction appears to us a very important improvement for correcting orthognatic cases with major problems of squeletical growth. Recent introduction of the antenatal diagnosis introduces a new concept in psychological approach of these cases. It is necessary to establish a network for managing these cases since the antenatal period. 

11051047
c-Jun targets amino terminus of androgen receptor in regulating androgen-responsive transcription. 
The human androgen receptor (hAR) is a member of the nuclear receptor superfamily and functions as a ligand-inducible transcription factor. We have previously proposed that c-Jun mediates the transcriptional activity of this receptor. The modular nature of hAR was used in this study to generate several fusions with the heterologous DNA-binding domain of the yeast transcription factor GAL4 in an attempt to identify the c-Jun-responsive domains within the receptor. Our results suggest that the target of c-Jun action is the amino terminus (AB region) of the receptor and that hAR amino acids 502-521 are critical for the c-Jun response. Additionally, amino acids 503-555 were shown to harbor an autonomous transactivation that is stimulated by c-Jun. Furthermore, we demonstrated that transcription intermediary factor-2 (TIF-2), a coactivator that acts on the activation function-2, stimulates the full-length hAR. These results suggest that c-Jun and TIF-2 can work together as coactivators on the hAR by targeting distinct portions of the receptor. 

9780150
c-Fos induces apoptosis in germinal center B cells. 
We examined the role of c-Fos in the differentiation of mature B cells into IgG-producing cells using transgenic mice carrying the c-fos gene under the control of the IFN-alpha/beta-inducible Mx promoter (Mx-c-fos) or the constitutive H-2Kb promoter (H2-c-fos). Splenic B cells from Mx-c-fos mice were cultured with LPS and rIL-4, and IgG1+ B cells were developed in the culture after day 3. When IFN-alpha/beta was added to the culture from day 2, development of IgG1+ B cells was perturbed, and the number of apoptotic cells increased within 24 h, suggesting that c-Fos induces apoptosis in Ig class-switching B cells. To confirm the effect of c-Fos on B cell differentiation in vivo, H2-c-fos mice were immunized with DNP-OVA. The mice produced primary IgM, but not IgG, anti-DNP Ab in serum and failed to generate germinal centers in spleen. The perturbation of germinal center formation in H2-c-fos mice was rescued by mating them with transgenic mice carrying the bcl-2 gene with the Ig promoter. However, primary IgG1 anti-DNP Ab production was still suppressed in doubly transgenic mice, suggesting that Bcl-2 can delay the time of c-Fos-induced apoptosis in Ig class-switching B cells but cannot rescue the death. Since c-Fos is induced in mature B cells reacted with Ags, and clonal deletion of self-reactive B cells in germinal centers is insensitive to Bcl-2, these results suggest that c-Fos plays a causal role in clonal deletion of germinal center B cells. 

858484
[Inhibition of uterine contraction in emergencies (author's transl)] 
During the first stage of labour 48 parturients were treated with the tocolytic agent TH 1165 a (Fenoterol-hydrobromide) because of danger to the foetus. The product was slowly injected i.v. in doses of 50 mcg (35 pat.) and 25 mcg (9 pat.) and on 4 patients in doses of 35 mcg. We investigated the effects of this therapy on labour, on the mother's and the child's circulation and on the foetal acid-base balance and foetal gas partial pressure. Whilst the different TH 1165a doses were not markedly different in their tocolytic effect, we discovered that side-effects occurred considerably more often and more intensively when higher doses of TH 116A WERE ADMINISTERED. We therefore recommend one i.v. injection of 25 mcg TH 1165a for clinical uterine relaxation in emergencies during labour. To guard against a vena cava compression syndrome, the injection should always be given with the patient in a lateral position. In emergency uterine relaxation the cardiac tocography (supplemented if necessary by micro blood gas analysis) should be monitored. In order tnce-only syringe containing 25 mcg TH1165a. 

9392074
The homeodomain protein Pho2p binds at an A/T-rich segment flanking the binding site of the basic-helix-loop-helix protein Pho4p in the yeast PHO promoters. 
Transcription of the genomic PHO5, PHO81 and PHO84 genes of the PHO regulon requires Pho4p and Pho2p activity, whereas transcription of PHO8 is directed by Pho4p alone. Pho4p binds to two 9-bp motifs, 5'-GCACGTGGG-3' (type 1. e.g. UASp2 of PHO5 and site D of PHO84) and 5'-GCACGTTTT-3' (type 2, e.g. UASp1 of PHO5 and site E of PHO84) in the PHO promoter. Experiments were performed to evaluate the ability of these 9-bp motifs to function as upstream activation sites (UASs) by insertion of various 36-bp fragments bearing the 9-bp motif in a CYC1-lacZ fusion gene. No expression of the lacZ gene was detected with the 36-bp fragment bearing UASp2 of PHO5, whereas similar 36-bp fragments bearing UASp1 of PHO5 and sites D and E of PHO84 showed UAS activity in response to Pi concentration in the medium and to the pho2 mutation. The Pho2p-responsive UASs are flanked by one or two copies of an A/T-rich segment, whereas UASp2 is not. Gel retardation and competition experiments performed using a T7-Pho2p-His chimeric protein showed that Pho2p binds to the 36-bp fragments bearing A/T-rich segment(s) but not appreciably to the 36-bp fragments not bearing such segment(s). Thus, the A/T segments flanking the PHO UASs are Pho2p binding sites and play an important role in PHO regulation. 

1374956
Intrinsic neuronal determinants of regeneration. 
Axon growth and axon regeneration are co-operative processes; the speed and extent of axon growth are influenced both by the properties of the environment surrounding the axon growth cone, and the properties of the neuron itself. In recent years, the environmental influences on axon growth have received most of the attention directed towards this area of research, but the properties of the neurons themselves are likely to be just as important. Within both adults and embryos there are differences in the growth potential of different neuronal types, and there is also evidence for an overall decrease in the vigour of axon growth with neuronal age. 

11523327
Non-aqueous-phase-liquid breakthrough during evaporative drying of clay barriers. 
In this study, an attempt has been made to model a real field scenario, whereby an initially almost saturated clay liner in a waste site is gradually drying, due to evaporation at its lower boundary. A detailed conceptual model that deals with the penetration and breakthrough of non-aqueous-phase-liquid (NAPL) in clay liners is introduced. Water content of clay samples was monitored during ambient evaporation through apertures at the base of sample holders. Clay drying rate served as the primary parameter for the NAPL breakthrough study. The interconnection between drying rates, structural damage formation (cracks and suction) and NAPL penetration is especially addressed. The processes taking place in the clay samples during drying appear to be associated with the capillary effects between the different fluid phases in the vicinity of either the NAPL-clay or the clay-air boundaries. A conceptual model of NAPL penetration and breakthrough of the clay layer has been considered, based on both indirect and direct observations of structural damages produced on either clay boundaries. A mutual interaction between these two boundaries is suggested and discussed. NAPL breakthrough is suggested to take place through cracks initiated on the upper soil surface. 

14716003
How enzymes work: analysis by modern rate theory and computer simulations. 
Advances in transition state theory and computer simulations are providing new insights into the sources of enzyme catalysis. Both lowering of the activation free energy and changes in the generalized transmission coefficient (recrossing of the transition state, tunneling, and nonequilibrium contributions) can play a role. A framework for understanding these effects is presented, and the contributions of the different factors, as illustrated by specific enzymes, are identified and quantified by computer simulations. The resulting understanding of enzyme catalysis is used to comment on alternative proposals of how enzymes work. 

164463
Temperature sensitivity of cyclic adenosine 3':5'-monophosphate-binding proteins and the regulation of growth and differentiation in neuroblastoma cells. 
The apparent association constant (K-a) of cAMP to the binding proteins from resistant and nonresistant cells was 7.4 times 10-7 M-1 and 8.2 times 10-7 M-1, respectively, and the specific activity of cAMP BINDING TO THESE PROTEINS WAS SIMILAR FOR BOTH TYPES OF CELLS. 

15487991
Spatial and population genetic structure of microsatellites in white pine. 
We evaluated the population genetic structure of seven microsatellite loci for old growth and second growth populations of eastern white pine (Pinus strobus). From each population, located within Hartwick Pines State Park, Grayling, Michigan, USA, 120-122 contiguous trees were sampled for genetic analysis. Within each population, genetic diversity was high and inbreeding low. When comparing these populations, there is a significant, but small (less than 1%), genetic divergence between populations. Spatial distance between populations or timber harvest at the second growth site were reasonable explanations for the observed minor differences in allele frequencies between populations. Spatial autocorrelation analysis suggested that, for the old growth population, weak positive structuring at 15 m fits the isolation by distance model for a neighbourhood size of about 100 individuals. In comparison, genotypes were randomly distributed in the second growth population. Thus, logging may have decreased spatial structuring at the second growth site, suggesting that management practices may be used to alter natural spatial patterns. In addition, the amount of autocorrelation in the old growth population appears to be lower for some of the microsatellites, suggesting higher numbers of rare alleles and that higher mutation rates may have directly affected spatial statistics by reducing structure. 

6722659
Diet-induced thermogenesis with relation to training state in female subjects. 
The purpose of this study was to investigate the effect of exercise training on meal-induced thermogenesis in 30 female subjects with an average age of 26 years, an average weight of 53.5 kg, and an average height of 162.4 cm. Three groups of 10 subjects were formed with an average maximum aerobic capacity (VO2max) of 57.5 mL X kg-1 X min-1 and a percent body fat of 17.5% for group 1 (competition athletes), of 49.9 mL X kg-1 X min-1 and 21.2% for group 2 (moderately active), and 38.9 mL X kg-1 X min-1 and 22.2% for group 3 (sedentary subjects). Oxygen uptake (VO2), respiratory quotient (R), and heart rate (HR) were measured at intervals for 45 min before and 120 min after a standard meal containing 800 kCal (1 kCal = 4.184 kJ). The increases in VO2 produced by the meal were significantly smaller (P less than 0.05) in group 1 than in group 3. Following the meal, R was significantly increased (P less than 0.01) from its initial value in the three groups, but it remained significantly lower in the well-trained subjects than in the nontrained. HR, which was initially higher (P less than 0.01) in group 3, was slightly increased after the meal, but the response was the same for all groups. These results show a diminished meal-induced thermogenesis in exercise-trained female subjects associated with reduced carbohydrate oxidation. 

17285587
In situ diagnostics of the decomposition of silacyclobutane on a hot filament by vacuum ultraviolet laser ionization mass spectrometry. 
The gas-phase reaction products of silacyclobutane (SCB) and 1, 1-dideuterio-silacyclobutane (SCB-d(2)) from a hot-wire chemical vapor deposition (HWCVD) chamber were diagnosed in situ using vacuum ultraviolet (VUV) laser single-photon ionization (SPI) coupled with time-of-flight (TOF) mass spectrometry. The SCB molecule was found to decompose at a filament temperature as low as 900 degrees C. Both Si- (silylene, methylsilylene, and silene) and C-containing (ethene and propene) species were produced from the SCB decomposition on the filament. Ethene and propene were detected by the mass spectrometer. It is demonstrated that the formation of ethene is favored over that of propene. The experimental study of hot-wire decomposition of SCB-d(2) shows that propene is most likely produced by a process that is initiated by a 1,2-H(D) migration to form n-propylsilylene, followed by an equilibration with silacyclopropane, which then decomposes to propene. The detection of ethene in our experiment indicates that a competitive route of fragmentation exists for SCB decomposition on the filament. It has been shown that this competitive route occurs without H/D scrambling. The highly reactive silylene, silene, and methylsilylene species produced from SCB decomposition underwent either insertion reactions into the Si-H bonds of the parent molecule or pi-type addition reaction across the double and triple CC bonds. The dimerization product of silene, 1,3-disilacyclobutane, at m/z = 88 was also observed. 

2474581
Comparative study of neuronal and glial gap-junctions in crayfish nerve cords. 
Electrical synapses (neuronal gap-junctions) and glial gap-junctions were compared by using thin sectioning, freeze fracturing, and negative staining techniques. Neuronal and glial gap-junctions differed in the length of the extracellular domains of the channels, in the presence of a cytoskeleton associated to neuronal gap-junctions, and in their unit cell dimensions. The difference in length of the channels and the fact that both glial and neuronal gap-junctions had the same particle diameter suggest that the proteins forming glial and neuronal gap-junctions might have different molecular weights. The cytoskeleton associated to neuronal gap-junctions consisted of a beaded layer of densities located parallel to the membrane in the synaptic regions. Synaptic vesicles associated to neuronal gap-junctions were attached to this cytoskeleton, which was in turn anchored to the synaptic membrane through densities about 20 nm apart, a spacing similar to the neuronal unit cell dimension. These results suggest that the cytoskeleton might be responsible for the association of vesicles to neuronal gap-junctions and for maintaining the crystalline appearance of neuronal gap-junctions in situ. 

6893444
Helping people evaluate health plans: the Minnesota Hospital Association criteria. 
The MHA Criteria for Evaluating Plans are a tool to help simplify the process of impacting on a plan. This simplified process facilitates input, which provides for a better planning process, and a better plan. 

1461784
[Evaluation of blood sugar self-monitoring of diabetic children and its educational applications] 
In diabetics children's education is important to "make" information, but it's important also to verify whether informations are given correctly. By use of computerized system it's possible to control the quality of self-management (number of glycemias, change in doses of insulin, values of HbA1c) and to determine the "know" and the "know how". 

556157
Carcinoembryonic antigen in aqueous humor of patients with primary malignant choroidal melanoma. 
Carcinoembryonic antigen levels were simultaneously determined in the aqueous humor and in the plasma of the 3 patients with primary choroidal malignant melanoma undergoing enucleation. An elevated carcinoembryonic antigen level was detected in the aqueous humor of 1 patient with no increase in plasma CEA level. In the other 2 patients no such elevation was found. A local increase of CEA levels produced by the tumor is likely to occur. Further studies are required of CEA levels of patients with primary malignant choroidal melanoma as an aid in diagnosis and treatment of this condition. 

9722104
The simulation and calculation of the fatigue of the lower complete denture in function by means of the finite element analysis. 
This paper presents a finite element analysis, by which the stress distribution during function of a lower jaw acrylic-resin complete denture can be shown. The geometry of a prosthesis has been approximated by measuring, its elementary dimensions, as well as the dimensions of the characteristic cross-sections, on an already completed denture. Based upon these dimensions a mesh, (a three-dimensional network diagram) of finite elements was made. The results obtained are presented both graphically and numerically. The equivalent fatigue stresses, according to von Mises' energetic theory of firmness, expressed in MPa (or in N/mm2), are also shown. The results obtained enable us to gain an insight into lower complete denture fatigue, and could also be used when optimizing the shape of a denture. Furthermore, they could indicate possible causes of the fatigue fractures of a denture, particularly in the area between the left and the right canines. 

6097577
Distribution and characterization of environmental promoter substances as assayed by synergistic Epstein-Barr virus-activating system. 
The application of a new screening procedure which utilizes the synergistic effect of short-chain fatty acids and tumor-promoting diterpene esters enabled rapid and easy detection of environmental substances with Epstein-Barr virus (EBV)-activating/tumor-promoting potency. Over 500 samples were tested and more than 30 substances with such activities were identified. Most, if not all, were plant diterpene esters derived from Euphorbiaceae and Thymelaeaceae families and a few were indole alkaloids of microbial origin. We attempted to link these laboratory findings with those of epidemiological field studies on three virus-associated diseases, Burkitt's lymphoma, nasopharyngeal carcinoma, and adult T-cell leukemia/lymphoma, which are known to have a peculiar geographical distribution. Our hypothesis was that EBV-activating/tumor-promoting substances might be present in the abundant areas where such diseases are endemic. We noticed that many active diterpene ester-containing plants are widely used as herbal medicaments in Africa and China and determined many plant species that had such activities. One example is Aleurites fordii, a plant commonly grown in Southern China for industrial purposes which yielded a potent promoter substance (12-O-hexadecanoyl-16-hydroxyphorbol-13-acetate, HHPA). The active diterpene esters were purified and their possible mechanism was studied from the view of receptor-binding, protein kinase C activation and transmembrane signaling. 

10177501
Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS); TRICARE program; nonavailability statement requirements--DoD. Final rule. 
This final rule revises certain requirements and procedures for the TRICARE Program, the purpose of which is to implement a comprehensive managed health care delivery system composed of military medical treatment facilities and CHAMPUS. Issues addressed in this rule include priority for access to care in military treatment facilities and requirements for payment of enrollment fees. This rule also includes provisions revising the requirement that certain beneficiaries obtain a non-availability statement from a military treatment facility commander prior to receiving certain health care services from civilian providers. 

977790
Influence of renal dysfunction on warfarin plasma protein binding. 
The in vitro plasma protein binding of warfarin was evaluated by ultrafiltration in plasma from seven normal subjects and seven patients with varying degrees of renal dysfunction. The unbound, or free, warfarin fraction was twice as high in the plasma samples withdrawn from patients with renal impairment than in the samples obtained from normal volunteers. Furthermore, there was a positive correlation between the extent of renal dysfunction and the magnitude of the free warfarin fraction when either creatinine clearance, plasma creatinine, or BUN was used to estimate renal function. 

9226933
Children's perception of faces of varied immaturity. 
This research examined the relationship between facial immaturity and the perception of youthfulness, helplessness, and cuteness. In the first study, college students rated 16 faces for youthfulness. Faces varied within four dimensions (eye position, eye size, nose length, and shape of chin) representing either a mature or immature feature. College students rated faces conserving immature features as more youthful than those without those features. In the second study, three groups of children (5 to 8, 9 to 12, and 13 to 16 years old) rated the same 16 faces with respect to cuteness, helplessness, and youthfulness. Children were similar with respect to their attention to immature features when evaluating faces for youthful qualities, although older children were more sensitive to eye position than younger children when rating faces for youthfulness and helplessness. Older children were more consistent in their attention to immature features when rating faces. 

7908958
Thermal hyperalgesia in association with the development of morphine tolerance in rats: roles of excitatory amino acid receptors and protein kinase C. 
In a rat model of morphine tolerance, we examined the hypotheses that thermal hyperalgesia to radiant heat develops in association with the development of morphine tolerance and that both the development and expression of thermal hyperalgesia in morphine-tolerant rats are mediated by central NMDA and non-NMDA receptors and subsequent protein kinase C (PKC) activation. Tolerance to the analgesic effect of morphine was developed in rats utilizing an intrathecal repeated treatment regimen. The development of morphine tolerance and thermal hyperalgesia was examined by employing the tail-flick test and paw-withdrawal test, respectively. Intrathecal MK 801 (an NMDA receptor antagonist), 6-cyano-7-nitroquinoxaline-2,3-dione (CNQX; a non-NMDA receptor antagonist), or GM1 ganglioside (an intracellular PKC inhibitor) treatment was given to examine the effects of these agents on the development and expression of thermal hyperalgesia in morphine-tolerant rats. Tolerance to the analgesic effect of morphine was reliably developed in rats following once daily intrathecal (onto the lumbosacral spinal cord) injection of 10 micrograms of morphine sulfate for 8 consecutive days as demonstrated by the decreased analgesia following morphine administration on day 8 as compared to that on day 1. In association with the development of morphine tolerance, thermal hyperalgesia to radiant heat developed in these same rats. Paw-withdrawal latencies were reliably decreased in morphine-tolerant rats as compared to nontolerant (saline) controls when tested on day 8 before the last morphine treatment and on day 10 (i.e., 48 hr after the last morphine treatment). The coincident development of morphine tolerance and thermal hyperalgesia was potently prevented by intrathecal coadministration of morphine with MK 801 (10 nmol) or GM1 (160 nmol), and partially by CNQX (80 nmol). MK 801 (5, 10 nmol, not 2.5 nmol) and CNQX (80, 160 nmol, not 40 nmol), but not GM1 (160 nmol), also reliably reversed thermal hyperalgesia in rats rendered tolerant to morphine when tested 30 min after each drug treatment on day 10 (48 hr after the last morphine treatment). The data indicate that thermal hyperalgesia develops in association with the development of morphine tolerance and that the coactivation of central NMDA and non-NMDA receptors is crucial for both the development and expression of thermal hyperalgesia in morphine-tolerant rats. Furthermore, intracellular PKC activation plays a critical role in the development of thermal hyperalgesia in morphine-tolerant rats. (ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 400 WORDS) 

11519462
[Effects of working conditions in the production of synthetic rubber on workers' health] 
Examination of 325 Kazan workers engaged in the production of synthetic rubber revealed a high (35.6%) prevalence of thyroid pathology. Patients with thyroid disease and apparently healthy workers manufacturing synthetic rubber were found to have lower levels of T3, T4, and zinc and higher levels of thyroglobulin antibodies and chromium in the serum than in apparently healthy individuals not contacting with noxious agents. The magnitude of increases in the workers' serum concentration of chromium was related to the length of service. The changes were more pronounced in patients with thyroid disease. Correlation analysis revealed that there were direct relationships between the serum levels of T3, T4, and zinc in all groups. There was an inverse correlation between the levels of T4 and the length of service in noxious production in the workers with thyroid disease. 

15043117
Aspirin therapy and bleeding during proximal femoral fracture surgery. 
To assess the effect of daily low-dose aspirin therapy on perioperative bleeding of patients operated on for proximal femoral fracture, we did a prospective case-control study. During 14 months, we followed up 104 patients, 39 of whom were taking aspirin before the injury. The bleeding was estimated by the number of blood units needed perioperatively, the change in hemoglobin values, and followup on complications and drain volume. The aspirin-treated group received an average of 0.5 units of blood more than the control group, postoperatively. This finding was statistically significant. The groups did not differ significantly in any other bleeding parameter. No major bleeding occurred in the patients. It is safe to do surgery for a proximal femoral fracture in patients who are taking aspirin. 

17324774
Preoperative diagnosis and efficacy of laparoscopic procedures in the treatment of Mirizzi syndrome. 
BACKGROUND: The role of laparoscopic procedures in the treatment of Mirizzi syndrome (MS) is not well-defined and remains controversial. We evaluated the preoperative diagnosis and efficacy of laparoscopic procedures in treatment of MS. STUDY DESIGN: Preoperative diagnosis and cholecystectomy were attempted on 2,012 consecutive patients at a single center and 24 (1.2%) were finally diagnosed with MS. Patients without preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiography underwent preoperative spiral CT after IV infusion cholangiography (IVC-SCT). RESULTS: Fourteen patients had McSherry type I MS (MS I) and 10 had type II MS (MS II). Open operation was performed on patients with MS II or a preoperative suspicion of gallbladder cancer. Laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) was performed successfully on 10 of 14 patients with MS I and the remaining 4 patients with MS I were converted to open procedure. At preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (n = 3) or IVC-SCT (n = 11) on patients with MS I, 3 of 4 (75%) patients who were converted to open operation had a nonvisualized cystic duct, and 9 of 10 (90%) patients with LC had a visualized cystic duct. CONCLUSIONS: MS I with a visualized cystic duct can be considered to be an indication for laparoscopic operation. IVC-SCT can be a useful tool for correct preoperative diagnosis and assessment of the feasibility of LC in patients with MS I. 

12097158
Human hypoxic signal transduction through a signature motif in hepatocyte nuclear factor 4. 
We identified a human hypoxic signal transduction pathway acting through a signature motif in the carboxyl terminal of hepatocyte nuclear factor 4 (HNF-4), by functional comparison of the transcriptional and protein-protein interaction activities of the wild type and mutants. It was previously shown that HNF-4 functions as a tissue-specific and hypoxia-activated transcription factor for the erythropoietin (Epo) gene. Human HNF-4 (465 amino acid residues) has DNA-binding, ligand-binding, and transactivation domains. The deletion mutant without the carboxyl terminal transactivation domain (amino acids 369-465) has been shown to be a dominant-negative mutant that repressed Epo transcriptional activity in hypoxia. Further characterization of the hypoxia-responsive domain by site-directed mutagenesis indicated that a TKQE motif of the carboxyl terminal (amino acids 460-463) in HNF-4 was essential for hypoxia-inducible Epo gene expression. We also found, by means of immunoprecipitation and a mammalian two-hybrid system, direct interactions between HNF-4 and hypoxia-inducible factor 1 (HIF-1), a heterodimer composed of alpha and beta subunits. HNF-4 was observed to interact with HIF-1alpha and HIF-1beta (arylhydrocarbon receptor nuclear translocator, ARNT) during hypoxia. In addition, the TKQE motif of HNF-4 was essential for protein-protein interactions with HIF-1alpha and ARNT. These results indicate that the human hypoxic signal of HIF-1 is transduced through interactions with the signature TKQE motif of the carboxyl terminal of HNF-4, resulting in Epo gene expression as a response to hypoxia. 

6543476
Immunological characteristics of cells entering the liver with portal blood. 
The mononuclear cell populations were characterized phenotypically and functionally in the splenic, mesenteric, portal, sinusoidal, and hepatic venous blood. We found higher concentrations of mononuclear cells in splenic than mesenteric and portal blood; splenic blood contained high numbers of cells with Fc, C3b receptors and surface immunoglobulin and OX8+ (cytotoxic/suppressor) cells. Liver sinusoidal blood was enriched, compared with inflowing portal blood, in cells with Fc, C3b receptors and surface immunoglobulin, OX+8 cells, and natural killer and killer cells. These findings indicate that the spleen may be the main source of migrating streams of cells to the liver and that cytotoxic subsets of these cells are retained in that organ. 

3487374
Endoneurial capillary permeability to [14C]sucrose in frog sciatic nerve. 
Using an in situ perfusion technique, we measured the [14C]sucrose permeability-surface area product (PA) in endoneurial capillaries of 48 frog sciatic nerves, as 6.6 +/- 0.6 (S.E.M.) X 10(-5) s-1, and the vascular space as 1.31 +/- 0.10%. Assuming A = 30 cm2/g, P = 2.2 X 10(-6) cm/s. P for sucrose was greater than P in some barrier tissues with tight junctions, but was less than P in all capillaries examined so far except rat cerebral capillaries. These observations demonstrate that endoneurial capillaries are an effective part of the blood-nerve barrier to water-soluble non-electrolytes. The findings are consistent with capillary impermeability to microperoxidase and with capillary ultrastructure. 

14604664
Synthesis and biological evaluation of substituted quinolines: potential treatment of protozoal and retroviral co-infections. 
We report the synthesis of substituted quinolines and their in vitro biological evaluation against the causal agents of cutaneous leishmaniasis, visceral leishmaniasis, African trypanosomiasis and Chagas' disease. Furthermore, several quinolines have also been tested for their anti-retroviral activity in HIV-1 infected cells. The structure-activity relationships of these new synthetic compounds are discussed and emphasis was placed on the treatment of leishmania/HIV co-infections. 

1303698
Detection of tick-borne encephalitis (TBE) virus in Liechtenstein. 
In this study, we present the first detection of a focus of tick-borne encephalitis (TBE) virus-infected ticks in Liechtenstein. The focus is located on a much-used forest path near Vaduz, the capital of the principality. The virus isolated is a representative of the Western subtype of the TBE virus. It is thus closely related to or identical with the other strains isolated in western Europe. 

1505807
Heparin neutralization by an extract of the human placenta: measurements and the concept of placental barrier to heparin. 
A soluble extract from human placenta was found to neutralize heparin in a factor Xa-dependent heparin assay system. In comparison with serum the antiheparin activity of placenta tissue is 10 times higher (extract from 1 g of placenta neutralizes 8.94 +/- 3.31 IU of heparin; 1 ml of serum approximately 1 IU). The substance neutralizing heparin has not been identified, but it has been found that it is nondialyzable, is not adsorbed on heparin-Sepharose, and does not act progressively. It was suggested that the substance(s) responsible for the antiheparin effect in vitro might contribute to the failure of heparin to penetrate the placenta in vivo (placental barrier to heparin). 

2615092
[A case of pulmonary alveolar microlithiasis on the bone image of dual-energy subtraction radiography] 
A 33-year-old female was evaluated for abnormality of her chest roentgenogram which showed diffuse fine granular micronodulation in the lower two thirds of both lung fields. The bone image (soft tissue cancelled image) of dual-energy subtraction radiography obtained with Fuji Computed Radiography (FCR) demonstrated that the abnormal shadows were characterized by calcified deposits. 

3123198
[Value of the carotid compression test for the diagnosis of cerebrovascular disorders] 
The carotid compression tests have been performed in 1940 outpatients and 233 hospitalized patients with clinical signs and symptoms of cerebrovascular disturbances. The frequency of EEG slowing, positivity of the compression tests and carotis sinus hypersensitivity was in patients with local neurological signs: 36%, 22.5%, and 24.8%, while the corresponding numbers for patients without neurological signs were: 24.6%, 21.8%, 14.7%. On the basis of the carotis angiography the following groups of the patients could be formed: Thrombosis of the internal carotid artery (A), thrombosis of the anterior or medial cerebral artery (B), carotis stenosis (C), other vascular pathological signs of the arteries (D), normal angiography (E). They were compared with the control group of patients with vertebrobasilar insufficiency (F). The frequency of EEG slowing (A = 92%, B = 72%, C = 58.9%, D = 57%, E = 40%, F = 22.5%). The percentage of the positivity of carotid compression tests (A = 54%, B = 32%, C = 46%, D = 26%, E = 12%) and occurrence of carotis sinus hypersensitivity (A = 26.8%, B = 16%, C = 17.7%, D = 10.8%, E = 11.3%, F = 6.9%) were proportionate to the pathological morphological signs. The results of the compression tests may give indication for detailed clinical investigation, and are helpful in the estimation of the functional capacity of the carotid arteries in the cerebral circulation. 

11697611
Drug use and barriers to use of health care services. 
This paper examines barriers to health care utilization and the correlates associated with these barriers. As part of a larger study of health services utilization, the study sample of 1085 including injection drug users, other chronic users of heroin or cocaine, and a demographically similar group who had used neither heroin nor cocaine, was selected based on the criterion of not having received health care for at least one health problem within the previous 12 months. Both categories of chronic drug users were more likely than non-users not to want health care treatment and to put off seeking needed health care. 

16082103
1-(4-Chlorophenyl)-2-methyl-4-nitro-5-(1-piperidyl)-1H-imidazole. 
The only specific interactions that influence the crystal packing of the title compound, C15H17ClN4O2, are weak C-H...N and C-H...Cl hydrogen bonds, even though there is a possibility of, for example, pi-pi stacking or halogen bonding. The dihedral angle between the mean planes of the imidazole and benzene rings is 59.82 (5) degrees . The length of the C-N bond connecting the imidazole and piperidine fragments is correlated with the degree of pyramidalization of the piperidine N atom. 

9484468
Conserved Ser residues in the basic region of the bZIP-type transcription factor HBP-1a(17): importance in DNA binding and possible targets for phosphorylation. 
HBP-1a(17) is representative of a group of plant bZIP-type transcription factors which includes HBP-1a proteins and G-box-binding factors. We found kinase activity in wheat nuclear extract that phosphorylated HBP-1a(17). Experiments using recombinant HBP-1a(17) derivatives as substrates revealed that all three of the Ser residues in the basic region, Ser-261, Ser-265, and Ser-269, were phosphorylated in a Ca(2+)-stimulated manner. DNA-binding analysis of mutants with a Ser-to-Glu change, prepared to mimic the phosphorylated proteins, indicated that introduction of a negative charge at position 265 or 269 prevents HBP-1a(17) from binding DNA not only in the homodimer of mutants but also in heterodimers with a wild-type protein. It is therefore suggested that the phosphorylation regulates the function of HBP-1a(17) at least at the level of DNA binding. Since Ser-265 and Ser-269 are highly conserved among the plant bZIP-type factors known to date, a common Ca(2+)-mediated regulatory mechanism may exert an effect on the bZIP-type factors through phosphorylation of these conserved Ser residues. 

15321078
Maternal hypoxaemia associated with the use of Entonox in labour. 
We report the occurrence of severe hypoxaemic episodes associated with the use of Entonox in labour, in an otherwise healthy woman. These did not occur when the parturient breathed room air during contractions and did not recur when epidural analgesia was established. Possible mechanisms of arterial desaturation associated with the use of Entonox in labour are discussed. 

10970752
Continuity of carer: what matters to women? A review of the evidence. 
OBJECTIVES: To consider how 'continuity of carer' has been defined in the literature and to review the literature on what aspects of continuity matter to women. DESIGN: Structured literature review. SETTING: The first objective was addressed within the context of a review of the organisation of midwifery services in the UK; for the second objective a wider literature was drawn on. MEASUREMENTS AND FINDINGS: Data were systematically extracted from the identified 'core' studies on the methods used for assessing continuity of carer and on women's satisfaction with periods of care. Continuity of carer was found to be defined in these studies as fewer caregivers, either overall or during pregnancy, or as a known caregiver in labour. Little attention was paid to other possible interpretations of continuity of carer. The literature on what is important to women was found to have used four distinct methods and findings were consistent within methods. Studies comparing women who had and had not had a known carer in labour found no significant differences in satisfaction; those using rankings or ratings found that a known intrapartum carer was a relatively low priority and most of those using open-ended questions found that few women mentioned continuity. In contrast, all studies which asked postnatal women whether a known intrapartum carer was important reported that those who had experienced it said 'yes', while those who had not, generally thought it unimportant. KEY CONCLUSIONS: There has been an emphasis in existing literature on continuity of carer but little attempt to assess continuity or quality of care. Limited definitions of continuity of carer have been used. There is no evidence that women who were cared for in labour by a midwife that they had already met were more satisfied than those who were not. Other aspects of woman-centred care were likely to be more important. Women wanted consistent care from caregivers that they trust, but most did not value continuity of carer for its own sake. IMPLICATIONS FOR PRACTICE: Limited definitions of continuity of carer seem to be becoming ends in themselves. This has particularly been the case with defining continuity as 'having a known carer in labour'. The available evidence does not justify prioritising this definition of continuity--rather the reverse. This is important for both women and midwives since it opens up other possibilities for organising services that put less strain on midwives' lives and may be equally satisfying for both women and midwives. 

11767139
Selective liquid chromatographic method for determination of fluoxetine in plasma. 
A selective and sensitive liquid chromatographic method was developed for the determination of fluoxetine (FLU) in plasma. FLU was isolated from plasma by liquid-liquid extraction. The chromatographic separation was performed on an analytical 250 x 3.9 mm id Novapak C18 column (4 microm particle size) with an isocratic mobile phase consisting of phosphate buffer-acetonitrile-methanol -triethylamine (58 + 30 + 10 + 2, v/v) adjusted to pH 7. Using UV detection at 226 nm, the detection limit for FLU in plasma was 3 ng/mL. No interferences were found with tricyclic antidepressant drugs, which allows this method to be used in clinical studies. The calibration curve was linear over the concentration range of 10-200 ng/mL. The average recovery was about 80% for plasma. The inter- and intraday assay coefficients of variation were <8%. 

3241091
Staging of localized prostate cancer: a clinical-pathologic correlation. 
Sixty consecutive patients were staged clinically by digital rectal examination, acid phosphatase and bone scan prior to radical retropubic prostatectomy and pelvic lymphadenectomy. Twenty-one patients also had magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and computerized tomography (CT) of the pelvic. The surgical specimens were step-sectioned for pathologic staging. Understaging was documented in 0% of A2 patients, 27% of B1 patients and 67% of B2 patients. Capsular invasion was found in 12% of B1 and 52% of B2 patients, while seminal vesicle extension was documented in 18% of B1 and 52% of B2 patients. Lymph node metastases occurred in 3% of B1 and 29% of B2 patients. Clinical staging error was related to tumor size, tumor grade and history of prior TURP or radiotherapy. Neither CT scan nor MRI improved the accuracy of the digital rectal examination. 

16667886
Cytokinins and Differentiation Processes in Mercurialis annua: Genetic Regulation, Relations with Auxins, Indoleacetic Acid Oxidases, and Sexual Expression Patterns. 
Cytokinins in apices of eight isogenic lines of Mercurialis annua were compared (high performance liquid chromatography-gas chromatography mass spectroscopy-computer system). These apices develop normal staminate or pistillate differentiation processes (sex series lines) or empty (sterile), semiempty (semisterile), and full anthers (restored fertile male) in the sterility series in which a pistillate line was constructed. Both series developed two different cytokinin pathways: trans-cytokinins characterized the sex series, whereas the cis pathway characterized the sterility series. Drastic changes in the trans pathway (0/250 nanograms trans-zeatin and 166/0 nanograms zeatin nucleotide) induced staminate/pistillate differentiations. Less drastic quantitative changes in the cis pathway induced sterility or restored fertility compared to normal fertile anthers (192 or 669 nanograms/traces). The action of the complete cis-pathway was morphologically effective in the sterility series when the ratio of cis to trans pathways was 1:2 or 1:1 instead of 1:3. A final diagram shows the action of each sex or sterility allele on the enzymes controlling specific metabolites in both pathways. The discussion provides insights on the regulation of cytokinin-auxin balances specific for each kind of reproductive differentiation. 

7978605
Femoral venous pulsations during open-chest cardiac massage. 
We describe the cases of two children with easily palpated femoral pulses during open-chest cardiac massage after aortic occlusion. These pulsations must have arisen from the femoral veins, implying that during CPR in children the usual anatomic landmarks for femoral venous access may be unreliable, and femoral pulsations do not necessarily reflect arterial flow. Femoral pulses may signify to-and-fro inferior vena caval flow that compromises venous return, adversely affecting cardiac output and the effectiveness of medication administration to the lower extremity. 

12212707
Scaling of atrioventricular transmission in mammalian species: an evolutionary riddle! 
"Scaling deals with the structural and functional consequences of changes in size or scale among otherwise similar organisms." It plays a key role in all studies on comparative mammalian physiology and morphology. Heart weight is proportionally related to body weight and can be described by a straightforward, so-called allometric equation. We studied scaling of AV transmission times (PR intervals on the ECG) in 375 mammals of different dimensions and species. Scaling of AV transmission times versus heart length (third root of weight) is statistically best described by a S-shaped curve. This implies that AV transmission time in mammals is not linearly related to heart length and does not depend solely on the length of the AV transmission system. The AV node fine-tunes AV transmission times at rest and during exercise in individuals; it protects the ventricles against high-rate atrial arrhythmias such as atrial fibrillation; and it regulates basal AV transmission times in mammalian species of varying sizes. We call the "how" and "why" of the scaling of AV transmission time in mammals an evolutionary riddle that deserves further study. 

17348506
An equivalent roughness model for seabed backscattering at very high frequencies using a band-matrix approach. 
This work concerns modeling of very high frequency (>100 kHz) sonar images obtained from a sandy seabed. The seabed is divided into a discrete number of ID height profiles. For each height profile the backscattered pressure is computed by an integral equation method for interface scattering between two homogeneous media as formulated by Chan [IEEE Trans. Antennas Propag. 46, 142-149 (1998)]. However, the seabed is inhomogeneous, and volume scattering is a major contributor to backscattering. The SAX99 experiments revealed that the density in the unconsolidated sediment within the first 5 mm exhibits a high spatial variation. For that reason, additional roughness is introduced: For each surface point a stochastic realization of the density along the vertical is generated, and the sediment depth at which the density has its maximum value will constitute the new height field value. The matrix of the full integral equation is reduced to a band matrix as the interaction between the point sources on the seabed is neglected from a certain range; this allows computations on long height profiles with lengths up to approximately 25 m (at 300 kHz). The equivalent roughness approach, combined with the band-matrix approach, agrees with SAX99 data at 300 kHz. 

14569753
Aerodigestive amyloidosis presenting as acute asthma. 
Aerodigestive amyloidosis is a rare disorder characterized by fibrillar protein deposition in the aerodigestive tree. We present a case of a 19-year-old Chinese gentleman whose diagnosis was initially missed as he presented with features suggestive of severe bronchial asthma and was intubated and ventilated. He subsequently presented 2 years later with severe stridor and required emergency tracheostomy. Current literature is reviewed for the histopathology, common clinical features, radiological findings and treatment options for aerodigestive amyloidosis. 

10462633
Controversies in the prevention of neurosurgical infection. 
Amongst post-operative infections, those associated with neurosurgery are of particular significance in view of their proximity to, or location within, the central nervous system. Superficial surgical site infections may be complicated by osteomyelitis of the calvarium and deeper extension to the meninges and cerebral parenchyma. The prevention, diagnosis and management of infections associated with implant devices provide similar challenges to those faced in orthopaedic and cardiac surgery. Whilst some consensus exists regarding the need for antimicrobial prophylaxis in the latter two disciplines, its place in neurosurgery remains controversial. When prophylaxis is considered, choice of antimicrobial agents should take account of up-to-date local information in relation to the relevant microbial ecology in hospitals and in the community setting. The potential for spread of blood-borne virus infections and transmissible spongiform encephalopathies in relation to neurosurgery must also be considered and it should be ensured that appropriate preventive strategies are in place. 

11447480
Hypertrophic cardiomyopathy repealing tenets in South Africa. 
Hypertrophic cardiomyopathy (HCM), a common primary cardiac disorder with an increased risk of sudden death, affects all population groups in South Africa. Distinct causal mutations in multiple sarcomeric protein-encoding genes correlate with the risk of sudden death. Such genotype/phenotype correlations cannot be extrapolated geographically or ethnically, necessitating the generation of South African-specific data. We used DNA-based techniques to search for the causal mutations in a panel of South African HCM-affected subjects (37 with unequivocal HCM, 47 with HCM-like disease). Mutations detected were traced in family members and carriers assessed by echocardiography and electrocardiography. Nine different HCM-causing mutations (5 unique to South Africa, 3 showing a founder effect) were identified in 3 genes in 24 index cases (57% HCM group, 6% HCM-like group). The different mutations were associated with variable hypertrophy, independent of the risk of sudden death. The disease was generally familial and many at-risk mutation carriers did not meet clinical diagnostic criteria for HCM. Rigorous diagnosis of index cases facilitates detection of causal mutations, which allows for unequivocal DNA-based diagnosis of at-risk family members, regardless of age or clinical status. This permits focused patient management, informed prognostication and realistic counselling for this insidious disease, as well as time and cost savings. 

16184468
Parity, other reproductive factors, and risk of pancreatic cancer mortality in a large cohort of U.S. women (United States). 
Several studies have found an inverse relationship between parity and risk of pancreatic cancer. However, most of the studies of pancreatic cancer in relation to parity and other reproductive factors have been small and the results inconsistent. Most recently, a well-conducted, prospective cohort study found a linear inverse association between parity and pancreatic cancer. To clarify the relationship between parity and other reproductive factors and risk of pancreatic mortality, we examined these associations among 387,981 postmenopausal U.S. women in the Cancer Prevention Study (CPS)-II cohort. CPS-II participants completed a self-administered questionnaire in 1982 and were followed for mortality through 2000. During follow-up, 1959 pancreatic cancer deaths occurred. Using Cox proportional hazards modeling, we calculated rate ratios (RR) adjusted for age, race, education, personal history of diabetes, body mass index, height, exercise, family history of pancreatic cancer, and cigarette smoking status, frequency, and duration. Overall, we did not observe a significant association between parity and pancreatic cancer mortality (trend p = 0.07). However, women who had five or more births had lower death rates from pancreatic cancer than nulliparous women (RR = 0.80, 95% CI = 0.66-0.96). We observed no association between any other reproductive factors examined (age at first birth, menarche, or menopause; type of menopause; diethylstilbestrol (DES) use; or duration of oral contraceptive or estrogen replacement therapy use) and pancreatic cancer mortality. In summary, our results support the observation that high parity is associated with lower risk of pancreatic cancer but do not show a linear trend with increasing parity. Furthermore, we find no evidence that other reproductive factors are associated with pancreatic cancer mortality. 

9801030
Antigenotoxic effects of cimetidine against benzene induced micronuclei in mouse bone marrow erythrocytes. 
An in vivo micronucleus assay using Balb/C male mice was used to examine antigenotoxic effects of cimetidine (CM) on benzene (BZN) induced genotoxic effects. CM not only has therapeutic and immunomudolatory role, but it has also been shown to protect bone marrow stem cells from radiation induced clastogenic effects. Therefore, in the present study we attempt to investigate the protective effects and possible mechanisms involved in the effects of CM. An 8-week-old male Balb/C mice (22+/-4 g weight) were treated with different doses of BZN (400, 600 and 800 mg/kg body weight), i.p. and sampled at 24, 48 and 72 h after treatment by cervical dislocation. Various doses of CM (10, 15, 30 mg/kg) were used in association with BZN and 1-2 h prior to BZN treatment. Results show that BZN effectively induced micronuclei in polychromatic erythrocytes (PCEs). Application of CM led to a significant reduction of micronuclei in PCEs, i.e. 2-fold after 10 mg/kg and 3-fold after 30 mg/kg CM treatment. Results also indicate CM was more effective when used in combination with BZN. Therefore, results indicate that CM could reduce clastogenic effects of BZN. Although further investigations are needed to reveal the mechanistical background behind the effect, the most probable mechanism involved might be free radical scavenging. This mechanism might be associated with amplification of glutathione system and cytochrome P-450 inhibition. 

489255
Studies on peptides. LXXXI. Application of a new arginine derivative, NG-mesitylene-2-sulfonylarginine, to the synthesis of substance P and neurotensin. 
A new devised arginine derivative, NG-mesitylene-2-sulfonylarginine, Arg(Mts), was employed for the synthesis of hypothalamic substance P and neurotensin. The former was obtained in 74% yield by treatment of the protected undecapeptide amide, Z - Arg(Mts) - Pro - Lys(Z) - Pro - Gln - Gln - Phe - Phe - Gly - Leu - Met(O)-NH2, with methanesulfonic acid in the presence of anisole followed by reduction of the sulfoxide with 2-mercaptoethanol. The latter was obtained in 54% yield by the similar treatment of the protected tridecapeptide ester, Z - Pyr - Leu - Tyr - Glu(OBzl) - Asn - Lys(Z) - Pro - Arg(Mts) - Arg(Mts) - Pro - Tyr - Ile - Leu - OBzl, with methanesulfonic acid. As scavenger, a mixture of anisole-thioanisole-o-cresol (1:1:1, by vol.) was employed to suppress the side reaction, O-mesitylene-2-sulfonation of the Tyr residue. 

8328619
Nutrition and health risks in the elderly: the nutrition screening initiative. 
OBJECTIVES. The Nutrition Screening Initiative is a national collaborative effort committed to the identification and treatment of nutritional problems in older persons. METHODS. A 14-item checklist of characteristics associated with nutritional status was administered to a random sample of Medicare beneficiaries, aged 70 years and older, in New England. Regression analysis was used to derive item weights that would predict poor nutrient intakes and low perceived health status. Sensitivity and specificity values were reviewed to define low, moderate, and high nutritional risk scores. RESULTS. A revised checklist containing 10 yes/no items was adopted. Scores of 6 or more points defined persons at high nutritional risk. Twenty-four percent of the Medicare population was estimated to be at high nutritional risk according to the checklist. Among those in the high-risk group, 56% perceived their health to be "fair" or "poor" and 38% had dietary intakes below 75% of the recommended dietary allowances for three or more nutrients. CONCLUSIONS. The Nutrition Screening Initiative Checklist is a brief, easily scored instrument that can accurately identify noninstitutionalized older persons at risk for low nutrient intake and health problems. 

14505445
Colworth memorial lecture. Pathways for remodelling chromatin. 
The alteration of chromatin structure plays an integral role in gene regulation. One means by which eukaryotes manipulate chromatin structure involves the use of ATP-dependent chromatin-remodelling enzymes. It appears likely that these enzymes play a widespread role in the regulation of many nuclear processes. Recently, significant progress has been made in defining the alterations to chromatin structure that these enzymes generate. The ability to alter nucleosome positioning may be a common feature of all ATP-dependent remodelling enzymes, but the spectrum of positions to which nucleosomes are relocated varies. Mounting evidence supports the ability of remodelling enzymes to translocate along DNA. This provides a means by which they could alter both the twist and writhe of DNA on the surface of nucleosomes, and so accelerate nucleosome repositioning. 

8871183
Responses of somatostatin, beta-endorphin and dynorphin A to a glucose load in two groups of women with polycystic ovarian syndrome. 
To investigate the relationship between elevated LH, hyperinsulinemia and neuropeptides in polycystic ovarian syndrome (PCOS), we measured the endogenous levels of insulin, somatostatin (SS), beta-endorphin (beta-EP) and dynorphin A (Dyn A) before and after a glucose load in three groups: group 1 (LH/ FSH > or = 3, n = 30); group 2 (LH/FSH < 3, n = 25), and controls (n = 15). In the basal state, significantly negative correlations were found between LH and SS (r = -0.51, p < 0.05) in group 1 and between LH and beta-EP (r = -0.49, p < 0.05) in group 2. After a glucose load, PCOS women had greater beta-EP and Dyn A responses in group 1 and impaired SS response in group 2 as compared with the control. The data suggest endogenously lower SS, higher beta-EP and Dyn A may contribute to the elevation of LH and insulin secretions in PCOS. 

9401107
Myotonic dystrophy protein kinase gene expression in skeletal muscle from congenitally affected infants. 
Myotonic dystrophy (DM) is an autosomal dominant neuromuscular disorder characterized by marked variability of its clinical manifestations. The mutational basis of DM is an unstable (CTG)n trinucleotide repeat in the 3' untranslated region of the myotonic dystrophy protein kinase gene (DMPK). We used quantitative RT-PCR to determine DMPK mRNA levels in muscular biopsies from three congenitally affected (CDM) and two control infants. The CDM infants had increased DMPK mRNA levels, which were not correlated to increased expression of the mutant allele. This increase may be the consequence of a maturational muscular arrest, which may maintain an elevated level of DMPK mRNA until birth. 

10377386
Substrate-induced closure of the flap domain in the ternary complex structures provides insights into the mechanism of catalysis by 3-hydroxy-3-methylglutaryl-CoA reductase. 
3-hydroxy-3-methylglutaryl-CoA (HMG-CoA) reductase is the rate-limiting enzyme and the first committed step in the biosynthesis of cholesterol in mammals. We have determined the crystal structures of two nonproductive ternary complexes of HMG-CoA reductase, HMG-CoA/NAD+ and mevalonate/NADH, at 2.8 A resolution. In the structure of the Pseudomonas mevalonii apoenzyme, the last 50 residues of the C terminus (the flap domain), including the catalytic residue His381, were not visible. The structures of the ternary complexes reported here reveal a substrate-induced closing of the flap domain that completes the active site and aligns the catalytic histidine proximal to the thioester of HMG-CoA. The structures also present evidence that Lys267 is critically involved in catalysis and provide insights into the catalytic mechanism. 

11144902
Diagnosis of prostatic intraepithelial neoplasia: Prostate Working Group/consensus report. 
High-grade prostatic intraepithelial neoplasia (PIN) is the most likely precursor of prostatic carcinoma. PIN has a high predictive value as a marker for carcinoma, and its identification in biopsy specimens warrants repeat biopsy for concurrent or subsequent carcinoma. The only methods of detection are biopsy and transurethral resection; PIN does not significantly elevate serum PSA concentration or its derivatives, nor does it induce a palpable mass, and cannot be detected by ultrasound. Androgen deprivation therapy decreases the prevalence and extent of PIN, suggesting that this form of treatment may play a role in chemoprevention. Radiation therapy is also associated with a decreased incidence of PIN. 

7761401
Mimics of the binding sites of opioid receptors obtained by molecular imprinting of enkephalin and morphine. 
Molecular imprinting of morphine and the endogenous neuropeptide [Leu5]enkephalin (Leu-enkephalin) in methacrylic acid-ethylene glycol dimethacrylate copolymers is described. Such molecular imprints possess the capacity to mimic the binding activity of opioid receptors. The recognition properties of the resultant imprints were analyzed by radioactive ligand binding analysis. We demonstrate that imprinted polymers also show high binding affinity and selectivity in aqueous buffers. This is a major breakthrough for molecular imprinting technology, since the binding reaction occurs under conditions relevant to biological systems. The antimorphine imprints showed high binding affinity for morphine, with Kd values as low as 10(-7) M, and levels of selectivity similar to those of antibodies. Preparation of imprints against Leu-enkephalin was greatly facilitated by the use of the anilide derivative rather than the free peptide as the print molecule, due to improved solubility in the polymerization mixture. Free Leu-enkephalin was efficiently recognized by this polymer (Kd values as low as 10(-7) M were observed). Four tetra- and pentapeptides, with unrelated amino acid sequences, were not bound. The imprints showed only weak affinity for two D-amino acid-containing analogues of Leu-enkephalin. Enantioselective recognition of the L-enantiomer of phenylalanylglycine anilide, a truncated analogue of the N-terminal end of enkephalin, was observed. 

16481285
Interleukin-10 promoter polymorphisms in patients with hepatitis B virus infection or hepatocellular carcinoma in Chinese Han ethnic population. 
BACKGROUND: Since single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs) can serve as gene markers, polymorphism profiles may help scientists to identify the full collection of genes that contribute to the development of complex diseases such as cancer. The distribution of interleukin-10 (IL-10) promoter polymorphisms in Chinese Han ethnic patients with hepatitis B virus (HBV) infection and hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC) was investigated in this study. METHODS: The polymorphisms of IL-10 promoter region were detected by polymerase chain reaction-single strand conformation polymorphism (PCR-SSCP) and sequencing. Sixty-six health controls, 42 patients with HBV infection, 30 HCC patients, and cell line SMMC-7721 were examined this way. RESULTS: Polymorphisms of T/C or T/N on -872 site occurred frequently in Han ethnic population. Polymorphisms were detected in HBV and HCC patients and cell line SMMC-7721. The hotspot among the polymorphisms was inserting base A between -1058 and -1057. CONCLUSION: Polymorphisms of IL-10 promoter in HBV and HCC patients may be associated with HBV infection and HCC development. 

7817582
[A case of Schmidt's syndrome] 
A typical case of Schmidt syndrome is reported. The syndrome comprises signs of primary adrenocortical failure and hypothyroidism. Other endocrine and non-endocrine immunopathies may be present also, such as type I diabetes, gonadal failure, Addison-Biermer anaemia, myasthenia gravis, vitiligo or alopecia areata. The possibility of these concomitant changes should be taken into account in the treatment of Schmidt syndrome. The case in a 52-year-old woman is reported in view of rare occurrence of thr syndrome and its few descriptions in the Polish literature as well as diagnostic difficulties. 

3451020
[Usefulness of passive dosimeters of carbon disulfide made in the East Germany for evaluating individual occupational exposure to this compound] 
To evaluate the usefulness of passive reactive dosimeters for the determination of individual exposure to carbon disulphide, field studies in viscose plants in Poland and East Germany have been carried out. Totally, 43 workers have been examined, using active charcoal pipes joined with personal samplers as a reference air sampling method. The results of measurements point to a statistically significant difference between passive dosimeters findings and exposure evaluation by the reference method. The 1.5-2.2 times lower results indicate too little usefulness of passive dosimeters made in East Germany as a quantitative method of evaluating occupational exposure to carbon disulphide in Polish viscose plants. 

12402202
Opsonin-independent phagocytosis: an effector mechanism against acute blood-stage Plasmodium chabaudi AS infection. 
Opsonin-independent macrophage phagocytosis was investigated as a possible mechanism of controlling early blood-stage Plasmodium chabaudi AS infection. Early during infection, peritoneal macrophages from resistant C57BL/6 (B6) mice exhibited increased phagocytosis of parasitized red blood cells (pRBCs) and free merozoites, which was absent in mice with deficient interferon (IFN)-gamma production during infection, including susceptible A/J, interleukin (IL)-12 p40, and IFN-gamma gene knockout mice. IFN-gamma treatment of macrophages collected from B6 and A/J mice early during infection enhanced phagocytosis of pRBCs, but IL-10 treatment inhibited this function. In vitro and in vivo studies in which type I and II class A scavenger receptor-deficient mice and inhibitors of scavenger and mannose receptors were used revealed that scavenger receptors other than class A type I and II and mannose receptors may play a role in malaria parasite uptake. These results indicate that opsonin-independent phagocytosis contributes to the IFN-gamma-dependent control of acute blood-stage malaria infection. 

6961904
Ultrastructure of odontoblasts in kitten tooth germs as revealed by freeze-fracture. 
Fifteen kittens were perfused with 2.5 per cent glutaraldehyde or modified Karnovsky fixative. Distribution and structural features of the three kinds of intercellular junctions; gap junctions, macular tight junctions and desmosome-like junctions were clarified by correlated observations using thin sections and freeze-fracture replicas. Distal junctional complexes of the odontoblasts were composed of both gap and macular tight junctions and sealed extracellular spaces incompletely, because of the poor sealing capacities of macular tight junctions. Therefore, there was no predentine-pulp barrier in the odontoblast layer. Except for the junctional complex, no tight junction was observed in the odontoblasts. Gap junctions and desmosome-like junctions were found between adjacent odontoblasts and between odontoblasts and neighbouring pulp cells. Gap junctions were similar to those of many other tissues but the desmosome-like junctions were different from mature desmosomes in the epithelial cells and showed immature features. Each intercellular junction of odontoblasts is considered to form a site of intercellular communication and cell-to-cell attachment. 

2241356
Mitral prosthetic replacement in small left atria. 
A modified transseptal approach for exposure of the difficult mitral valve is described. This allows the surgeon to visualize the valve, especially during prosthetic replacement, in the presence of a small, friable, or noncompliant left atrium. 

9144534
Functional expression of human p21(WAF1/CIP1) gene in rat glioma cells suppresses tumor growth in vivo and induces radiosensitivity. 
This study reports the successful growth suppression of a rat glioblastoma model (RT-2) both in vitro and in vivo by the insertion of p21(WAF1/CIP1), a negative cell cycle regulatory gene, into the tumor cells. Greater than 95% of the tumor cells expressed p21 protein after being infected with pCL based p21 retrovirus at 4x M.O.I. (multiplicity of infection). The p21-infected cells showed a 91% reduction in colony forming efficiency and a 66% reduction in growth rate. More prominent p21 staining was found in cells exhibiting histologic evidence of senescence. Intracranial implantation of the infected cells showed complete disappearance of the p21-infected cells at day 10 and long-term survival of the animals compared to controls. Injection of pCLp21 virus into tumor established in situ showed tumor necrosis and gene expression. In a clonogenic radiation survival assay, a 93% reduction of surviving colonies of p21-infected cells was seen in comparison to vector-infected control cells and to p53-infected cells after exposure to 8 Gy (800 rads). 

981078
Psychiatric aspects of chronic organic brain syndrome. 
In chronic organic brain syndrome, or dementia, the patient generally retreats to simple, familiar situations and resists involvement in others. The symptoms represent both organic deficits due to brain damage and psychologic reactions to the deficits. Some causes are treatable. Because of progressive change in the total behavior of the patient, major rearrangement of life-style is often necessary. The physician should guide both patient and family in this process. Medication may also be helpful. 

7528015
Nitric oxide synthase activity is elevated in brain microvessels in Alzheimer's disease. 
The cerebral microcirculation undergoes specific biochemical changes in Alzheimer's disease. In this study, we have compared the nitric oxide synthase (NOS) activity of brain microvessels isolated from Alzheimer and control brains. L-[3H]-citrulline, the stable co-product generated with nitric oxide (NO) from L-[3H]-arginine, was measured as an indicator of NOS activity. The results indicated a significant increase in NOS activity in microvessels isolated from Alzheimer brains. In addition, using antibodies to both the endothelial and inducible NOS isoforms, we demonstrated a significant increase in enzyme level in Alzheimer-derived vessels. Elevated vascular production of NO, a potentially neurotoxic mediator in the CNS, may contribute to the susceptibility of neurons to injury and cell death in Alzheimer's disease. 

9774975
Migration of a Holliday junction through a nucleosome directed by the E. coli RuvAB motor protein. 
Chromatin plays a critical role in regulating access to DNA by proteins that direct recombination and repair. The E. coli RuvAB protein complex promotes branch migration of the Holliday junction recombination intermediate. The ability of RuvAB to negotiate passage of the junction through nucleosomal DNA is examined. The model system involves the formation of a Holliday junction positioned upstream of a nucleosome. Unassisted, the junction is blocked by a histone octamer. In the presence of RuvAB and ATP, rapid branch migration through the nucleosome is observed. It results in disruption of the histone-DNA interactions leading to the removal of the octamer from the junction intermediate. These results suggest that eukaryotic DNA motor proteins analogous to RuvAB could function during recombination to promote branch migration through chromatin. 

8957364
Prevention of reperfusion injury by inhaled nitric oxide in lungs harvested from non-heart-beating donors. Paris-Sud University Lung Transplantation Group. 
BACKGROUND: In lung transplantation using non-heart-beating donors (NHBD), the postmortem period of warm ischemia exacerbates lung ischemia-reperfusion injury. We hypothesized that inhaled nitric oxide (NO) would reduce ischemia-reperfusion injury, and thus ameliorate the viability of the lung graft. METHODS: A blood-perfused, isolated rat lung model was used. Lungs were flushed and harvested from non-heart-beating donors after 30 minutes of in situ warm ischemia. The lung was then stored for 2 hours at 4 degrees C. Inhaled NO at 30 ppm was given either during the period of warm ischemia, during reperfusion, or during both periods. Lung ischemia-reperfusion injury was assessed after 1 hour of reperfusion by measuring pulmonary vascular resistance, coefficient of filtration, wet-to-dry lung weight ratio, and myeloperoxidase activity. RESULTS: A severe IR injury occurred in lungs undergoing ischemia and reperfusion without NO as evidenced by high values of pulmonary vascular resistance (6.83 +/- 0.36 mm Hg. mL-1.min-1), coefficient of filtration (3.02 +/- 0.35 mL.min-1.cm H2O-1 x 100 g-1), and wet-to-dry lung weight ratio (8.07 +/- 0.45). Lower values (respectively, 3.31 +/- 0.44 mm Hg.mL-1.min-1, 1.49 +/- 0.34 mL.min-1.cm H2O-1 x 100 g-1, and 7.44 +/- 0.43) were observed when lungs were ventilated with NO during ischemia. Lung function was further improved when NO was given during reperfusion only. All measured variables, including myeloperoxidase activity were significantly improved when NO was given during both ischemia and reperfusion. Myeloperoxidase activity was significantly correlated with coefficient of filtration (r = 0.465; p < 0.05). CONCLUSIONS: These data suggest that inhaled NO significantly reduces ischemia-reperfusion injury in lungs harvested from non-heart-beating donors. This effect might be mediated by inhibition of neutrophil sequestration in the reperfused lung. 

9926975
When all else fails: stepwise multiple solutions for a complex cancer pain syndrome. 
In the presence of insufficient pain relief and substantial adverse effects, application of alternative routes of administration and a change of opioid are the main methods used to improve the analgesic response. When all else fails, the result may further be optimized using adjuvant drugs by an alternative route, namely the intrathecal route. A stepwise approach with multiple drugs and routes of administration is described. This was implemented to resolve a complex pain syndrome otherwise considered uncontrollable. We found it possible to manage a very difficult pain situation by intrathecal home infusion through the efforts of a well-trained family and GP and a continuous exchange of information and advice with the pain relief team about changes in therapy to adapt to the clinical situation. A stepwise and a meaningful approach to clinical problems with use of advanced techniques and alternative drugs in the patient's home may be helpful in the treatment of conditions otherwise considered intractable. 

15263890
Exploring quality of life following high spinal cord injury: a review and critique. 
STUDY DESIGN: Review. OBJECTIVES: To explore the concept of quality of life (QOL), critique the practice and problems of assessing QOL following spinal cord injury (SCI) and to review the findings of studies into QOL for people with SCI both below and above the level of C4. METHODS: Relevant articles were identified from the Medline and CINAHL databases for approximately the period 1990-2003, cross-indexing 'spinal cord injury' or 'quadriplegia/tetraplegia' with 'quality of life', 'life satisfaction', 'social adjustment' or 'psychological adaptation'. This search was augmented through papers identified in reference lists. Articles were excluded if they were designed solely to examine the impact of a specific intervention upon QOL; or if they examined satisfaction with various life domains without explicitly linking these to perceptions of QOL. Papers were also accessed that addressed the philosophical and epistemological issues involved in QOL conceptions and assessment. RESULTS: Review of the literature highlights the philosophical and methodological difficulties associated with the quantitative measurement of a qualitative experience; and with the assessment of life domains chosen by researchers. Analysis of QOL research undertaken among people with all levels of SCI demonstrates that dissatisfaction with life following injury arises primarily from social disadvantage. However, little research has been conducted specifically to ascertain perceptions of QOL among people with high SCI. CONCLUSIONS: Ensuring the relevance of future research into QOL following high SCI requires qualitative methodology and mixed methods. Further research is needed to determine how rehabilitation professionals can act on the findings of their QOL assessments and enhance the QOL experienced by people with spinal cord injury in the context of their environments. SPONSORSHIP: The early phase of this study was supported by: University of British Columbia Graduate Fellowship; Rick Hansen Man in Motion Foundation (studentship); Social Sciences and Humanities Research Council of Canada: doctoral fellowship. 

3158964
[Recurrent herpes with neuralgia and zones of cutaneous hypoesthesia] 
A 52-year old man presented with recurrent Herpes simplex of the thigh and buttock of 30 years duration. The skin eruption was preceded by pain and sciatica. Surgical excision of the skin area involved modified the site of recurrence. During an attack, the patient developed severe pain and hypoaesthesia in the left half of his chest. The skin lesions were unmodified, and a type 2 Herpes simplex virus was isolated from a vesicle. A clinical examination performed 5 weeks later showed reduced sensitivity to pin prick in the previously painful D5 to D12 territory. Three points are of interest in this case: the site of recurrence moved after surgical excision, pain extended over a wide area and, most of all, persistent hypoaesthesia occurred during a recurrence. 

6424423
Effect of particle size of dried mycobacteria on adjuvant induced arthritis in the rat. 
Freund's complete adjuvant prepared by grinding dried, heat killed Mycobacterium tuberculosis with liquid paraffin was investigated for particle size-weight distribution. Variations in the grinding times and preparative procedure had a marked effect on the arthritogenic action of the adjuvant in the rat. A satisfactory response in the injected foot was found only when the particle size was less than 19 microns and a secondary response in the non-injected foot required particles less than 10 microns in diameter. 

6406368
Murine encephalitozoonosis model for studying the host-parasite relationship of a chronic infection. 
Encephalitozoon cuniculi caused chronic nonlethal infections in euthymic BALB/cAnN mice, whereas athymic BALB/cAnN-nu mice died from infection. Specific, anamnestic, transferable, and acquired responses against E. cuniculi were expressed by infected euthymic mice. Resistance to lethal disease appears to be T-cell dependent. Immune serum failed to protect infected athymic mice, whereas the transfer of T-enriched spleen cells from E. cuniculi-sensitized euthymic donors prevented lethal E. cuniculi infections in athymic mice. These findings indicate that murine encephalitozoonosis may be an excellent system for studies of a chronic infection in an immunologically well-characterized host. 

464545
New kinetic procedure for the measurement of conjugated bilirubin with a centrifugal analyzer. 
A procedure has been developed for the automated measurement of conjugated bilirubin in serum with a centrifugal analyzer. The conjugated bilirubin is measured by a fixed time kinetic method which monitors the reaction between conjugated bilirubin and diazotized sulfanilic acid at 550 nm. Results are calculated based on a comparison of the reagent blank-corrected absorbance changes between 15 seconds and 75 seconds for sample vs changes in an empirical standard. The standard used is N-(1-naphthyl) ethylene diamine dihydrochloride (NEDC) which reacts with diazotized sulfanilic acid at a rate comparable to conjugated bilirubin. The standard is calibrated by comparison with a modified Jendrassik and Grof procedure using a serum blank-corrected centrifugal analyzer reference method. The method is linear to 150 mg per 1 with a sensitivity of 3.0 milliabsorbance units per 1.0 mg per 1 of conjugated bilirubin using a 35 mul sample volume. Within-run precision is 1 percent for elevated concentrations of bilirubin. Hemolysis introduces a negative interference, the nature of which is discussed. 

15984515
[Treatment of small cell lung cancer] 
The treatment of choice for limited small-cell lung cancer (SCLC) is platinum-based chemotherapy combined with early, concurrent thoracic radiotherapy with a hyperfractionated regimen. The standard chemotherapy for extensive SCLC in Japan is the combination of irinotecan and cisplatin. There are expectations for new and effective molecular-target-based drugs for SCLC. 

1003597
[Para-sphincteric infiltrations (authors transl)] 
The aut horsdescribe the technique and the first results of para-sphincteric anaesthetic infiltrations of the striate sphincter of the urethra in paraplegics. These infiltrations may decrease, or even cause to disappear altogether, dysuria as long as the striate sphincter is alone responsible and that the straite sphincter muscle is not the process of fibrosis. In certain special cases, this simple technique may have a durable effect which makes it possible to avoid definitive procedures such as endoscopic or surgical section. 

9869418
Alfin1, a novel zinc-finger protein in alfalfa roots that binds to promoter elements in the salt-inducible MsPRP2 gene. 
Alfin1 cDNA, obtained by differential screening of a poly(A)+ library from salt-tolerant alfalfa cells, encodes a novel protein with a Cys4 and His/Cys3 putative zinc-binding domain that suggests a possible role for this protein in transcriptional regulation. We have expressed the cDNA in Escherichia coli and show that the recombinant Alfin1 protein binds DNA in a sequence-specific manner. The DNA recognition sequence was determined from individual clones isolated after four rounds of random oligonucleotide selection in gel retardation assays, coupled with PCR amplification of the selected sequences. The consensus binding site for Alfin1 is shown to contain two to five G-rich triplets with the conserved core of GNGGTG or GTGGNG in clones showing high-efficiency binding. DNA binding of the recombinant Alfin1 was inhibited by EDTA. Alfin1 mRNA was found predominantly in alfalfa roots. Growth of salt-sensitive Medicago sativa L on 171 mM NaCl led to a slight decrease in Alfin1 mRNA, while the salt-tolerant plants showed no decrease in Alfin1 mRNA levels. Interestingly, recombinant Alfin1 binds efficiently to three fragments of the MsPRP2 promoter, each containing consensus sequences identified by the random oligonucleotide selection. Since MsPRP2 transcripts were shown to be root-specific and accumulated in alfalfa roots in a salt-inducible manner, Alfin1 may play a role in the regulated expression of MsPRP2 in alfalfa roots and contribute to salt tolerance in these plants. 

10214913
The role of homologous recombination processes in the repair of severe forms of DNA damage in mammalian cells. 
The role of homologous recombination processes in the repair of severe forms of DNA damage is reviewed, with particular attention to the functions of members of the recA/RAD51 family of genes. In the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae, several of the gene products involved in homologous recombination repair (HRR) have been studied in detail, and a picture is beginning to emerge of the repair mechanism for DNA double-strand breaks. Knowledge is fragmentary for other eukaryotic organisms and for other types of DNA damage. In mammalian cells, while it has been known for some years that HRR occurs, the relative importance of the process in repairing DNA damage is unknown and very few of the gene products involved have been identified. Very recently, a number of RAD51-like genes have been identified in mammals, either through cloning genes complementing cell lines sensitive to DNA-damaging agents (XRCC2, XRCC3), or through homology searches (RAD51L1, RAD51L2, RAD51L3). As yet the role of these genes and their possible functions are speculative, although the combination of sequence conservation and gene expression patterns suggest that they function in HRR pathways. 

15856427
Outpatient treatment of low-risk neutropenic fever in cancer patients using oral moxifloxacin. 
BACKGROUND: Oral-based antibiotic therapy is the standard of care in the management of cancer patients with low-risk neutropenic fever. Nevertheless, to the authors' knowledge, the best antibiotic regimen and the feasibility of ambulatory treatment have not been clearly defined. METHODS: The authors evaluated the efficacy and safety of moxifloxacin as outpatient treatment in cancer patients with febrile neutropenia who were selected according to the recently proposed Multinational Association for Supportive Care in Cancer (MASCC) risk assessment model. Moxifloxacin was given at a dose of 400 mg orally once daily. RESULTS: Fifty-four patients with solid and hematologic malignancies, the majority of whom (84%) had advanced disease, were included in the current study. The median neutrophil count at the time of study entry was 340/mm3 (range, 20-950/mm3) and the median duration of neutropenia was 4 days (range, 3-14 days). Of 55 neutropenic episodes, 50 (91%) had a successful outcome with a median time to defervescence of 2 days (range, 1-5 days). A multivariate analysis indicated that severe neutropenia (an absolute neutrophil count of < 100 mm3) was the only independent factor associated with treatment failure (P < 0.04). Moxifloxacin was found to be well tolerated and there were no infectious deaths reported. CONCLUSIONS: The results of the current study demonstrated that moxifloxacin was a highly effective and safe regimen in the outpatient treatment of cancer patients with febrile neutropenia. 

17386470
Headspace solid-phase microextraction of phthalic acid esters from vegetable oil employing solvent based matrix modification. 
A new solvent-free analytical procedure based on headspace solid-phase microextraction (SPME) coupled to gas chromatography employing an electron capture detector (GC/ECD) or alternatively a mass spectrometric detector (GC/MSD) has been developed for the determination of phthalic acid esters (dimethyl-[DMP], diethyl-[DEP], di-n-butyl-[DnBP], butylbenzyl-[BBP], di-2-ethylhexyl-[DEHP] and di-n-octyl [DnOP] phthalate) in vegetable oils. Four different fiber coatings were evaluated, among them polydimethylsiloxane with a thickness of 100 microm appeared to be the best choice for allowing extraction of the whole group of analytes. Various solvents were tested as sample matrix modification agents with the aim to facilitate the transfer of esters with low vapour pressure (DEHP and DnOP) from oil matrix into the headspace. The addition of methanol resulted in optimal set-up applicable for all phthalate esters. Temperature control and the way of sample stirring were recognized as critical points of the whole procedure. Primarily, because shaking rather than stirring of the sample is carried out using a CombiPal multipurpose sampler, the automation of the SPME method employing this instrument was found to be not fully suitable for efficient stripping of phthalates from the oil matrix into the sample headspace. Nevertheless, the optimized manual SPME method, encompassing GC/ECD or GC/MSD for the separation and detection of target analytes, offers a unique solution and showed acceptable performance characteristics: linear response in the range of 0.5-2 mg kg(-1) and repeatability expressed as R.S.D. between 14 and 23% at the spiking level of 2 mg kg(-1). 

12778562
Rapid laboratory evolution of adult wing area in Drosophila melanogaster in response to humidity. 
We examined the evolutionary response of wing area (a trait highly correlated with other measures of body size) to relative humidity (RH), temperature, and their interaction in Drosophila melanogaster, using replicated lines that had been allowed to evolve at low or high humidity at 18 degrees C or at 25 degrees C. We found that after 20 weeks of selection (5-10 generations), low RH lines had significantly greater wing areas than high RH lines in both sexes. This evolutionary response may have resulted from selection of larger flies with a smaller surface area for water loss relative to their weight, or as a correlated response to selection on some other unidentified trait. There were no evolutionary effects of temperature on wing area or cell density. This may have been due to the short duration of the selection experiment, and/or counteracting selection pressures on body size at warm temperature. 

3298650
Glycosaminoglycan composition of tight skin and control mouse skins. 
Tight skin (TSK) mouse skin has previously been shown to contain increased amounts of collagen and glycosaminoglycans (GAG). We now report on the GAG composition of TSK mouse skin. Using an electrophoretic and an enzymatic HPLC method, skin from 99 TSK and control mice (newborn, 1 month-old, and 6 months-old) were analyzed for GAG composition. There was no significant difference between TSK and control GAG. 

2583120
Binding of the 3' terminus of tRNA to 23S rRNA in the ribosomal exit site actively promotes translocation. 
A key event in ribosomal protein synthesis is the translocation of deacylated tRNA, peptidyl tRNA and mRNA, which is catalyzed by elongation factor G (EF-G) and requires GTP. To address the molecular mechanism of the reaction we have studied the functional role of a tRNA exit site (E site) for tRNA release during translocation. We show that modifications of the 3' end of tRNAPhe, which considerably decrease the affinity of E-site binding, lower the translocation rate up to 40-fold. Furthermore, 3'-end modifications lower or abolish the stimulation by P site-bound tRNA of the GTPase activity of EF-G on the ribosome. The results suggest that a hydrogen-bonding interaction of the 3'-terminal adenine of the leaving tRNA in the E site, most likely base-pairing with 23S rRNA, is essential for the translocation reaction. Furthermore, this interaction stimulates the GTP hydrolyzing activity of EF-G on the ribosome. We propose the following molecular model of translocation: after the binding of EF-G.GTP, the P site-bound tRNA, by a movement of the 3'-terminal single-stranded ACCA tail, establishes an interaction with 23S rRNA in the adjacent E site, thereby initiating the tRNA transfer from the P site to the E site and promoting GTP hydrolysis. The co-operative interaction between the E site and the EF-G binding site, which are distantly located on the 50S ribosomal subunit, is probably mediated by a conformational change of 23S rRNA. 

3367235
Digestibility of nitrogen and amino acids in selected protein sources fed to mice. 
The purpose of this investigation was 1) to determine the apparent and true digestibilities in mice of nitrogen (N) and amino acids (AA) in commercially refined protein sources, and 2) to estimate metabolic fecal nitrogen (MFN) excretion. Each protein source was fed to adult female mice at 15 and 30% of a purified diet. A protein-free diet was included. Nutrient digestibility was determined by a fecal balance method with chromic oxide as a marker. Apparent digestibility of N in each protein source reflected the dietary N concentration and AA digestibility showed a similar trend. True digestibility (TD) of N was 97-98% for Animal Nutrition Research Council reference protein, casein, gelatin and gliadin, 94-96% for lactalbumin and soy protein and 81% for zein. TD of AA generally reflected TD of N. MFN excretion (g/100 g dry matter consumed) was 0.146 when the protein-free diet was fed and 0.151 by extrapolation to zero N intake. It was concluded that when commercially refined proteins are fed to mice, MFN excretion can be determined by either method, but this may not apply when the protein source contains antinutritive substances. 

7524949
Use of capillary electrophoresis-isoelectric focusing for the determination of bovine hemoglobin variants. 
A capillary electrophoretic technique was developed to monitor patterns of hemoglobin production in young calves subjected to multiple phlebotomies. The method is similar to one previously described for the determination of human hemoglobin variants in whole blood using isoelectric focusing. After a single collection of one-half the circulating blood volume, there were obvious alterations in hemoglobin chain variants. HbA levels diminished as blood loss increased with minimum values corresponding to maximum blood loss. HbF levels did not appear to be affected. Also visible during the regenerative process were atypical overlapping peaks preceding the normal hemoglobin peaks. At the conclusion of the 18-day study, most of the electropherograms had returned to initial states. These changes were found to be a sensitive indicator of accelerated erythropoiesis in contrast to the standard technique of total hemoglobin determination by colorimetric means. 

10553078
Identification of three HLA-A*0201-restricted cytotoxic T cell epitopes in the cytomegalovirus protein pp65 that are conserved between eight strains of the virus. 
The Ag specificity of the CTL response against CMV is directed almost entirely to a single CMV tegument protein, the phosphoprotein pp65. We report the identification of three peptides derived from the protein pp65 that displayed a high or intermediate binding to HLA-A*0201 molecules, which were also able to induce an in vitro CTL response in peripheral blood lymphocytes from CMV seropositive individuals. The peptide-specific CTLs generated were capable of recognizing the naturally processed pp65 either presented by CMV-infected cells or by cells infected with an adenovirus construct expressing pp65 in an HLA-A*0201-restricted manner. Thus, we were able to demonstrate responses to subdominant CTL epitopes in CMV-pp65 that were not detected in polyclonal cultures obtained by conventional stimulations. We also found that the amino acid sequences of the three peptides identified as HLA-A*0201-restricted CTL epitopes were conserved among different wild-type strains of CMV obtained from renal transplant patients, an AIDS patient, and a congenitally infected infant, as well as three laboratory strains of the virus (AD169, Towne and Davis). These observations suggest that these pp65 CTL peptide epitopes could potentially be used as synthetic peptide vaccines or for other therapeutic strategies aimed at HLA-A*0201-positive individuals, who represent approximately 40% of the European Caucasoid population. However, strain variation must be taken in consideration when the search for CTL epitopes is extended to other HLA class I alleles, because these mutations may span potential CTL epitopes for other HLA molecules, as it is described in this study. 

16510669
Racial and socioeconomic disparity in perforated appendicitis among children: where is the problem? 
OBJECTIVE: Significant racial, ethnic, and socioeconomic disparities have been observed in the rates of perforated appendicitis among children, by using large administrative databases. This study evaluated whether these factors had an impact on the care of patients with appendicitis at a major children's hospital with a well-established, comprehensive, primary referral system. METHODS: A retrospective analysis was performed for all children between the ages of 2 and 20 years who were treated for appendicitis between January 1, 2001, and December 31, 2003. Demographic variables included patient age, gender, race, insurance status, parental educational status, and income level. Coding data were used to identify patients with perforated appendicitis. The use of radiologic imaging was also analyzed. RESULTS: During the 3-year period, 788 patients were treated for appendicitis. The racial distribution (white: 81%; black: 12%; other: 7%) was consistent with the demographic composition of the local population. The overall perforation rate was 25%, and the rate was significantly greater in the age group of <6 years, compared with older children. However, there were no significant differences in the perforation rate with respect to race, insurance status, educational level, or income status. Rates of radiologic imaging use were similar among all racial and socioeconomic groups. CONCLUSIONS: Although racial and socioeconomic disparities in the rates of perforated appendicitis among children have been reported, we found no significant evidence for such inequality at our institution. This may reflect improved access, early diagnosis, and referral by primary care physicians in the community. Pooled national and multiple-state administrative databases have been used to highlight persistent disparities in health care. This study illustrates how single-institution data sources can be used to test a local hypothesis generated by national data, with surprisingly different results. 

7951955
Arthroscopic visualization of the tibial plafond during posterior malleolar fracture fixation. 
Fracture of the tibial plafond, such as in a trimalleolar fracture, with a large posterior tibial (posterior malleolus) fragment may require open reduction and internal fixation. Anatomic reduction of the articular surface can be ensured by visualizing the articular surface using an arthroscope during reduction. Four cases wherein this technique has proven effective are described. 

17511001
RNA interference tolerates 2'-fluoro modifications at the Argonaute2 cleavage site. 
Short interfering RNA (siRNA) molecules with good gene-silencing properties are needed for drug development based on RNA interference (RNAi). An initial step in RNAi is the activation of the RNA-induced silencing complex RISC, which requires degradation of the sense strand of the siRNA duplex. Although various chemical modifications have been introduced to the antisense strand, modifications to the Argonaute2 (Ago2) cleavage site in the sense strand have, so far, not been described in detail.In this work, novel 2'-F-purine modifications were introduced to siRNAs, and their biological efficacies were tested in cells stably expressing human tartrate-resistant acid phosphatase (TRACP). A validated siRNA that contains both purine and pyrimidine nucleotides at the putative Ago2 cleavage site was chemically modified to contain all possible combinations of 2'-fluorinated 2'-deoxypurines and/or 2'-deoxypyrimidines in the antisense and/or sense strands. The capacity of 2'-F-modified siRNAs to knock down their target mRNA and protein was studied, together with monitoring siRNA toxicity. All 2'-F-modified siRNAs resulted in target knockdown at nanomolar concentrations, despite their high thermal stability. These experiments provide the first evidence that RISC activation not only allows 2'-F modifications at the sense-strand cleavage site, but also increase the biological efficacy of modified siRNAs in vitro. 

2198253
Differentiation of Serratia marcescens 274 into swimmer and swarmer cells. 
We describe a new sensory response in the enteric bacterium Serratia marcescens. When grown in liquid media, the bacteria were short rods with one to two flagella and displayed classical swimming behavior. Upon transfer to a solid surface (0.7 to 0.8T% agar medium), the bacteria underwent a dramatic change of form. They ceased septation, elongated, and expressed numerous (10 to 100) flagella that covered the lateral sides of the cells. The bacteria now displayed a different form of locomotion--swarming--which allowed them to rapidly move over the top of the solid surface. The differentiation to either swimmer or swarmer cells could be reversed by growth on solid or liquid medium, respectively. To identify conditions that influence this differentiation, the growth environment of S. marcescens was manipulated extensively. The swarming response was monitored by visual and microscopic observation of cell movement on solid surfaces, by immunofluorescent labeling followed by microscopic observation for the presence of elongated, profusely flagellated cells, as well as by estimation of induction of flagellin protein, using Western immunoblot analysis. Conditions that imposed a physical constraint on bacterial movement, such as solid or viscous media, were the most efficient at inducing the swarming response. No chemical constituent of the medium that might contribute to the response could be identified, although the existence of such a component cannot be ruled out. Both swimmer and swarmer cells had flagellin proteins of identical molecular weight, which produced similar proteolysis patterns upon digestion with trypsin. 

2377798
[Incidence and clinical significance of rhythm disorders in the elderly] 
The goal of this study was the evaluation of cardiac arrhythmias in an unselected population of elderly patients by 24-hour Holter electrocardiography. An elevated incidence of hyperkinetic (62%) and hypokinetic arrhythmias (22.7%) were detected. Following a critical review of the literature, the Authors conclude that even in hyperkinetic arrhythmias a conservative approach is advisable without indiscriminate therapeutic treatment. This review also confirmed the clinical utility of ambulatory monitoring in the detection of arrhythmias, otherwise underestimated, mainly in asymptomatic patients. 

15247544
Epilepsy. 
PURPOSE OF REVIEW: The purpose of this review is to consider the current and potential role of neuroimaging from an epilepsy perspective, and to illustrate that by combining appropriate imaging techniques, neuroimaging can contribute greatly to elucidating the basic mechanisms of the various forms of epileptic disorders. RECENT FINDINGS: New magnetic resonance imaging sequences (magnetization transfer imaging) and positron emission tomography ligands (serotonergic system) were biologically validated in large groups of patients with localization-related epilepsies. Investigations in genetically determined homogenous patient populations (PAX6, juvenile myoclonic epilepsy) have strengthened the link between genetic defects and neuropathological targets (anterior commissure, thalamus). Magnetic resonance spectroscopy and electroencephalogram-triggered functional magnetic resonance imaging provided converging evidence for a key role of the thalamus in the generation of generalized seizures. The role of functional magnetic resonance imaging in identifying eloquent areas of cortex and its relationship to structural lesions, in particular malformations of cortical development, has been further elucidated. Longitudinal magnetic resonance imaging studies reported progressive volume loss after febrile convulsions and in active epilepsy. SUMMARY: Neuroimaging is essential for improving the efficacy and safety of therapeutic, in particular, surgical procedures. Investigations of larger, more homogenous genetic disorders and longitudinal rather than cross-sectional neuroimaging studies have advanced our knowledge about the cause and effect of epileptic disorders, and will ultimately link defects in molecular genetics with specific neuropathological targets. 

3041066
[Combination chemotherapy concurrent with small-dose radiation therapy of small cell carcinoma of the lung] 
Forty consecutive patients with small cell carcinoma of the lung were treated with chemotherapy, radiotherapy or both. Of 34 patients treated with chemotherapy, 24 were treated with combination chemotherapy, containing cyclophosphamide vincristine methotrexate and procarbazine, concurrent with small dose radiation therapy (500cGy/5 fraction) as a chemosensitizer (COMPrt). The response rate to this regimen was 81% (29% complete) and the 2 year survival rate was 28.6%. These results have been superior to other regimens and the toxicity was not see to be any higher. After completion of COMPrt regimen, 10 patients were treated with intrathoracic radiation therapy (average dose 3000cGy) and 3 received surgical treatment. Radiation therapy improved the 2-year survival rate (42.2%) when compared with those patients who received no radiation therapy (18.2%). Three patients received surgical treatment were considered to be disease-free for 23, 17, and 9 months respectively, after induction of chemotherapy. 

16643382
Cultivation of endothelial progenitor cells on fibrin matrix and layering on dacron/polytetrafluoroethylene vascular grafts. 
Completely biological tissue-engineered vascular graft is an upcoming substitute for damaged blood vessel, but its clinical use is currently limited due to poor mechanical strength. Therefore, at present, polymeric small-diameter vascular grafts lined with endothelial cells (ECs) to reduce graft thrombosis may be a more viable option. Successful construction of EC-seeded artificial grafts faces some challenges such as (i) retention of endothelial lining; and (ii) availability of differentiated autologous cells. Biomaterial surfaces that are modified by depositing extracellular matrix (ECM) components may stabilize cells in the lumen against forces of blood flow. Adult stem cells such as endothelial progenitor cells (EPCs) circulate in the blood and they usually attach to the exposed matrix at the injured blood vessel site. Depending on the signaling capabilities of ECM, cells may differentiate into ECs,, and if a similar composition of the matrix is provided in vitro, EPCs isolated from blood might get differentiated and thus autologous cells for tissue engineering may be obtained. In this in vitro study, ECM scaffold consisting of biomolecules such as fibrin, fibronectin, and gelatin along with growth factors is found to have supported differentiation of EPC into EC. Further, the ECM precoated on Dacron and polytetrafluoroethylene is found to have supported the formation of EC monolayer that synthesized nitric oxide, and resisted shear stress. Thus, biomimetic fibrin composite is found to be suitable not only to seed cells on currently available artificial grafts but also to obtain differentiated EC from EPC. 

8539022
Dapiprazole's effect upon accommodative recovery: is it due entirely to changes in depth of field? 
We conducted a study to evaluate the ability of dapiprazole 0.5% ophthalmic solution to reverse accommodative loss brought about by mydriatic drugs having mild cycloplegic effects. To accomplish this, we analyzed data from several earlier randomized, masked clinical studies. Our composite data include over 90 subjects dilated with tropicamide. Tropicamide was used alone in 1% concentration, as well as in combination with phenylephrine, 2.5% and in the proprietary preparation, Paremyd (Allergan Pharmaceuticals). Accommodative amplitude and pupillary diameter were measured before instilling dilating drops and then again one-half hour later, immediately before instilling either dapiprazole or a placebo. Accommodative amplitude and pupil diameter measurements were then repeated four more times, on both the treatment and control eyes and at 30, 60, 120, and 180 min after instillation of the last drop of dapiprazole or placebo. We found accelerated "accommodative" recovery with dapiprazole for each of the three tropicamide-containing drugs used in our study. This is not surprising because some recovery of accommodative amplitude after dapiprazole's administration is expected. This is because dapiprazole accelerates pupillary recovery and a narrowing of the pupil gives rise to an increase in ocular depth of field. Rate of accommodative recovery with dapiprazole was found not to be significantly different for all three tropicamide-containing preparations tested (p > 0.05). Does dapiprazole produce improvement in amplitude of accommodation beyond that attributable to increased depth of field? (ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS) 

18068291
Edge-strength of flowable resin-composites. 
OBJECTIVES: To evaluate in vitro the failure-forces of flowable composites at different distances from an interface edge of a bulk material. METHODS: Seven materials were investigated. An edge-strength testing instrument (CK10) was used in this study. Fourteen disc specimens were prepared (12mmx2.5mm) for each material using Teflon moulds, with a layering technique and light curing at 500mW/cm(2). Measurements were made (n=5 per distance) at 0.4mm until 1.0mm distance from the edge with 0.1mm interval. All specimens prepared were stored in distilled water at 37 degrees C for 1 week. The failure-force was recorded for each test and the failure mode was examined under the integral microscope of the CK10. One-way ANOVA followed by Tukey post-hoc test at the significance level of 0.05 was used for statistical analysis. RESULTS: The highest failure-force at 0.5mm (edge-strength) was found with Grandio flow (130.2N) while the lowest was with Filtek flow (103.6N). Significant correlation was found between the failure-forces and the increasing distance from the edge in all flowable composites giving coefficients ranging from r(2)=0.98 to 0.95. However, no correlation was found between the failure-forces and the percent filler (wt.%) of flowable composites at all distances. Two modes of failure were observed cracking and chipping. CONCLUSIONS: Edge-strength of flowable composites could be used to differentiate between materials and predict their clinical margin performance. Edge-fracture resistance of flowable composites is lower towards the margins than towards the centre of restoration. 

3609873
Impairment of memory and consciousness in migraine: clinical and EEG study. 
We report the clinical and EEG study of three migraine patients who presented with peculiar clinical phenomena related to migraine attack. The first case is a transient global amnesia that followed a classic migraine status. The second is a confusional state that complicated a classic migraine attack. The third is a complex attack with combined features of migraine and epilepsy. 

8692518
Infertility treatment dropout and insurance coverage. 
OBJECTIVE: To assess early patient dropout rates during infertility treatment as a potential measure of wasted resources. METHODS: The study involved multifaceted population cohorts, including a prospectively observed captive health maintenance organization (HMO) population and retrospectively selected preferred provider organization (PPO) patients. One hundred twenty-eight HMO couples were followed prospectively for 6 months. The insurance carrier retroactively selected 96 couples from their PPO population who were believed to be infertility patients. They were matched by date, age, and time of hysterosalpingography to infertility patients in the carrier's HMO population. Patients were considered treatment dropouts if they either requested their provider to abandon further work-up or treatment, or if they failed to return for an appointment for 3 months. RESULTS: Forty-six of 128 (36%) HMO patients followed prospectively discontinued care within 180 days, with only eight (6.3%) providing defined reasons. Preferred provider organization patients uniformly demonstrated significantly higher dropout rates than HMO patients, a finding already apparent at 60 days (P < .002; odds ratio [OR] 3.67, 95% confidence interval [CI] 1.47-9.97) and 120 days of treatment (P = .002; OR 2.87, 95% CI 1.39-6.06). Among PPO patients, dropout rates were especially pronounced if infertility care was provided by generalists. At billing levels of at least $2000, HMO patients also demonstrated less dropout than PPO patients (P < .001; OR 6.14, 95% CI 2.72-14.79), with generalists again demonstrating a significantly larger patient loss than infertility specialists (P < .001; OR 0.18, 95% CI 0.66-0.49). CONCLUSION: Infertility patients demonstrate a surprisingly large early dropout rate, which is significantly larger if patients receive infertility care from generalists rather than specialists. Newly presenting infertility patients should be carefully evaluated, especially in indemnity situations, before expensive diagnostic and therapeutic interventions are ordered. 

14750829
Flexible bidentate pyridine and chiral ligands in the self-assembly of supramolecular 3-D cages. 
Discrete, nanoscopic 3-D cages are prepared in high yield via coordination-driven self-assembly from a variety of building blocks, including bidentate 3-substituted pyridines, chiral, and silicon-based tripods. All are characterized by NMR ((31)P, (1)H) and electrospray ionization mass spectrometry. 

8726589
Peripheral blood progenitor cell transplantation for breast cancer: pharmacoeconomic considerations. 
The recent observation that mobilized peripheral blood progenitor cells (PBPCs) can be used as a source of hematopoietic support has had a major effect on the cost and morbidity associated with bone marrow transplantation in patients with breast cancer. The pharmacoeconomic impact of this new technology is especially evident when secondary costs are analyzed. We see a reduction in hospital stay, decreased use of resources such as platelet transfusions and antibiotics, and long-term quality life-years gained for those patients benefiting from this therapy. Experienced transplant centers have found that the direct cost of high-dose chemotherapy using filgrastim and PBPC support is reduced as much as 50% to the patient or their insurance company. Pharmacists will play a key role in optimizing the benefits of PBPC transplantation, particularly because this therapy is moving to the outpatient arena. This article will review the pharmacoeconomic impact of PBPC transplantation primarily in terms of secondary cost measures and quality of life and discuss the limited direct cost data available and the impact of this therapy on pharmacy practice. 

1217291
[Reflection of evolutionary trends in the recovery pattern of the electrical activity in the human brain after unilateral electroshock] 
After unilateral electroshocks the following stages of the recovery of EEG may be defferentiated in man: residual seizure activity, flat EEG, low-amplitude polyform arrhythmia, monoform delta-rhythm, synchronized teta- and alpha-rhythms. It is assumed that changes of these stages reflect the migration of EEG pacemakers within the system of hierarchically interrelated brain structures, which provide for various forms of regulation of the electrical activity of the cortex. It was shown that in each of the hemispheres, pacemakers operate relatively independently and that electrical stimulation of the dominant (left) hemisphere affects brain activity to a greater extent than stimulation of nondominant (right) hemisphere. The ascending influences of desynchronizing systems of the brain stem are less lateral as compared to the ascending pathways of hypothalamic and thalamic structures. 

12729774
Miniplate removal in trauma and orthognathic surgery--a retrospective study. 
Records of patients undergoing the surgical removal of miniplates placed during the management of maxillofacial trauma (n=49) and orthognathic surgery (n=16) in a single unit, over a 2-year period have been analysed. Data concerning indications for plating, age and sex distribution, site of plating, time between insertion and removal, antibiotic prophylaxis, general medical factors and clinical indications for plate removal were evaluated for all patients. In addition, data for trauma patients included the site of fracture, and time delay between injury and plate insertion. Infection and/or wound dehiscence were the predominant causes for plate removal in both groups, in spite of the routine use of prophylactic antibiotics in a predominantly young, healthy cohort of patients. A removal rate of approximately 10% was found in the two groups of patients. This low rate would seem to imply that the routine removal of miniplates is not clinically indicated. 

8721597
Malignant chondroid syringoma: immunohistopathology. 
Malignant chondroid syringoma, also called malignant mixed tumor of the skin, is a rare variant of a malignant tumor derived from sweat gland cells. Histologically the tumor is composed of an epithelial and a mesenchymal component. The epithelial structures show glandular differentiation and carcinomatous features. They are embedded in a mucinous stroma with spindle mesenchymal cells and areas of chondroid differentiation. The epithelial cells express cytokeratins. The luminal epithelial cells show binding to the lectin Ulex europaeus; intraluminal cells are carcinoembryonic antigen positive. The stromal cells are cytokeratin negative and sporadically positive for vimentin. Chondroid areas are S-100 protein and vimentin positive. No labeling for actin is seen. 

18027695
[Effects of laminar shear stress on the expression of IL-8 receptor CXCR1 in endothelial cells] 
This study was conducted to elucidate the effects of different fluid shear stress on the expression of IL-8 receptors CXCR1 in endothelial cells. The HUVEC cell lines, EA. Hy926 cells, were cultured in vitro, exposed to 5.56, 10.02, and 15.27 dyn/cm2 laminar shear stress, respectively, and then the shear stress grous were each investigated at the time-points of 0h, 1h, 2h, 4h and 8h. Western blotting was used for detecting the expression of IL-8 receptor CXCR1 at the time-points. The results showed that, under 5.56 dyn/cm2 shear stress, the expression of CXCR1 increased with time significantly (P < 0.01). The maximum expression of CXCR1 appeared at 4 h and was 2.2 times that of the control. When exposed to 10.02 dyn/cm2, the expression of CXCR1 increased gradually with time and finally remained at a constant higher level. When exposed to 15.27 dyn/cm2, CXCR1 expression decreased significantly with time (P < 0.01). The minimum CXCR1 expression appeared at 8 h and was 62. 59 percent of that of the control. These results indicate that the expression of CXCR1 in endothelial cell is regulated by laminar shear stress. 

8908268
Role of fimbriae in adherence of Streptococcus pyogenes to pharyngeal epithelial cells. 
The adherence of bacteria to mucosal surface constitutes the initial, critical step in colonization and infection. Streptococcus Pyogenes (S. pyogenes) is one of the most important bacteria in tonsillitis and pharyngitis. The mode of the adherence of S. pyogenes to pharyngeal epithelial cells and the morphology of S. pyogenes were observed by scanning electron microscopy and transmission electron microscopy. The adherence of S pyogenes to pharyngeal epithelial cells was mediated by the fimbriae radiating from the surface of the bacteria. The M protein-negative (M-) strain had smooth, bare cell walls, whereas the M protein-positive (M+) strain had an exterior covered by hair-like fimbriae. 

3922502
Rapid measurement of creatine kinase activity in a coronary care unit using a portable benchtop reflectance photometer. 
Rapid measurements of plasma creatine kinase activity using an inexpensive benchtop reflectance photometer (Ames Seralyzer) and disposable reagent strips were evaluated in the laboratory and coronary care unit. The system proved simple to use and capable of yielding rapid (four minutes per analysis), precise (coefficient of variation less than 9%), and accurate results (correlation with routine method 0.995) when used by medical staff. Creatine kinase values were available 6.5-102 hours earlier than routine laboratory data, depending on the time and day of sampling, thereby facilitating appropriate and economic patient management. This instrument might be used to supplement the routine enzyme service for selected admissions, resulting in greatly improved availability of results and hence contributing to the early discharge of patients from intensive care facilities. 

1187001
[Antibiotic therapy and renal insufficiency. Pharmacokinetics of pivampicillin, cephaloridin and streptomycin in chronic uremic patients undergoing conservative or hemodialytic treatment] 
The plasma kinetics of some antibiotics (pivampicillin, cephaloridine, streptomycin) has been studied in patients with chronic renal failure. The oral administration of pivampicllin promptly increases the plasma levels of the antibiotic, without any toxic side effect: this antibiotic is to be chosen in chronic uremic patients, also during regular dialytic treatment (R.D.T.). Cephaloridine has some renal toxic effects in high concentration; in the renal failure it is advisable to calculate the exact dose of the antibiotic by the use of nomograms when the creatinine clearance is known. These nomograms must absolutely be employed when administrating some toxic antibiotics, as gentamycin and streptomycin in chronic uremic patients. Some formulas have been experimentally determined, which allow a calculation of the exact dose of the antibiotic, also during R.D.T. If a kidney or urinary tract infection is present in patients with low G.F.R. (creatinine-clearance less than 30 ml/min.), it is necessary to administer only those antibiotics which can reach an active urinary concentration (i.e. penicillin and derivatives, cephaloridine). 

11120662
Effect of streptozotocin-induced diabetes on glycogen resynthesis in fasted rats post-high-intensity exercise. 
It has recently been shown that food intake is not essential for the resynthesis of the stores of muscle glycogen in fasted animals recovering from high-intensity exercise. Because the effect of diabetes on this process has never been examined before, we undertook to explore this issue. To this end, groups of rats were treated with streptozotocin (60 mg/kg body mass ip) to induce mild diabetes. After 11 days, each animal was fasted for 24 h before swimming with a lead weight equivalent to 9% body mass attached to the tail. After exercise, the rate and the extent of glycogen repletion in muscles were not affected by diabetes, irrespective of muscle fiber composition. Consistent with these findings, the effect of exercise on the phosphorylation state of glycogen synthase in muscles was only minimally affected by diabetes. In contrast to its effects on nondiabetic animals, exercise in fasted diabetic rats was accompanied by a marked fall in hepatic glycogen levels, which, surprisingly, increased to preexercise levels during recovery despite the absence of food intake. 

1850883
Combined extracorporeal shock wave lithotripsy and percutaneous alkalinization in uric acid calculi. 
The combination of percutaneous alkaline irrigation and lithotripsy was performed in 5 cases of uric acid calculi obstructing the ureter. Shock wave lithotripsy accelerates the dissolution of uric acid stones. 

16656251
Metabolic Changes Associated with Vernalization of Wheat. I. Carbohydrate and Nitrogen Patterns. 
A spring wheat (Triticum aestivum) and an obligate winter wheat (Triticum compactum) variety were each grown for 5 weeks in controlled environments at 2 degrees and 25 degrees . The threshold for flower induction in the winter wheat was 4 to 5 weeks at 2 degrees , whereas the spring wheat had no low temperature requirement for flowering. Changes in the levels of carbohydrate and nitrogen fractions in the wheat leaves were determined during their growth in the cold and warm environments. There was an enhanced accumulation of the 5 carbohydrate fractions in both wheat varieties grown at 2 degrees compared to 25 degrees . Highly significant differences in the levels of sucrose, oligosaccharides, and starch were found between the spring and winter varieties grown at 2 degrees . The winter wheat seedlings grown at 2 degrees accumulated much more of these carbohydrates than the corresponding spring wheat. The carbohydrate patterns in both varieties grown at 25 degrees were nearly identical except for the final 2 weeks of growth. The level of nitrogenous substances in the tissues grown at 2 degrees was much higher than in the corresponding tissues grown at 25 degrees . The only significant difference between the spring and winter varieties was in the soluble protein fraction. This fraction rose nearly 3-fold in the winter variety grown at 2 degrees , whereas it remained nearly constant in the similarly grown spring wheat. Most of the changing chemical patterns observed in relation to the vernalization treatment appear to be metabolic alterations associated with low temperature rather than alterations directly related with the vernalization response. 

17641417
Transcription factor E2F-1 is upregulated in human gastric cancer tissues and its overexpression suppresses gastric tumor cell proliferation. 
The E2F family members play a critical role in cell cycle regulation and other biological processes in the cell. To better understand the involvement of E2F-1 in the development and progression of gastric tumors, we investigated the mutation and expression of E2F-1 in human gastric cancer tissues and the effect of E2F-1 overexpression on the proliferation of gastric carcinoma cells. In this study, 80 pairs of gastric cancer specimens and paratumor tissues from different patients and 40 stomach mucosa specimens from healthy individuals were examined. PCR-SSCP analysis demonstrated that mutations were not detected in any of the gastric cancer and normal tissue specimens. In addition, the results of an immunohistochemistry assay revealed higher expression rates of E2F-1 (P<0.01) in gastric cancer tissues (72.5%) than in paratumor tissues (30.0%) of the same individuals and stomach mucosa from healthy individuals (22.5%). However, no correlation was observed between the E2F-1 levels and patients' clinical features, such as sex, age, histological types, lymph node metastasis, and clinical stages (P>0.05). Finally, the influence of E2F-1 overexpression on the growth of human gastric carcinoma MKN-45 cells in vitro was assessed by measuring colony formation, cell survival, and cell cycle progression. Our data clearly showed that cell growth and proliferation were significantly inhibited in MKN-45 tumor cells transfected with the expression vector encoding E2F-1 in comparison with nontransfected cells or cells transfected with empty vector. These findings suggest that E2F-1, a stable and conservative gene during the oncogenesis and progression of stomach cancers, may potentially serve as a biomarker for clinical diagnosis of gastric carcinomas and as a target for the development of novel therapeutic interventions to treat this disease. 

9178757
Localization of ligand-binding domains of human corticotropin-releasing factor receptor: a chimeric receptor approach. 
Two CRF receptors, CRFR1 and CRFR2, have recently been cloned and characterized. CRFR1 shares 70% sequence identity with CRFR2, yet has much higher affinity for rat/human CRF (r/hCRF) than CRFR2. As a first step toward understanding the interactions between rat/human CRF and its receptor, the regions that are involved in receptor-ligand binding and/or receptor activation were determined by using chimeric receptor constructs of the two human CRFR subtypes, CRFR1 and CRFR2, followed by generating point mutations of the receptor. The EC50 values in stimulation of intracellular cAMP of the chimeric and mutant receptors for the peptide ligand were determined using a cAMP-dependent reporter system. Three regions of the receptor were found to be important for optimal binding of r/hCRF and/or receptor activation. The first region was mapped to the junction of the third extracellular domain and the fifth transmembrane domain; substitution of three amino acids of CRFR1 in this region (Val266, Tyr267, and Thr268) by the corresponding CRFR2 amino acids (Asp266, Leu267, and Val268) increased the EC50 value by approximately 10-fold. The other two regions were localized to the second extracellular domain of the CRFR1 involving amino acids 175-178 and His189 residue. Substitutions in these two regions each increased the EC50 value for r/hCRF by approximately 7- to 8-fold only in the presence of the amino acid 266-268 mutation involving the first region, suggesting that their roles in peptide ligand binding might be secondary. 

17765305
Vaccines against bluetongue in Europe. 
After the incursion of bluetongue virus (BTV) into European Mediterranean countries in 1998, vaccination was used in an effort to minimize direct economic losses to animal production, reduce virus circulation and allow safe movements of animals from endemic areas. Vaccination strategies in different countries were developed according to their individual policies, the geographic distribution of the incurring serotypes of BTV and the availability of appropriate vaccines. Four monovalent modified live virus (MLV) vaccines were imported from South Africa and subsequently used extensively in both cattle and sheep. MLVs were found to be immunogenic and capable of generating strong protective immunity in vaccinated ruminants. Adverse side effects were principally evident in sheep. Specifically, some vaccinated sheep developed signs of clinical bluetongue with fever, facial oedema and lameness. Lactating sheep that developed fever also had reduced milk production. More severe clinical signs occurred in large numbers of sheep that were vaccinated with vaccine combinations containing the BTV-16 MLV, and the use of the monovalent BTV-16 MLV was discontinued as a consequence. Abortion occurred in <0.5% of vaccinated animals. The length of viraemia in sheep and cattle that received MLVs did not exceed 35 days, with the single notable exception of a cow vaccinated with a multivalent BTV-2, -4, -9 and -16 vaccine in which viraemia persisted at least 78 days. Viraemia of sufficient titre to infect Culicoides insects was observed transiently in MLV-vaccinated ruminants, and natural transmission of MLV strains has been confirmed. An inactivated vaccine was first developed against BTV-2 and used in the field. An inactivated vaccine against BTV-4 as well as a bivalent vaccine against serotypes 2 and 4 were subsequently developed and used in Corsica, Spain, Portugal and Italy. These inactivated vaccines were generally safe although on few occasions reactions occurred at the site of inoculation. Two doses of these BTV inactivated vaccines provided complete, long-lasting immunity against both clinical signs and viraemia, whereas a single immunization with the BTV-4 inactivated vaccine gave only partial reduction of viraemia in vaccinated cattle when challenged with the homologous BTV serotype. Additional BTV inactivated vaccines are currently under development, as well as new generation vaccines including recombinant vaccines. 

3527152
Monoclonal antibodies to monoamine oxidase B and another mitochondrial protein from human liver. 
A monoclonal antibody has been generated to human liver monoamine oxidase (MAO) B by fusion of mouse myeloma cells with spleen cells from a mouse immunized with a mixture of semi-purified MAO A and MAO B. The antibody, 3F12/G10, an immunoglobulin G1, reacts with its antigen in cryostat sections of human liver, showing an intracellular particulate distribution as demonstrated by immunoperoxidase staining. The antibody indirectly precipitates [3H]pargyline-labelled human MAO B both from liver and platelet extracts but fails to precipitate MAO A from liver extracts. The antibody does not recognise rat liver MAO B, showing that the determinant is not universally expressed on MAO B. The antibody has no effect on the catalytic activity of MAO B. Other monoclonal antibodies were generated but they are directed to a protein with a subunit Mr of 54 000, a contaminant of the MAO preparation. One of these antibodies, A8/C2, an IgG2a, reacts with the same protein in both rat and human liver extracts. 

3702675
Endogenous hypertriglyceridemia in a nonobese rat model: plasma lipoproteins and dietary sensitivity. 
Sprague-Dawley male rats from the Ivanovas-Sieve colony (IVA-SIV) show higher plasma triglyceride levels compared to the standard Charles River (CR) rats. The triglyceride enrichment occurs primarily in the very-low-density lipoproteins (VLDL), otherwise of a normal % composition, suggesting that the number of particles is increased, rather than their triglyceride (TG) content. High-density lipoprotein (HDL) particles, corresponding to HDL1, appear to be increased in the IVA-SIV rats, as confirmed by rate-zonal ultracentrifugation. The apoprotein composition of isolated lipoproteins (apo B content and isoelectric focusing pattern), does not differ in the two strains. The IVA-SIV rats are remarkably more TG inducible, compared to the standard CR. This can be shown with fructose loading and with a cholesterol-cholic acid diet. The plasma TG increase, after Triton administration, indicative of the VLDL-TG production, is fourfold higher in the IVA-SIV, compared to the CR rats. These findings provide evidence for some similarities between the IVA-SIV rat and human endogenous hypertriglyceridemia, and suggest an increased TG biosynthesis in this model. 

12382231
The Acute Dialysis Quality Initiative--part VI: access and anticoagulation in CRRT. 
Both the choice of vascular access and anticoagulant regimen for continuous renal replacement therapy (CRRT) are a major determinant of not only circuit life span but also affect solute clearance. This evidence-based review critically examines the published rature on different vascular access sites, access types, and anticoagulation regimens, to provide clinical guidelines for good working practices and to direct future studies. 

11023123
Polyneuropathies of cats. 
Polyneuropathies of cats have a variety of clinical presentations. Areflexic flaccid quadriparesis, or quadriplegia, progressing over a 24- to 48-hour period, may be associated with polyneuropathies, as can chronic insidiously progressive tremors and muscle weakness that wax and wane or progress slowly over weeks or months, and which can go undiagnosed for years. In addition, these neurological signs may be due to spinal cord, neuromuscular junction or muscle disorders, so the diagnosis of polyneuropathy can be a challenge even for the most astute of clinicians. Polyneuropathies may have congenital, inherited, inflammatory, metabolic and toxic causes. Sometimes the underlying aetiology is not found and a diagnosis of idiopathic polyneuropathy is made. Since the treatment and prognosis of polyneuropathies in cats vary, the purpose of this review is to assist the veterinary practitioner to recognise, appropriately manage and provide an accurate prognosis for these challenging cases. 

182126
Effects of calcium ions and adenosine diphosphate on the activities of NAD+-linked isocitrate dehydrogenase from the radular muscles of the whelk and flight muscles of insects. 
1. The activity of NAD+-linked isocitrate dehydrogenase from the radular muscle of the whelk is higher than those in many vertebrate muscles and only slightly lower than in the flight muscles of insects. The enzyme activity from the whelk (Buccinum undatum) is stable for several hours after homogenization of the radular muscle, whereas that from insect flight muscle is very unstable. Consequently, the enzyme from the whelk muscle is suitable for a systematic investigation of the effects of Ca2+ and ADP. 2. The sigmoid response of the enzyme activity to isocitrate concentration is markedly increased by raising the Ca2+ concentration from 0.001 to 10 muM, but it is decreased by ADP. The inhibitory effect of Ca2+ is most pronounced at pH7.1; it is not observed at pH 6.5. Similar effects are observed for the enzyme from the flight muscle of the locust (Schistocerca gregaria) and the water bug (Lethocerus cordofanus). The percentage activation by ADP of the enzyme from either the whelk or the insects is greater at 10 muM-Ca2+, and 50% of the maximum activation is obtained at 0.10 and 0.16 mM-ADP for the enzyme from whelk and locust respectively at this Ca2+ concentration. At 10 muM-Ca2+ in the absence of added ADP, the apparent Km for isocitrate is markedly higher than in other conditions. Ca2+ concentrations of 0.01, 0.1 and 0.2 muM cause 50% inhibition of maximum activity of the enzyme from the muscles of the whelk, locust and water bug respectively. 3. Recent work has indicated that mitochondria may play a complementary role to the sarcoplasmic reticulum in the control of the distribution of Ca2+ in muscle. The opposite effects of Ca2+ on the activities of isocitrate dehydrogenase and mitochondrial glycerol phosphate dehydrogenase from muscle tissue are consistent with the hypothesis that changes in the intracellular distribution of Ca2+ control the activities of these two enzymes in order to stimulate energy production for the contraction process in the muscle. Although both enzymes are mitochondrial, glycerol phosphate dehydrogenase resides on the outer surface of the inner membrane and responds to sarcoplasmic changes in Ca2+ concentration (i.e. an increase during contraction), whereas the isocitrate dehydrogenase resides in the matrix of the mitochondria and responds to intramitochondrial concentrations of Ca2+ (i.e. a decrease during contraction). It is suggested that changes in intramitochondrial Ca2+ concentrations are primarily responsible for regulation of the activity of NAD+-isocitrate dehydrogenase in order to control energy formation for the contractile process. However, when the muscle is at rest, changes in intramitochondrial concentrations of ADP may regulate energy formation for non-contractile processes. 

18060935
Pregnancy-associated spontaneous coronary artery dissection. 
Spontaneous coronary artery dissection is a rare cause of acute myocardial infarction that occurs particularly in women during the pregnancy and in the postpartum period. We describe a dramatic case of pregnancy-related spontaneous left main coronary artery dissection that resulted in acute myocardial infarction with severe left ventricular dysfunction and was complicated by acute heart failure and cardiogenic shock. Urgent revascularization and restoration of myocardial perfusion that were performed in this case resulted in marked left ventricular function recovery and clinical improvement. 

17362729
Effect of preservation solution on graft viability in single-lung transplantation from heart-beating donors in pigs. 
BACKGROUND: Low-potassium-dextran preservation solution Perfadex (PER) may provide better outcome of transplanted lungs than high-potassium Euro-Collins (EC) solution. However, there are no comparative studies of the recipient inflammatory response to the graft. PURPOSE: The purpose of this study was to compare EC versus PER as preservation solutions with respect to the functional performance and inflammatory response in single-lung transplantation from heart-beating donors in pigs. MATERIALS AND METHODS: The donor left lung flushed with the corresponding cold preservation solution was stored at 3 degrees C for 3 hours. We assessed hemodynamic values and pulmonary function in the recipient over a 2-hour reperfusion period calculated as percent of basal values, and expressed as mean of the reperfusion period. Interleukin-8 (IL-8) concentration in the donor was estimated in bronchoalveolar lavage fluid 2 hours after recipient reperfusion. Biopsies of the donor right lung and the transplanted lung were obtained to measure myeloperoxidase (MPO) activity. IL-8 and MPO values were expressed as percent of the donor value. We evaluated the wet/dry pulmonary weight ratio (W/D), polymorphonuclear neutrophil count (PMN), and a score of histological damage in the transplanted graft. RESULTS: Pulmonary function evaluated by % static: 66.6 +/- 6.8 (EC), 82.3 +/- 10.2 (PER), and dynamic: 74.0 +/- 7.3 (EC), 89.3 +/- 7.7 (PER) compliances, as well as % IL-8: 562.5 +/- 168.6 (EC), 232.3 +/- 148.7 (PER), % MPO: 485.9 +/- 194.9 (EC), 140.8 +/- 21.1 (PER), W/D: 9.9 +/- 3.1 (EC), 6.8 +/- 1.4 (PER), PMN 13.5 +/- 6.8 (EC), 5.5 +/- 3.3 (PER) and the histological damage score: 3.0 +/- 1.5 (EC), 0.7 +/- 0.4 (PER) showed significant differences between the EC and the PER (P < .01). CONCLUSIONS: PER affords good lung preservation with early graft function and modest evidences of inflammation, lung injury, and edema compared with the EC perfused lung. 

5334765
Differentiation of cariogenic streptococci by fluorescent antibody. 
Jablon, J. M. (University of Miami, Miami, Fla.), and D. D. Zinner. Differentiation of cariogenic streptococci by fluorescent antibody. J. Bacteriol. 92:1590-1596. 1966.-Eight strains of streptococci were isolated from human carious lesions by the fluorescent-antibody (FA) technique. Seven of these strains produced experimental caries in hamsters or rats maintained on a high sucrose diet. The eighth strain was noncariogenic in animals but possessed some antigenic components in common with the cariogenic strains. On the basis of antigen-antibody reactions by microprecipitin and agar-gel diffusion patterns, the strains were divided into four groups; these groups differed with regard to their cariogenic activity in hamsters. Fluorescein-conjugated antisera, prepared against the human strains, showed some cross-reactions which interfered with the efficacy of the FA technique in differentiating between the related streptococcal groups. To eliminate these cross-reactions, a small amount of related-strain antisera was added to the fluorescein-conjugated antisera to the cariogenic strains. This technique is effective in blocking cross-reactions and should be tried wherever cross-reactions are encountered in the FA technique. 

9727181
Transcatheter occlusion of atrial septal defects: an initial experience with the Amplatzer septal occluder. 
OBJECTIVE: To discuss the initial experience with the use of a new double disc occluding device, the Amplatzer septal occluder in transcatheter occlusion of secundum atrial septal defects (ASD). METHODS: Transvenous sizing of secundum ASD was performed in five children under general anaesthesia using transoesophageal echocardiographic and fluoroscopic guidance. An Amplatzer septal occluder equal to or minimally larger than the stretched diameter of the ASD was used for transcatheter occlusion of the defect in three suitable patients. Pulmonary balloon valvuloplasty with a 18 mm x 3 cm Mansfield balloon catheter was carried out in one patient with associated pulmonary valvar stenosis in the same procedure setting. RESULTS: Stretched diameters of the defects in the three patients ranged from 14 to 17 mm. Devices of sizes 14, 17 and 17 were deployed through 7F and 8F sheaths, respectively. The upper and lower rims of interatrial septum were more than 8 mm in all patients. All patients had successful occlusion with complete obliteration of the atrial left to right shunting. Simultaneous pulmonary balloon valvuloplasty for the valvar stenosis reduced pressure gradient from 53 mmHg to 22 mmHg across the valve prior to septal occlusion in one patient. No intraprocedural or short-term complication was encountered. CONCLUSIONS: The design of the Amplatzer septal occluder permits ease in loading, delivery, deployment and stable seating of the device. This initial experience shows that Amplatzer device occlusion is feasible, relatively safe and effective and appears to be a viable alternative to surgical closure of secundum atrial septal defects in properly selected patients. 

1417932
Effects of snake venom phospholipase A2 toxins (beta-bungarotoxin, notexin) and enzymes (Naja naja atra, Naja nigricollis) on aminophospholipid asymmetry in rat cerebrocortical synaptosomes. 
The effects of snake venom phospholipase A2 (PLA2) toxins (beta-bungarotoxin, notexin) and PLA2 enzymes (Naja nigricollis, Naja naja atra) on aminophospholipid asymmetry in rat cerebrocortical synaptic plasma membranes (SPM) were examined. Incubation of intact synaptosomes with 2 mM 2,4,6-trinitrobenzene sulfonic acid (TNBS) for 40 min, under non-penetrating conditions, followed by SPM isolation, allowed us to calculate the percentage of phosphatidylethanolamine (PE) and phosphatidylserine (PS) in the outer leaflet of the SPM, while incubation with disrupted synaptosomes provided total labeling values with the difference representing labeling of the inner leaflet. We found that 30% of the PE and 2% of the PS were in the outer leaflet, with 54% of the PE and 80% of the PS in the inner leaflet; 16% of the PE and 18% of the PS was inaccessible to TNBS. PLA2 toxins and enzymes increased in a concentration-dependent manner the percentage of PS and, to a lesser extent, the percentage of PE in the outer leaflet of the SPM, due to a redistribution from the inner to the outer leaflet. There was no correlation between the PLA2 enzymatic activities and the increased percentage of PS in the outer leaflet of the SPM induced by the PLA2 toxins and enzymes. Alteration of aminophospholipid asymmetry does not explain the greater presynaptic specificity and potencies of the PLA2 toxins as compared to the PLA2 enzymes, but may be associated with the increased acetylcholine release from synaptosomes induced by both the toxins and enzymes. 

1677110
Progestagen supplementation of exogenous oestrogens and risk of endometrial cancer. 
The favourable effects of exogenous progestagen on the endometrium are well known, but have not been adequately quantified with respect to endometrial cancer. The benefits of progestagen need to be weighted against its possible untoward effects on the risk of breast cancer and cardiovascular disease. A population-based case-control study of endometrial cancer was undertaken to evaluate the benefits of progestagen use. 158 incident cases were identified between 1985 and 1987 among women aged 40-64 years who were residents of King County, Washington. Detailed interviews were conducted and the responses were compared with those of 182 controls selected by random telephone digit dialling. The risk of endometrial cancer among women who had used unopposed oestrogen for more than 3 years was over five times that of women who had used no hormones (relative risk [RR] 5.7, 95% confidence interval [Cl] 2.5-12.8), whereas those who had also used a progestagen for at least six months of that time had an RR of only 1.6 (95% Cl 0.6-3.9). The RR differed according to days per month that progestagen was used: 2.4 (0.6-9.3) for progestagen use of less than 10 days per month versus 1.1 (0.4-3.6) for use of 10 or more days per month. These results provide additional evidence that the use of progestagen for 10 or more days per cycle can reduce the excess risk of endometrial cancer associated with long-term postmenopausal oestrogen use. 

679562
Reproducibility of ventilation studies. 
Differences in ventilation patterns were observed in several instances in two consecutive ventilation studies with 127 Xe and 133Xe gas involving a group of 20 patients with COPD and other pulmonary disorders. Included were differences in the distribution of a tracer gas bolus during the initial inspiration, the distribution of gas tracer after equilibration and during gas washout, artifacts external to the lung, and variations in the half-time for gas washout. The observed discrepancies are clinically significant and could lead to erroneous or ambiguous diagnoses. 

11933986
Self-reports of forgetting and remembering childhood sexual abuse in a nationally representative sample of US women. 
OBJECTIVE: The purpose of this article is to describe patterns of forgetting and remembering childhood sexual abuse (CSA) in a nationally representative sample of US adult women. METHOD: The respondents were a national probability sample of 711 women, aged 26 years to 54 years, residing in noninstitutional settings in the contiguous 48 states. In a 1996 face-to-face interview survey, trained female interviewers asked each respondent whether she had experienced any sexual coercion by family members or nonfamily members while growing up; whether she believed that she had been sexually abused (by family members or others); and whether she had ever forgotten the CSA experiences and, if so, how she had subsequently remembered them. RESULTS: Twenty-one and six-tenths percent of respondents reported having sexually coercive experiences while growing up; of these, 69.0% indicated that they felt they had been sexually abused. More than one-fourth of respondents who felt sexually abused reported that they had forgotten the abuse for some period of time but later remembered it on their own. Only 1.8% of women self-described as sexually abused reported remembering the abuse with the help of a therapist or other professional person. CONCLUSIONS: The findings indicate that, among women who report CSA, forgetting and subsequently remembering abuse experiences is not uncommon. According to the women surveyed, however, very few (1.8%) of those who felt abused recovered memories of CSA with help from therapists or other professionals. As one of the few studies of CSA memories in a nationally representative sample, this study suggests that therapist-assisted recall is not a major source of CSA memories among women in the US general population. 

8000166
[The adolescent psychiatric service in the Saxony free state and its contribution to health promotion] 
The tasks of the Public Health Service with particular reference to children and teenagers in the German Federal Land of Saxonia are laid down by legislation enacted by the Ministry for Culture on health care in schools (30.7.92). It is the main task of health promotion in schools to prevent health disorders and disturbed development in children and teens. The following tasks must be performed, among others: medical examination before admittance to school and in the classes 2, 5 and 9; public hours of consultation; and statistical documentation. All the essential demands on modern public health service for children and teens are part of current legislation in Saxonia. 

2846501
Chemotherapy with curative potential in small cell carcinoma of the lung. 
Despite response rates to combination chemotherapy regimens approaching 90 per cent, long-term survival is experienced by less than 10 per cent of patients with small cell carcinoma of the lung. Recent efforts to improve the efficacy of therapy have focused on the combined use of radiation and chemotherapy, alternating non-cross resistant chemotherapeutic regimens, dose intensification, and performance of surgery for selected patients with limited-stage disease. 

2103635
The isolated perfused heart according to Langendorff technique--function--application. 
1. Definition. The isolated perfused heart according to Langendorff is a preparation which is easily obtained from all warm-blooded animals. The heart is usually perfused at constant pressure, but frequently at constant flow, mostly with oxygenated saline solutions. The ventricles do not fill with the perfusate and therefore do not perform pressure-volume work. If, however, an intraventricular balloon is inserted, the ventricle can contract isovolumetrically. 2. Measuring parameters. Mechanical parameters of the working myocardium (contractile force, volume, ventricular diameter), mean coronary flow, bioelectrical parameters (EKG, monophasic injury potentials), and cardiac rhythm can be measured and recorded. 3. Function tests. The intact function of the working myocardium and the coronary vessels should be examined using various simple tests regarding the myocardium, the smooth musculature, and the endothelium of coronary vessels. 4. Possible applications. In the Langendorff-heart of normal or pretreated animals, inotropic, chronotropic, antiarrhythmic or vasoactive substances can be investigated in the steady state or by means of specific stress tests. In addition, the preparation is particularly suitable for biochemical studies of myocardial metabolism. 6. Advantages. Due to the technical ease with which a variety of parameters can be measured, a single heart can provide maximum information about the condition of the myocardium and the coronary vessels. Thus, it is not surprising to find that 90 years after its first description, the isolated perfused heart according to Langendorff continues to be utilized. 

16208708
Pericarditis associated with nickel hypersensitivity to the Amplatzer occluder device: a case report. 
A 38-year-old man with a history of migraine headaches with aura and one episode of ischemic stroke was found to have a patent foramen ovale (PFO). After percutaneous closure with the nickel-containing Amplatzer PFO occluder, the patient developed pericarditis, atrial fibrillation, and increased migraine headaches with aura that abated with oral prednisone. He tested positive for nickel hypersensitivity, which we conclude is the likely etiology of his pericarditis. 

8299706
Endocrine markers in malignant tumor cells producing parathyroid hormone-related protein. 
Humoral hypercalcemia of malignancy may reflect the synthesis and secretion of biologically active parathyroid hormone-related protein (PTHrP) by a given tumor. In the present study we investigated 25 human non-endocrine carcinomas which were clinically associated with hypercalcemia (Ca > 11 mg%). By applying PTHrP-specific immunocytochemistry, PTHrP could be detected in all tumors. The intra-tumorous distribution was heterogeneous with strong positivity in relatively few cells or weak positivity in the majority of cells. Surprisingly, in the PTHrP producing cells none of the marker proteins typical of endocrine cells (neuron-specific enolase, Leu-7 antigen, chromogranin, synaptophysin and endocrine granule constituent) was found. On the other hand, PTHrP producing cells of endocrine origin, such as medullary cancer, or normal and adenomatous parathyroid glands, all produce these endocrine markers. Thus for the first time, the existence of peptide hormone producing tumor cells is reported without expression of endocrine markers. This indicates a special mechanism of PTHrP secretion. 

8248223
Alteration of reproductive function but not prenatal sexual development after insertional disruption of the mouse estrogen receptor gene. 
Estrogen receptor and its ligand, estradiol, have long been thought to be essential for survival, fertility, and female sexual differentiation and development. Consistent with this proposed crucial role, no human estrogen receptor gene mutations are known, unlike the androgen receptor, where many loss of function mutations have been found. We have generated mutant mice lacking responsiveness to estradiol by disrupting the estrogen receptor gene by gene targeting. Both male and female animals survive to adulthood with normal gross external phenotypes. Females are infertile; males have a decreased fertility. Females have hypoplastic uteri and hyperemic ovaries with no detectable corpora lutea. In adult wild-type and heterozygous females, 3-day estradiol treatment at 40 micrograms/kg stimulates a 3- to 4-fold increase in uterine wet weight and alters vaginal cornification, but the uteri and vagina do not respond in the animals with the estrogen receptor gene disruption. Prenatal male and female reproductive tract development can therefore occur in the absence of estradiol receptor-mediated responsiveness. 

3130222
Effect of 24 mm levonorgestrel IUD on uterine endometrium of female rhesus monkeys, Macaca mulatta. 
Hysterectomy specimens were obtained from ten adult female rhesus monkeys treated with levonorgestrel-releasing intrauterine devices (IUDs) for a period of three, six and twelve months. The effect of levonorgestrel on the endometria, ovaries and fallopian tubes of removed uteri was examined in luteal phase of cycle. A uniform suppression of endometrium with glandular atrophy and pseudodecidualization of stromal cells was observed in endometrial biopsies, whereas ovaries and tubal epithelium exhibited normal physiological changes as evidenced by presence of ovulatory stigma along with well formed corpus luteum and secretory activity of tubal epithelium. 

10942389
HIV-1 gp120- and gp160-induced apoptosis in cultured endothelial cells is mediated by caspases. 
The immune dysfunction and cell destruction that occur in the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV)-infected host appear to result from the direct cytopathic effects of viral infection and the effects of viral proteins on uninfected bystander cells. Recently, the alpha-chemokine receptor CXCR4 has been reported to mediate apoptosis in neuronal cells and in CD4(+) and CD8(+) T cells after its binding to HIV-1 envelope proteins. In the current study, it was observed that human umbilical vein endothelial cells (HUVEC) undergo apoptosis after their treatment with the HIV-1 envelope proteins gp120/160. Anti-CXCR4 monoclonal antibody decreased HIV-1 gp120/160-induced apoptosis, suggesting that the CXCR4 chemokine receptor mediates the apoptotic effects of these HIV envelope glycoproteins. Further studies revealed that caspases play an important role in this process because the pretreatment of cells with a general caspase enzyme inhibitor decreased the extent of HUVEC apoptosis induced by gp120/160. In addition, it was found that caspase-3 was activated on HIV-1 gp120/160 treatment of these cells. It was also observed that gp120/160 treatment slightly increased the expression of the pro-apoptotic molecule Bax. These results suggest that HIV-1 envelope glycoproteins can disrupt endothelial integrity through the interaction with CXCR4, thereby facilitating virus transit out of the bloodstream and contributing to the vascular injury syndromes seen in acquired immunodeficiency syndrome. (Blood. 2000;96:1438-1442) 

14738863
The proteasome inhibitor, PS-341, causes cytokeratin aggresome formation. 
Mallory body (MB) experimental induction takes 10 weeks of drug ingestion. Therefore, it is difficult to study the dynamics and mechanisms involved in vivo. Consequently, an in vitro study was done using primary tissue culture of hepatocytes from drug-primed mice livers in which MBs had already formed. The hypothesis to be tested was that MBs are cytokeratin aggresomes, which form when hepatocytes have a defective ubiquitin-proteasome pathway by which turnover of cytokeratin proteins is prevented. To test this hypothesis, primary tissue cultures of the hepatocytes from normal and MB-forming livers were incubated with the proteasome inhibitor PS-341 and then the cytokeratin filaments and the filament connecting proteins, that is, beta-actin, and ZO1, were visualized by immunofluorescence microscopy. PS-341 caused detachment of the cytokeratins from the cell surface plasma membrane. The cytokeratin filaments retracted toward the nucleus and cytokeratin aggresomes formed. In human livers, MBs showed colocalization of cytokeratin-8 (CK-8) with ubiquitin but not with beta-actin or ZO1. Mouse hepatoma cell lines were studied using PS-341 to induce cytokeratin aggresome formation. In these cell lines, the cytokeratin filaments first retracted toward the nucleus then formed cytokeratin-ubiquitin aggresomes polarized at one side of the nucleus. At the same time, the cells became dissociated from each other, however. The results simulated MB formation. MBs differ from cytokeratin aggresomes both morphologically and in ultrastructure. 

471852
Autoimmune hemolytic anemia. 2. Drug-induced type. 
A variety of commonly prescribed drugs can produce a positive direct antiglobulin test, but the incidence of actual drug-induced hemolytic anemia is low. Of the four mechanisms which may be responsible, only one involves autoantibody production; the others include drug-RBC interaction of the hapten type, immune complex formation, and direct alteration of the RBC membrane. 

11224728
Role of corticosteroids in stable chronic obstructive pulmonary disease. 
Evidence supporting or refuting the use of corticosteroids in the treatment of patients with chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) has only recently become available, and evidence is still missing for a number of important clinical issues. Results from four large studies on the long-term effects of inhaled corticosteroids on COPD and other controlled studies on the more short-term effects of inhaled corticosteroids provide evidence that regular treatment with these drugs is only appropriate for a limited group of patients with COPD. These include symptomatic COPD patients with documented spirometric response to inhaled corticosteroids or those with a forced expiratory volume in 1 second (FEV(1)) less than 50% predicted and repeated exacerbations requiring treatments with antibiotics or oral corticosteroids. 

15059193
Creola bodies in wheezing infants predict the development of asthma. 
Creola bodies (CrBs) have been shown to be present specifically in the sputum of adults with asthma, and are clinically useful in the estimation of airway hyper-responsiveness through correlation with the levels of eosinophil cationic protein in the sputum. Our aim was to investigate whether CrBs can be detected in the sputum of wheezing infants, and the clinical significance of CrBs in wheezing infants in the development of asthma. Twenty-three wheezing infant patients, mean age 5.3 months, were studied. The presence of CrBs in the sputum was determined by Papanicolau's stain. The patients were divided into two groups: CrB positive [CrB(+)] and CrB negative [CrB(-)]. In addition, we examined the relationship between the presence of CrBs and the asthma symptom scores that occurred during a 1-month post-discharge period. The following results were obtained: (i) CrBs were detected in 15 of 23 (65%) wheezing infants; (ii) the asthma symptom scores after discharge was significantly higher in the CrB(+) group than in the CrB(-) group (p < 0.001); (iii) in the infants experiencing their first episode of wheezing, the asthma symptom scores during the post-discharge period was also significantly higher in the CrB(+) group than in the CrB(-) group (p < 0.05). Furthermore, infantile asthma was diagnosed in 12 (80.0%) infants in the CrB(+) group during the following 2-yr period, but none in the CrB(-) group. These findings suggest that CrBs detected in the sputum of wheezing infants may be used to identify the progression to infantile asthma. 

2677665
[Renal tubular impairment after surgery] 
It is well known that acute renal failure (ARF) after surgery has a high mortality rate. The purpose of this paper is to clarify the renal tubular damage following surgery. Urinary beta 2 microglobulin (u-BMG) and urinary N-acetyl-beta-D-glucosaminidase (u-NAG) activities, thought to be the sensitive indicators of renal tubular impairment, were measured in 48 patients treated surgically in our clinic. Three out of 48 patients developed ARF. Remaining 45 showed normal values in conventional renal function tests, while u-BMG and u-NAG revealed abnormally high levels in many cases. Bleeding amount during surgery, operative time, postoperative complications, especially circulatory shock, and preoperative hypotention were the factors which correlated closely to the elevation of u-BMG and u-NAG. Administration of urinastatin prevented the u-NAG elevation postoperatively, while it had no effect on u-BMG. 

422606
Closed Ender nailing of femoral-shaft fractures. 
Closed Ender nailing was used in sixty fractures of the femoral shaft. Follow-up examination in fifty-two cases is reported. There were only two failures of the method, both in fractures with supracondylar extension. Simple transverse and short oblique fractures and those with unicortical comminution were shown to be stable after nailing, while long oblique fractures and lesions with bicortical comminution had a tendency to shorten and often required cerclage wiring, cast-bracing, or traction. The average hospital stay was 23.7 days. The operations were simple and quick. There was one case of osteomyelitis, one of clinically apparent thrombophlebitis, and one of fat-embolism syndrome in a patient with multiple fractures and multisystem injuries. There were no cases of breakage of the nail, delayed union, or non-union. In most cases knee motion returned to the preinjury level, although in five knees removal of the nails was necessary. The two failures of nailing which required plate fixation occurred in fractures extending into the supracondylar region. Therefore, these fractures are not suitable for Ender nailing. 

17360845
Risk factors for the presence of high-level shedders of Escherichia coli O157 on Scottish farms. 
Escherichia coli O157 infections are the cause of sporadic or epidemic cases of often bloody diarrhea that can progress to hemolytic uremic syndrome (HUS), a systematic microvascular syndrome with predominantly renal and neurological complications. HUS is responsible for most deaths associated with E. coli O157 infection. From March 2002 to February 2004, approximately 13,000 fecal pat samples from 481 farms with finishing/store cattle throughout Scotland were examined for the presence of E. coli O157. A total of 441 fecal pats from 91 farms tested positive for E. coli O157. From the positive samples, a point estimate for high-level shedders was identified using mixture distribution analysis on counts of E. coli O157. Models were developed based on the confidence interval surrounding this point estimate (high-level shedder, greater than 10(3) or greater than 10(4) CFU g(-1) feces). The mean prevalence on high-level-shedding farms was higher than that on low-level-shedding farms. The presence of a high-level shedder on a farm was found to be associated with a high proportion of low-level shedding, consistent with the possibility of a higher level of transmission. Analysis of risk factors associated with the presence of a high-level shedder on a farm suggested the importance of the pathogen and individual host rather than the farm environment. The proportion of high-level shedders of phage 21/28 was higher than expected by chance. Management-related risk factors that were identified included the type of cattle (female breeding cattle) and cattle stress (movement and weaning), as opposed to environmental factors, such as water supply and feed. 

16851071
Experimental and computational study of the electronic structural changes in LiTi2O4 spinel compounds upon electrochemical Li insertion reactions. 
Electronic structural changes in LiTi(2)O(4) spinel compounds upon electrochemical lithium insertions were investigated by X-ray absorption spectroscopy (XAS) measurements and first principles calculations based on spin-polarized density functional theory. Ti K-edge, O K-edge XAS spectra and theoretical calculations indicate that oxide ions as well as titanium ions are involved in electronic structural changes caused by electrochemical lithium ion insertions. The considerable effect of the oxide ions in the early 3d transition metal (titanium) oxide system is discussed in this article. 

2547289
Fine needle aspiration cytology in the assessment of breast lumps in Ibadan. 
Within the period August 1984 to January 1987, 209 needle aspirates of breast lumps were examined cytologically. One hundred and forty-four smears had histological confirmation. The diagnostic accuracy of fine needle aspiration cytology for malignancy is 79% in this study, with a specificity of 97%. The role of fine needle aspiration cytology, as a useful diagnostic tool and a necessary adjunct to clinical examination in the assessment of breast lumps is discussed. 

1403887
Simplifying the altered cast impression technique for distal-extension removable partial dentures. 
This technique allows construction of a detachable custom tray by the dental laboratory before the distal extension RPD framework is returned to the dentist. This permits a framework try-in with unencumbered physiologic relief, rapid attachment of the custom tray, subsequent impression making, and possibly jaw relation records all in one patient visit. 

15247065
Aging, exercise, and phytochemicals: promises and pitfalls. 
Phytochemicals are emerging comprehensive and versatile sources of antioxidants to be consumed to enhance the body's defenses against harmful reactive oxygen species generated endogenously or exogenously. Tocols, favonoids, and phenolic acids compose the majority of this class of antioxidants, although more complex compounds may also be involved, such as ginsenosides. In vitro and in vivo studies have demonstrated convincingly that dietary supplementation of phytochemicals has beneficial effects against certain types of pathogenesis, disease, cancer, and aging. There is evidence that these effects are related to the ability of phytochemicals to promote the antioxidant defense system and reduce oxidative stress and damage in the cell. However, due to their structural and chemical diversity and complexity, many of the benefits as well as potential adverse effects remain to be examined. 

7816454
Clinical pathophysiology of vestibular neurectomy. 
This study attempts to characterize the residual vestibular function remaining after incomplete supralabyrinthine vestibular neurectomy performed for disabling vertigo. Patients with bilateral vestibular neurectomy had preserved horizontal vestibulo-ocular reflexes in response to high angular accelerations with gain enhancement over time. A torsional down-beating spontaneous nystagmus and an important tilt of the subjective vertical were observed when the remaining eighth nerve was sectioned after homolateral incomplete supralabyrinthine vestibular neurectomy. These findings suggest that a reorganization of vestibular reflexes may occur after incomplete supralabyrinthine vestibular neurectomy if afferents of the inferior vestibular branch are partially spared. The vestibular function after incomplete supralabyrinthine vestibular neurectomy does not affect the postoperative control of vertiginous attacks and may have positive effects in case of deterioration of the contralateral inner ear. 

1687664
Brain glutamine synthetase activity and hyperoxia in neonatal rats. 
We have previously shown that exposure to 100% oxygen for 2 h results in a two-fold decrease in the brain glutamine synthetase activity of neonatal rats. The present study examines whether this decrement in enzyme activity leads to a global accumulation of glutamate, an excitotoxin which is a substrate for this enzyme. Despite a demonstrable decrement in whole brain glutamine synthetase activity, whole brain glutamate content is unaltered in animals exposed to 100% oxygen for 2 h. Furthermore, despite a persistent two-fold decrement in glutamine synthetase activity in animals exposed to 100% oxygen for 6 h, there remained no significant difference in glutamate content or in the glutamate/glutamine ratio between these animals and animals similarly exposed to room air. These results imply that the observed decrease in glutamine synthetase activity does not globally influence the glutamate content of the brain. 

1957123
Sucralfate--safety and side effects. 
The safety of sucralfate in terms of aluminium absorption, excretion, tissue accumulation, and toxicity is discussed, with special reference to the small amount of aluminium absorbed, its ready excretion by the normal kidney, and the hazard of toxicity in patients with advanced renal failure. The various manifestations of aluminium toxicity are described, and the notion that Alzheimer's disease should be included in this category is refuted. The clinical relevance of possible intraluminal binding and drug-drug interactions in patients receiving sucralfate therapy is also considered. Evidence is presented to show that sucralfate reduces the hyperphosphataemia in chronic uraemia, albeit at the risk of raised blood aluminium levels, but has no measurable effect on normal phosphate levels in patients with good renal function. The bioavailability of phenytoin, fluoroquinolone antibiotics, and H2-receptor blockers may be impaired by concomitant dosing with sucralfate, but normal kinetics are restored by administering the drug 2 h before sucralfate. 

1253422
Fluorometry of plasma amino nitrogen, with use of fluorescamine. 
We describe a fluorometric procedure, with use of fluorescamine, for determining plasma amino nitrogen in a 10-mul sample of deproteinized plasma. Values for apparently healthy human subjects agree well with those obtained by spectrophotometry. The simplicity and speed of the assay recommends it as a screening procedure for detecting aminoacidopathies. 

12677263
The Beginnings of Drug Therapy: Ancient Mesopotamian Medicine. 
As civilizations developed and human and domesticated animal population density increased, protozoan, bacterial and viral disease-causing organisms had an expanded field for their propagation. This increase was particularly rapid and occurred at a very early date in Mesopotamia. Many closely related civilizations developed in Mesopotamia, including the Sumerians. Even in the early Sumerian civilization, medicine had developed considerably. Much of our knowledge of their medical practices comes from cuneiform clay tablets, many of which are prescriptions for medicine. (c) 2002 Prous Science. All rights reserved. 

15297722
[Creation of functional muteins using phage libraries for pharmacoproteomic-based drug discovery and development of DDS] 
Tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-alpha) has been expected to be a promising new antitumor agent, but toxic side effects by the systemic administration of TNF-alpha limit its clinical application. In this study, we attempted to improve the therapeutic potency of TNF-alpha by using our protein-drug innovation systems. Among phage libraries displaying various mutant TNF-alphas, we isolated some lysine-deficient super mutant TNF-alphas, typified by mTNF-alpha-K90R, with higher TNF-receptor affinities and stronger bioactivity in vitro, in spite of the importance of lysine residues for trimer formation and receptor binding. mTNF-alpha-K90R showed more than 10 times stronger in vivo antitumor effects and 1.3 times less toxicity than wild-type TNF-alpha (wTNF-alpha). Site-specifically mono-PEGylated mTNF-alpha-K90R (sp-PEG-mTNF-alpha-K90R) at N-terminus showed higher in vitro bioactivity than unmodified wTNF-alpha, whereas randomly mono-PEGylated wTNF-alpha at a lysine residue (ran-PEG-wTNF-alpha) had less than 6% of the bioactivity of wTNF-alpha. The antitumor therapeutic window of sp-PEG-mTNF-alpha-K90R was extended by about 5 times, 60 times and 18 times compared with those of mTNF-alpha-K90R, wTNF-alpha and ran-PEG-wTNF-alpha, respectively. sp-PEG-mTNF-alpha-K90R may, thus, be a potential systemic anti-tumor therapeutic agent. These data suggested that our fusion protein-drug innovation system composed of a creation system of functional mutant proteins based on phage display technique and a site-specific PEGylation system may open up a new avenue to the optimal protein therapy. 

3171028
Severe illness in older patients: the association between depressive disorders and functional dependency during the recovery phase. 
An association between depression and physical dependency arising from a recent illness has been generally accepted. To clarify this relationship over time, 30 medical rehabilitation patients aged 54 to 94 years were assessed 1 week after admission and at discharge to quantify symptoms of depression, physical dependency, and cognitive functioning using the Hamilton Depression Scale (HAM-D), the Geriatric Depression Scale (GDS), the Barthel Index for physical function, and the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE). Significant depressive symptomatology was found by HAM-D in 25 patients on admission and 14 on discharge. No significant associations were present between either admission or discharge depression scores and all other variables. The HAM-D change score was significantly correlated with the Barthel change score (r = 0.57, P less than 0.001) and with the MMSE change score (r = 0.48, P = 0.01). All patients whose mood improved also improved in physical functioning, whereas 75% of those whose mood did not improve failed to make headway in physical functioning. This implies that it is not the degree of physical incapacity but rather the failure to regain prior abilities which is strongly associated with persisting depression following a catastrophic illness. Furthermore, characteristics found commonly in the group whose mood did not improve included physicians' failure to diagnose and treat depression or a setback from a significant medical or surgical complication. 

7344584
Congenital Lobar emphysema. 
Congenital lobar emphysema is a rare but important clinical entity which may come to the paediatrician as an acute respiratory emergency. This is defined as a post-natal over-distension of one or more lobes of a histologically normal lung. To the best of our knowledge, this condition has not been reported in Indian Medical Literature to-date. Not that the actual incidence of Congenital Lobar Emphysema has changed materially but increased clinical awareness of the possibility of the diagnosis and the widespread use of roentgenography in infants has clearly resulted in frequent recognition of this condition. The plain x-ray study is so characteristic that an immediate diagnosis can be made for further line of management. 

3397971
A prospective study comparing incisional labial to incisional parotid biopsies in the detection and confirmation of sarcoidosis, Sjogren's disease, sialosis and lymphoma. 
Simultaneous incisional biopsies of labial minor salivary glands and the superficial lobe of the parotid were accomplished in patients suspicious for sarcoidosis, Sjogren's disease, sialosis and lymphomatous changes in Sjogren's disease. Labial minor salivary gland biopsies identified sarcoidosis in 11 of 31 (36%) patients, compared to 29 of 31 (93%) patients using the parotid biopsy (p = 0.005). Similarly, the labial minor salivary gland biopsy confirmed 21 of 36 (58%) patients to have Sjogren's disease, compared to 36 of 36 (100%) (p = 0.005) patients confirmed using the parotid biopsy. Five patients with normal labial salivary gland biopsies were shown to have idiopathic hypertrophic sialosis with enlarged parotids identified by the parotid biopsy. Five additional patients were diagnosed with lymphoma occurring within the parotid glands of patients with Sjogren's disease, via the parotid biopsies, that were not identifiable with the labial minor salivary gland biopsy. The parotid biopsy consistently identified each disease entity in an earlier stage, and with more evident histopathology. Neither technique showed appreciable morbidity. Three of 77 patients showed a sensory loss related to labial salivary gland biopsy. No sensory or motor nerve loss was associated with the parotid biopsy. 

10993496
Mitochondrial mutations of Leber's hereditary optic neuropathy: a risk factor for multiple sclerosis. 
Multiple sclerosis (MS) and Leber's hereditary optic neuropathy (LHON) have been found to occur in combination. Based on an extensive literature search and on a clinical analysis of 55 LHON pedigrees (103 patients) and 40 patients with definite MS, this study concludes that the association of LHON and MS is more than a coincidence, and that carrying a primary LHON mutation is a risk factor for developing MS. All three primary LHON mutations occurring in the European and North American populations have been found to be associated with an MS-like syndrome. The neurological characteristics of MS associated with LHON are indistinguishable from those of MS in general, but the severe and bilateral visual symptoms and signs justify considering these patients as a clinical subgroup of MS and screening them for LHON mutations. However, screening LHON patients for MS appears to be more rewarding. 

8591430
Estimation of motility of subgingival microflora using high speed shutter camera and image analysis system. 
This paper reports on the development of a motility measuring system for human subgingival microflora using a high speed shutter camera and an image analysis system. The paper first presents the method for estimating the motility of subgingival microflora by the total number of pixels and then describes the evaluation of the total number of pixels as an indicator of bacterial motility. Our results with this system demonstrate that the motility of subgingival microflora can be expressed as the total number of pixels. 

1744574
Effects of beta-endorphin and naloxone on corticosterone and cortisol release in the newt (Triturus carnifex): studies in vivo and in vitro. 
The effects of beta-endorphin and its receptor antagonist, naloxone, on corticosterone and cortisol production in male and female Triturus carnifex were studied in vivo and in vitro. In the in-vivo experiment, the animals were injected s.c. with beta-endorphin and/or naloxone, and killed after 15, 30, 90 and 360 min. In the in-vitro experiment, interrenal tissues, with and without added pituitary, were incubated with beta-endorphin and/or naloxone for 15, 30, 60 and 120 min. The data obtained in vivo and in vitro from males and females were in agreement. Treatment with beta-endorphin caused a significant decrease in corticosterone and cortisol release, while naloxone induced an increase in the two corticosteroids at the same times as the decrease caused by beta-endorphin. The combined beta-endorphin plus naloxone treatment did not change corticosterone and cortisol levels. These results suggest that, in Triturus carnifex, opioids are involved in the regulation of the hypothalamo-pituitary-interrenal axis. In particular, the in-vitro results indicate a direct effect of opioids on interrenal steroidogenesis. 

18045413
New water disinfection system using UVA light-emitting diodes. 
Aim: To evaluate the ability of high-energy ultraviolet A (UVA) light-emitting diode (LED) to inactivate bacteria in water and investigate the inactivating mechanism of UVA irradiation. Methods and Results: We developed a new disinfection device equipped with high-energy UVA-LED. Inactivation of bacteria was determined by colony-forming assay. Vibrio parahaemolyticus, enteropathogenic Escherichia coli, Staphylococcus aureus and Escherichia coli DH5alpha were reduced by greater than 5-log(10) stages within 75 min at 315 J cm(-2) of UVA. Salmonella enteritidis was reduced greater than 4-log(10) stages within 160 min at 672 J cm(-2) of UVA. The formation of 8-hydroxy-2'-deoxyguanosine in UVA-LED irradiated bacteria was 2.6-fold higher than that of UVC-irradiated bacteria at the same inactivation level. Addition of mannitol, a scavenger of hydroxyl radicals (OH( )), or catalase, an enzyme scavenging hydrogen peroxide (H(2)O(2)) to bacterial suspensions significantly suppressed disinfection effect of UVA-LED. Conclusion: This disinfection system has enough ability to inactivate bacteria and OH( ) and H(2)O(2) participates in the disinfection mechanism of UVA irradiation. Significance and Impact of the Study: We newly developed UVA irradiation system and found that UVA alone was able to disinfect the water efficiently. This will become a useful disinfection system. 

6977636
Physiologic model for the pharmacokinetics of 2'deoxycoformycin in normal and leukemic mice. 
A flow-limited physiologic mathematical model has been developed to describe the time course of 2'deoxycoformycin (2'dCF) concentrations in the plasma and tissues of mice following iv and ip doses. Urinary excretion is modeled as a linear involving filtration and secretion, since kidney clearance exceeded estimated glomerular filtration rate. Intracellular binding is described as the sum of linear nonspecific binding plus strong saturable binding to adenosine deaminase. Pharmacokinetic parameters are determined by a sequential optimization scheme in which each tissue is studied by means of a hybrid model. The model has been used to predict pharmacokinetic behaviour of 2'dCF in both normal and leukemic mice, and model simulations are compared with published data. 

1799102
[A comparative analysis of the functional stability (based on electrophysiological criteria) of slices of the suslik and guinea pig brains maintained under deep hypothermia] 
The effect of prolonged deep cooling has been investigated in hippocampal and septal slices from the brain of hibernating and active ground squirrels, as well as of the guinea pigs. The slices were kept at low temperatures (2-4 degrees C) for various periods of time (from several hours to 6 days) and were periodically tested in a warm (31 degrees C) incubation medium. Hippocampal field potentials (mainly of the field CA1) and spontaneous activity of single neurones of the medial septum were recorded. Significant differences were observed in the recovery of functional activity of the slices after their preparation as well as after cooling between experimental groups of animals. Slices from hibernating ground squirrels retained their activity for 7-9 days, those from active ones--for 6-7 days, whereas slices from guinea pigs did not recover their functional activity after cooling for more than 1-2 days. 

8821233
Cortical bone cyst following a greenstick radial fracture. 
There are only a few reports of well defined cystic lesions of the peripheral skeleton following fracture. In children, these lesions are mostly small cortical defects affecting the distal radial metaphysis after a greenstick or torus fracture. A cyst is reported complicating a greenstick fracture, together with a brief review of published reports confirming that these are asymptomatic lesions which can be managed conservatively without further investigation. 

15108074
Telomerase activation and expression of its catalytic subunits in benign and malignant tumors of the parathyroid. 
PURPOSE: Telomerase activity (TA) has been extensively studied in tumors of many organs, but not the parathyroid gland. Therefore, we investigated TA in parathyroid tumors, and examined the mRNA expression of its catalytic subunits. METHODS: We examined 17 single adenomas, one hyperplastic parathyroid gland, and one metastatic parathyroid cancer and quantified TA by fluorescence-based TRAP analysis. We also studied the expression of telomerase catalytic subunits in nine adenomas and one cancer by reverse transcription - polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) analysis. RESULTS: Telomerase activity was not detected in any of the adenomas or the hyperplastic gland; however, the metastatic cancer was highly positive for TA. Both human telomerase RNA ( hTR) and human telomerase-associated pretein (hTEP-1) mRNA were detected universally in every specimen tested. Conversely, human telomerase reverse transcriptase (hTERT) mRNA was not detected by the conventional electrophoresis-based technique. Faint expression of hTERT mRNA was detected by real-time RT-PCR only in the sample of parathyroid cancer. DISCUSSION: We hypothesize that TA plays a role in the malignant transformation of parathyroid disease and suggest that hTERT mRNA expression could be the key step for TA as in other malignancies. Telomerase activity and hTERT may be useful molecular targets of parathyroid cancer. 

10950916
Visual word form familiarity and attention in lateral difference during processing Japanese Kana words. 
The purpose of this study was to examine the relationship between familiarity and laterality in reading Japanese Kana words. In two divided-visual-field experiments, three- or four-character Hiragana or Katakana words were presented in both familiar and unfamiliar scripts, to which subjects performed lexical decisions. Experiment 1, using three stimulus durations (40, 100, 160 ms), suggested that only in the unfamiliar script condition was increased stimulus presentation time differently affected in each visual field. To examine this lateral difference during the processing of unfamiliar scripts as related to attentional laterality, a concurrent auditory shadowing task was added in Experiment 2. The results suggested that processing words in an unfamiliar script requires attention, which could be left-hemisphere lateralized, while orthographically familiar kana words can be processed automatically on the basis of their word-level orthographic representations or visual word form. 

3008575
Na+-H+ and Cl(-)-OH-(HCO3-) exchange in gastric glands. 
The pH-sensitive, fluorescent, cytoplasmic-trapped dye 2,7-bis(carboxyethyl)-5(6)-carboxyfluorescein (BCECF) has been used to measure intracellular (pHi) and pH electrode to measure extracellular pH (pHo) in suspensions of gastric glands isolated from rabbit stomachs. The fluorescence of BCECF-loaded glands was calibrated in terms of pHi by equilibrating pHo and pHi using ionophores or digitonin and titrating pHo to different values. An APPENDIX is included that covers details of dye calibration and interpretation of fluorescence signals. Glands incubated in NaCl Ringer solution had pHi 7.11. Na+-free Ringer solution caused pHi to decrease reversibly to 6.80. Na+-dependent alkalinization of pHi followed a similar time course to the acidification of pHo. These changes were blocked by 1 mM amiloride. When gland cells were acidified (using two different techniques) realkalinization was completely Na+ dependent but was independent of the presence of Cl-; also, neither high extracellular K+ concentration ([K+]o) nor high [K+]o plus 10(-5) M valinomycin affected the rates of Na+-dependent alkalinization. A neutral Na+-H+ exchanger was implicated. Glands also exhibited Cl(-)-dependent changes of pHi that were blocked by 4,4'-diisothiocyanostilbene-2,2'-disulfonic acid (2 X 10(-4) M). A Cl(-)-OH-(HCO3-) exchanger was indicated. Other studies showed that intracellular buffering capacity was approximately 45 mM (pH-1) and that the apparent proton conductance of gland cell membranes was small. 

101774
[Bone sarcoma (author's transl)] 
Sarcogenesis essentially follows two laws: The frequency of sarcoma is distributed according to the mesenchymal cell content in the different sections of the body. The sites of predilection are found within the same tissue systems in zones of increased growth activity and cell division. Clinical oncogenic statistics show that other factors apart from quantity of sarcogenic noxae and latent period are important in producing the malignancy. The synopsis of histology, X-ray findings and clinical examination is significant for diagnosis and for prognosis the degree of spread (TNM classification), localization and therapy. Early operation is still the most successful and most decisive therapeutic measure. The necessity for a supervised cancer follow-up is also shown in these tumors. 

15885038
Evaluation of general joint laxity, shoulder laxity and mobility in competitive swimmers during growth and in normal controls. 
The aim of the study was to evaluate differences between competitive swimmers and a reference group of school children concerning general joint laxity, laxity of the glenohumeral joint and range of motion in the shoulder. Materials and methods. Competitive swimmers (n = 120) were compared with references consisting of age and gender matched school children (n = 1277). General joint laxity was evaluated with the Beighton score. Anterior glenohumeral laxity was assessed according to the drawer test, and inferior glenohumeral laxity according to the sulcus test. Shoulder rotation was measured with a goniometer. RESULTS: Male swimmers of both age groups showed a higher degree of general joint laxity compared with the reference group while 9-year-old female swimmers alone had a lower degree of general joint laxity compared with references. No significant difference concerning shoulder laxity was noticed between groups. There was a decreased internal rotation in male and female swimmers as compared with the reference group. External rotation was reduced in female swimmers as compared with the female references. The same result was observed in male swimmers, but only at the age of 12 years. CLINICAL CONSEQUENCE: Competitive swimming in children seems to lead to a decreased range of motion with regard to shoulder rotation. However, the reason for this is still unclear and further investigations are needed. 

3070362
[Neutrocytopenia in childhood] 
In the paediatric patient neutropenia most often appears to be a transient symptom due to different non-haematological disorders. Persistent neutropenia, however, indicates a genuine disturbance of haemotopoiesis and myelopoiesis, respectively. The corresponding defects are either congenital or acquired, with clinical courses varying from asymptotic to life threatening disease. Diagnostic evaluation should comprise all methods available in order to obtain detailed classification of the type of neutropenic disorder. Therapeutic management is based on supprotive care. Immunosuppressive agents are discussed in patients with autoimmun neutropenia. For patients with severe congenital agranulocytosis bone marrow transplantation should be considered. In the future the availability of recombinant haematopoietic growth factors may provide a further therapeutic advantage. 

307479
Hemorrhagic gastritis: current concepts. 
Hemorrhagic gastritis is a common cause of upper GI hemorrhage, in which the clinical course may vary from a mild, self-limited illness when associated with gastric irritants, to lifethreatening massive hemorrhage when associated with stress in critically ill patients. Treatment is based upon early endoscopic diagnosis, withdrawal of offending gastric irritants, intensive organ system support, and reduction of gastric acidity. Angiographic techniques and surgery are restricted to patients who fail these supportive measures, often after blood replacement beyond the usual criteria for operative intervention, usually in patients with stress. Newer pharmacologic and endoscopic therapeutic modalities are under evaluation and may help improve survival among patients with massive hemorrhage from stress ulcer. 

1623643
Immune complexes and antibody levels in blisters over human leprosy skin lesions with or without erythema nodosum leprosum. 
Erythema nodosum leprosum (ENL) is a serious complication of lepromatous leprosy, affecting skin and peripheral nerves in a large percentage of these patients, and is presumed to result from spontaneous immunologic changes. Its pathogenesis is poorly understood, although histopathologic features have suggested immune complex (IC)-mediated injury. Abundant circulating antibody is present but no convincing correlation has been established between circulating IC and ENL. We have examined cutaneous leprosy lesions in vivo using blisters induced by prolonged gentle suction to determine whether or not IC are demonstrable in lesions with or without ENL, using an IC assay based on monoclonal rheumatoid factor binding. We also examined whether antibodies involved in such IC are produced locally or reach the skin via the circulation. Surprisingly large quantities of IC were found in ENL lesions, and in some cases the quantities were significantly higher than in matching serum. Total IgG, IgA, and IgM in the skin were not higher than expected, however. Attempts to demonstrate increases in intracutaneous levels of specific anti-Mycobacterium leprae antibodies were unsuccessful. This is the first report of the demonstration of IC in suction blister fluid. The results indicate that large quantities of IC may be present in cutaneous leprosy lesions and are consistent with the hypothesis that they are formed in situ when circulating antibody combines with antigen in the skin. The nature of the antigen in these IC remains undefined. 

3787979
[Transport function of lymphovenous anastomosis] 
The work is devoted to functional methods of examination of the lymphatic system in operations for the formation of lymphovenous anastomoses. The method of "moving bubble" was used for the investigation of the transport function of 50 lymphovenous anastomoses. This method was found to allow determination of the transport function of different variants of lympho-venous and lymphonodular-venous anastomoses, their patency and hermetic capacity and detection of the functionally more advantageous variant of the operation for the introduction into practice. 

2492876
Breast reconstruction following mastectomy. 
Breast reconstruction after mastectomy can avoid a permanent deformity. As a member of the breast management team, the reconstructive surgeon can give advice on timing and techniques. Breast reconstruction can either be started at the time of the mastectomy or delayed for months or years. Newer techniques of tissue expansion permit breast reconstruction without additional scars or significant hospitalization. Autogenous tissue breast reconstruction techniques are available that provide natural, long-lasting breast reconstruction without the need for a silicone breast implant. 

15596503
Skeletal muscle NAD(P)H two-photon fluorescence microscopy in vivo: topology and optical inner filters. 
Two-photon excitation fluorescence microscopy (TPEFM) permits the investigation of the topology of intercellular events within living animals. TPEFM was used to monitor the distribution of mitochondrial reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide (NAD(P)H) in murine skeletal muscle in vivo. NAD(P)H fluorescence emission was monitored ( approximately 460 nm) using 710-720 nm excitation. High-resolution TPEFM images were collected up to a depth of 150 microm from the surface of the tibialis anterior muscle. The NAD(P)H fluorescence images revealed subcellular structures consistent with subsarcolemmal, perivascular, intersarcomeric, and paranuclear mitochondria. In vivo fiber typing between IIB and IIA/D fibers was possible using the distribution and content of mitochondria from the NAD(P)H fluorescence signal. The intersarcomeric mitochondria concentrated at the Z-line in the IIB fiber types resulting in a periodic pattern with a spacing of one sarcomere (2.34 +/- 0.17 microm). The primary inner filter effects were nearly equivalent to water, however, the secondary inner filter effects were highly significant and dynamically affected the observed emission frequency and amplitude of the NAD(P)H fluorescence signal. These data demonstrate the feasibility, and highlight the complexity, of using NAD(P)H TPEFM in skeletal muscle to characterize the topology and metabolic function of mitochondria within the living mouse. 

14528487
Oxidation and degradation products of papaverine. Part II[1]: investigations on the photochemical degradation of papaverine solutions. 
The structure of the final degradation product formed in papaverine solutions in either water or chloroform was found to be a 2, 3, 9, 10-tetramethoxy-12-oxo-12H-indolo [2, 1-a] isoquinolinylium salt (a dibenzo [b, g] pyrrocolonium derivative). Its formation from papaverine oxidation products that is papaverinol, papaveraldine, and papaverine-N-oxide chloroform solutions under the influence of UV light, was investigated and possible reaction pathways are discussed. 

15214427
Determination of trace elements in wines and classification according to their provenance. 
Provenance and authenticity of wines can be recognized on the basis of typical mineral and trace element patterns by means of chemometric methods. Therefore analytical methods were developed for the determination of As, Be, Co, Cs, Ga, Li, Nb, Ni, Rb, Te, Ti, W, Y, and Zr as well as Mo, Cd, Sb, Tl, U, and the rare earth elements in wines by inductively coupled plasma mass spectrometry (ICP-MS). For low risk of contamination or loss of analyte as well as depletion of sample amount and an easy sample pretreatment, direct measurement of diluted wines was studied. The accuracy of the analytical results was proven by recovery experiments by method comparison with standard addition methods and measurement of digested wines. In addition to applying statistical methods for characterizing the precision of the methods, the uncertainty of the measurements was estimated. Results for the elements mentioned above and additional 16 elements (Al, B, Ba, Ca, Cr, Cu, Fe, Mn, Mg, P, Pb, Si, Sn, Sr, V, and Zn) were evaluated by data analytical methods. Due to a specific choice of the analytes for multivariate statistical investigation a prediction rate by cross validation of 88.6% could be achieved. 

2226312
Localization of the thyroxine binding sites in apolipoprotein B-100 of human low density lipoproteins. 
By photoaffinity labeling human low density lipoproteins (LDL) with [125I]T4 we confirmed our previous observation that of the three T4 binding sites of apolipoprotein B-100 (apoB-100) one is in its 26% NH2-terminal portion [apoB-26, the 140 kDa fragment, residues 1-1297] and two in the remaining 74% COOH portion (apoB-74, 410 kDa, residues 1298-4536). We now show that of these two sites one is in the NH2 portion of apoB-74 (apoB-44, 240 kDa, residues 1298-3249) and the other in the nonoverlapping COOH portion (apoB-30, 170 kDa, residues 3250-4536). ApoB-100 contains 13 binding sites for heparin, a known inhibitor of T4 binding to the major T4 carrier plasma proteins; however, heparin failed to inhibit T4 binding to apoB-100 and fragments thereof. The same failure was seen with three monoclonal antibodies (MAbs), 4G3, 5E11, and 43 that block totally or partially LDL binding to the LDL receptor [respective epitopes at residues 2980-3084 (apoB-44), 3441-3569, and 4027-4081 (apoB-30)]. Of the other 3 MAbs, all without effect on LDL binding to the LDL receptor, [1D1, 2D8, and 16, respective epitopes at residues 474-539 (apoB-26), 1438-1481 (apoB-44), and 4154-4189 (apoB-30)], only two (MAbs 1D1 and 2D8) inhibited T4 binding (21 to 39%). We conclude that the three T4-binding sites of apoB-100 are outside the LDL receptor binding domain, distant from the heparin binding sites and, assuming no allosteric effects, in the vicinity of residues 474-539 (T4 site of apoB-26), 1438-1481 (T4 site of apoB-44), and in the C terminal quarter of apoB-30. 

10600250
Color science and spectrum inversion: a reply to Nida-Rumelin. 
Martine Nida-Rumelin (1996) argues that color science indicates that behaviorally undetectable spectrum inversion is possible and raises this possibility as an objection to functionalist accounts of visual states of color. I show that her argument does not rest solely on color science, but also on a philosophically controversial assumption, namely, that visual states of color supervene on physiological states. However, this assumption, on the part of philosophers or vision scientists, has the effect of simply ruling out certain versions of functionalism. While Nida-Rumelin is quite right to search for empirical tests for claims about the nature of visual states, philosophical issues remain pivotal in determining the correctness of these claims. 

15903346
A new synthetic route to authentic N-substituted aminomaleimides. 
A number of compounds reported in the literature as N-aminomaleimides (2) are, instead, isomeric N-aminoisomaleimides (3). The ubiquity of this mischaracterization and its propagation within the literature are discussed. In addition, the first general synthetic route to aliphatic and aromatic N-substituted aminomaleimides is described. As an illustration, the compound reported to be N-(4-bromophenylamino)maleimide (2b) was prepared and determined to be N-(4-bromophenylamino)isomaleimide (3b). The authentic compound was synthesized by the condensation of 4-bromophenylhydrazine (7b) and the exo-furan/maleic anhydride Diels-Alder adduct (8) in acetic acid to produce the furan-protected aminomaleimide 10b, followed by heating to remove furan through the retro Diels-Alder reaction. The structures of 2b, 3b, and 10b were established unequivocally by X-ray crystallography and other spectroscopic techniques. 

9382965
Growth hormone-stimulated insulin-like growth factor (IGF) I and IGF-binding protein-3 in liver cirrhosis. 
BACKGROUND/AIMS: The aim of this study was to evaluate the liver's potential to generate insulin-like growth factor (IGF) I and IGF-binding protein-3 (IGFBP-3), following stimulation by human recombinant growth hormone, as a possible marker for liver functional reserve in patients with liver cirrhosis. METHODS: In a pilot study, 15 patients (mean age 56 years) with postnecrotic liver cirrhosis were divided into two groups according to disease severity (Child-Pugh score): Group 1 (n=8) with scores of 5-8 and Group 2 (n=7) with scores of 9-12. Five age-matched healthy subjects served as controls. Human recombinant growth hormone (0.06 mg/kg) was administered subcutaneously on 2 consecutive days. Serum levels of IGF-I and IGFBP-3 were measured before and up to 48 h after human recombinant growth hormone injection. Nutritional status was assessed by the creatinine-height index and was compared to lymphocyte count, body mass index, and muscle arm circumference. RESULTS: Baseline IGF-I levels were significantly lower in patients with cirrhosis than in controls, while no differences were noted between the two patient groups. IGF-I levels increased significantly after rhGH administration to the healthy controls, to a lower degree in Group 1, while no change occurred in Group 2. IGF-I levels at 24 h and beyond correlated significantly with the nutritional status, the Child-Pugh score, and the basal levels of GH-binding protein and IGFBP-3. IGFBP-3 serum levels did not change after rhGH stimulation. CONCLUSIONS: IGF-I generation after GH stimulation may provide a new dimension in the assessment of liver function and nutritional status in patients with liver cirrhosis. 

8992402
[Metachronous intra-abdominal fibromatosis of the gastro-spleno-colonic ligament and the mesentery: histopathogenetic interpretation. Report of a case] 
The paper reports a case of intra-abdominal fibromatosis with an initial localisation in the gastro-spleno-colic ligament followed by a metachronous localisation in the mesentery. Both localisations preceded the appearance of sigmoidorectal polyps and ovarian polycystosis. The authors discuss the biological problems related to the pathology and tend to interpret it as a dys-reactive disease of connective tissue in a genetically predisposed, subject. 

6098716
[Fundamental and clinical studies on sulbactam/cefoperazone in the field of obstetrics and gynecology] 
Fundamental and clinical studies on sulbactam/cefoperazone (SBT/CPZ), a combination drug of sulbactam and cefoperazone, were carried out in the field of obstetrics and gynecology. The following results were obtained: Transfer into female genital organ tissues Following 1 hour intravenous drip infusion of SBT/CPZ, favourable transfers of both of SBT and CPZ to female genital organ tissues and pelvic dead space exudate were observed. Clinical evaluation A total of 12 cases comprising 6 with intrauterine infection, 1 with pyometra, 1 with abscess of portio vaginalis, 2 with parametritis, 1 with pelvioperitonitis and 1 with purulent lymphocyst was treated with SBT/CPZ. Clinical efficacy was excellent in 6 cases, good in 5 cases and poor in 1 case, with overall efficacy rate of 92%. The bacteriological efficacy was judged as eradicated in 3, and as decreased in 2 out of 5 evaluable cases. In all of the 5 cases, isolated organisms were beta-lactamase producing organisms. No notable side effects or abnormal laboratory findings were observed except 1 case with elevations of GOT and GPT. 

9114132
Human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) RNA in plasma as the preferred target for therapy in patients with HIV infection: a critique. 
The measurement of human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) RNA copies in plasma establishes the prognosis for HIV-infected patients and provides a rapid method of assessing the efficacy of a new antiretroviral agent. However, whether or not periodic measurement of plasma HIV RNA will aid physicians in the long-term treatment of infected patients remains to be proven. Dr. Fessel has reviewed the available literature and suggests that the enthusiasm for this technique of managing HIV infection may be premature. Dr. Fessel emphasizes that solid evidence is needed to prove that prolonged suppression of plasma levels of HIV RNA reflects suppression of viral replication in the lymphoreticular tissue and prevents selection of resistant HIV variants. With such evidence, the usefulness of the plasma HIV RNA assay in the treatment of HIV-infected patients will be more firmly established. 

3486123
Predictors of alcoholism in the Lundby Study. I. Material and methods. 
In this prospective longitudinal study over 15 years (1957 to 1972) the background factors for those who became alcoholics and those who did not were registered before anybody knew what the outcome would be. The population (2,612 inhabitants) lived in 1957 in a delimited area in the South of Sweden, Lundby. In 1957 nearby everyone (98%) was examined by a single psychiatrist, and again in 1972, irrespective of domicile, by two psychiatrists. Among the men who at the outset did not misuse alcohol, 58 became alcoholics. These alcoholics were compared with the non-alcoholics regarding e.g. personality traits, social factors and interactions between factors. 

10674598
Endobag extractor to remove masses during laparoscopy. 
BACKGROUND: Intra-abdominal masses are removed during laparoscopy using different types of endobags. However, in many cases the specimens are larger than the trocar or the incision in the abdomen, with a potential risk of endobag rupture. INSTRUMENT: We developed an instrument to facilitate extraction of an endobag during laparoscopy without the need for a conventional minilaparotomy. The endobag extractor has three removable diverging blades that symmetrically enlarge the operative canal in the abdominal wall if spread after sharp extension of the skin incision. The full endobag can be drawn through the canal without the risk of endobag rupture because the size of the canal can be individualized, building a funnel. EXPERIENCE: We removed various kinds of ovarian tumors, specimens from salpingo-oophorectomies, and other specimens in 22 cases. CONCLUSION: This new instrument allows easy removal of surgical specimens during laparoscopy without conventional minilaparotomy, regardless of the type of endobag used. We believe this instrument lessens the risk of endobag rupture. 

1807026
[Histochemistry of acid phosphatase in small intestine mucosa in experimental coccidiosis in suckling piglets] 
The activity of acid phosphatase (phosphohydrolase of orthophosphate monoesters; EC. 3.1.3.2) was evaluated densitometrically in the mucosa of duodenum, jejunum and ileum of 22 conventional piglets which were experimentally infected by oocysts of the coccidiae Isospora suis (infection dose of 200,000 oocysts) on day one after parturition (DAP). The activity of the studied hydrolase was investigated in the infected piglets during days two to ten after infection (DAI) in the intestinal mucosa (enterocytes) and in goblet cells. The density of the reaction product of acid phosphatase was simultaneously determined in the same mucosal cells of different sections of the small intestine in five control conventional piglets at the age of 2-14 days. In the small intestine mucosa of control piglets the activity of acid phosphatase was demonstrated to be located especially in the supranuclear zone of enterocytes. As for goblet cells, the reaction product of acid phosphatase is distributed in all zones (supra-, para-, infranuclear zones); the lowest density of this enzyme was found in the infranuclear zone. The activity of acid phosphatase is also localized in intestinal crypts: in their cells the enzyme concentration is decreasing from duodenum to caudal sections. Important changes were revealed, in comparison with the control data, in the development of the activity of acid phosphatase in the intestinal mucosa cells in the experimentally infected piglets. In the period of investigation (DAI 2-10) there were two stages of the development of the density of the enzyme reaction product. The first stage can be characterized by an increase, the other by a decrease in the level of acid phosphatase activity. Enterocytes are influenced in both stages, but the decrease in the density of the reaction product of acid phosphatase was observed only in absorption cells, and not in goblet cells. The increase in the activity of acid phosphatase occurs in the periods of DAI 4 and 9-10. Enzymatic deviations occur mainly in the absorption cells of the mucosa of duodenum and middle jejunum; in the cells of posterior jejunum and ileum an increase in the density of the reaction product of acid phosphatase was also demonstrated, but at the lower quantitative level (especially on DAI 4). The decrease in the activity of acid phosphatase has a protracted development and it takes place on DAI 5 to 8. (ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 400 WORDS) 

11877432
Crystal structure of Thermotoga maritima 0065, a member of the IclR transcriptional factor family. 
Members of the IclR family of transcription regulators modulate signal-dependent expression of genes involved in carbon metabolism in bacteria and archaea. The Thermotoga maritima TM0065 gene codes for a protein (TM-IclR) that is homologous to the IclR family. We have determined the crystal structure of TM-IclR at 2.2 A resolution using MAD phasing and synchrotron radiation. The protein is composed of two domains: the N-terminal DNA-binding domain contains the winged helix-turn-helix motif, and the C-terminal presumed regulatory domain is involved in binding signal molecule. In a proposed signal-binding site, a bound Zn(2+) ion was found. In the crystal, TM-IclR forms a dimer through interactions between DNA-binding domains. In the dimer, the DNA-binding domains are 2-fold related, but the dimer is asymmetric with respect to the orientation of signal-binding domains. Crystal packing analysis showed that TM-IclR dimers form a tetramer through interactions exclusively by signal-binding domains. A model is proposed for binding of IclR-like factors to DNA, and it suggests that signal-dependent transcription regulation is accomplished by affecting an oligomerization state of IclR and therefore its affinity for DNA target. 

7358815
Hydrophobic chromatography and bioanalysis of some polar pyridine derivatives used as antilipolytic agents. 
The antilipolytic compound 5-fluoro-3-pyridinecarboxylic acid and 5-fluoro-3-hydroxymethylpyridine have been determined quantitatively in plasma (Srel = 5-7% in the concentration range 1-20 microgram/ml) by liquid chromatography on LiChrosorb RP-8 (5 micrometer) with phosphate buffer pH 3-4 as mobile phase, after precipitation of proteins and direct injection of the supernatant. Detection limits were 0.1-0.2 microgram/ml. The chromatographic retention is explained by adsorption of the uncharged compounds on to the support complemented by ion-pair adsorption with buffer components at extreme pH values. 

209594
Analysis of frog neuromuscular function at hyperbaric pressures. 
Nerve and muscle compound action potentials were measured in the frog sciatic nerve-gastrocnemius muscle preparation in a hyperbaric helium-air environment. Helium pressure to 69 ATA induced a reversible depression in muscle compound action potential amplitude without significantly affecting other parameters. Blockade other parameters. Blockade induced by tetraethylammonium while at pressure could be partially reversed by decompression. A desensitization-type of neuromuscular block produced at pressure after neostigmine infusion could also be partially reversed by decompression. These results suggest a possible involvement of the acetylcholine receptor complex in pressure-induced depression of synaptic transmission. 

435792
Upper gastrointestinal endoscopy: its effects on patient management. 
Out of 95 patients referred for upper gastrointestinal endoscopy after a barium-meal examination, 44 underwent a change in management. Some changes were minor but in 12 patients a decision on surgery was required. Seven of these patients were among a group of 13 for whom the referring consultant would have recommended laparotomy had endoscopy not been available, while the other five were subjected to an unplanned laparotomy. These findings support the practice of performing endoscopy on patients whose symptoms are not fully explained by barium-meal examination, especially patients aged over 45. In such cases the procedure also seems to be cost-effective. 

3190117
A simple approach to blepharoplasty using the Angres II blepharopigmentation lid clamp. 
Surgeons who perform blepharopigmentation will experience increased demand for blepharoplasty. Both procedures can be combined easily. A simple technique using the Angres II lid clamp is outlined. 

6371154
Protective efficacy of hybridoma type-specific antibody against experimental infection with group-B Streptococcus. 
Murine monoclonal antibodies to group-B Streptococcus type III were developed by fusion of splenic lymphocytes from immunized BALB/c mice with the mouse-myeloma cell line SP 2/0. The four type III-specific antibodies, which were of the IgM class, protected neonatal rats against intraperitoneal infection with homologous-type group-B streptococci; survival rates were 95%-100% for protected rats but only 17% for unprotected rats. One antibody preparation offered excellent protection against any of five type-III strains employed. Monoclonal antibody provided protection when administered 4, 8, or 12 hr after infection, although delayed administration was less efficacious against more virulent strains. Monoclonal IgM also protected against intranasal inoculation of bacteria. These results indicate the potential therapeutic efficacy of monoclonal antibody in neonatal group-B streptococcal disease, but further laboratory investigations must precede clinical investigation of monoclonal or polyclonal antibody therapy in humans. 

3719199
Dysphonia. 
Dysphonia, or hoarseness, is a symptom (not a diagnosis) produced by roughening or abnormal movement of the vocal folds. A diagnosis can only be made by viewing the vocal folds. Because of the excellent prognosis for laryngeal carcinoma that is treated early, all patients who complain of dysphonia deserve to have this diagnosis excluded. 

8786286
Fallibility of plasma noradrenaline measurements in studying postprandial sympathetic nervous responses. 
The use of the plasma noradrenaline (NA) concentration as an index of sympathetic nervous system (SNS) activity in the postprandial state is associated with several problems: (i) It does not take into account the contribution of alterations in clearance to the plasma NA level, (ii) when antecubital venous blood is sampled, it reflects regional forearm rather than whole body SNS activity and (iii) no insight is gained into the regional pattern of SNS activation. These potential confounders were addressed in this study performed in 17 healthy young men. The validity of plasma NA measurements in assessing postprandial changes in sympathetic nervous activation was evaluated in relation to that of whole body and regional plasma NA spillover, derived using isotope dilution methodology. Plasma clearance of NA is significantly altered following a meal, with a transient elevation in the early postprandial phase which may lead to an underestimation of SNS activation when assessed from arterial plasma NA levels. Forearm plasma NA spillover increases postprandially, such that despite significant postprandial elevations in arterial plasma NA, the plasma arterial contribution to antecubital venous plasma NA levels is maintained at less than 40%, the rest being derived locally from the forearm. This makes venous plasma samples unsuitable for the assessment of SNS activation in organs and vascular sites distant from the sampling site. The kidneys and skeletal muscle are the major regional sites of postprandial sympathetic nervous activation, while cardiac plasma NE spillover is unaltered postprandially. This regional pattern of SNS activation postprandially must be taken into account when relating increments in plasma NA levels to specific physiological events. 

11699806
Prevalence, persistence, and correlates of depressive symptoms in a national sample of mothers of toddlers. 
OBJECTIVES: To examine the prevalence, persistence, and correlates of depressive symptoms in mothers of toddlers in a nationally representative sample. METHOD: The self-report components of two linked databases were used for this study, the 1988 National Maternal and Infant Health Survey and the 1991 Longitudinal Followup. Depressive symptoms of 7,537 mothers were measured by the Center for Epidemiologic Studies-Depression Scale (CES-D) at both time points. Weighted bivariate and multivariate analyses were used to assess the stability of maternal depressive symptoms across two time points and maternal and child predictors of elevated depressive symptoms. RESULTS: Twenty-four percent of mothers at time 1 (mean child age 17 months) and 17% at time 2 (mean child age 35 months) had elevated depressive symptoms (CES-D score > or =16). Thirty-six percent of those with elevated scores at time 1 also had elevated scores at time 2. Not having breast-fed, a mistimed or unwanted pregnancy, and poor child health status were related to elevated depressive symptoms but not persistence. CONCLUSIONS: Elevated depressive symptoms are common in mothers of toddlers. Given the potential magnitude of need, a systematic clinical and public health approach may be required. 

7495788
Antimicrobial peptide pores in membranes detected by neutron in-plane scattering. 
Antimicrobial peptides isolated from the host defense systems of animals have been shown to exert their activity directly on the lipid bilayer of cell membranes, but the antimicrobial mechanisms are not clear, due chiefly to the difficulty of discerning the high-order structures formed by these peptides in membranes. Previously we have shown that these peptides insert into the membrane when their concentrations exceed a lipid-dependent critical value. With neutron in-plane scattering we now show that inserted alamethicin creates aqueous pores approximately greater than 18 A in diameter. The density of pores is consistent with the assumption that all of the alamethicin is involved in pore formation. Pores were not detected below the critical concentration. Thus concentration-dependent pore formation appears to be the molecular mechanism of antimicrobial action. 

8644690
Chronic consumption of short-chain fructooligosaccharides by healthy subjects decreased basal hepatic glucose production but had no effect on insulin-stimulated glucose metabolism. 
We aimed to study the effects of chronic ingestion of short-chain fructooligosaccharides (FOS), an indigestible carbohydrate, on hepatic glucose production, insulin-mediated glucose metabolism, erythrocyte insulin binding, and blood lipids in healthy subjects. Twelve healthy volunteers received either 20 g FOS/d or sucrose for 4 wk in a double-blind crossover design. FOS did not modify fasting plasma glucose and insulin concentrations. Mean (+/- SEM) basal hepatic glucose production was lower after FOS than after sucrose consumption (2.18 +/- 0.10 compared with 2.32 +/- 0.09 mg.kg-1, min-1, respectively; P < 0.02, paired Student's t test). However, neither insulin suppression of hepatic glucose production nor insulin stimulation of glucose uptake measured by hyperinsulinemic clamp was significantly different between the two dietary periods. Erythrocyte insulin binding was also comparable. Serum triacylglycerols, total and high-density- lipoprotein cholesterol, apolipoproteins A-I and B, and lipoprotein(a) were not modified by FOS. To try to understand why FOS did not increase serum lipids, the in vitro production of short-chain fatty acids from FOS was evaluated by using human fecal inoculum and compared with that from lactulose, which was found to increase serum lipids. FOS produced an acetate-propionate ratio two times lower than that of lactulose. We conclude that 4 wk of 20 g FOS/d decreased basal hepatic glucose production but had no detectable effect on insulin-stimulated glucose metabolism in healthy subjects. The colonic fermentation pattern of undigestible carbohydrates may be relevant to predicting their metabolic effects. 

2247202
[A case of transsphenoidal meningoencephalocele] 
A 6-year-old boy was sent to us due to basal meningoencephalocele detected by MRI. He had had a past history of strabismus and morning glory syndrome since 6 months of age, as well as hypopituitary dwarfism since he was 3 years old. On admission, physical examination revealed hypertelorism and left coloboma. Laryngoscopic examination revealed a round mass covered by normal nasal mucose in the midline of the tegmen of the choana. X-ray tomogram and CT scan demonstrated an isodense mass protruding into the nasopharyngeal cavity through a bony defect of the sella turcica. Right carotid angiogram showed stenosis of the right internal carotid artery and abnormal fine vessels in the basal ganglia similar to basal Moyamoya network. There was an irregular filling of the right anterior cerebral artery. Left carotid angiogram showed an irregular filling of the left middle cerebral artery. MRI showed an anterior part of the third ventricle descending into, and the meningocele protruding into the nasopharyngeal cavity. It also showed a stalk extending from the hypothalamus into the meningocele, but the pituitary gland was not recognized. The meningocele was of the same signal intensity as CSF in both T1 and T2 weighted images. Growth hormone deficiency was confirmed by radioimmunoassay of the peripheral blood. An operation was scheduled transcranial to prevent snoring during sleep at age 9. The stalk was observed behind the chiasm during the operation, but a radical operation was not performed because of a possibility of postoperative hypothalamic-pituitary dysfunction. Transsphenoidal encephalocele is rare. So far as we could see, only 30 cases have been reported. (ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS) 

8250884
Selective effects of mastoparan analogs: separation of G-protein-directed and membrane-perturbing activities. 
Mastoparan (MP), a wasp venom peptide, is known both to interact with G-proteins and to alter membrane structure and function. To determine the structural requirements for these two aspects of MP action, we constructed several analogs of the peptide and characterized them using Swiss 3T3 cell membranes. The effects of these peptides were measured on: i) G-protein-mediated stimulation of phospholipase-C activity by GTP gamma S and bombesin and ii) the membrane enzyme activities, calcium-activated phospholipase-C and Na,K-ATPase. MP strongly inhibited all the above activities and caused membrane permeabilization. Substitution of one Lys residue by Gly at either the N- or C-terminal of the MP molecule resulted in peptides which selectively inhibited G-protein stimulated phospholipase-C with no or very slight membrane-perturbing effects. Introduction of additional Lys residues to MP led to the opposite effect. Thus, G-protein modulating and membrane disrupting actions of MP appear to be not necessarily linked, and may be separated. 

10017
Acid-base changes of mature and premature neonates following exchange transfusion. 
The changes of acid-base values of 60 mature and premature neonates treated by exchange transfusion were followed. It could be shown that the blood conserves having acidic pH values caused no acidosis if the acid-base balance of the patients had been normal before transfusion. An existing acidosis frequently increased significantly in the first day of life of the mature but also in the later days in premature neonates. Thus, the determination of acid-base state prior and after transfusion of such patients seems to be important. In the case of pronounced acidosis its correction and also the control of the acid-base values after the exchange transfusion are necessary. 

870715
Oxalate stone disease after intestinal resection. 
There have been 543 jejuno-ileal bypass patients screened for the presence of urinary calculi 1 to 6 years postoperatively. Of these patients 9 per cent have had 1 to 2 calculi during the followup and 3 per cent have had multiple calculi. Ninety-four per cent of the recovered calculi consisted entirely of calcium oxalate. Seven patients had a history of stones before the bypass, 6 of whom have had additional stones postoperatively. To define the conditions associated with stone formation in these patients measurements of serum and urinary oxalate concentration, urinary calcium oxalate saturation, urinary crystal size distribution, and the rates of intestinal oxalate absorption and urinary crystallization have been performed on patients who did and did not have stones postoperatively. On the basis of these studies it appears that the patients in whom stones formed differ from those in whom they did not form only in the rate of urinary crystallization and in the number of large crystal particles present in the urine. Evaluation of current therapeutic modalities in terms of the capability to correct these stone-forming characteristics and to reduce actual calculus formation reveals that the only successful regimen is that which includes an extreme reduction of oxalate ingestion. 

7370070
[Autoradiographic distribution of 14C after administering tracer-marked nitroprusside, cyanide and thiocyanate to pregnant mice and rats (author's transl)] 
Doses of ca. 2--3 mg/kg of nitroprusside, cyanide and thiocyanate, tracer-marked with 14C, were applied i.v. to pregnant mice and rats. Autoradiograms of the whole animal were taken 1 min, 10 min and 60 min after administration. After administering nitroprusside two phases of the tracer pattern could be distinguished: the phase of removal of the cyanide poisoning with tracer-markings predominant in the liver and the lungs, followed by the phase of thiocyanate excretion, with tracer-markings predominantly in the stomach and urinary system. Tracer-markings in the foetuses were observed during the thiocyanate phase, but not during the cyanide phase. The therapeutic consequences are discussed. 

7953368
Lipid peroxidation and prostaglandins in colorectal cancer. 
Dietary fat, arachidonic acid metabolism and lipid peroxidation have all been implicated in colorectal carcinogenesis. Fatty acids, prostaglandins (PGE2, PGF2 alpha) and malondialdehyde (MDA), the stable end-product of lipid peroxidation of polyunsaturated fatty acids (PUFAs), were studied in paired tumour and normal mucosa of 20 patients with colorectal cancer. Levels of arachidonic acid and total PUFAs were increased in the phospholipid fraction of tumours (P < 0.05). Levels of PGE2 and MDA were also higher in tumours (P < 0.001) and there was a significant correlation between MDA and PGE2 concentrations (rs = 0.69, P < 0.01). In contrast to previously reported in vitro studies, this work suggests that lipid peroxidation may be enhanced in human colorectal tumours. As PGE2 and MDA have been shown to be involved in carcinogenesis, these may be considered potential therapeutic targets for preventing or treating colorectal carcinoma. 

7779959
A comparison of three avidin-biotin complex immunoenzyme systems for detection of African swine fever virus antigen in paraffin-embedded tissues. 
The sensitivity and specificity of 3 avidin-biotin complex (ABC) immunostaining systems were compared on paraffin-embedded tissues from African swine fever virus (ASFV)-infected pigs. Results were also compared with immunofluorescent detection on cryosections of the same tissue for optimal detection of ASFV antigen. The ABC-alkaline phosphatase (ABC-AP) and ABC-peroxidase (ABC-PO) systems were at least as sensitive as direct fluorescent antibody (FA) and 10-fold more sensitive than the ABC-glucose oxidase system. Three ABC-AP and 2 ABC-PO chromagens with different counterstains were compared. In addition, 2 fixatives, 2 biotinylation procedures, 7 endogenous peroxidase blocking regimes, 6 tissue adhesives, and 3 mounting media were compared. The ABC-AP system with a red chromagen and hematoxylin counterstaining was preferred and most closely approximated routinely stained pathologic sections. Fixation in paraformalde-hydelysine-periodate fixative preserved ASFV antigen for research studies for at least 3 years. Formalin-fixed tissues retained some staining for up to 10 years. 

15661182
Long-term potentiation of synaptic transmission at the mossy fiber-granule cell relay of cerebellum. 
In the last decade, the physiology of cerebellar neurons and synapses has been extended to a considerable extent. We have found that the mossy fiber-granule cell relay can generate a complex form of long-term potentiation (mf-GrC LTP) following high-frequency mf discharge. Induction. Mf-GrC LTP depends on NMDA and mGlu receptor activation, intracellular Ca(2+) increase, PKC activation, and NO production. The preventative action of intracellular agents (BAPTA, PKC-inhibitors) and of membrane hyperpolarization, and the correlated increase in intracellular Ca(2+) observed using fluorescent dyes, indicate that induction occurs postsynaptically. Expression. Expression includes three components: (a) an increase of synaptic currents, (b) an increase of intrinsic excitability in GrC, and (c) an increase of intrinsic excitability in mf terminals. Based on quantal analysis, the EPSC increase is mostly explained by enhanced neurotransmitter release. NO is a candidate retrograde neurotransmitter which could determine both presynaptic current changes and LTP. NO cascade blockers inhibit both presynaptic current changes and LTP. The increase in intrinsic excitability involves a raise in apparent input resistance in the subthreshold region and a spike threshold reduction. Together with other forms of cerebellar plasticity, mf-GrC LTP opens new hypothesis on how the cerebellum processes incoming information. 

126088
Alterations in the composition and bacteriophage-binding properties of walls of Staphylococcus aureus H grown in continuous culture in simplified defined media. 
A nutritional mutant of Staphylococcus aureus H has been isolated and grown in media in which the only amino acids are arginine, cysteine, glutamic acid and proline. Walls of the bacteria grown in such media in continuous culture under potassium limitation differ in composition from walls of the bacteria grown in batch culture in rich nutrient broth in that they contain less glycine, the peptidoglycan component is less highly cross-linked and the teichoic acid component contains a reduced proportion of N-acetylglucosaminyl substituents. Walls of the potassium-limited bacteria retain the ability to bind bacteriophage 52a but are more susceptible to the action of lytic peptidases than are wall samples in which the peptidoglycan is more highly cross-linked. Teichoic acid was present in walls of the bacteria grown under phosphate limitation in the defined medium and these walls were also able to absorb bacteriophage 52a. 

9701774
In vitro characterization of ciprofloxacin distribution in rat lung. 
The binding of ciprofloxacin to both lung homogenate and isolated subcellular fractions, as well as the washout kinetics from lung homogenate of rats, was studied in vitro. Differences in the binding capacity of ciprofloxacin to subcellular fractions and total lung homogenate were observed. In vitro mean partition coefficient values (+/- SD) for nuclear, mitochondrial and microsomal fractions were 2.84 +/- 0.82, 2.32 +/- 0.69 and 2.72 +/- 0.75, respectively, with no statistical differences among these values. On the other hand, the partition coefficient obtained with lung homogenate showed a mean value (+/- SD) of 1.39 +/- 0.31, statistically lower than the values corresponding to the different cellular fractions. These results reveal a great affinity of ciprofloxacin for intracellular structures that may condition the distribution characteristics of the quinolone in lung and other body tissues, In washout studies, washout of ciprofloxacin from lung homogenate proved to be a monoexponential and first-order kinetic process. 

16128939
Sedation with propofol for routine ERCP in high-risk octogenarians: a randomized, controlled study. 
OBJECTIVES: Adequate patient sedation is mandatory for diagnostic and therapeutic endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP). In this respect it is known that the short-acting anesthetic propofol offers certain potential advantages for sedation during ERCP, but there are no controlled studies concerning the feasibility and safety of propofol sedation in elderly, high-risk patients. METHODS: One hundred and fifty consecutive patients aged >or=80 yr with high comorbidity (ASA score >or=III: 91 %), randomly received midazolam plus meperidine (n = 75) or propofol alone (n = 75) for sedation during ERCP. Vital signs were continuously monitored and procedure-related parameters, recovery time, and quality as well as patients' cooperation and tolerance of the procedure were assessed. RESULTS: Clinically relevant changes in vital signs were observed at comparable frequencies with a temporary oxygen desaturation (<90%) occurring in eight patients in the propofol-group and seven patients receiving midazolam/meperidine (n.s.). Hypotension was documented in two patients in the propofol group and one patient receiving midazolam/meperidine. Propofol provided a significantly better patient cooperation than midazolam/meperidine (p < 0.01), but the procedure tolerability was rated nearly the same by both groups. Mean recovery time was significantly shorter in the propofol group (22 +/- 7 min vs 31 +/- 8 min for midazolam/meperidine (p < 0.01)) while the recovery score was significantly higher under propofol (8.3 +/- 1.2 vs 6.1 +/- 1.1(p < 0.01)). During recovery a significant lower number of desaturation events (<90%) were observed in the propofol group (12%) than in the midazolam/meperidine group (26%, p < 0.01). CONCLUSION: Under careful monitoring the use of propofol for sedation during ERCP is superior to midazolam/meperidine even in high-risk octogenarians. 

11061694
Alphabet soup: cystic lesions of bone. 
Giant cell tumor (GCT), aneurysmal bone cyst (ABC), and simple bone cyst (SBC) represent relatively common tumors and tumorlike conditions to affect bone. This article describes the clinical presentation of these lesions, as well as the characteristic radiologic and pathologic findings of each. In addition, differential diagnoses, disease course, and various treatment options are discussed. 

2029154
Drug treatment of Parkinson's disease: current concepts. 
The cause of Parkinson's Disease remains unknown although environmental toxin/s and ageing are likely to play a significant role. Experimental 1-methyl-4-phenyl-1,2,3,6-tetrahydropyridine induced parkinsonism can be prevented by monoamine oxidase B inhibitors. Monoamine oxidase B inhibitors have been shown to delay disease progression in early Parkinson's Disease and improve mortality. Symptomatic therapy remains the cornerstone of drug treatment, and should include levodopa replacement with concomitant dopamine agonist therapy in order to achieve maximum efficacy, and reduce side effects. Complicated Parkinson's Disease could be managed by better delivery systems like slow release preparations and parenteral infusions. Brain tissue transplants may offer hope of restoring the damaged nigrostriatal system. 

2405023
TIPS for a better ellipse. 
The ellipse or fusiform closure is the simplest and most common type of excisional surgery and repair. Textbooks and review articles repeat similar traditional principles for excision and closure. In this article four additional ideas are reviewed to improve the final cosmetic result of the ellipse. 

15121968
Hospital stay for healthy term newborns. 
Decisions regarding the length of hospital stays for newborns and their mothers became driven by financial reimbursement from third-party payers in the 1990s. The Newborns' and Mothers' Health Protection Act of 1996 and a report from the Secretary's Advisory Committee on Infant Mortality acknowledge the importance of physician assessment in determining the timing of each newborn's discharge. The pediatrician's primary role is to ensure the health and well-being of the newborn in the context of the family. It is within this context that this revised statement addresses the short hospital stay (<48 hours after birth) for healthy term newborns. 

7116939
Sister chromatid exchange in human populations: the effect of smoking, drug treatment, and occupational exposure. 
Increased rate of sister chromatid exchangec (SCE) in peripheral lymphocytes has been observed in smokers as compared to nonsmokers and in patients receiving certain cytostatic drugs. The increased SCE frequency in smokers was shown to depend on the number of cigarettes smoked per day, as well as on the duration of smoking. DNA cross-links caused by photochemotherapy against psoriasis, 8-methoxypsoralen plus UVA irradiation (PUVA), as well as by the anti-cancer chemotherapeutic agent CCNU, were shown to be more effective at inducing SCE's than other types of DNA damage caused by these treatments. These observations suggest that SCE analysis may be used as an indicator of genotoxic exposure in vivo, provided that the various types of DNA damage caused by genotoxic agents and the dose, as well as the time of exposure in relation to the time of sampling, are considered. 

1583984
[Curative en-bloc resection (lung, diaphragm, liver, adrenal gland and thoracic wall) for echinococcus multilocularis. Report of an unusual disease course] 
Report concerning an en-bloc-resection of right lower lobe of the lung, diaphragm, right lobe of the liver, right adrenal gland, parts of the chestwall and a fistula for alveolar echinococcus. Combined postoperative treatment with mebendazol. More than 4 years postoperatively no evidence of a recurrency. 

2474580
Expression of cytokeratin in the epithelium of dentigerous cysts and odontogenic keratocysts: an aid to diagnosis. 
Sections of tissue embedded in paraffin wax from 18 selected odontogenic cysts were studied both histologically and immunohistochemically with antibodies to cytokeratins using the indirect peroxidase technique. The cysts were divided on a clinical and histological basis into two equal groups comprising dentigerous cysts and odontogenic keratocysts. It was possible to differentiate the two cyst types in every case by the pattern of staining using the monoclonal antibody LP34 for cytokeratins of intermediate molecular weight. The monoclonal antibody CAM 5.2 for cytokeratins of low molecular weight was not discriminatory. Such a clear distinction may prove useful diagnostically in distinguishing between two cysts of similar appearance but very different behaviour. 

1752806
Effect of selection for litter size and body weight on hormone-induced ovulation rate in mice. 
Genetic differences in natural vs hormone-induced ovulation rates were compared in immature female mice from five lines that had undergone long-term single-trait and antagonistic index selection for litter size and(or) 6-wk BW. Lines used were control (K); high litter size (L+); high BW (W+); low litter size and high BW (L-W+); and high litter size and low BW (L+W-). Natural ovulation rate at a mean age of 34.3 d and hormone-induced (5 IU of pregnant mare's serum gonadotropin followed 2 d later by 5 IU of human chorionic gonadotropin) superovulation rate at a fixed age of 31 d were obtained. Total number of eggs ovulated was affected by line (P less than .001), treatment (P less than .001), and line x treatment interaction (P less than .001). Line differences were subsequently tested within treatment because of the significant line x treatment interaction. Line differences were important (P less than .001) for natural ovulation, hormone-induced ovulation, and response to hormones. Mean natural ovulation rates for K, L+, W+, L-W+, and L+W- were 14.1, 19.8, 15.1, 13.6, and 16.4, respectively. Selection changed ovulation rate by 40, 16, 7, and -4% in the L+, L+W-, W+ and L-W+ lines, respectively (P less than .01). Hormone-induced ovulation rates in K, L+, W+, L-W+, and L+W- were 32.3, 24.6, 19.6, 20.9, and 22.1, respectively. Exogenous hormones increased ovulation by 18.2, 4.8, 4.6, 7.3, and 5.7 ova for K, L+, W+, L-W+, and L+W-, respectively (P less than .001). Lines with lower natural ovulation rates had higher responses to superovulation. Increased ovulation rate due to treatment ranged from 24.3% in L+ to 129% in K. These results indicate significant differences among lines in ovarian response to exogenous hormones. 

6870256
Acylhydrolases from parsley (Petroselinum hortense). Relative distribution and properties of four esterases hydrolyzing malonic acid hemiesters of flavonoid glucosides. 
In parsley, malonylated flavonoid glycosides are formed in response to ultraviolet irradiation and accumulate in the vacuoles. Involvement of malonyltransferases, which catalyze the transfer of malonic acid from malonyl-coenzyme A to either flavone/flavonol 7-O-glucosides or flavonol 3-O-glucosides, has been described previously. These enzymes are present in very young leaf buds, and their activities decrease rapidly when leaves begin to unfold, while at the same time esterase activity is developing. The latter enzyme activity continues to increase with tissue age. Four esterases, distinguished by pI's of 3.8, 3.9, 4.0, and 4.05, were purified to apparent homogeneity from parsley leaves and shown to hydrolyze malonic acid hemiesters of flavonoid glucosides. These esterases are unspecific and are best described as one acetyl- and three arylesterases on the basis of inhibition studies by 4-chloromercuribenzoic acid and diisopropyl fluorophosphate. Esterases and malonic acid hemiesters appear to be separated from each other within the parsley leaf cell, and only on disruption of the cells do the respective substrates become available to the enzymes. Involvement of esterases in formation of wound periderm in parsley plants is suggested. 

1901829
IL-4 acts as a homeostatic regulator of IL-2-induced TNF and IFN-gamma. 
Interleukin-4 (IL-4) is a cytokine secreted by interleukin-2 (IL-2)-activated lymphocytes. IL-2-stimulated lymphocytes also secrete two cytokines, tumour necrosis factor (TNF) and gamma-interferon (IFN-gamma), which contribute to effector function and which may themselves recruit fresh, cytokine-secreting effector cells. We have now investigated whether the IL-4 induced is able to homeostatically regulate secretion of the TNF and IFN-gamma. Peripheral blood mononuclear cells or lymphocytes from normal donors and from patients with neoplastic disease were cultured in the presence of IL-2 alone, IL-4 alone or with both cytokines. IL-2 induced high levels of TNF and IFN-gamma secretion in both groups. The addition of recombinant IL-4 to these IL-2-stimulated cultures lead to significant inhibition of IFN-gamma and TNF production. IFN-gamma secretion was reduced by 50-99% in normal donors and by between 11% and 99% in patients (P less than 0.001). TNF levels induced by IL-2 were similarly reduced by IL-4 both in normal donors (P less than 0.003) and in patients (P less than 0.01). These inhibitory effects were produced by IL-4 at doses of IL-2 attainable in vivo. Inhibition appears to represent a homeostatic regulatory mechanism which may limit recruitment of fresh activated killer (AK) cells. When endogenous IL-4 activity in IL-2-activated lymphocytes was blocked by anti-IL-4 antibody, significantly higher levels of IFN-gamma and TNF were secreted (P less than 0.05). Since both TNF and IFN-gamma may contribute to the anti-neoplastic action of IL-2, manipulating the level of IL-4 activity in vivo could augment the benefits of IL-2 immunotherapy. 

18077952
Microvascular decompression for primary trigeminal neuralgia: long-term effectiveness and prognostic factors in a series of 362 consecutive patients with clear-cut neurovascular conflicts who underwent pure decompression. 
OBJECT: The purpose of this study was to evaluate the long-term efficacy of microvascular decompression (MVD) and to identify the factors affecting outcome in patients treated for primary trigeminal neuralgia (TN). Only the cases with a clear-cut neurovascular conflict (vascular contact and/or compression of the root entry zone of the trigeminal nerve) found at surgery and treated with "pure" MVD (decompression of the root without any additional lesioning or cutting of the adjacent rootlets) were retained. METHODS: The study included 362 patients who were followed up over a period of 1 to 18 years (median follow-up 7.2 years). A Kaplan-Meier survival analysis was generated at 1 and 15 years of follow-up for all of the considered factors. According to Kaplan-Meier analysis, the success rate (defined as pain-free patients without any medication) was 91% at 1 year and estimated to be 73.38% after 15 years of follow-up. RESULTS: None of the following patient-related factors played any significant role in prognosis: sex, patient age at surgery, history of systemic hypertension, duration of neuralgia before surgery, or history of failed trigeminal surgery. Patients with atypical neuralgia (a baseline of permanent pain) had the same outcome as those with a typical (purely spasmodic) presentation. In addition, the side and topography of the trigeminal nerve did not play a role, whereas involvement of all three divisions of the nerve had a negative effect on outcome. Concerning anatomical factors, neither the type of the compressive vessel nor its location along or around the root was found to be significant. However, the severity of compression was important-the more severe the degree of compression, the better the outcome (p = 0.002). The authors also found that presence of focal arachnoiditis had a negative influence on outcome (p = 0.002). CONCLUSIONS: Pure MVD can offer patients affected by a primary TN a 73.38% probability of long-term (15 years) cure of neuralgia. The presence of a clear-cut and marked vascular compression at surgery (and possibly-although not yet reliably--on preoperative magnetic resonance imaging) is the guarantee of a higher than 90% success rate. 

10784102
A possible role for nerve growth factor in the augmentation of sodium channels in models of chronic pain. 
Inflammation induces an upregulation of sodium channels in sensory neurons. This most likely occurs as a result of the retrograde transport of cytochemical mediators released during the inflammatory response. The purpose of this study was to determine the effect of the subcutaneous administration of one such mediator, nerve growth factor (NGF), on the production of sodium channels in neurons of the rat dorsal root ganglion. For this, hindpaw withdrawal from either a thermal or mechanical stimulus was measured in rats at selected intervals for up to 2 weeks following injections of NGF. Sodium channel augmentation was then examined in dorsal root ganglia using site-specific, anti-sodium channel antibodies. Both thermal and mechanical allodynia was observed between 3 and 12 h post-injection. The hyperalgesic response returned to baseline by approximately 24 h post-injection. Sodium channel labeling was found to increase dramatically in the small neurons of the associated dorsal root ganglia beginning at 23 h, reached maximum intensity by 1 week, and persisted for up to 3 months post-injection. Pre-blocking NGF with anti-NGF prevented the NGF-induced decrease in paw withdrawal latencies and significantly reduced the intensity of sodium channel labeling. The results indicate that NGF is an important mediator both in the development of acute hyperalgesia and in the stimulation of sodium channel production in dorsal root ganglia during inflammation. 

3677106
Phase I and pharmacokinetic study of flavone acetic acid. 
Flavone acetic acid is the second in a series of compounds based on the flavonoid aglycone ring structure to be clinically evaluated in malignant disease. Preclinical studies have indicated that a minimum plasma level of 150 micrograms/ml is required before therapeutic efficacy (in a wide range of experimental tumors) is seen in mice; both in vitro and in vivo studies also suggest that the duration of drug exposure is crucial in determining activity. Thus a Phase I trial has been performed in a total of 54 patients using 3 schedules, i.e., a 1-, 3-, and 6-h infusion. In each case, treatment was given once weekly for a minimum of 3 weeks. The maximum tolerated doses were 6.4, 6.4, and 10.0 g/m2, respectively. Dose limiting toxicity was denoted by an intense feeling of warmth and flushing with a 1-h infusion, hypotension with a 3-h infusion, and hypotension and diarrhea with a 6-h infusion. No objective responses were seen in this Phase I trial. The recommended doses for Phase II trials of flavone acetic acid in Europe are 4.8 g/m2 over 1 h or 8.6 g/m2 over 6 h. At these doses the peak plasma concentrations obtained are 650 and 388 micrograms/ml, respectively. Total drug exposure (assessed by an area under the curve greater than 100 micrograms/ml) was approximately 50% greater for the 6-h schedule. This Phase I trial indicates that peak plasma concentrations associated with experimental activity are achievable in humans, although optimal drug exposure times have not yet been defined. 

8113710
Death following colchicine poisoning. 
A 45-year-old male was admitted to hospital after 2 to 3 days of vomiting, nausea, and diarrhea following an apparent overdose of colchicine tables. During hospitalization his white blood cell count fell dramatically. At death, 33 h following initial hospitalization, pleural effusion with bilateral bronchopneumonia was evident, together with numerous bacterial colonies and marked hypocellularity of bone marrow and reduced megakaryocytes, erythroid, and myeloid cells. The most striking histological findings were numerous metaphasic mitotic figures in gastric and small bowel epithelia. Colchicine was detected, confirmed by high pressure liquid chromatography with photodiode array detection, and quantitated in antemortem plasma collected 3.3 h following hospitalization and in postmortem blood and bile. Colchicine was not detected in liver, vitreous humor, or stomach contents. 

9548387
MK-801 reverses Fos expression induced by the full dopamine D1 receptor agonist SKF-82958 in the rat striatum. 
Administration of the selective and full dopamine D1 receptor agonist SKF-82958 ((+/-)-6-chloro-7,8-dihydroxy-3-allyl-1-phenyl-2,3,4,5-tetrahydro-1H-3-b enzazepine) (1 and 3 mg/kg i.p.) led to a dose-dependent induction of Fos protein in the rat striatum. The 3 mg/kg SKF-82958-induced expression of striatal Fos protein was blocked by the dopamine D1 receptor antagonist SCH-23390 (R(+)-7-chloro-8-hydroxy-3-methyl-1-phenyl-2,3,4,5-tetrahydro-1H-3-benza zepine) (0.3 mg/kg i.p.). The noncompetitive NMDA receptor antagonist MK-801 ((5R,10S)-(+)-5-methyl-10,11-dihydro-5H-dibenzo[a,d]-cyclohepten-5 ,10-imine) (1 mg/kg i.p.) also completely prevented striatal Fos induction by an injection of 3 mg/kg SKF-82958. These results suggest that dopamine D1 receptor activation by the full agonist SKF-82958 is sufficient to trigger Fos expression in the striatum, but that concomitant stimulation of NMDA receptors is required for the striatal Fos induction in response to dopamine D1 receptor activation. 

16386514
Role of cold ischemia in acute rejection: characterization of a humoral-like acute rejection in experimental renal transplantation. 
The aim of the study was to characterize the role of cold ischemia in the process of acute rejection using an experimental renal transplant model. Syngeneic renal transplants were performed between Wistar Agouti rats and allogeneic grafts using Wistar-Agouti rats as recipients of Brown-Norway kidneys. For cold ischemia (CI), kidneys were preserved in Euro-Collins (4 degrees C/ 2.5 hours). Rats were bilaterally nephrectomized at the moment of renal transplant and did not receive any immunosuppressant. The groups were NoAR (n = 6): immediate syngeneic transplant; CI-NoAR (n = 6): syngeneic transplant with CI; AR (n = 13): immediate allogeneic graft; CI-AR (n = 6): allogeneic graft with CI. Allogeneic rats were followed for the survival study. Syngeneic rats, with mean survival time beyond 6 months, were sacrificed on the day 7 to compare grafts with those in the allogeneic groups. H&E- and PAS-stained grafts were evaluated using the Banff criteria. Tissue INF-gamma and TNF-alpha were quantified by RT-real time-PCR on the kidney grafts. Renal insufficiency did not appear in the NoAR group, but it did from the posttransplant day 5 in both acute rejection groups. While NoAR kidneys showed well-conserved renal architecture, then AR group displayed variable degrees of tubular necrosis with scarce cellular infiltration, interstitial hemorrhage, vascular damage with fibrinoid necrosis, perivascular edema, and nuclear disruption. Cold ischemia in rejecting animals increased the mortality rate due to renal insufficiency and accelerated acute rejection. Independently of CI, the proinflammatory cytokines TNF-alpha and INF-gamma were increased in both rejection groups. In conclusion, addition of CI overactivates the acute rejection process via a humoral component. 

7994482
Modeling slow correcting gaze movements. 
Recent experimental results show evidence for the corrective role of postsaccadic drifts. This paper addresses the modeling of these slow correcting gaze movements (SCMs). Classical arguments to explain drifts are presented, both in the head fixed condition (pulse-step mismatch) and in the head free condition (vestibulo-ocular reflex (VOR)). The most significant behavioral and electrophysiological experimental data related to SCMs are then briefly reported, with the conclusion that SCMs have a clear corrective role, incompatible with classical explanations of drifts. Based on these experimental data, existing models of the saccadic system are then compared. A theoretical comparison of the classical Robinson model with an alternative model is proposed. Two possible (slow and fast) pathways involved in the control of SCMs are examined, and simulation results are presented. Finally, the discussion addresses the observed species differences in SCMs. The link between natural SCMs and electrical SC stimulations, and the interactions between saccades, VOR, and SCMs are also discussed. 

14641867
Transcript level of erythroid differentiation-related factor, a candidate surrogate marker for transmissible spongiform encephalopathy diseases in blood, shows a broad range of variation in healthy individuals. 
BACKGROUND: In 2001, it was demonstrated that the expression of the erythroid differentiation-related factor (EDRF) is reduced in lymphatic tissues of rodents and cattle as well as in whole blood of sheep that suffer from transmissible spongiform encephalopathy. STUDY DESIGN AND METHODS: To determine whether the normal range of EDRF expression varies in healthy individuals, mRNA levels were measured in whole blood samples from 106 healthy blood donors by quantitative real-time RT-PCR. Furthermore, the correlations of transcript levels with individual physical characteristics were analyzed. In addition, EDRF expression was examined in total RNA samples from a lymph node and the intestine. RESULTS: The data show that EDRF mRNA levels in healthy persons vary within a total range of 2 log units as well as they display a weak correlation with body height. Furthermore, it was found that EDRF is also expressed in lymph nodes and the intestine. CONCLUSION: Owing to its broad range of variation, measuring the EDRF expression does not seem to be a good surrogate marker, unless an altered expression is distinctively different from the varying level in healthy humans. 

16492985
Bilateral molecular changes in a neonatal rat model of unilateral hypoxic-ischemic brain damage. 
Perinatal hypoxia ischemia (HI) is a frequent cause of neonatal brain injury. This study aimed at describing molecular changes during the first 48 h after exposure of the neonatal rat brain to HI. Twelve-day-old rats were subjected to unilateral carotid artery occlusion and 90 min of 8% O2, leading to neuronal damage in the ipsilateral hemisphere only. Phosphorylated-Akt levels were decreased from 0.5 to 6 h post-HI, whereas the level of phosphorylated extracellular signal-related kinases (ERK)1/2 increased during this time frame. Hypoxia-inducible factor (HIF)-1alpha protein increased with a peak at 3 h after HI. mRNA expression for IL-beta and tumor necrosis factor-alpha and -beta started to increase at 6 h with a peak at 24 h post-HI. Expression of heat shock protein 70 was increased from 12 h after HI onwards in the ipsilateral hemisphere only. Surprisingly, HI changed the expression of cytokines, HIF1-alpha ,and P-Akt to the same extent in both the ipsi- as well as the contralateral hemisphere, although neuronal damage was unilateral. Exposure of animals to hypoxia without carotid artery occlusion induced similar changes in cytokines, HIF-1alpha, and P-Akt. We conclude that during HI, hypoxia is sufficient to regulate multiple molecular mediators that may contribute, but are not sufficient, to induce long-term neuronal damage. 

12008957
Role of the PAR4 thrombin receptor in stabilizing platelet-platelet aggregates as revealed by a patient with Hermansky-Pudlak syndrome. 
Individuals with Hermansky-Pudlak Syndrome (HPS) lack platelet dense granules and have no ADP-autocrine response. Despite these platelet deficiencies, HPS patients exhibit a surprisingly mild bleeding phenotype. We hypothesize that activation of the PAR4 thrombin receptor compensates for the lack of an ADP-autocrine response by the P2Y12 ADP receptor in individuals with HPS. Here, we determine that PAR4 activation by thrombin occurs well after ADP release from dense granules in normal individuals. However, the signal from PAR4 stabilizes platelet-platelet aggregate formation in the absence of P2Y12 activation by ADP. Thus, the strong signal emanating from PAR4 during platelet aggregation would provide an explanation for the mild bleeding diathesis of HPS. 

10217772
IncC of broad-host-range plasmid RK2 modulates KorB transcriptional repressor activity In vivo and operator binding in vitro. 
The korAB operon of broad-host-range plasmid RK2 encodes five genes, two of which, incC and korB, belong to the parA and parB families, respectively, of genome partitioning functions. Both korB and a third gene, korA, are responsible for coordinate regulation of operons encoding replication, transfer, and stable inheritance functions. Overexpression of incC alone caused rapid displacement of RK2. Using two different reporter systems, we show that incC modulates the action of KorB. Using promoter fusions to the reporter gene xylE, we show that incC potentiates the repression of transcription by korB. This modulation of korB activity was only observed with incC1, which encodes the full-length IncC (364 amino acids [aa]), whereas no effect was observed with incC2, which encodes a polypeptide of 259 aa that lacks the N-terminal 105 aa. Using bacterial extracts with IncC1 and IncC2 or IncC1 purified through the use of a His6 tail and Ni-agarose chromatography, we showed that IncC1 potentiates the binding of KorB to DNA at representative KorB operators. The ability of IncC to stabilize KorB-DNA complexes suggests that these two proteins work together in the global regulation of many operons on the IncP-1 genomes, as well in plasmid partitioning. 

12785403
An outbreak of methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus in a neonatal intensive care unit. 
OBJECTIVE: To describe the epidemiologic and molecular investigations that successfully contained an outbreak of methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus (MRSA) in a neonatal intensive care unit (NICU). DESIGN: Isolates of MRSA were typed by pulsed-field gel electrophoresis (PFGE) and S. aureus protein A (spa). SETTING: A level III-IV, 45-bed NICU located in a children's hospital within a medical center. PATIENTS: Incident cases had MRSA isolated from clinical cultures (eg, blood) or surveillance cultures (ie, anterior nares). INTERVENTIONS: Infected and colonized infants were placed on contact precautions, cohorted, and treated with mupirocin. Surveillance cultures were performed for healthcare workers (HCWs). Colonized HCWs were treated with topical mupirocin and hexachlorophene showers. RESULTS: From January to March 2001, the outbreak strain of MRSA, PFGE clone B, was harbored by 13 infants. Three (1.3%) of 235 HCWs were colonized with MRSA. Two HCWs, who rotated between the adult and the pediatric facility, harbored clone C. One HCW, who exclusively worked in the children's hospital, was colonized with clone B. From January 1999 to November 2000, 22 patients hospitalized in the adult facility were infected or colonized with clone B. Spa typing and PFGE yielded concordant results. PFGE clone B was identified as spa type 16, associated with outbreaks in Brazil and Hungary. CONCLUSIONS: A possible route of MRSA transmission was elucidated by molecular typing. MRSA appears to have been transferred from our adult facility to our pediatric facility by a rotating HCW. Spa typing allowed comparison of our institution's MRSA strains with previously characterized outbreak clones. 

6096681
Possible mechanisms of action of nitrous oxide at the opioid receptor. 
The difference between the analgesic and anesthetic effects of Nitrous Oxide (N2O) is emphasized. Evidence is presented indicating that N2O analgesia is mediated by an interaction with opioid receptors. Possible mechanisms by which so small a molecule as N2O could interact with the mu opioid receptor are proposed. 

17292552
Astigmatic intensity equation for electron microscopy based phase retrieval. 
Phase retrieval, in principle, can be performed in a transmission electron microscope (TEM) using arbitrary aberrations of electron waves; provided that the aberrations are well-characterised and known. For example, the transport of intensity equation (TIE) can be used to infer the phase from a through-focus series of images. In this work an "astigmatic intensity equation" (AIE) is considered, which relates phase gradients to intensity variations caused by TEM objective lens focus and astigmatism variations. Within the paraxial approximation, it is shown that an exact solution of the AIE for the phase can be obtained using efficient Fourier transform methods. Experimental requirements for using the AIE are the measurement of a through-focus derivative and another intensity derivative, which is taken with respect to objective lens astigmatism variation. Two quasi-experimental investigations are conducted to test the validity of the solution. 

512555
Toxicity of low concentration long-term exposure to an airborne mixture of nitrous oxide and halothane. 
To evaluate experimentally the questions of reproductive, teratological, cytogenetic, and tumorigenic sequelae of long-term exposures to escape levels of halothane plus nitrous oxide (N2O), male and female rats were exposed either to air, to 1 ppm halothane plus 50 ppm N2O, or to 10 ppm halothane plus 500 ppm N2O for 7 hr/day, 5 days/wk for appropriate periods of time. In one experiment, young adult female rats were exposed for 60 days, then mated and reexposed either staring with Day 1 or Day 6 of gestation until Day 15. The former were permitted to deliver naturally while the latter were delivered by C-section on Day 20. The young adult males used in breeding were also exposed for 60 days prior to mating and then for a total of 52 weeks thereafter. At termination, bone marrow cell and spermatogonial metaphase preparations were made and assessed for cytogenetic abnormalities. The mated females were evaluated for ovulation, pre- and post-implantation loss, fetal growth, fetal abnormalities, and early post-natal development, as appropriate. In a parallel experiment, 50 male and 50 female weanling rats in each group were exposed for 104 weeks to the same levels and then evaluated for tumor development with emphasis on the reticuloendothelial system. The results indicated a significant reduction in ovulation and implantation efficiency from exposure to the higher levels and slightly retarded fetal development at both levels. No teratological or abortifacient effects were noted. No tumorogenic effects were observed. However, cytogenetic damage to both bone marrow and spermatogonial cells was seen at both levels. 

4094659
Participation of nucleus reticularis gigantocellularis in guanabenz-promoted hypotension, decrease in cardiac contractility and bradycardia in rats. 
The possible participation of the nucleus reticularis gigantocellularis in the hypotension, decrease in cardiac contractility and bradycardia induced by guanabenz was examined in rats that were anesthetized with pentobarbital sodium (40 mg/kg, i.p.). Guanabenz (10 micrograms/kg, i.v.) elicited an initial, transient hypertension, accompanied by an increase in cardiac contractility, followed by a significant and sustained hypotension, as well as decrease in the force and rate of cardiac contraction. In rats receiving bilateral focal electrolytic lesions of the nucleus reticularis gigantocellularis, the same injection produced only the initial transient responses, without the subsequent depressant effects. Microinjection of guanabenz directly into the ventro-medial portion of the nucleus reticularis gigantocellularis, at an ineffective systemic concentration (500 ng), produced significant and prolonged reduction in arterial pressure, cardiac contractility and heart rhythm. On the other hand, local application of the same concentration (500 ng) of guanabenz into the lateral portion of the same nucleus produced only minor hypotension and bradycardia, with no decrease in cardiac contractility. It is concluded that the nucleus reticularis gigantocellularis is at least one of the central sites through which guanabenz may produce its cardiovascular suppressant effects. 

6717248
Lipid composition of liver mitochondria and microsomes in hyperthyroid rats. 
Triiodothyronine-induced alteration of the lipid pattern in rat-liver mitochondria and microsomes has been investigated. In mitochondria, a 25% total cholesterol decrease and a 14% phospholipid increase have been detected. In these hyperthyroid rat liver organelles, a strong decrease in the total cholesterol/phospholipid molar ratio occurs. On the contrary, in microsomes from the same animals, a decrease of about 23% has been measured for both total cholesterol and phospholipids; hence, in this fraction, the total cholesterol/phospholipid molar ratio is unaffected by hyperthyroidism. The liver mitochondrial phospholipid composition, unlike the microsomal composition, is altered significantly in hyperthyroid rats; a 7.4% phosphatidylcholine decrease is accompanied by a similar additive percentage increase of both phosphatidylethanolamine and cardiolipin. In regard to total phospholipid fatty acid composition in liver microsomes from hyperthyroid rats, no variation has been observed compared with the control rats, whereas in mitochondria from the same animals, a meaningful linoleic acid decrease with a similar arachidonic acid increase has been found. In addition to fatty acid alteration, the separated mitochondrial phospholipid classes also exhibit some increase in stearic acid. Among phospholipids, cardiolipin changes the most of the esterified fatty acids in hyperthyroid rat liver. In this compound, a strong increase in the percentage of both palmitic and stearic acid and a 32.4% decrease of linoleic acid have been found. 

10930064
A depressed myocardium. 
BACKGROUND: Venlafaxine is a potent neuronal serotonin and noradrenaline re-uptake inhibitor, and to a lesser extent an inhibitor of dopamine reuptake. Paroxetine is a potent selective inhibitor of serotonin reuptake. CASE REPORT: A 27-year-old man ingested 1987.5 mg of venlafaxine and 360 mg of paroxetine. He subsequently developed systolic and diastolic hypertension, transient electrocardiographic abnormalities, and an area of persistent myocardial damage. He recovered from his overdose with his blood pressure and electrocardiogram returning to normal. The area of myocardial damage was documented on echocardiogram as an area of marked hypokinesia at the basal anterior septum. Despite the absence of confirming blood levels or the absolute exclusion of cocaine, this case indicates that venlafaxine and paroxetine have the potential for serious cardiotoxicity when taken in overdose. 

12948794
Effects of TMJ anesthesia and jaw gape on jaw-stretch reflexes in humans. 
OBJECTIVE: To study the roles of afferent sensory inputs in the temporomandibular joint (TMJ) and of muscle length in the modulation of the jaw-stretch reflex in humans. METHODS: Reflexes were evoked in both the masseter and temporalis muscles under standardized conditions in 11 young women. The study was performed in two sessions; experimental conditions were jaw gape and injection of local anesthetics. For jaw gape, 4, 14, and 24 mm were used in random order. One milliliter TMJ injections (carbocaine, 10 mg/ml, versus isotonic saline, 0.9%) were given in a randomized, double blind manner. When a participant received carbocaine during the first session, isotonic saline was injected during the second one. A total of 480 reflexes were evoked in every participant. RESULTS: No significant differences were found between carbocaine and isotonic saline. ANOVA and post hoc paired t tests did show, however, a significant effect of jaw gape for the left masseter and anterior temporalis muscles, with the 14 mm gape having the highest amplitude. CONCLUSIONS: Blocking the afferent sensory input (including the mechanoreceptors) from the TMJ seems to have no influence on the sensitivity of the human jaw-stretch reflex. Instead, muscle spindles are the most likely receptors to be responsible for the reflex modulation that was observed in the present study. 

862142
The aortic bodies supplied by coronary arteries in the dog. Their contribution to the hypertensive response that follows serotonin injection. 
I assessed the role of the chemoreceptors (aortic bodies) supplied by the coronary arteries in the hypertensive response induced by left atrial injection of (200 microgram serotonin) in adult anesthetized dogs. I compared the pressor response induced by serotonin during normal coronary circulation with that during exclusion of the central coronary segments from which the coronary blood supply to the aortic bodies arises. Exclusion of the central segments reduced the pressor response significantly from the control responses. Exclusion of the coronary blood supply of the aortic bodies resulted in a reduction of the control response of more than 50% in only two of the 21 dogs. I conclude that although the aortic bodies supplied by the coronary arteries play a significant role in the total hypertensive response to injected serotonin, their role usually is not predominant. 

1754480
[Psoriatic arthritis and celiac disease in childhood. A case report] 
A case of a girl followed up for 18 years is reported. At the age of two, the patient presented psoriasis and coeliac disease confirmed by biopsy and by laboratory data. She followed a coeliac diet and at the age of twelve she manifested a rheumatoid arthritis of the left knee without pain, confirmed by laboratory data (RA test, ANA test). In this period, the patient underwent another gastrointestinal biopsy after suspension of the diet; the structural alterations of the gastrointestinal tract being always present, she continued the diet associated with non steroidal antiphlogistic drug therapy for rheumatoid arthritis. The Authors remark the association of diseases, making a comparison with literature data and confirming the current hypotheses. It is interesting to observe that when the patient presented articular symptoms, there was the reappearance of the gastrointestinal symptomatology. Very interesting is the presence of psoriasis: in fact there is the problem whether this case is a psoriatic arthritis with coeliac disease or a juvenile rheumatoid arthritis with coeliac disease and psoriasis. At last, the Authors report the good results obtained by coeliac diet and non steroidal antiphlogistic drugs; a complete remission of articular symptoms and a good puberal and intellectual growth have been observed. 

1671472
Hyperinsulinaemia and microvascular angina ("syndrome X") 
Glucose and insulin responses to a glucose load in 11 patients with angina attributed to microvascular coronary dysfunction were compared with those in 11 healthy subjects matched for age, sex, and body mass. Stimulated hyperinsulinaemia was demonstrated in the microvascular angina group. The findings suggest a role for increased concentrations of insulin in coronary microvascular dysfunction. 

2934058
The effect of multivalent ions on the inactivation of bacteriophage phi X174 by lipopolysaccharide from Escherichia coli C. 
The inactivation of bacteriophage phi X174 by lipopolysaccharide from Escherichia coli C is promoted by multivalent metal ions and by polyamines. The effect of the two types of cation is similar, and the concentration causing 50% inactivation varies inversely with the charge on the cation, although quadrivalent amines are less active than expected. The increase in activity as the charge rises suggests that electrostatic binding is overwhelmingly important. 

658228
Is attenuation of tRNA charging responsible for the inhibition of protein labelling accompanying depolarisation of the cerebral cortical cells? 
Topical application of concentrated solutions of KCl resulted in reduction of charging of tRNA 7 min after s.c. injection of L-(U-14C) leucine. Neither radioactivity nor pool size of the total amino acids changed during this period. 

15684654
Spinal axonal injury induces brief downregulation of ionotropic glutamate receptors and no stripping of synapses in cord-projection central neurons. 
Spinal cord injury often damages the axons of cord-projecting central neurons. To determine whether their excitatory inputs are altered following axonal injury, we used rat rubrospinal neurons as a model and examined their excitatory input following upper cervical axotomy. Anterograde tracing showed that the primary afferents from the cerebellum terminated in a pattern similar to that of control animals. Ultrastructurally, neurons in the injured nucleus were contacted by excitatory synapses of normal appearance, with no sign of glial stripping. Since cerebellar fibers are glutamatergic, we examined the expression of ionotropic receptor subunits GluR1-4 and NR1 for AMPA and NMDA receptors, respectively, in control and injured neurons using immunolabeling methods. In control neurons, GluR2 appeared to be low as compared to GluR1, GluR3, and GluR4, while NR1 labeling was intense. Following unilateral tractotomy, the levels of expression of each subunit in axotomized neurons appeared to be normal, with the exception that they were lower than those of control neurons of the nonlesioned side at 2-6 days postinjury. These findings suggest that axotomized neurons are only temporarily protected from excitotoxicity. This is in sharp contrast to the responses of central neurons that innervate peripheral targets, in which both synaptic stripping and reduction of their ionotropic glutamate receptor subunits persist following axotomy. The absence of an injury-induced trimming of afferents and stripping of synapses and the lack of a persistent downregulation of postsynaptic receptors might enable injured cord-projection neurons to continue to control their supraspinal targets during most of their postinjury survival. Although this may support neurons by providing trophic influences, it nevertheless may subject them to excitotoxicity and ultimately lead to their degenerative fate. 

17111309
Effect of pool length on blood lactate, heart rate, and velocity in swimming. 
Exercise testing in water has been used to follow the progression of conditioning during regular training in swimmers. The present study examined the effects of pool length in eleven male swimmers on a set of 5 x 200-m freestyle swims with increasing speed from submaximal to maximal. Mean velocity of swimming, blood lactate and heart rate were examined in both 25-m and 50-m pools. Turning benefit as a marker for turning skill was measured separately by a underwater video system (speed difference between pre- and post-turning) during short all-out swims. Maximum force during swimming was measured in tethered swimming and explosive strength of leg extensor muscles was evaluated by a counter movement jump. The significantly higher (p=0.033 - 0.000) blood lactate values for the 50-m pool as compared to the 25-m pool were found at each point of swimming velocity versus blood lactate curve. The highest post-test lactate level was 7.36 +/- 1.47 mmol x l (-1) in the short course and 8.24 +/- 1.55 mmol x l (-1) (p=0.033) in the long course. The maximum swimming velocity was significantly greater (4.5 %) in the 25-m pool swimming (1.38 +/- 0.11 m x s (-1) vs. 1.32 +/- 0.12 m x s (-1); p=0.000). The heart rate values were significantly (p=0.020 - 0.000) lower in the short course than in the long course at all points of submaximal velocity with a mean difference of 7.3 +/- 0.7 bpm. Heart rate was equal (172 +/- 14 vs. 172 +/- 14 bpm) after the maximum swims in both short and long course. The turning benefit in the short maximum swim was 0.12 +/- 0.05 m x s (-1) (8.1 +/- 3.2 %), correlating positively with the difference in maximal swimming velocity between the short and long-pool swims (r = 0.59; p = 0.029), with the maximum force during tethered swimming (r=0.75; p=0.004) and with the vertical jumping height in the counter movement jump (r=0.55; p=0.039). We conclude that the pool length has a strong effect on blood lactate concentration and heart rate with greater swimming velocity in the short course pool. 

2697956
[The importance of ultrasonic study of the right heart ventricle and pulmonary artery in the diagnosis of hypertension of the lesser circulation] 
The data obtained during ultrasonic examination of the right heart ventricle and pulmonary artery are compared to the data of venous catheterization of the heart in 30 patients with chronic pulmonary diseases. Significant direct relationship was established between the correlations of the right and left ventricle volumes, the end diastolic and systolic volumes of the right ventricle, the cross section area of the right main pulmonary artery as was an inverse relationship between the ejection fraction and systolic effective pressure in the right ventricle. In bronchopulmonary diseases, two-dimensional echocardiography is an informative enough method not only in the assessment of hypertrophy, dilatation and failure of the right heart ventricle but also in indirect diagnosis of pulmonary circulation hypertension. 

116569
Cardiac tamponade caused by caval catheter--a radiological demonstration of an unusual complication. 
An adult male developed shock some hours after the start of intravenous alimentation. The caval catheter, which had been inserted through the right subclavian vein, was later radiographically demonstrated to be in the pericardial sac. We reviewed the literature on this and other complications of caval catheters. From this information and our own experience we offer some suggestions for prevention and management of some of the complications of caval catheters. 

17928369
Expression of polygalacturonases and evidence to support their role during cell separation processes in Arabidopsis thaliana. 
Polygalacturonases (PGs) have been proposed to play an important role in the process of cell separation. The Arabidopsis thaliana genome contains 69 annotated genes that by amino acid homology and transcript organization could be classified as putative PGs and these can be grouped into multiple clades. An analysis of five members located in two separate clades, using reporter fusion constructs and reverse transcription-PCR, revealed that whilst these PGs exhibit high sequence similarity they have distinct patterns of spatial and temporal expression. Sites of expression include the aleurone and endosperm cells surrounding the emerging radicle in a germinating seed, the cortical cells adjacent to the developing lateral root, the abscission zones of floral organs, the dehiscence zone of anthers and siliques, and pollen grains. Silencing of an abscission-related PG (At2g41850), using a T-DNA insertion strategy, delayed the time-course of floral organ loss but did not prevent shedding from taking place. These observations are discussed with regard to the contribution that PGs may play during the life cycle of a plant. 

17127695
Effectiveness of a chronic kidney disease clinic in achieving K/DOQI guideline targets at initiation of dialysis--a single-centre experience. 
BACKGROUND: Limited data exist about the effects of chronic kidney disease (CKD) clinics on quality-of-care indicators in patients before initiation of dialysis. METHODS: A single-centre retrospective chart review study was conducted on all patients who initiated dialysis at the Veterans Affairs Denver Healthcare System between 2000 and 2005. Patients initiating dialysis were evaluated at the start of dialysis and 12 months after dialysis initiation, as a function of care provided by nephrologists in training (renal-hypertension clinic) vs a trained renal nurse practitioner (CKD clinic). RESULTS: Data were available for 77 patients followed in the CKD clinic and 36 in the renal-hypertension clinic. There were no major demographic differences between the cohorts at the time of clinic referral. The length of follow-up before dialysis did not differ significantly between the cohorts (10.7+/-9.8 months for the patients in the CKD clinic cohort and 13.6+/-16.0 months for the patients in the renal-hypertension clinic cohort, P=0.3299). At the initiation of dialysis, patients followed in the CKD clinic had higher haemoglobin (11.6+/-1.5 vs 10.8+/-1.7 g/dl, P=0.0239) and serum albumin (3.4+/-0.5 vs 3.0+/-0.7 g/dl, P=0.0020) concentrations. More of the CKD clinic patients had a functioning permanent vascular access (P<0.0001). The number of all-cause hospitalizations in the 12 months after initiation of dialysis was significantly lower in the CKD clinic group (P=0.0024), but no significant differences were noted in all-cause mortality. CONCLUSIONS: Our data indicate that a single experienced renal nurse practitioner, working to a protocol, is more likely to adhere to guidelines than are multiple nephrology trainees rotating through a nephrology clinic. 

10300111
Strategies one hospital group has developed for successful change. 
Evangelical Health Systems has developed its own patient care software program and is marketing it to other hospitals under the name FasTrack Systems, Inc. The hospital communications and software package was installed in three EHS hospitals in 18 months. 

8978331
Electrophysiologic effects of acute myocardial ischemia. A mechanistic investigation of action potential conduction and conduction failure. 
A multicellular ventricular fiber model was used to determine mechanisms of slowed conduction and conduction failure during acute ischemia. We simulated the three major pathophysiological component conditions of acute ischemia: elevated [K+]o, acidosis, and anoxia. Elevated [K+]o was the major determinant of conduction, causing supernormal conduction, depressed conduction, and conduction block as [K+]o was gradually increased from 4.5 to 14.4 mmol/L. Only elevated [K+]o caused conduction failure when varied within the range reported for acute ischemia. Before block, depressed upstrokes consisted of two distinct components: the first to the fast Na+ current (INa) and the second to the L-type Ca2+ current (ICa(L)). Even in highly depressed conduction, excitability was maintained by INa, with conduction block occurring at 95% INa inactivation. However, because ICa(L) supported the later phase of the depressed upstroke, ICa(L) enhanced conduction and delayed block by increasing the electrotonic source current. At [K+]o = 18 mmol/L, slow action potentials generated by ICa(L) were obtained with 10% ICa(L) augmentation. However, in the presence of acidosis and anoxia, significantly larger (120%) ICa(L) augmentation was required. The depressant effect was due mostly to anoxic activation of outward ATP-sensitive K+ current, which counteracts inward ICa(L) and, by lowering the action potential amplitude, decreases the electrotonic current available to depolarize downstream cells. The simulations highlight the interactive nature of electrophysiological ischemic changes during propagation and demonstrate that both membrane changes and load factors (by downstream fiber) must be considered. 

15512816
A pilot trial of rituximab and alemtuzumab combination therapy in patients with relapsed and/or refractory chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL). 
The treatment of patients with chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL) who fail purine analogues is sub optimal. CLL lymphocytes express two antigens, namely CD 20 and CD 52, for which monoclonal antibodies are readily available. Rituximab is a chimeric monoclonal antibody targeted against CD 20, which has some activity in refractory CLL, with primary effect on nodal disease. Alemtuzumab is a humanized anti-CD 52 antibody that is approved for the treatment of CLL in patients who fail alkylating agents and purine analogues. Alemtuzumab has better activity in the peripheral blood and the bone marrow compared to nodal disease. We investigated whether combining both antibodies is safe in refractory CLL. Both antibodies were given to a total of 12 patients divided into 3 cohorts with escalating alemtuzumab doses (3 mg, 10 mg, and 30 mg). The combination was proven to be safe, not toxic, feasible, and active. One patient attained PR by NCI criteria while all other patients had stable disease lasting a median of 101.5 days. All patients normalized their peripheral lymphocytosis within a median of 23.5 days. No treatment-related mortality was identified. No CMV reactivation occurred. Additional studies are needed to investigate the clinical significance of such a combination in this patient population, and whether this combination can be administered safely with systemic chemotherapy. These studies are currently underway. 

17053265
Hemodynamic changes during discontinuation of mechanical ventilation in medical intensive care unit patients. 
BACKGROUND: Cardiac dysfunction can prevent successful discontinuation of mechanical ventilation. Critically ill patients may have undetected cardiac disease, and cardiac dysfunction can be produced or exacerbated by underlying pathophysiology. OBJECTIVE: To describe and compare hemodynamic function and cardiac rhythm during baseline mechanical ventilation with function and rhythm during a trial of continuous positive airway pressure in medical intensive care patients. METHODS: A convenience sample of 43 patients (53% men; mean age 51.1 years) who required mechanical ventilation were recruited for this pilot study. Cardiac output, stroke volume, arterial blood pressure, heart rate, cardiac rhythm, and plasma catecholamine levels were measured during mechanical ventilation and during a trial of continuous positive airway pressure. RESULTS: One third of the patients had difficulty discontinuing mechanical ventilation. Successful patients had significantly increased cardiac output and stroke volume without changes in heart rate or arterial pressure during the trial of continuous positive airway pressure. Unsuccessful patients had no significant changes in cardiac output, stroke volume, or heart rate but had a significant increase in mean arterial pressure. The 2 groups of patients also had different patterns in ectopy. Concurrently, catecholamine concentrations decreased in the successful patients and significantly increased in the unsuccessful patients during the trial. CONCLUSIONS: Patterns of cardiac function and plasma catecholamine levels differed between patients who did or did not achieve spontaneous ventilation with a trial of continuous positive airway pressure. Cardiac function must be systematically considered before and during the return to spontaneous ventilation to optimize the likelihood of success. 

3826306
The effects of day care participation on parent-infant interaction at home. 
This study assessed how parents who placed their children in a model infant and toddler center were, over time, influenced by three salient features of the center: its child-centered focus, its social orientation, and its support for men in nurturing roles. 

9734740
Dietary vitamin A and prevalence of bronchial metaplasia in asbestos-exposed workers. 
The purpose of this investigation was to examine the association between dietary intake of vitamin A in the form of retinol and provitamin A carotenoids and the prevalence of bronchial squamous metaplasia in a sample of asbestos workers from an industrial clinic. Bronchial biopsies were obtained from 49 asbestos workers. Pulmonary function testing was done and in-person interviews were conducted to estimate dietary intake of retinol and provitamin A carotenoids, tobacco exposure, and asbestos exposure. Results indicated that workers with metaplasia reported consuming a significantly lower intake of total vitamin A [2000 retinol equivalents (RE)/d] than did subjects without metaplasia (2710 RE/d, P = 0.02). Logistic regression analyses showed that higher intakes of retinol [odds ratio (OR): 0.31; 95% CI: 0.04, 2.44], provitamin A carotenoids (OR: 0.31; 95% CI: 0.03, 2.84), and total vitamin A (OR: 0.29; 95% CI: 0.03, 2.49) were associated with a nonsignificant reduction in the OR for metaplasia (highest quartile compared with lowest quartile, adjusted ORs). Current smoking (OR: 5.25; 95% CI: 0.50, 55.1) and former smoking (OR: 2.95; 95% CI: 0.31, 28.1) were associated with a nonsignificant increase in the OR for bronchial metaplasia compared with never smoking. Greater airway obstruction [decreased forced expiratory volume in 1 s (FEV1)/forced vital capacity (FVC)] was associated with an increased OR for metaplasia (OR: 2.86; 95% CI: 1.09, 7.69). These results suggest that a higher (ie, above the median) intake of vitamin A from foods decreases the risk of bronchial metaplasia in workers occupationally exposed to asbestos. 

9681452
Corticotropin-releasing factor administered centrally, but not peripherally, stimulates hippocampal acetylcholine release. 
In addition to corticotropin-releasing factor's well-known role in mediating hormonal and behavioral responses to stress, this peptide also reportedly affects arousal and cognition, processes that classically have been associated with forebrain cholinergic systems. Corticotropin-releasing factor stimulation of cholinergic neurons might thus provide a mechanism for this peptide's cognitive effects. To examine this possibility, the present experiments characterize the effect of corticotropin-releasing factor on cholinergic neurotransmission, using in vivo microdialysis to measure hippocampal acetylcholine release. Corticotropin-releasing factor (0.5-5.0 microg/rat intracerebroventricularly) was found to increase dialysate concentrations of acetylcholine in a dose-dependent manner in comparison with a control injection, the ovine peptide having a greater effect than the same dose of the human/rat peptide. This effect was found to be centrally mediated, independent of the peripheral effects of an exogenous corticotropin-releasing factor injection; subcutaneous injections of the peptide increased plasma concentrations of corticosterone, the adrenal hormone ultimately secreted in the rat's stress response, to the same level as did the central injections, without affecting hippocampal acetylcholine release. These results demonstrate that corticotropin-releasing factor, acting centrally, regulates hippocampal cholinergic activity, and suggest that corticotropin-releasing factor/acetylcholine interactions may underlie some of the previously identified roles of these neurotransmitters in arousal, cognition, and stress. 

12825436
The application of geographic information systems and global positioning systems in humanitarian emergencies: lessons learned, programme implications and future research. 
Geographic information systems (GIS), global positioning systems and remote sensing have been increasingly used in public health settings since the 1990s, but application of these methods in humanitarian emergencies has been less documented. Recent areas of application of GIS methods in humanitarian emergencies include hazard, vulnerability, and risk assessments; rapid assessment and survey methods; disease distribution and outbreak investigations; planning and implementation of health information systems; data and programme integration; and programme monitoring and evaluation. The main use of GIS in these areas is to provide maps for decision-making and advocacy, which allow overlaying types of information that may not normally be linked. GIS is also used to improve data collection in the field (for example, for rapid health assessments or mortality surveys). Development of GIS methods requires further research. Although GIS methods may save resources and reduce error, initial investment in equipment and capacity building may be substantial. Especially in humanitarian emergencies, equipment and methodologies must be practical and appropriate for field use. Add-on software to process GIS data needs to be developed and modified. As equipment becomes more user-friendly and costs decrease, GIS will become more of a routine tool for humanitarian aid organisations in humanitarian emergencies, and new and innovative uses will evolve. 

2094407
Neuropsychological and psychiatric changes following treatment of ARC patients with zidovudine. 
Six homosexual men with a diagnosis of acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS)-related complex (ARC- CDC IVA/C2) were assessed with a series of neuropsychological and psychiatric tests prior to commencing treatment with zidovudine and again after 5-6 months. Significant improvements were seen in cognitive functioning, mental state and physical health at the second assessment. 

2574062
Effects of benzodiazepines and non-benzodiazepine compounds on the GABA-induced response in frog isolated sensory neurones. 
1. The effects of benzodiazepines and non-benzodiazepine compounds on the gamma-aminobutyric acid (GABA)-induced chloride current (ICl) were studied in frog isolated sensory neurones by use of a concentration-jump (termed 'concentration-clamp') technique, under single-electrode voltage-clamp conditions. The drugs used were classified into four categories as follows: full benzodiazepine receptor agonists (diazepam, clonazepam, nitrazepam, midazolam, clotiazepam and etizolam), partial agonists (CL 218,872, Ro 16-6028, Ro 17-1812 and Ro 23-0364), inverse agonists (Ro 15-3505, FG 7142 and beta-CCE) and a benzodiazepine receptor antagonist, Ro 15-1788 (flumazenil). 2. All full agonists at concentrations of 3 x 10(-6) M or less increased dose-dependently the peak amplitude of ICl elicited by 3 x 10(-6) M GABA to twice to three times larger than the control. However, no further augmentation of the GABA response was observed at concentrations of 1 x 10(-5) M or higher. Partial agonists also showed a dose-dependent augmentation of the GABA response at concentrations ranging from 3 x 10(-8) M to 3 x 10(-5) M, but their efficacies of augmentation of the GABA response were only about half or less of those of full agonists. Of the inverse agonists, beta-CCE had a unique dose-dependent effect on the GABA response. Beta-CCE reduced dose-dependently the GABA response at concentrations of less than 3 x 10(-6) M, but augmented it at concentrations of 3 x 10(-5) M and 6 x 10(-5) M. The inverse agonists reduced dose-dependently the GABA response. (ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS) 

6341717
A method for the dissection of the embryonic cerebral cortex into individual layers. An application to biochemical studies of glycan metabolism. 
A method is presented for the isolation of defined cerebral cortical layers from the prenatal rat brain. By this procedure cells at different stages of proliferation and/or differentiation can be obtained as relatively homogeneous populations. The principle of the proposed isolation procedure consists of freezing the isolated embryonic brain in a mould which flattens the two hemispheres. The different cortical layers are then isolated by carefully cutting serial cryostat sections. On embryonic day 16 (ED 16), 3 individual layers could be sampled from the cortex: the marginal zone, the zone of DNA synthesis and the mitotic region of the ventricular germinative zone. On ED 18 and ED 20, a further 3 layers could be isolated: the cortical plate, the sub-plate region, and the intermediate zone. As an example of an application of the isolation procedure for biochemical studies, maturation-dependent changes in the protein and Concanavalin A-binding glycoprotein patterns together with the activity of beta-N-acetylglucosaminidase in the different cortical layers of the embryonic brain are demonstrated at different stages of brain development. 

263112
Interstitial-implant radiotherapy in upper-aerodigestive-tract malignancy. 
In the treatment of upper-aerodigestive-tract malignancy, interstitial-implant radiotherapy differs in several physical and biologic respects from conventional external-beam therapy: unlike external-beam therapy, it can deliver a high central dose with a rapid fall-off, which overcomes the central hypoxic resistance effect and yet greatly improves normal tissue tolerance. External-beam and interstitial-implant therapy can also be combined to the patient's benefit; in many cases, this combination offers advantages over external-beam therapy alone, preoperative external-beam therapy, or aggressive surgery. The recent upsurge of interest in this modality has come about because of three developments: more suitable radioactive sources, after-loading, and computerized dosimetry. The early results in upper-aerodigestive-tract malignancy, both as primary and as salvage therapy, are promising; but the precise role of this treatment in our therapeutic armamentarium remains to be established. 

17252219
Phase I participants' views of quality of life and trial participation burdens. 
PURPOSE: Participants' perception of quality of life (QOL) and respondent burden have significant implications for investigators' ethical responsibilities to their subjects in phase I cancer trials. To address these responsibilities, analysis was conducted on participants' views of their experiences of a phase I trial, including the associated burdens and what constitutes QOL. PATIENTS AND METHODS: One hundred potential participants of the endostatin trial were surveyed. Sixteen of the 18 trial participants were interviewed extensively about their experiences on the trial. RESULTS: Participants described 'normality' as a baseline ability to function, be productive, and be free from symptoms of disease and side effects of treatment. Reflecting the relative nontoxicity of the study drug, participants contrasted their current QOL with their negative experience of previous cancer treatments and viewed their QOL as fairly good. However, participants emphasized that indirect and procedural burdens of trial participation had a significant impact on their current QOL. CONCLUSIONS: Candid descriptions of a trial's practical demands, in addition to potential physical complications in a trial, could improve the quality of informed consent. 

3369461
Attitudes of house physicians concerning various antibiotic-use control programs. 
Medical and surgical house physicians at three teaching hospitals with different antibiotic control programs (ACPs) were surveyed to determine their attitudes about and preferences for these programs. Questionnaires were mailed to resident physicians who had trained at all three hospitals. One hospital had no antibiotic prescribing policy (open prescribing), one employed an infectious-disease physician consultant who discussed antibiotic orders for certain reserved drugs with prescribing physicians but did not otherwise restrict access to the drugs (educational ACP), and the third hospital required approval of an infectious-disease physician for dispensing of reserved drugs by the pharmacy department (restrictive ACP). The survey response was 77% after one follow-up mailing to nonrespondents. Regardless of hospital type, physicians preferred the educational ACP to either open prescribing or the restrictive ACP. Based on personal experiences, significantly fewer physicians encountered patient-care problems with the educational ACP than with either open antibiotic prescribing or the restrictive ACP. Significantly more physicians perceived that the educational ACP was more beneficial for patient antibiotic therapy and will be more beneficial for future antibiotic prescribing than the restrictive ACP. Most respondents believed that ACPs save hospitals money, that ACPs can be implemented without compromising either patient care or physician performance, and that they would encounter similar ACPs in the future. Educational ACPs should be considered at teaching hospitals with interested infectious-disease consultants. 

15208635
Separate blue and green cone networks in the mammalian retina. 
The distinct absorbance spectra of the cone photopigments form the basis of color vision, but ultrastructural and physiological evidence shows that mammalian cones are electrically coupled. Coupling between cones of the same spectral type should average voltage noise in adjacent photoreceptors and improve the ability to resolve low-contrast spatial patterns. However, indiscriminate coupling between spectral types could compromise color vision by smearing chromatic information across channels. Here we show, by measuring the junctional conductance between green-green and blue-green cone pairs in slices from the dichromatic ground-squirrel retina, that green-green cone pairs are routinely coupled with an average conductance of 220 pS, whereas coupling is undetectable in blue-green cone pairs. Together with a lack of tracer coupling and the selective localization of connexin proteins, our results show that signals in blue and green cones are processed separately in the photoreceptor layer. 

2867579
Serum oestradiol and ischaemic heart disease--relationship with myocardial infarction but not coronary atheroma or haemostasis. 
Elevated oestradiol (E2) levels may be a risk factor for ischaemic heart disease in men, although the mechanisms for the elevation of oestrogen and for its adverse effects remain unclear. We have studied 100 Caucasian males undergoing elective coronary angiography for ischaemic chest pain and measured serum oestradiol, a profile of haemostatic tests, extent of coronary artery disease and evidence of previous myocardial infarction in order to assess any relationships which could explain the effect of elevated serum oestradiol levels. Levels were significantly higher in men with a history of myocardial infarction compared to those without (p less than 0.01), but were unrelated to the extent of coronary disease or to the haemostatic tests. These results suggest that the association of oestradiol with coronary events relates to myocardial infarction, not to atherogenesis, and is not due to any currently measurable alterations of haemostasis. Current beta-adrenoceptor blocker treatment was associated with lower oestradiol and thromboxane B2 concentrations (both, p = 0.06). These incidental findings suggest that further studies of the effects of beta-blockade on oestradiol and thromboxane metabolism are indicated. 

15573496
N-phosphoryl amino acids and biomolecular origins. 
The possible role of phosphoryl amino acids for biomolecular origins is briefly reviewed. Peptide formation, ester formation, ester exchange on phosphorus and N to O migration occurred when the N-phosphoryl amino acid was incubated at room temperature. Short nucleotides and peptides were formed when nucleoside was reacted with N-phosphoryl amino acid at room temperature. Serine and threonine residues in their conjugate with different nucleosides (mediated with phosphorus) showed different self-cleavage activities. N-phosphoryl Histine and Ser-His dipeptide could cleave nucleic acids, proteins and esters in neutral medium. Based on a simple model, a pathway of 'co-evolution of protein and nucleic acid' was proposed. 

10779457
Social support, depression, and mortality during the first year after myocardial infarction. 
BACKGROUND: We previously reported that depression after myocardial infarction (MI) increases the long-term risk of cardiac mortality. Other research suggests that social support may also influence prognosis. This article examines the interrelationships between baseline depression and social support in terms of cardiac prognosis and changes in depression symptoms over the first post-MI year. METHODS AND RESULTS: For this study, 887 patients completed the Beck Depression Inventory (BDI) and the Perceived Social Support Scale (PSSS) at about 7 days after MI. Some 32% had BDIs > or =10, indicating mild to moderate depression. One-year survival status was determined for all patients. Follow-up interviews, including the BDI, were conducted with 89% of survivors. There were 39 deaths (35 cardiac). Elevated BDI scores were related to cardiac mortality (P=0.0006), but PSSS scores and other measures of social support were not. There was a significant interaction between depression and the PSSS (P=0. 016). The relationship between depression and cardiac mortality decreased with increasing support. Furthermore, residual change score analysis revealed that among 1-year survivors who had been depressed at baseline, higher baseline social support was related to more improvement in depression symptoms than expected. CONCLUSIONS: Post-MI depression is a predictor of 1-year cardiac mortality, but social support is not directly related to survival. However, very high levels of support appear to buffer the impact of depression on mortality. Furthermore, high levels of support predict improvements in depression symptoms over the first post-MI year in depressed patients. High levels of support may protect patients from the negative prognostic consequences of depression because of improvements in depression symptoms. 

8185582
Enzyme kinetics of lipolysis revisited: the role of lipase interfacial binding. 
A model for the enzyme kinetics of lipolysis was developed where the rate limiting step of the reaction is the interfacial binding step. Binding involves the association of the enzyme with a cluster of substrate molecules and a conformational change in the enzyme, resulting in an interfacially penetrated lipase bound to a cluster of substrate molecules. The resulting derived rate equation is identical to the HIll equation. Fits of the model to experimental velocity vs. substrate concentration data from the literature allowed for the determination of enzyme-substrate interface dissociation constants and reaction order with respect to substrate concentration. 

11595172
Cooperative effects by the initiation codon and its flanking regions on translation initiation. 
The purine-rich Shine-Dalgarno (SD) sequence located a few bases upstream of the mRNA initiation codon supports translation initiation by complementary binding to the anti-SD in the 16S rRNA, close to its 3' end. AUG is the canonical initiation codon but the weaker UUG and GUG codons are also used for a minority of genes. The codon sequence of the downstream region (DR), including the +2 codon immediately following the initiation codon, is also important for initiation efficiency. We have studied the interplay between these three initiation determinants on gene expression in growing Escherichia coli. One optimal SD sequence (SD(+)) and one lacking any apparent complementarity to the anti-SD in 16S rRNA (SD(-)) were analyzed. The SD(+) and DR sequences affected initiation in a synergistic manner and large differences in the effects were found. The gene expression level associated with the most efficient of these DRs together with SD(-) was comparable to that of other DRs together with SD(+). The otherwise weak initiation codon UUG, but not GUG, was comparable with AUG in strength, if placed in the context of two of the DRs. The +2 codon was one, but not the only, determinant for this unexpectedly high efficiency of UUG. 

8797999
Ultra-high-speed MR imaging. 
Conventional magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) has been shown to provide excellent morphological images of the body organs, particularly structures undergoing little physiologic motion. Nevertheless, the clinical usefulness of MRI has been hampered by long acquisition times, high cost of scanning because of limited patient throughput, and image artifacts due to patient motion. With recent technical developments, several ultrafast scanning techniques capable of acquiring images in a breath-hold now find their introduction into clinical use. The system improvements are potentially useful for a vast range of applications hitherto not accessible to MR imaging. Among these are functional brain imaging, realtime imaging of cardiac motion and perfusion, fast abdominal imaging, improved MR angiography, and potentially real-time monitoring of interventional procedures. Whereas some ultrafast techniques can be performed on conventional scanners, echo-planar imaging, the fastest currently available data acquisition strategy, requires specially designed hardware. This article provides an overview of the technical advances in ultrafast MRI and discusses potential applications and the possible future impact on body scanning. 

2739584
Studies on faecal streptococci in the river Tigris. 
Six hundred water samples collected from the river Tigris at Mosul City were investigated for faecal streptococci. Human faecal streptococci were predominant, and animal faecal streptococci were also detected. Eight species and varieties were identified, viz Streptococcus faecalis, atypical Streptococcus faecalis, Streptococcus bovis, Streptococcus equinus, Streptococcus faecalis var. liquefaciens, Streptococcus faecalis var. zymogenes, Streptococcus durans and Streptococcus faecium. The incidence of these species and varieties were 43.32%, 13.18%, 11.47%, 11.30%, 9.76%, 5.30%, 3.76% and 1.88%, respectively. 

7214683
Cutaneous basophil hypersensitivity in atopic dermatitis. 
The infiltration by basophils into delayed hypersensitivity skin test sites was examined in patients with atopic dermatitis, contact dermatitis and in normal healthy persons. Atopic dermatitis patients, with large amounts of IgE, injected intradermally with staphylococcal antigens showed reactions that were more transient and erythematous than those of normal persons. On histological examination there were numerous, degranulating basophils among the perivascular mononuclear cells. Normal persons, with small amounts of IgE showed typical mononuclear cell infiltration and few basophils. Patients with contact dermatitis, one with much IgE, responded to patch tests to potassium dichromate or to nickel sulphate by delayed type reactions, but on histology, two of the four patients showed a significant infiltration by basophils. It is considered that the erythematous response to the antigen in atopic dermatitis patients is related to the basophil infiltration. 

8418203
Reversal of acute and chronic synovial inflammation by anti-transforming growth factor beta. 
Transforming growth factor beta (TGF-beta) induces leukocyte recruitment and activation, events central to an inflammatory response. In this study, we demonstrate that antagonism of TGF-beta with a neutralizing antibody not only blocks inflammatory cell accumulation, but also tissue pathology in an experimental model of chronic erosive polyarthritis. Intraarticular injection of monoclonal antibody 1D11.16, which inhibits both TGF-beta 1 and TGF-beta 2 bioactivity, into animals receiving an arthropathic dose of bacterial cell walls significantly inhibits arthritis. Inhibition was observed with a single injection of 50 micrograms antibody, and a 1-mg injection blocked acute inflammation > 75% compared with the contralateral joints injected with an irrelevant isotype control antibody (MOPC21) as quantitated by an articular index (AI = 0.93 +/- 0.23 for 1D11.16, and AI = 4.0 +/- 0 on day 4; p < 0.001). Moreover, suppression of the acute arthritis achieved with a single injection of antibody was sustained into the chronic, destructive phase of the disease (on day 18, AI = 0.93 +/- 0.07 vs. AI = 2.6 +/- 0.5; p < 0.01). The decreased inflammatory index associated with anti-TGF-beta treatment was consistent with histopathologic and radiologic evidence of a therapeutic response. These data implicate TGF-beta as a profound agonist not only in the early events responsible for synovial inflammation, but also in the chronicity of streptococcal cell wall fragment-induced inflammation culminating in destructive pathology. Interrupting the cycle of leukocyte recruitment and activation with TGF-beta antagonists may provide a mechanism for resolution of chronic destructive lesions. 

16088718
Antibiotic side effects. 
There is recent enhanced interest in the potential of medication to produce serious toxicity, and the television media have focused on the serious side effects and drug-drug interactions caused by antibiotics. In fact, a recent hospital study noted that drug-related toxicity was one of the most common causes of death for hospitalized patients. Antibiotic-induced adverse events contribute to host injury diagnostic confusion and excessive medical costs. In addition, however, a "spin-off'' of antibiotic-induced adverse events is the emergence and dissemination of drug-resistant organisms. This chapter will describe the adverse events and drug-drug interactions produced by those antibiotics that are most commonly prescribed to patients to prevent or treat respiratory tract infections. An effort will also be made to focus on those unique settings (the patient with renal insufficiency, the patient receiving immunosuppressive medication, the pregnant patient, the elderly patient, and the HIV-infected patient who is a candidate for primary or secondary prophylaxis for Pneumocystis carinii) that require a knowledge of antibiotic-induced adverse events. 

10106906
Keyworkers for elderly people in the community: case managers and care co-ordinators. 
In the United Kingdom a range of services for elderly people in the community has developed that is delivered by a variety of professionals and administered within different organisations. This has resulted in a problem of co-ordinating services to meet the individual needs of the most frail elderly people. In the United States 'case management' has been introduced as a way of improving the co-ordination of care. Despite structural differences in the provision of health and social services between the United States and the United Kingdom, the concept of case management has influenced the design of a number of innovatory schemes in the United Kingdom, including the Gloucester Care for Elderly People at Home project (CEPH). These innovatory schemes have demonstrated the need for a 'keyworker' and clarified the tasks that are involved in taking responsibility for co-ordinating services to meet the needs of elderly people at risk of failing to cope at home. There is, however, a danger of proliferating the complexity of service provision by creating a new breed of professional; an alternative might be to alter the responsibilities, attitudes and team orientation of existing professional workers so as to include taking on the keyworker role for some of their clients. 

10726651
Evaluation of chlamydia and gonorrhea screening criteria: San Francisco sexually transmitted disease clinic: 1997 to 1998. 
BACKGROUND AND OBJECTIVES: The advent of more sensitive diagnostic testing technologies and competition in public healthcare spending have resulted in a reevaluation of sexually transmitted disease (STD) screening practices in an attempt to target populations at greatest risk. Screening among populations with a < 2% prevalence of chlamydia and a < 1% prevalence of gonorrhea may not be cost-effective. GOAL: To identify subpopulations with a low prevalence of chlamydia or gonorrhea. STUDY DESIGN: The prevalence of genital chlamydia and gonorrhea among asymptomatic STD patients screened from 1997 to 1998 at San Francisco City Clinic was stratified by demographic and behavioral risk factors. RESULTS: The prevalence of chlamydia and gonorrhea was 3.4% and 1.1% among asymptomatic women and 4.0% and 1.0% among asymptomatic men, respectively. Two low-prevalence subpopulations identified among asymptomatic patients were women older than 29 years (chlamydia, 1.2%) and men who have sex with women (gonorrhea, 0.8%). CONCLUSIONS: These data identified low-prevalence subpopulations among asymptomatic STD patients. As a result, the STD screening criteria at San Francisco City Clinic were changed accordingly. 

17728456
Experience-dependent modification of primary sensory synapses in the mammalian olfactory bulb. 
Experience-dependent changes in neural circuits have traditionally been investigated several synapses downstream of sensory input. Whether experience can alter the strength of primary sensory synapses remains mostly unknown. To address this issue, we investigated the consequences of odor deprivation on synapses made by olfactory sensory axons in the olfactory bulb of rats. Odor deprivation triggered an increase in the probability of glutamate release from olfactory sensory neuron synapses. Deprivation also increased the amplitude of quantal synaptic currents mediated by AMPA- and NMDA-type glutamate receptors, as well as the abundance of these receptors in the glomerular region. Our results demonstrate that sensory experience is capable of modulating synaptic strength at the earliest stages of information transfer between the environment and an organism. Such compensatory experience-dependent changes may represent a mechanism of sensory gain control. 

15829180
The protective effect of adenosine A2A receptor antagonism in cerebral ischemia. 
OBJECTIVES: We reviewed our most recent work on the protective effect of adenosine A(2A)antagonism in cerebral ischemia. METHODS: Focal ischemia was produced in rats by introducing a nylon monofilament pre-coated with silicone through the external carotid artery to occlude the right MCA at its origin. RESULTS: A(2A) antagonism was found protective in the model of permanent focal ischemia induced by the monofilament technique. This methodology provides the possibility of evaluating the protection against the outflow of excitatory amino acids and against an acute motor disturbance, i.e.contralateral turning to the ischemic side in the first hours after ischemia in awake rats. Hours later, a definite neurological deficit and necrotic neuronal damage can be evaluated. DISCUSSION: Our results suggest that A(2A) antagonism may be protective from the earliest up to several hours after the ischemic event. 

11200270
New phosphoramidite reagents for the synthesis of oligonucleotides containing a cysteine residue useful in peptide conjugation. 
The preparation is described of four 2-cyanoethyl-N,N-diisopropyl phosphoramidites of N-alpha-Fmoc-S-protected cysteine hydroxyalkyl amides. The phosphoramidites were used in solid-phase synthesis of 5'-cysteinyl oligonucleotides, useful intermediates in the preparation of peptide-oligonucleotide conjugates through reaction with a maleimide peptide or with a peptide thioester via "native ligation". 

17251009
Broad substrate Cytochrome P450 monooxygenase activity in the cells of Aspergillus terreus MTCC 6324. 
Cytochrome P450 (CYP) monooxygenase activities with different category of substrates namely, alkanes, alkane derivatives, alcohols, aromatic compounds, organic solvents, and steroids were detected in the cells of Aspergillus terreus. High CYP specific activity was observed when methanol (5.6+/-0.017 U mg(-1)), acetone (7.76+/-0.02 U mg(-1)), dimethylsulphoxide (DMSO) (9.70+/-0.005 U mg(-1)), n-hexadecane (4.39+/-0.02 U mg(-1)), or n-octadecane (4.23+/-0.01 U mg(-1)) were used as substrates. Significant CYP specific activity was also detected when naphthalene (3.80+/-0.002 U mg(-1)) was used as substrate. The CYP catalysis of n-hexadecane had followed both terminal and sub terminal oxidations. The activity was localized in the cytosol of n-hexadecane grown cells, while, it was apparently distributed in light mitochondrial fraction and microsomal fraction of glucose grown cells. The substrate specificities of CYP present in all the locations were similar irrespective of the substrates used for the growth. Heme staining of the microsomal fraction containing CYP and other proteins in SDS-PAGE showed single heme protein band with corresponding molecular weight of 110 kDa. 

1818814
[The applied anatomy of human right posterior hepatic veins] 
The right posterior hepatic veins (RPHV) were investigated using the stripped specimens of 55 cadaver adult livers and the corrosion casts of portal and hepatic venous system of 45 embryos and newborns. RPHV were found in 88 livers (88%). RPHV of 6 livers (6%) was thicker than the right hepatic vein. There were 4 types of RP-HV and they could be grouped under three anatomical locations: superior, intermedial and inferior RPHV. According to our observation, RPHV with calibre more than 0.50 cm was mainly in the group of inferior RPHV (72%). RPHV in 23 (41.82%) adult livers had extrahepatic course with a Length of 1.72 +/- 0.88 cm. The application of RPHV in hepatectomy and image diagnosis was also discussed. 

2583542
Biology and physiology of development of aging. 
The presentation of a new language of biology and physiology to undergraduate and graduate students in gerontology is a challenge met with varied approaches in content and form. Major issues in content are presented with reference to encyclopedic and more readable texts and journals. Use of audiovisual, discussion, and written materials are identified. The importance of ongoing evaluation, knowledge and implementation of the most current information, and goals of undergraduate and graduate courses are addressed. 

11182418
Redo ileal pouch-anal anastomosis for malfunctioning pouches-acceptable alternative to permanent ileostomy? 
BACKGROUND: Pouch complications after ileal pouch-anal anastomosis (IPAA) can result in morbidity and pouch loss. Recent reports describe success with redo IPAA. This study was conducted to assess the outcome of malfunctioning pouches treated by redo IPAA. METHODS: All patients undergoing redo IPAA between 1983 and 1999 were identified and clinical records studied. Redo IPAA was defined as an operation for malfunctioning pouch with pelvic dissection and disconnection, pouch revision, and reanastomosis. Analyzed were etiology, presentation, diagnostic modalities, surgical management, pouch loss, and outcome. Follow-up was obtained by telephone or mailed survey. RESULTS: Between 1983 and 1999, 650 IPAA procedures were performed, 6 (0.9%) of which required redo IPAA. Ten referred patients required redo IPAA. These 16 cases included 7 anastomotic disruptions, 3 pouch-vaginal fistulae, 2 recurrent polyps after stapled IPAA, 2 megapouches, 1 cuff abscess, and 1 straight pullthrough. All patients underwent redo IPAA with pouch salvage 100% in this series. Twelve had the original pouch repaired and 4 new pouches. Six patients (37%) had complications and outcome was acceptable with 7.8 stools per day and nighttime incontinence "rarely" or "never" in 7 patients. Eight described results as "good," 6 as "fair.". CONCLUSION: Redo IPAA can be performed with few complications, an acceptable outcome, and should result in low pouch loss. 

12830377
The systemic inflammatory response syndrome (SIRS) to identify infected patients in the emergency room. 
OBJECTIVE: Evaluation of the usefulness of criteria for systemic inflammatory response syndrome (SIRS) compared with the final diagnosis of infection in patients admitted to the emergency room of two university-based hospitals. DESIGN: Longitudinal cohort study. SETTING: Hospital Universitario San Vicente de Paul and Hospital General de Medellin, Medellin, Colombia. PATIENTS. Seven hundred thirty-four patients with suspected infection as main diagnosis for admittance into the emergency room. MEASUREMENTS AND RESULTS: Sensitivity, specificity, predictive values and likelihood ratios (LR) of SIRS criteria at admission were determined using, as gold standards, the diagnosis at the time of discharge based on clinical history and evolution, and microbiological confirmation of infection. SIRS criteria were met by 503 patients (68.5%); the discharge diagnosis of infection was found in 657 (89.4%) and 276 (37%) had microbiological confirmation. SIRS criteria exhibited a sensitivity of 69%, specificity of 35%, positive predictive value (PPV) of 90%, negative predictive value (NPV) of 12% and positive LR of 1.06. There were no differences between the two gold standards. CONCLUSIONS: The finding of two or more SIRS criteria was of little usefulness for diagnosis of infection. It is necessary to work with new criteria and probably with biological markers, in order to obtain a simple, precise and operative definition of the sepsis phenomenon. 

16883510
[The medulloblastoma] 
INTRODUCTION AND DEVELOPMENT: Medulloblastoma is a cerebellar small cell tumor, whose ancestor cell has not been yet identified in the human normal embriology: its exact origin is, in fact, still unknown. Nevertheless, one of the most acceptable possibilities facing the origin of the tumor is the remaining rests of cerebellar outer granular sheet. It is a predominantly infantile tumor, less frequent in young adults, and World Health Organization (WHO) classification has assignated grade IV of malignancy. In this publication of the WHO, medulloblastomas have been subclassified into: classic, desmoplastic, medulloblastomas with extensive nodularity and advanced neuronal differentiation and large cell medulloblastomas. Real differences dealing with survival and prognosis amidst these subvarieties have been noted in extensive series. CONCLUSION: The most frequently genetic alteration is the presence of isochromosome 17q in most of 50% of the cases. 

8800873
Case report: CT and MRI demonstration of hypothalamic and infundibular relapse in childhood acute lymphoblastic leukaemia. 
The central nervous system is affected in up to 10% of patients with acute lymphoblastic leukaemia, usually in the form of leptomeningeal infiltration. Parenchymal spread is rare. We report a case in which CT and MRI demonstrated hypothalamic and infundibular relapse. 

2282564
Bone changes in hyperthyroidism--a preliminary study. 
Thyrotoxicosis may cause osteopenia and lead to increased risk of fractures. From July 1988 to March 1989, 88 hyperthyroid patients and 65 age, sex matched normal controls were enrolled for lumbar spine bone mineral density (BMD) study. Significantly lower BMD values can be found in premenopausal hyperthyroid women (1.233 gm/cm2 vs 1.317 gm/cm2, p less than p less than 0.05). In the group of thyrotoxicosis, no linear correlation can be found between BMD and the degree of hyperthyroidism (N = 84, r = 0.01 and N = 74, r = 0.054 as comparing BMD to T4 and T3, respectively). After treatment with antithyroid drugs (ATD) for 3 months, BMD did not change significantly (1.258 gm/cm2 vs 1.242 gm/cm2, p = 0.02) in the hyperthyroid patients. Therefore, premenopausal hyperthyroid women have lower BMD than premenopausal euthyroid women. The treatment of hyperthyroidism after 3 months' course did not increase lumbar spine BMD. 

11160716
Self-assembly of nucleocapsid-like particles from recombinant hepatitis C virus core protein. 
Little is known about the assembly pathway and structure of hepatitis C virus (HCV) since insufficient quantities of purified virus are available for detailed biophysical and structural studies. Here, we show that bacterially expressed HCV core proteins can efficiently self-assemble in vitro into nucleocapsid-like particles. These particles have a regular, spherical morphology with a modal distribution of diameters of approximately 60 nm. Self-assembly of nucleocapsid-like particles requires structured RNA molecules. The 124 N-terminal residues of the core protein are sufficient for self-assembly into nucleocapsid-like particles. Inclusion of the carboxy-terminal domain of the core protein modifies the core assembly pathway such that the resultant particles have an irregular outline. However, these particles are similar in size and shape to those assembled from the 124 N-terminal residues of the core protein. These results provide novel opportunities to delineate protein-protein and protein-RNA interactions critical for HCV assembly, to study the molecular details of HCV assembly, and for performing high-throughput screening of assembly inhibitors. 

14998094
The effect of experiential anchoring on the reproducibility of exercise regulation in adolescent children. 
In this study, we examined whether a preparatory perceptual 'anchoring' technique would enhance the reproducibility (test-retest reliability) of adolescent children in their ability to self-regulate their exercise output on the basis of their effort perceptions. Forty-one adolescents aged 12.6 +/- 0.7 years (mean +/- s), randomly assigned to either an anchor or non-anchor group, undertook two identical production trials (three 3-min cycle ergometer bouts at levels 3, 6 and 8 of the Children's Effort Rating Table) over 8 days. Before each trial, the anchor group received an experiential (exercise) trial intended to provide a frame of reference for their perceived exertions. The test-retest reproducibility of the heart rates and power outputs produced during the production trials was assessed using intraclass correlation coefficients and 95% limits of agreement analysis. For the anchor group, the intraclass correlation coefficients ranged from 0.68 to 0.81 for heart rate and from 0.39 to 0.86 for power output. For the non-anchor group, they were generally higher: 0.86 to 0.93 and 0.81 to 0.95 for heart rate and power output, respectively. The 95% limits of agreement indicated no marked differences between the two groups in the amount of bias and within-subject error. The results suggest that among these adolescents, the implementation of an experiential anchoring protocol had no positive effect on the reproducibility of their exercise regulation during prescribed cycling. 

10224840
Emphysematous pyelonephritis: imaging diagnosis and follow-up. 
We conducted the study to evaluate the efficacy and roles of different imaging modalities in the diagnosis and follow-up of emphysematous pyelonephritis (EPN) and to correlate imaging findings with clinical outcome. Retrospective analysis of the imaging studies and clinical outcome were performed in 28 consecutive patients with EPN. They were all initially treated with CT-guided percutaneous drainage (PCD). The imaging studies performed included plain abdominal radiography (KUB) (n = 28), sonography (US)(n = 24), intravenous urography (IVU)(n = 5), retrograde pyelography (RP)(n = 20) and computed tomography (CT)(n = 28). Follow-up imaging studies included CT(n = 23) and renal scintigraphy (n = 15). The sensitivities of detecting abnormal gas in EPN on KUB and US were 66% and 88%. The mortality rate was 11%, not associated with different types, stages or renal involvement. On the follow-up CT performed within one month of PCD, type I EPN evolved into type II in 86% of the cases. On the long-term follow-up CT, renal atrophy and focal scarring were revealed in the diffuse and focal renal involvement of EPN. The mean split renal function shown on the follow-up scintigraphy was 30%. We concluded KUB and US were valuable for screening EPN, although CT was the most specific and sensitive. Follow-up CT studies not only demonstrate the response of treatment but also depict the different courses and the results of different types and renal involvement of EPN, although not associated with mortality rate. 

153303
[Correlation the laevocardiogram and plain chest films in the presence of myocardial insufficiency (author's transl)] 
A correlation was attempted in 106 patients with myocardial insufficiency between linear and volume parameters of the laevocardiogram and the corresponding parameters on plain chest films, as well as between pressure measurements and the degree of pulmonary congestion. Measurements on the plain radiograph provide only limited information on the function of the myocardium and the severity of myocardial lesion respectively. Nevertheless, they are of some value during the course of the disease. 

8208189
Sports-related eye injuries. 
OBJECTIVE: To: (i) determine the magnitude and describe the spectrum of sports-related eye injuries; (ii) compare the sporting profile variations within Australia and overseas; and (iii) provide recommendations to help decrease the frequency and severity of eye injuries in sports. DESIGN AND SETTING: Descriptive study of sports-related eye injuries identified from a cross-sectional survey of ocular trauma treated in an eye hospital during a two-year period from November 1989 to October 1991. RESULTS: Although sports injuries comprised only 5% of all eye trauma, they accounted for a disproportionately high ocular morbidity, representing 22% of hospital admissions. Most patients were admitted for hyphaema (81%), but there were eight ruptured globes and 20 other cases required surgical repair. For those hospitalised for serious injuries, 19% were legally blind (visual acuity < or = 6/60) and 10% had visual acuity between 6/18 and 6/36 initially, with 29% of patients recording a visual loss in excess of 50% incapacity (< or = 6/18) at three months after injury. CONCLUSION: Eye injuries were most frequently caused by squash, badminton, Australian Rules football and cricket, a sports profile distinctly different from those of the United States and United Kingdom. That none of the players in may study had worn correct eye protection offers a wide scope for preventing injuries in what should be safe recreational pastimes. 

16650169
Impact of psoriasis on quality of life in Kuwait. 
BACKGROUND: Psoriasis can seriously affect the quality of life (QOL) of patients and has a strong impact on social relations, psychological status and daily activities. OBJECTIVE: The aim of this study was to describe the impact of different grades of severity in psoriasis on QOL in patients in Kuwait. PATIENTS/METHODS: We used the Dermatology Quality Of Life scale (DQOLS) developed by Morgan and then validated for use in Kuwait to study a sample of 330 out-patients with psoriasis. RESULTS: Overall, physical activities were affected in greater than 50% of cases. This figure increased significantly with increased severity of psoriasis. Also, social relationships were disrupted in more than half of the patients but with no significant difference between different grades of severity. All psychological feeling items were affected by psoriasis to variable degrees. However, significant differences related to the severity of psoriasis were detected: feeling embarrassed, feeling short tempered, feeling depressed, and feeling a lack of hope. One third of cases declared their sexual activities were affected by psoriasis. CONCLUSION: Data provided should improve the physicians' awareness of the importance of patients' QOL and enhance psychological evaluation of the psoriatic patient which will promote his/her positive outcome and compliance with treatment. 

15706513
Systematic DNA-binding domain classification of transcription factors. 
Based on the manual annotation of transcription factors stored in the TRANSFAC database, we developed a library of hidden Markov models (HMM) to represent their DNA-binding domains and used it for a comprehensive classification. The models constructed were applied on the UniProt/Swiss-Prot database, leading to a systematic classification of further DNA-binding protein entries. The HMM library obtained can be used to classify any newly discovered transcription factor according to its DNA-binding domain and, thus, to generate hypotheses about its DNA-binding specificity. 

17190441
Hyrtiazepine, an azepino-indole-type alkaloid from the Red Sea marine sponge Hyrtios erectus. 
Biological and chemical investigations of the methanolic crude extract of the Red Sea marine sponge Hyrtios erectus led to the isolation of a novel azepino-indole-type alkaloid named hyrtiazepine (2) and 5-hydroxy-1H-indole-3-carboxylic acid methyl ester (3), together with the known metabolites hyrtiosulawesine (1), 5-hydroxyindole-3-carbaldehyde (4), hyrtiosin A (5), and hyrtiosin B (6). Their structures were elucidated on the basis of mass spectrometry and detailed 2D NMR spectroscopic data. Hyrtiosulawesine (1) displayed a significant antiphospholipase A2 activity with an IC50 value of 14 microM in a fluorometric assay using Crotalus adamanteus venom phospholipase A2. 

610867
Temperature sensitivity of the erythrocyte membrane potential as determined by cyanine dye fluorescence. 
We have used the cyanine dye fluorescence technique to measure the membrane potential of human erythrocytes as a function of temperature. With erythrocytes starved of glucose, there is an abrupt decrease in membrane potential centered at 38 degrees which is reversible up to 41 degrees, and irreversible at higher temperatures. With erythrocytes supplemented with glucose, the thermally induced transition is centered at 41 degrees and is reversible up to the highest temperature measured, 45 degrees. These results extend previous spectroscopic studies with erythrocyte membranes which demonstrated a thermally induced transition in protein tertiary or quaternary structure that is irreversible above 42 degrees. 

7093673
External ions and membrane potential of leech neuropile glial cells. 
In ion-substitution experiments supplemented by measurements of the membrane conductance, the membrane potential of neuropile glial (NG) cells in the CNS of th medicinal leech has exhibited a dependence of the external concentration of both potassium and chloride. The membrane potential was largely dependent on the external potassium concentration, as may be inferred from the change in potential as the potassium concentration of the bathing solution was changed. The external potassium concentrations had been corrected to allow for the discrepancy between intra- and extraganglionic levels found with ion-selective electrodes. A transient membrane depolarization was recorded when the chloride in the bathing medium was replaced by sulphate or glucuronate. The restoration of the normal membrane potential following the return to chloride-based saline was preceded by a transient hyperpolarization. After transfer to low-chloride solutions, the transient depolarization of the NG cell membrane was followed by a steady-state hyperpolarization. The amplitude of the steady-state hyperpolarization depended on the concentration of chloride in the bathing medium. The membrane conductance decreased in low-chloride solutions. 

322825
The Ayerst Award Lecture 1976. Novel factors in protein biosynthesis. 
Comparison of nucleotide sequences surrounding the initiation sites of a number of mRNAs reveals few common features. These may be the presence of in- or out-of-phase nonsense codons and (or) polypurine bases complementary to the 16S RNA of the 30S subunit of ribosomes. Since the bases which precede or follow an initiation site vary in length and composition we have examined whether they play a role as spacers between cistrons or whether they have an active function in the termination and initiation of translation. In vitro we have observed that some sequences 5' terminal to AUG are preferred over others in forming an initiation complex. The same bases have much less effect when present at the 3' terminal end of an AUG codon. When the 5' terminal codon is the termination codon UAA, absolutely no initiation complex can be detected. This suggests that spacing may be needed between a stop and a start codon. Conversely, the hexamer AUGUAA failed to elicit chain termination. This was so in systems that terminated when free UAA was added or when a sense triplet was present between the initiation and termination triplets. These results suggest that ribosomes may recognize the stop triplet. Hence ribosomes may not obey simple A and P site models in the termination reaction. 

8269246
Does routine cystic duct cholangiogram during laparoscopic cholecystectomy prevent common bile duct injury? 
Between November 1989 and September 1992, the author performed 1,000 laparoscopic cholecystectomies. Three common bile duct injuries occurred (0.3%). Selective cystic duct cholangiograms were performed for diagnosis and management of common bile duct stones. A total of 102 cholangiograms (10%) were done. Only eight of these cholangiograms were done for anatomical verification in the face of severe chronic or acute cholecystitis. Five were cystic duct cholangiograms, resulting in two common bile duct injuries. To avoid the problem of common bile duct injury in cases of obscure anatomy where clarification was needed, a cholecystocholangiogram was done for duct identification in three subsequent cases without event. The third common bile duct injury occurred early in the learning experience without benefit of the cholangiogram. 

7804031
Selenium concentration and glutathione peroxidase activity in blood of children with cancer. 
In this work we studied 205 children with cancer, aged 6 months to 7 years, who had been diagnosed as suffering from various types of neoplasm. In blood of these children we determined the selenium concentration and glutathione peroxidase activity by fluorometric and spectrophometric methods, respectively. The control group consisted of 128 healthy children. In all groups of children with cancer we observed a significantly lower selenium concentration and lowered glutathione peroxidase activity. We found statistical differences in selenium concentration between first or second and third, and between first and fourth or fifth stages of the disease, only in 3-7 year-old patients. Glutathione peroxidase activity was statistically depressed in the same age group between the first or second and third stages of the disease. Generally, there were no differences in the concentration of the microelement or in the glutathione peroxidase activity between children before and during treatment with cytostatics. 

11318967
Oxidative stress is reduced by the long-term use of vitamin E-coated dialysis filters. 
BACKGROUND: Oxidative stress during hemodialysis is thought to promote the progression of vascular complications in hemodialysis patients. The protective role of vitamin E as a lipophilic antioxidant against oxidative stress has been widely investigated. Here we investigated the effects of a vitamin E-coated regenerated cellulose hollow fiber dialyzer (CL-EE) on oxidative stress compared with a polysulfone hollow fiber (CL-PS). METHODS: For at least three months before beginning the protocol, 10 nondiabetic (NDM) patients (70.0 +/- 7.5 years; 6 males and 4 females) and 8 diabetic (DM) patients (65.0 +/- 7.4 years; 4 males, 4 females) were dialyzed with CL-PS. After that, we treated all of the patients with CL-EE for six months. Malondialdehyde (MDA), advanced glycation end products (AGEs), and 8-hydroxydeoxyguanosine (8-OHdG) were monitored as biomarkers for oxidative stress at the start and then at one, three, and six months into treatment with CL-EE. RESULTS: Serum MDA, AGE, and 8-OHdG levels increased after the hemodialysis with CL-PS. The increase of the biomarkers was completely prevented by a single use of CL-EE. Long-term hemodialysis with CL-EE for six months significantly reduced the basal levels of the oxidant markers at one month for AGE and at six months for 8-OHdG in both DM and NDM patients. Serum MDA was reduced in only DM patients at three months. The improvement of the oxidative stress with CL-EE was more prominent in the DM patients. CONCLUSIONS: Long-term treatment with CL-EE efficiently improves the oxidative stress associated with hemodialysis and potentially reduces dialysis complications due to oxidative stress. 

2421949
Determination in human cerebrospinal fluid of glial fibrillary acidic protein, S-100 and myelin basic protein as indices of non-specific or specific central nervous tissue pathology. 
The nervous system specific proteins glial fibrillary acidic protein (GFAp), S-100 and myelin basic protein (MBP) were determined in 535 human cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) samples. The level of all three proteins was increased in CSF of patients with nonselective destructive central nervous tissue disease such as encephalitis, cerebrovascular disease or tumoural compression. The increases in GFAp were more constant, making it a better marker of CNS pathology. Increases in MBP in CSF of patients with acute demyelinating disease were confirmed. S-100 did not seem to give more information as GFAp. Isolated increases of GFAp could be demonstrated in patients with dementia (Alzheimer type or multi-infarct dementia) or syringomyelia. Since CNS of these patients is very rich in fibrillary astrocytes, containing large amounts of GFAp, it is suggested that GFAp is to be considered as a specific marker of fibrillary gliosis in CSF and can be used as a diagnostic tool in dementia and syringomyelia. 

12361333
Gamma irradiator dose mapping simulation using the MCNP code and benchmarking with dosimetry. 
The Monte Carlo transport code, MCNP, has been applied in simulating dose rate distribution in the IR-136 gamma irradiator system. Isodose curves, cumulative dose values, and system design data such as throughputs, over-dose-ratios, and efficiencies have been simulated as functions of product density. Simulated isodose curves, and cumulative dose values were compared with dosimetry values obtained using polymethyle-methacrylate, Fricke, ethanol-chlorobenzene, and potassium dichromate dosimeters. The produced system design data were also found to agree quite favorably with those of the system manufacturer's data. MCNP has thus been found to be an effective transport code for handling of various dose mapping excercises for gamma irradiators. 

16515030
[Role of blood glucose in prediction of cardiovascular risk] 
Increased cardiovascular risk in diabetes mellitus has been well-documented. In contrast, it is not widely known, that the relation between degree of hyperglycemia and mortality of diabetics or nondiabetics with acute coronary syndromes (ACS) shows a positive correlation. Insulin treatment significantly improves survival of patients with both ACS and septicemia. New onset diabetes or impaired glucose tolerance can be detected in significant proportion of patients with AMI or coronary artery disease. New onset disturbance of carbohydrate metabolism has a powerful negative influence on clinical prognosis, therefore it's early diagnosis is considered an important new challenge for clinicians. The authors discuss prognostic significance of hyperglycemia-induced macroangiopathy, postprandial blood glucose, and concomitant metabolic state, respectively, furthermore potential therapeutic role of insulin in treatment of ischemic, reperfusional, and toxic metabolic disturbances. 

2425599
Histamine release by free radicals: paracetamol-induced histamine release from rat peritoneal mast cells after in vitro activation by monooxygenase. 
The incubation of paracetamol with isolated rat serosal mast cells evokes the release of histamine only in the presence of (S10) liver microsomes obtained from PCB or phenobarbital treated rats. The release of histamine was not accompanied by a leakage of lactate dehydrogenase and was blocked by the antioxidant alpha-tocopherol and by D-mannitol, an hydroxyl free radicals scavenger. The data are consistent with the metabolic oxidation of paracetamol in the generation of reactive intermediates capable of activating the sequential exocytosis. 

12600761
Validating riverine transport and speciation models using nuclear reactor-derived radiocobalt. 
Risk assessment of intentional or accidental discharges of toxic substances into river systems requires combined hydraulic and chemical modeling. Periodic discharges of known volumes with low radioactivity by the Beznau nuclear reactor (Switzerland) serve as validation tracers for both river flow and chemical speciation simulation. Validation of the former has been achieved by comparison of modeled and measured arrival times of radiocobalt along a 65 km transect with a maximum reaction period of 24 hours. Modeled breakthrough curves coincide well with measurements collected during three field campaigns, in spite of the fact that sorption and sedimentation processes were not activated during simulation. This gives indirect evidence of inefficient cobalt sorption. Particle/solution distribution measurements carried out during breakthrough allow further validation of our speciation approach, which is based on Tableau setup of inorganic reactions combined with sorption and organic complexation. Modeled and measured speciation results confirm recent observations of enhanced complexation of cobalt with dissolved organic substances, which significantly reduces particle sorption. The large variability of conditional stability constants for sorption and complexation reactions, for sorption site densities, and for organic ligand concentrations explains the variability of published particle-solution distribution coefficients. 

1201468
Body build and preoperative arterial oxygen tensions. 
Arterial oxygen tensions were determined in 35 supine unpremedicated surgical patients. Correlations were sought for age, weight, and weight/height, and Pao2. A definite, clear cut linear reduction of Po2 with age was found but not for weight alone. A relationship with weight/height ratio was found. If the weight/height related reduction in FRC following induction is added to that, two potential factors can be seen to contribute to intra-operative hypoxaemia. In a further 20 patients who received phenobarbitone premedication only, arterial oxygen tensions were found to be above the predicted line for their age. This is taken as evidence against respiratory depression due to premedication with barbiturates. 

7270660
Influence of resistance, speed of movement, and forearm position on recruitment of the elbow flexors. 
In this experiment, it was found that the maximum recruitment of the elbow flexors, with the exception of Pronator Teres, was greater with the forearm in the supinated position. Increases in the resistance and the speed of movement placed greater demands on all muscles. This was reflected by the increased EMG levels. These findings have clinical implications in the rehabilitation of the elbow flexors following musculo-skeletal or neurological pathology. It is suggested that a program of strengthening of the elbow flexors should include activities in the supinated position. This position places the greatest demand on the major elbow flexors. Additional demands can be made by alteration in the resistance and speed of movement. 

6296930
Partial purification and properties of mevalonate kinase from neonatal chick liver. 
Mevalonate kinase from neonatal chick liver has been partially purified by ammonium sulphate precipitation and Sephadex G100 and DEAE-cellulose fractionation. The kinetic characteristics agreed with the sequential mechanism suggested for the enzyme and provided apparent Km values of 0.01 mM for mevalonic acid and 0.25 mM for ATP. Partially purified mevalonate kinase from neonatal chick liver showed an absolute specificity for ATP. Mn2+ was a better activator than Mg2+ at low concentrations (0.1-1.0 mM). Higher Mn2+ concentrations produced a clear inhibition of mevalonate kinase. Likewise, addition of EDTA, with or without metal ions, clearly inhibited the enzymatic reaction. 

10229512
Influence of automatic gain control parameter settings on speech understanding of cochlear implant users employing the continuous interleaved sampling strategy. 
OBJECTIVE: The purpose of the present study was to gather data on the influence of compression ratio and attack and release times of slow-acting front-end automatic gain control (AGC) systems on speech understanding of cochlear implant users in various listening situations. The data should allow evaluation of the usefulness of front-end AGC in body-worn speech processors. DESIGN: Subjects were 12 experienced postlingually deafened adult users of the Med-El Combi-40 multichannel cochlear implant. Six different front-end configurations, including a linear setting, the standard AGC of the Med-El Combi-40 processor, and four slow-acting dual front-end AGCs (use of two instead of one level detector for improved transient handling), were evaluated in two experiments. In experiment 1, tests were performed at 55, 70 and 85 dB SPL, roughly corresponding to soft, medium and loud speech. Experiment 2 was intended to evaluate the quality of transient handling of the six configurations. In this experiment an intense transient ("chink") at 100 dB SPL was spliced onto the beginning of each sentence (presented at 85 dB SPL). RESULTS: At 55 dB SPL subjects performed significantly more poorly with the linear setting than with the AGC settings, but no differences in performance could be found for the AGC settings. At 70 dB SPL subjects showed the poorest performance with the high compression ratio dual front-end AGCs. No differences in performance of the six front-end configurations were found at 85 dB SPL. In the presence of intense chinks, performance of the standard AGC dropped significantly. CONCLUSIONS: The results indicate that slow-acting front-end AGC can be used effectively in speech processors for cochlear implants to expand the range of input levels that are audible for the cochlear implant user, without any need to adjust a processor control, and that incorporation of an additional fast-acting AGC component can improve performance under conditions where intense transients occur. 

1433015
Comparison of the acute inflammation induced by calcium pyrophosphate dihydrate, apatite and mixed crystals in the rat air pouch model of a synovial space. 
Pure monoclinic or triclinic calcium pyrophosphate dihydrate (CPPD) crystals, apatite crystals or mixtures of these crystals were injected into the synovial-like space created by the rat air pouch to compare the acute inflammation induced by these crystals. Fluids were withdrawn 6 h after injection and examined for leukocyte counts, protease, prostaglandin E2 (PGE2) and tumor necrosis factor (TNF) levels. CPPD crystals (especially monoclinic CPPD) induced higher numbers of leukocytes, and more protease, PGE2 and TNF than apatite. CPPD seemed to play a predominant role in the acute inflammation induced by mixed crystals. 

1498092
Effects of several growth factors on cultured neurofibroma cells. 
Neurofibromatosis type 1 (NF1) is a common autosomal dominant disorder characterized by abnormalities affecting multiple tissues derived from the neural crest. The peripheral neurofibromas are numerous and sometimes reach several hundred in number. In this study, the possible involvement of several growth factors in neurofibroma growth was investigated in vitro. When explants of neurofibroma tissue were cultured, macrophage-like cells with pseudopodia migrated out first, and later took on a slender fusiform shape. These cells contained S-100 protein and were identified as Schwann cells. They did not proliferate under standard culture conditions. Nerve growth factor (NGF) was helpful in maintaining the differentiated phenotype of Schwann cells, but did not stimulate their proliferation. Immunohistochemical staining for type IV collagen revealed that some large flattened polygonal cells had a mesh of type IV collagen on the surface. These cells were perineurial cells. The proliferation of cells derived from neurofibroma was stimulated by basic fibroblast growth factor (bFGF), epidermal growth factor (EGF), and transforming growth factor alpha (TGF-alpha). In comparison with skin fibroblasts, the cells derived from neurofibroma responded to these growth factors at considerably lower concentrations. Stimulation by EGF at physiological concentrations indicated the possible involvement of EGF in the development of neurofibromas. 

12447698
Induction of RECK by nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs in lung cancer cells. 
Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs) are known to exert anti-angiogenic and anti-metastatic activity both in vitro and in vivo. Block of angiogenesis and metastasis by NSAIDs has been found to be mediated partly via suppression of matrix metalloproteinase (MMP) activity. However, the molecular mechanism of this inhibitory action has not been well defined. Recent works demonstrated that a membrane-anchored MMP inhibitor RECK may potently suppress MMP-2 and -9 activity to inhibit angiogenesis and metastasis in vitro and in vivo. In this study, we test the possibility that NSAIDs may up-regulate RECK to inhibit MMP activity. RT-PCR analyses showed that NS398 and aspirin up-regulated RECK mRNA level in CL-1 human lung cancer cells. Additionally, NSAIDs increased RECK protein level as detected by immunoblotting. Since RECK is a membrane-anchored glycoprotein, we also performed immunofluorescent staining to assess the expression of RECK on cell surface. Our results showed that fluorescent intensity of RECK was obviously increased after NSAID treatment. Moreover, induction of RECK by NSAIDs was associated with reduction of MMP-2 activity. We also found that NSAID-activated RECK expression might not be mediated via inhibition of cyclo-oxygenases (COXs) because addition of prostaglandin E(2) (PGE(2)) could not counteract the effect of NSAIDs and overexpression of COX-2 could not down-regulate RECK. Taken together, our results suggest that induction of RECK expression may be one of the mechanisms by which NSAIDs suppress MMP activity to block angiogenesis and metastasis. 

920793
At the threshold of the Golden Gate: special problems of a neglected minority. 
The residents of San Francisco's Chinatown demonstrate the consequences of a substantial number of economic and social ills reflecting the history of the Chinese-Americans and the orientation of American society towards them. Changes in the immigration laws have presented particularly stressful circumstances for the traditional Chinese-American family. The relationship of such social stresses to the incidence and form of psychopathology--including an unusually high incidence of suicide--is noted. 

10794223
Balance sheets of knee and functional scores 5 years after total knee arthroplasty for osteoarthritis: a source for patient information. 
To improve patient information on the results of total knee arthroplasty (TKA) for osteoarthritis, 253 primary TKAs of a prospective study with a mean follow-up of 5.3 years were analyzed. The increase or decrease of the individual variables of the Knee Society knee and function score and the percentage of operated knees in which these variables increased were determined. Improvement in pain rating had the largest increase of all variables, contributing 60% to the knee score increase. Pain improved in 95% of the knees. Alignment improved in about 90% of knees and accounted for 25% of knee score increase. Improvement in level walking contributed more to increase of function score than better stair-climbing abilities. Level walking improved in 80% of knees and stair climbing in 55%. Pain is the most rewarding indication for TKA, followed by deformity and poor walking ability. Key words: total knee arthroplasty, knee score, functional score, patient information. 

18077164
Rapid novel divergent synthesis and muscarinic agonist profile of all four optical isomers of N,N,N-trimethyl(6-methyl-1,4-dioxan-2-yl)methanaminium iodide. 
Two stereoselective parallel divergent four-step procedures to obtain all four enantiomeric forms of N,N,N-trimethyl(6-methyl-1,4-dioxan-2-yl)methanaminium iodide were developed. Enantiomeric purity was determined by quantitative (1)H NMR spectroscopy in the presence of the chiral shift reagent (+)-MTPA. The biological profile of the obtained compounds was evaluated at all muscarinic receptor subtypes by binding and functional assays. 

17568204
Descemet's stripping endothelial keratoplasty. 
PURPOSE OF REVIEW: Descemet's stripping endothelial keratoplasty (DSEK) is rapidly becoming the preferred treatment for corneal endothelial dysfunction. Familiarity with recent advances in techniques and instrumentation can help reduce the initially steep learning curve and incidence of complications. RECENT FINDINGS: DSEK produces excellent visual outcomes with minimal change in corneal surface topography or refraction. It can successfully treat corneal dysfunction associated with Fuchs' endothelial dystrophy, bullous keratopathy, iridocorneal endothelial syndrome or a failed penetrating graft. Donor dissection has become automated, and new techniques have been devised to facilitate graft insertion and unfolding. Some surgeons now routinely perform DSEK with topical anesthesia. Graft detachment is the most frequent early postoperative complication, but new methods can help promote donor adherence. The incidence of graft-rejection episodes is lower after DSEK compared with standard penetrating keratoplasty, possibly because wound healing is a lesser concern, and many DSEK patients are maintained on low-dose topical steroids indefinitely. Early efforts to transplant just the endothelial cell layer show promise. SUMMARY: DSEK provides quicker visual rehabilitation and an improved safety profile compared with standard penetrating keratoplasty. Continued evolution of this relatively new technique is helping to reduce complications and further improve outcomes. 

7657456
Studies on the reproductive capacity of Echinostoma caproni (Trematoda) in hamsters and jirds. 
Total egg output per infective stage inoculated was used as a measurement of the reproductive capacity in Echinostoma caproni infections in hamsters and jirds. Egg production per adult E. caproni recovered was comparable in the hamster and in the jird, but the reproductive capacity of E. caproni in infections with 6 metacercariae in the hamster markedly exceeded that in the jird. This was due mainly to the expulsion of worms from the jird. Eggs per gram faeces produced was shown to be an invalid parameter in comparing the reproductive capacity in E. caproni infections in jirds and hamsters due to differences in amounts of faeces produced, and evidence was obtained that uterine egg counts may not be a useful parameter in assessment of overall reproductive potentials. In the hamster, the reproductive capacity of infections with 25 or 6 metacercariae of E. caproni was comparable. This reflected a density independent recovery and egg production of the adult worms. The reproductive capacity, being an expression of the importance of a particular host species for the reproduction of a parasite population, is suggested as a convenient and useful quantitative parameter in the establishment of standardized criteria for evaluating host-parasite relationships in definitive host models. 

4337156
Comparison of the triglyceride lipase of liver, adipose tissue, and postheparin plasma. 
Heparin-released triglyceride lipase from three sources, adipose tissue, liver, and postheparin plasma, was compared. Heparin-released triglyceride lipase from liver differed in several major respects from that in adipose tissue. These differences included response to inhibitors and to high density lipoprotein in the incubation media. Heparin-released triglyceride lipase from liver, when compared with that from adipose tissue, was relatively inactive against lipoprotein substrates. The triglyceride lipase from postheparin plasma exhibited properties more like those of liver. These studies raise the possibility that triglyceride lipase in postheparin plasma may be heterogeneous and that levels of the enzyme in postheparin plasma may not accurately reflect the capacity for clearance of triglyceride from the plasma. 

12724177
The amygdala and psychopathology studies in epilepsy. 
The results of volumetric studies of the amygdala and hippocampus in patients with epilepsy who also have psychopathology are described. The main data relate to the increased size of the amygdala in patients with epilepsy and psychosis. The associations between the amygdala and affective disorders, notably dysthymia and euphoria, are also discussed. 

2913904
Hepatico-jejuno-duodenostomy reconstruction following excision of choledochal cysts in children. 
Ten children with choledochal cysts were treated at Children's Memorial Hospital in Chicago between 1979 and 1980 and at Henrietta Egleston Hospital for Children or Grady Memorial Hospital in Atlanta between 1980 and 1987. Age at the time of operation ranged from one to 46 months. There were eight girls and two boys with Type I choledochal cysts. One child with a dilated but histologically normal common bile duct underwent a choledochoduodenostomy. The remaining nine patients had excision of the choledochal cyst. Continuity with the GI tract was then re-established with a valved isolated jejunal segment interposed between the common hepatic duct and the duodenum. The valve serves to prevent reflux of enteric contents up into the biliary tract. The short jejunal segment allows bile to drain into the duodenum with minimal stasis; this more closely approximates the natural physiologic state than does a Roux-en-Y reconstruction. There was no mortality, with follow up ranging from six months to over eight years. Two post-operative complications (one anastomotic stricture and one small bowel obstruction) occurred, both in the same patient. There were no anastomotic leaks and no episodes of post-operative cholangitis. All patients are currently free of jaundice and none have signs of portal hypertension. The treatment of choledochal cysts is excision. Biliary tract reconstruction with the valved common hepatico-jejuno-duodenostomy is safe, effective, and physiologically appealing. 

2729005
The relation between height, armspan and forced expiratory volume in elderly women. 
Loss of height occurs with ageing. This could distort the relation between height and forced expiratory volume in 1s (FEV1) as age increases. Armspan, which approximates to height at maturity, does not fall with age and might, therefore, be a better linear variable to compare with age and spirometric volumes in older people. We studied the relation between age, height, armspan and FEV1 in 150 women aged 60-91 years. The mean value of span minus height was 4.7 cm (range -5 to +17). Standardized FEV1 (SD) in 5-year age bands between 60 and 80+ fell as follows: 1.79(0.52)1, 1.62(0.49)1, 1.38(0.41)1, 1.32(0.44)1, 1.15(0.48)1. When re-standardized using armspan, the values were: 1.76(0.48)1, 1.59(0.53)1, 1.37(0.46)1, 1.29(0.47)1, 1.11(0.54)1. The differences between the two standardized values in each age band were not significant. It was concluded that span measurements offer no advantage over height measurements in cross-sectional population studies of lung volume in old age. However, in subjects who cannot have their height measured, or who are known to have lost a substantial amount of height, armspan is a reasonable substitute measure of body size from which to calculate predicted FEV1 values. 

1469511
Polycystic kidney disease in the CBA/N immunodeficient mouse. 
We describe a polycystic lesion of the kidney in the CBA/N mouse with an X-linked recessive immunodeficient syndrome. There is progressive cystic dilatation affecting all parts of the nephron. The cyst lining is composed of a single layered epithelium with focal nuclear crowding and the formation of micropapillary structures. The cystic epithelial cells show subnuclear vacuolation. Focal basement membrane thickening is also a feature. There is no significant inflammatory infiltrate present within these kidneys. Electron microscopic examination reveals that the subnuclear vacuolation is due to loss of the membrane infoldings at the basal pole of the epithelial cell with fluid accumulation within the extracellular space. The basement membrane thickening is due to expansion of the lamina densa. These changes are not present at birth but develop progressively with age. The finding of a polycystic kidney lesion in these mice offers an opportunity to investigate the relationship between the immune system and renal cyst formation. 

2762845
[Comparison of promoting the proliferation and fusion of myoblast between conditioned media from fibroblasts of chick embryo and fetal mouse] 
Conditioned media were prepared by using the collected media which had cultured fibroblasts from muscle tissue of fetal mouse (ICR) or chick embryo (Leghorn chicken). The effects of these media on the proliferation and fusion in mouse or chick myoblast were studied quantitatively. The results were as follows: (1) the conditioned medium from fibroblasts of fetal mouse promoted the proliferation of mouse or chick embryonic myoblasts by 2.65 times (P less than 0.001) or 2.35 times (P less than 0.01) as compared with control groups respectively. (2) The conditioned medium from fibroblasts of embryonic chicken promoted the proliferation of chick or mouse embryonic myoblasts by 2.66 times (P less than 0.01) or 2.17 times (P less than 0.01) respectively. (3) The conditioned medium from fibroblasts of fetal mouse enhanced the fused rate of mouse or chick myoblasts by 1.9 or 2.6 times respectively. The conditioned medium from fibroblasts of embryonic chick enhanced the rate of chick myoblast fusion by 2.1 times, but the effect on the mouse myoblast fusion was not remarkable. The results suggest that the effect of fibroblast conditioned media on myoblast proliferation is similar in the two species, but the effect on the fusion of myoblasts is somewhat species-specific. 

2216521
[Clinical significance of the most important abnormalities of respiratory organs] 
The incidence rate and the clinical significance of inborn abnormalities of respiratory organs frequently are still underrated. In the clinic for paediatrics of the Medical Academy of Dresden malformations of respiratory organs, situated below the larynx, were demonstrated in 18 per cent of patients who had been referred hither in the course of 20 years for bronchopulmonary diagnostics. The clinical symptoms are very different and often uncharacteristic. Not seldom malformations of that kind first of all remain silent till a superinfection or a striking roentgenogram will arise the suspicion on a malformation. Following symptoms may refer to: permanent or intermitting stridor in the stenoses of the large respiratory tract (trachea and main bronchi), that is diagnosed as the most frequent anomaly. In nearly 80 per cent of the patients suffering from stenoses of a main bronchus symptoms of a recurrent or chronically obstructive bronchitis stood in the foreground. Mostly a tachy- and a dyspnoe are the leading symptoms in case of a connatal lobar emphysema, the most frequent anmaly of the pulmonary parenchyma followed by the pulmonary hypolasia and -agenesis. Chronic or relapsing pneumonias respectively a persisting cough may appear as symptoms in pulmonary sequestrations and in isolated anomalies of the bronchial aborization that otherwise in the majority of the cases will rest clinically mute. The long-term prognosis for children suffering from stenoses in the main bronchis is compared with those of tracheal stenoses relatively satisfactory. 

3066109
Fatal Yersinia enterocolitica septicemia complicated by unique hemosiderosis. A case report. 
A fatal case of Yersinia enterocolitica septicemia which was complicated by unique hemosiderosis is reported. On admission, the patient had diabetes and showed unusual hyperferritinemia. Postmortem examination revealed that the liver was studied with abscesses, and Yersinia antigen was expressed in foamy macrophages within these abscesses. Moreover, the cadaver showed generalized hemosiderin deposition, which was mainly observed in the liver and, to lesser degrees, in the pancreas, spleen, lymph nodes, brain, thyroid and kidneys. Since there was no apparent cause of the hyperferritinemia and generalized hemosiderosis, consideration was given to possible primary hemochromatosis. However, no liver or pancreatic fibrosis was demonstrated. Kupffer cells were also loaded with hemosiderin, and therefore it was considered that these cells had lost their ability to phagocytize the microorganism adequately, leading to major liver involvement. Interestingly, hemosiderin deposits in the kidneys were mostly present in glomerular epithelial cells. To our knowledge, this unique presentation has not been previously described in humans. 

17638785
Proinflammatory cytokine single nucleotide polymorphisms in nasal polyposis. 
OBJECTIVE: To investigate the association between nasal polyposis (NP) and single nucleotide polymorphisms of the proinflammatory cytokines IL (interleukin) 1alpha (the IL1A gene), IL-1beta (the IL1B gene), and tumor necrosis factor alpha (the TNFA gene). DESIGN: Prospective case-control trial. SETTING: Tertiary referral center. PATIENTS: Eighty-two patients with NP and 106 healthy volunteers without sinonasal disease. MAIN OUTCOME MEASURES: Genotypes of IL1A (4845G, 4845T), IL1B (-511C, -511T) and TNFA (-238G, -238A and -308G, -308A) were identified by restriction fragment length polymorphism analyses after polymerase chain reaction. RESULTS: The 4845 GT and 4845 TT genotypes of the IL1A gene were associated with NP (P<.05). The frequency of the -511 CC genotype of the IL1B gene was significantly higher in patients with NP than in controls (P=.01). The frequency of the -511 CT genotype of IL1B was significantly higher (P=.01) in the controls than in the patients with NP. The -238 AA genotype of the TNFA gene was higher in the patients with NP than in the controls (P=.05). There was a significantly high risk of susceptibility to NP in patients with the -308 GA genotype of TNFA (P=.001). None of the genotypes of the proinflammatory cytokines were related to sex, the presence of atopy, asthma, or aspirin intolerance (P>.05). CONCLUSION: The IL1A (4845 GT and 4845 TT), IL1B (-511 CC), and TNFA (-238 AA and -308 GA) genotypes were associated with susceptibility to NP in our study population. 

1904394
Synaptophysin in human breast carcinomas. 
Synaptophysin expression was studied immunohistochemically in 109 female and in three male breast carcinomas. Positivity was demonstrated in 10 female and in two male tumours in a high percentage of neoplastic cells. Synaptophysin positive breast carcinomas also expressed other neuroendocrine markers such as chromogranin and neuron-specific enolase. 

12603351
Membrane-bound and releasable nucleotidase activities: differences in canine mesenteric artery and vein. 
1. At least two enzymatic activities are proposed to degrade the extracellular ATP: (i) ubiquitously expressed membrane-bound enzymes (ecto-nucleotidases); and (ii) soluble (releasable) nucleotidases that are released during stimulation of sympathetic nerves and break down neuronal ATP. No quantitative data have placed the magnitude of these nucleotidase activities into a physiological perspective of neurovascular control. 2. We studied comparatively the membrane-bound and releasable nucleotidase activities in canine isolated inferior mesenteric arteries and veins using 1,N6-etheno(epsilon)-nucleotides (i.e. epsilon-ATP, epsilon-ADP, epsilon-AMP and epsilon-adenosine) as exogenous substrates. The enzymatic activities were estimated by measuring the disappearance of the epsilon-substrate and appearance of epsilon-products by means of HPLC-fluorescence detection during either stimulation of sympathetic perivascular nerves (releasable activity) or in the absence of nerve stimulation (ecto-nucleotidase activity). 3. Incubation of vascular segments with 50 nmol/L epsilon-ATP for 60 min resulted in a decrease of the epsilon-ATP substrate by 63.5 +/- 4.6 and 91.2 +/- 6.2% in the artery and vein, respectively. In contrast, the decrease of the epsilon-ATP during electrical field stimulation (EFS; 16 Hz, 0.3 msec, 2 min) was 39.8 +/- 4.2% in the artery and 13.1 +/- 7.3% in the vein. Therefore, the mesenteric arteries demonstrate a greater releasable ATPase activity and a weaker ecto-ATPase activity than mesenteric veins. 4. The degradation of epsilon-ADP and epsilon-AMP was similar in both blood vessels under either experimental protocol. The epsilon-adenosine was not significantly degraded in the absence or presence of EFS. 5. These data implicate a differential removal of extracellular ATP as a potential mechanism of serving resistance and capacitance in the splanchnic circulation. 

1585214
The treatment of sleep disorders. 
Narcolepsy is clinically associated with cataplexy, sleep paralysis and hypnagogic hallucinations. It is treated by reassurance (that there is no physical disease) and by stimulants such as ephedrine and amphetamine on an intermittent basis. The special tricyclic antidepressant clomipramine is also used, and mono-amine oxidase inhibitors (MAOIs) are useful in theory. Obstructive sleep apnoea is an important and often unrecognised cause of daytime somnolence. It is treated by weight reduction (pickwickian syndrome), hormones, or recently, with continuous positive pressure apparatus. Night terrors (pavor nocturnus) and sleepwalking typically occur during deep sleep (stage 3 and 4 throughout the episode) in children. In a night terror the child sits up with a scream, with eyes open, but inaccessible. He eventually falls asleep calmly. Sleepwalking, too, shows the features of inaccessibility and subsequent amnesia for the episode. Both conditions are normally treated with reassurance (to the parents) but may occasionally warrant benzodiazepines. Enuresis usually occurs in non-rapid eye movement (NREM) sleep, especially stages 3 and 4. The reason for the efficacy of tricyclic antidepressants is not precisely known. Delirium tremens (DT) is treated as a rebound excess of REM sleep, with benzodiazepines and other drugs. It is the withdrawal syndrome (with or without major seizures) to the barbiturate-alcohol group of drugs, which includes alcohol, chloral, paraldehyde, glutethimide, methylprylone, ethchlorvynol, meprobamate and meprobamate-diphenhydramine. Insomnia may be treated by the above drugs, by analgesics, antidepressants, major tranquillisers (neuroleptics) and miscellaneous other compounds. For the majority of patients, however, the most suitable group seems to be the benzodiazepines. The benzodiazepines are much safer than their predecessors, in both acute and chronic usage. (ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS) 

16348468
Evaluation of Four Aerobiological Sampling Methods for the Retrieval of Aerosolized Pseudomonas syringae. 
The Andersen six-stage impactor, the SAS (Surface Air System) impactor, the AGI-30 impinger, and gravity plates were evaluated for the retrieval of aerosol-released Pseudomonas syringae. The upper limits of the impactor samplers were exceeded at a spray concentration of 10 CFU/ml, indicating that these samplers are not appropriate for monitoring high airborne concentrations. Decreased cell concentrations were retrieved with increased sampling time for the Andersen and AGI samplers, indicating that a minimum sampling time is preferable for monitoring aerosolized vegetative cells. 

2964459
Lymphomatoid papulosis and its relationship to "idiopathic" hypereosinophilic syndrome. 
Persistent hypereosinophilia, endomyocardial fibrosis, and a recurrent self-healing papulonodular eruption with the histologic features of lymphomatoid papulosis are described in three patients. One patient died after developing an acute myeloblastic transformation in the eosinophil series. Immunocytochemical studies of cutaneous lesions in two of the patients suggested a mature T-cell phenotype with a predominant population of CD4-positive cells. Immunostaining of cutaneous tissue with monoclonal antibodies BE1 and BE2 yielded negative findings. Because it is now known from in vitro studies that T lymphocytes secrete the eosinopoietic factor, interleukin 5, it is possible that the cutaneous lesions, hypereosinophilia, and associated endomyocardial fibrosis were induced by transformed helper T lymphocytes in these three patients. 

17620011
Simultaneous ultrasound-assisted emulsification-extraction of polar and nonpolar compounds from solid plant samples. 
A new approach to solid sample preparation for the simultaneous isolation of polar and nonpolar compounds using a microemulsion as leaching medium is proposed. Methanol/water (dispersed-phase)-hexane (continuous-phase) emulsions formed in the presence of ultrasound and a solid sample allow polar and nonpolar compounds to be transferred to the dispersed and continuous phase, respectively. The efficiency of this dual sample preparation approach was assessed in the characterization of natural products of variable hardness including acorns, grape seeds, and alperujo (a residue of olive oil production). The time needed for quantitative extraction of the target fractions (phenol compounds and fatty acids) is 9 min for acorns and alperujo and 20 min for grape seeds; the longer time needed for grape seeds can be attributed to higher matrix hardness. Such good performance can be ascribed to the ultrasound-enhanced formation of methanol/water microdroplets 1-15 microm in size, which act as solid-liquid microextractors spanning a large surface area. The presence of the sample was found to greatly improve emulsion stability, which can be ascribed to the amphiphilic nature of the fatty acids in the samples. Following leaching and separation of the two phases by centrifugation, the polar and nonpolar fractions were analyzed by HPLC-diode array detection and GC/MS, respectively. The proposed approach provides extraction efficiency similar to the Folch method (reference method for fat extraction, 4.5 h) in a shorter time and extraction efficiency equal to or higher than the stirring-based method (reference method for phenol compounds extraction, 24 h). 

15063590
Intestinal epithelial tight junctions as targets for enteric bacteria-derived toxins. 
The application of a multidisciplinary approach to study bacterial pathogenesis, along with the recent sequencing of entire microbial genomes have made possible discoveries that are changing the way scientists view the bacterium-host interaction. Today, research on the molecular basis of the pathogenesis of infectious diarrheal diseases of necessity transcends established boundaries between microbiology, cell biology, intestinal pathophysiology, and immunology. Novel multidisciplinary approaches led to the discovery of new bacteria-host cell interactions involving signals regulating intestinal permeability through the modulation of cell cytoskeleton and intercellular tight junctions (TJ). A century ago, TJ were conceptualized as a secreted extracellular cement forming an absolute and unregulated barrier within the paracellular space. Biological studies of the past several decades have shown that TJ are dynamic structures subjected to structural changes that dictate their functional status under a variety of developmental, physiological, and pathological circumstances. To meet the many diverse physiological challenges to which the intestinal epithelial barrier is subjected, TJ must be capable of rapid and coordinated responses. This requires the presence of a complex regulatory system that orchestrates the state of assembly of the TJ multiprotein network. Many pathogenic bacteria exploit this system to accomplish their pathogenic strategies by ultimately modulating intestinal permeability. 

12360990
[Hahnemann's use of 'Fragmenta de viribus medicamentorum' in his early medical practice: analysis based on a patient file] 
Published in two volumes in 1805, Hahnemann's Latin work Fragmenta de viribus medicamentorum is the first materia medica in the history of homoeopathy. This article examines Hahnemann's use of his own published works in his early medical practice, by focusing on a single patient file from the medical casebooks. 

16942911
Synthesis, characterization and biological activity of some platinum(II) complexes with Schiff bases derived from salicylaldehyde, 2-furaldehyde and phenylenediamine. 
Four platinum(II) complexes of Schiff bases derived from salicylaldehyde and 2-furaldehyde with o- and p-phenylenediamine were reported and characterized based on their elemental analyses, IR and UV-vis spectroscopy and thermal analyses (TGA). The complexes were found to have the general formula [Pt(L)(H(2)O)(2)]Cl(2) x nH(2)O (where n=0 for complexes 1, 3, 4; n=1 for complex 2. The data obtained show that Schiff bases were interacted with Pt(II) ions in the neutral form as a bidentate ligand and the oxygens rather than the nitrogens are the most probable coordination sites. Square planar geometrical structure with two coordinated water molecules were proposed for all complexes The free ligands, and their metal complexes were screened for their antimicrobial activities against the following bacterial species: E. coli, B. subtilis, P. aereuguinosa, S. aureus; fungus A. niger, A. fluves; and the yeasts C. albican, S. cervisiea. The activity data show that the platinum(II) complexes are more potent antimicrobials than the parent Schiff base ligands against one or more microorganisms. 

7984
[Parenteral use of a solution-emulsion following digestive surgery] 
A post-operative use of the calorico-nitrogenous mixture: Trive 1000 was carried out in 25 patients after digestive surgery. The prescribed dose of this lipidic emulsion was 1,36 1 for an average period of four days. A study of the results led to establish the following facts:--a 55 p. cent increase in the nitrogen retention in comparison with a control series of ten patients and from (J o) the day of the intervention to (J F) the day when the treatment was stopped. Besides, the duration of the treatment did not seem to modify this balance, at least within the limits of the period of use. On the other hand, the quantity of EB 51 was a determining factor since 2000 ml were necessary to obtain a positive nitrogen balance (+ 0.96 g).--a very small rise in the amino-acid serous rate. It appeared in 14 patients and, supplied by EB 51, 3 other amino-acids increased their proportion spontaneously (Asp.--Gluc.--Tau.).--a reduction of the rate of 5 amino-acids, one of which, however, (Arginine) was being supplied by the drip. The variations were never statistically significant but for the Phenylalanine rate increase.--a non-systematic variation in the blood proteids that decreased as far as total proteids and albumin were concerned and that increased as far as globulins alpha1 and alpha2 were concerned.--Finally, no variations in the serous graphic record of lipid levels were noted, neither in the average of figures, nor in the analyses carried out after each bottle. Besides, it must be added that the tolerance of the product was excellent both on a general level (very few cases of intolerance: 4) and on the level of the plasma turbidimetry which did not reveal and chylomicrons except in one case. Therefore Trive 1000 proved to be an interesting nutrient combinatin quite suited to a parenteral feeding because of its high caloric power. The necessity of a calories/g/nitrogen ratio from 100 to 200 corresponding to 2000 ml of EB 51 was once more evidenced. Therefore such a dose (for lack of a protein assimilation) allows for a nitrogen retention important enough to prevent an excessive consumption of the body proteinic reserves. Such doses are perfectly tolerated both on the general and metabolic levels (mainly on the lipometabolic one). 

11573230
Laser soldering of rat skin, using fiberoptic temperature controlled system. 
BACKGROUND AND OBJECTIVE: Laser soldering of tissues is based on the application of a biological solder on the approximated edges of a cut. Our goal was to use laser soldering for sealing cuts in skin under temperature feedback control and compare the results with ones obtained using standard sutures. STUDY DESIGN/MATERIALS AND METHODS: Albumin solder was applied onto the approximated edges of cuts created in rat skin. A fiberoptic system was used to deliver the radiation of a CO(2) laser, to heat a spot near the cut edges, and to control the temperature. Laser soldering was carried out, spot by spot, where the temperature at each spot was kept at 65-70 degrees C for 10 sec. RESULTS: The tensile strength of laser-soldered cuts was measured after 3-28 days postoperatively and was found comparable to that of sutured cuts. Histopathological studies showed no thermal damage and less inflammatory reaction than that caused by standard sutures (P = 0.04). CONCLUSIONS: Temperature controlled laser soldering of cuts in rat skin gave strong bonding. The cosmetic and histological results were very good, in comparison to those of standard sutures. 

11854143
Induction of CYP1A1 and CYP1B1 in T-47D human breast cancer cells by benzo[a]pyrene is diminished by arsenite. 
Polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons (PAHs) and metals are often environmental cocontaminants, yet there have been relatively few studies of combined effects of PAHs and metals on cytochrome P450 (P450)-catalyzed metabolism. We examined the effects of NaAsO(2) in combination with benzo[a]pyrene (BAP) on CYP1A1 and CYP1B1 in T-47D human breast cancer cells by using estrogen metabolism as a probe of their activities. Exposure to BAP caused elevated rates of the 2- and 4-hydroxylation pathways of estrogen metabolism, indicating induction of both CYP1A1, an estradiol 2-hydroxylase, and CYP1B1, an estradiol 4-hydroxylase. BAP-induced metabolism peaked 9 to 16 h after exposure and returned to near-basal levels by 48 h. Concentration-response studies showed maximal induction of the 2- and 4-hydroxylation pathways at 3 microM BAP; higher levels caused reduced rates of metabolism due to inhibition of CYP1A1 and CYP1B1. NaAsO(2) caused pronounced decreases in the induction of CYP1A1 and CYP1B1 by 3 microM BAP because cotreatment with 10 microM NaAsO(2) inhibited the rates of the 2- and 4-hydroxylation pathways by 86 and 92%, respectively. Western immunoblots showed diminished levels of BAP-induced CYP1A1 by coexposure to NaAsO(2). The levels of the CYP1A1 and CYP1B1 mRNAs induced by BAP were not significantly affected by coexposure to NaAsO(2); however, heme oxygenase 1 mRNA levels were markedly induced by coexposure to BAP and NaAsO(2). These results indicate a post-transcriptional inhibitory effect of arsenite on the expression of CYP1A1 and CYP1B1 in T-47D cells, possibly resulting from reduced heme availability. 

16657007
Gibberellin-like Substances From Vegetative Tissue of a Conifer, Arizona Cypress. 
Vegetative shoots of Arizona cypress (Cupressus arizonica Greene) were found to contain an estimated 40 to 70 mug of gibberellin-like activity per kg. Based on elution patterns of silicic acid and celite partition columns, mobilities on thin layer chromatograms and specificity of the cucumber, d-3 dwarf maize, dwarf pea, and barley half seed bioassays it was possible to determine that the tissue contained at least 5 acidic, ethyl acetate-soluble gibberellin-like substances. The major one would appear to be GA(3). In addition, GA(9), GA(4), and/or GA(7)-like compounds, and 2 unidentified gibberellin-like substances are present. 

7506367
Radiation-induced micronucleus formation in mouse bone marrow after low dose exposures. 
The incidence of micronucleus formation was studied at 12, 24 and 36 h post-irradiation in the polychromatic (PCE) and normochromatic (NCE) erythrocytes of the bone marrow of mice whole-body exposed to 0, 3, 9, 18, 36, 54 and 72 cGy of 60Co gamma-radiation. It was observed that the frequency of micronucleated polychromatic erythrocytes (MPCE) increased with the increase in exposure dose at all the post-irradiation time periods studied. Similarly, the frequency of micronucleated normochromatic erythrocytes (MNCE) also increased with the increase in exposure dose and the increase for both MPCE and MNCE was dose related. The dose-response relationship was linear-quadratic for both MPCE and MNCE. The study of mitotic index revealed that a dose as low as 9 cGy is capable of reducing the mitotic index significantly at 24 h post-irradiation and the dose response was linear-quadratic. However, no significant decline in the mitotic index was observed at 12 and 36 h post-irradiation. 

10725293
Inhibition of myosin phosphatase by upregulated rho-kinase plays a key role for coronary artery spasm in a porcine model with interleukin-1beta. 
BACKGROUND: We recently demonstrated that the Rho-kinase-mediated pathway plays an important role for coronary artery spasm in our porcine model with interleukin-1beta (IL-1beta). In this study, we examined whether or not Rho-kinase is upregulated at the spastic site and if so, how it induces vascular smooth muscle hypercontraction. METHODS AND RESULTS: Segments of the left porcine coronary artery were chronically treated from the adventitia with IL-1beta-bound microbeads. Two weeks after the operation, as reported previously, intracoronary serotonin repeatedly induced coronary hypercontractions at the IL-1beta-treated site both in vivo and in vitro, which were markedly inhibited by Y-27632, one of the specific inhibitors of Rho-kinase. Reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction analysis demonstrated that the expression of Rho-kinase mRNA was significantly increased in the spastic compared with the control segment. Western blot analysis showed that during the serotonin-induced contractions, the extent of phosphorylation of the myosin-binding subunit of myosin phosphatase (MBS), one of the major substrates of Rho-kinase, was significantly greater in the spastic than in the control segment and that the increase in MBS phosphorylations was also markedly inhibited by Y-27632. There was a highly significant correlation between the extent of MBS phosphorylations and that of contractions. CONCLUSIONS: These results indicate that Rho-kinase is upregulated at the spastic site and plays a key role in inducing vascular smooth muscle hypercontraction by inhibiting myosin phosphatase through the phosphorylation of MBS in our porcine model. 

12410592
Distribution and gene expression of cytoskeletal proteins in two-cell rat embryos and developmental arrest. 
Previous observations in rat two-cell embryos suggested that distribution of microfilaments and microtubules are involved in developmental arrest. Therefore, we examined the distribution of cytoskeletal proteins, actin binding proteins, and microtubule-associated proteins in rat two-cell embryos. We also examined gene expression of beta-actin, alpha-tubulin, and cytoskeletal proteins that showed changes in their distributions. Distribution of cytoskeletal proteins was examined by immunocytochemistry. Although distributions of alpha-actinin, MAP1A, MAP1B/MAP5, and MAP2 were disturbed in arrested embryos, these abnormal distributions occurred following the initiations of developmental arrest and marked damage of microfilaments and microtubules. Gene expression of cytoskeletal proteins was examined by RT-PCR. Beta-actin and alpha-actinin mRNA was detected in normal late two-cell stage but not in arrested embryos. The difference occurred after zygotic gene activation. Expression of alpha-tubulin was detected in neither normal late two-cell stage nor arrested embryos. No MAP1A, MAP1B/MAP5, or MAP2 expression was detected in embryos during the two-cell stage. In conclusion, both distributions of microfilaments and microtubules are closely involved in rat developmental arrest, but other distributions of cytoskeletal proteins, actin binding proteins, and microtubule-associated proteins do not appear to have major roles in two-cell arrest. Furthermore, mRNA expression patterns are different between microfilaments and microtubules. Both distribution and mRNA transcription of microfilaments are involved in rat developmental arrest, whereas only distribution of maternal microtubules is disturbed in arrested embryos. 

1593557
Labor in the gravida with 10 or more years between pregnancies. 
It has been suggested that women who have had a pregnancy interval of 10 or more years would have prolonged labor in pregnancies after the first, as do primigravidas. In a series of 94 multiparas with 10 or more years between pregnancies and 63 age-matched, multiparous controls, there was no significant difference in the length of the latent phase of labor or of the first, second and third stages of active labor in the two groups. The concept of a "physiologic primigravida" in these cases should be abandoned. 

17852353
Cloning and characterization of a cDNA encoding 14-3-3 protein with leaf and stem-specific expression from wheat. 
The 14-3-3 proteins, originally described as the mammalian brain proteins, are ubiquitous eukaryotic proteins and have been shown to exert an array of function. A great number of 14-3-3 sequences have been reported in Eudicotyledon. The data of 14-3-3 from the monocotyledon plants, however, are limited. In this report, a 14-3-3 cDNA (designated as Ta14A) was isolated from wheat. An extensive search in GenBank database revealed another 14 14-3-3 isoforms from monocotyledonous plants. These proteins plus 14-3-3 isoforms from Arabidopsis were used for phylogenetic reconstruction, which revealed two groups of 14-3-3 proteins in monocotyledonous plants, namely epsilon and non-epsilon, respectively. The epsilon isoforms were present in monocotyledonous plants. Therefore, the gene duplication to result in an epsilon and non-epsilon isoforms was likely to take place before the speciation of monocotyledon and Eudicotyledon plants. Structural analysis indicated that the different conserved domains and structural characters existed in the monocotyledon 14-3-3 isoforms, which will affect their interaction with other effector proteins. Ta14A was strongly expressed in leaf and stem, undetected in root, suggesting it may have the unique functions within these tissues. These data suggest that structure difference and spatial expression of 14-3-3 will be the important factors to confine its functional specificity. 

8403723
The motility of interposition in patients with esophageal carcinoma after reconstructive esophageal surgery. 
This study evaluated the motility of interposition in patients with esophageal carcinoma after different reconstructive operations of the esophagus using an esophageal radionuclide transit test. A modified standard method was used to calculate total mean transit time (MTT), residual fraction (RF), and retrograde index (RI) in the supine position at least 6 months after the reconstructive operations of the esophagus. Eleven patients with esophagogastrostomy (EG), 7 patients with esophagoiliocolostomy (EIC), and 25 normal volunteers with a similar distribution of ages were included in this study for comparison. The values of the scintigraphic parameters in patients with esophageal reconstruction were significantly worse than in normal volunteers (P < 0.05). In addition, the MTT and RF in patients with EG were higher than in patients with EIC (P < 0.05), but no significant difference in RI was demonstrated. In conclusion, the motility of interposition became worse after reconstructive operations, but reconstruction with the colon can preserve better motility than with the stomach. 

2576035
Active immunization of homosexual men using a recombinant hepatitis B vaccine. 
Twenty homosexual men [13 anti-human immunodeficiency virus (HIV)-positive, seven anti-HIV negative] without HBsAg, anti-HBs, and anti-HBc were vaccinated with three 20 micrograms doses of a recombinant hepatitis B vaccine. All anti-HIV-positive homosexuals were nonresponders independent of the initial number of CD4-positive cells. Among seven anti-HIV-negative individuals, five responded. After three doses of the vaccine, CD4-positive cells fell in anti-HIV positive individuals by 22.4%. A similar fall in CD4-positive cells of an average 24.9% was noted in 17 matching, but nonvaccinated, anti-HIV-positive homosexuals. The study indicates that the efficacy of vaccination in anti-HIV-positive individuals is questionable. There is, however, no evidence that vaccination against hepatitis B might be harmful to anti-HIV-positive subjects. 

7575832
Pressor response to cycle ergometry in the midtrimester of pregnancy: can it predict preeclampsia? 
Ninety-seven primigravid patients were prospectively studied to assess the predictive value of the pressor response to aerobic exercise as a screening test for preeclampsia. The blood pressure response to cycle ergometry exercise to a maternal pulse of 140 beats/min was recorded on each subject. Each subject was studied in the second trimester of pregnancy at a mean gestational age of 23 weeks (range, 18 to 27). Three of the study subjects developed hypertension with proteinuria in the third trimester. A rise in systolic blood pressure of at least 30 mm Hg occurred in 29 patients, but this did not predict third trimester preeclampsia (p = 0.21). A rise in diastolic blood pressure of 20 mm was observed in 18 patients, two of whom developed preeclampsia (p = 0.08). An increase of diastolic pressure of 20 mm Hg with moderate cycle ergometry exercise in the second trimester may predict a subset of patients at elevated risk of preeclampsia in the third trimester. However, the positive predictive value of this 20 mm Hg pressor increase (11%) limits its applicability as a screening test. Thus, we cannot recommend the use of an exercise screening test at this time. 

1907279
Actin, troponin C, Alzheimer amyloid precursor protein and pro-interleukin 1 beta as substrates of the protease from human immunodeficiency virus. 
We show here for the first time that actin, troponin C, Alzheimer amyloid precursor protein (AAP), and pro-interleukin 1 beta (pro-IL-1 beta), are substrates of the protease encoded by the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) type-1. As has been seen in other non-viral protein substrates of the HIV protease, the presence of Glu residues in the P2' position appears to play an important role in substrate recognition. Three of the four bonds cleaved in actin, two of the three in troponin C, and all of the bonds hydrolyzed in AAP and pro-IL-1 beta have a P2' Glu residue. In fact, Glu residues are accommodated in all positions from P4 to P4' surrounding the scissile bond in substrates of the HIV proteases, and as many as 4 adjacent Glu residues were seen in one of the bonds cleaved in AAP. This study of non-viral protein substrates has also revealed unexpected amino acids such as Gly, Arg, and Glu in the scissile bond itself rather than the more conventional hydrophobic amino acids. The HIV-2 protease hydrolyzed actin in a manner similar to that of the HIV-1 enzyme, but its cleavage of troponin C was distinct in that it split a bond adjacent to a triplet of Glu residues in P2, P3, and P4 that was refractory to the HIV-1 enzyme. Documentation of cleavage sites in the several important cellular proteins noted above has extended our understanding of the features in a substrate that are recognized by these multi sub-site proteases of retroviral maturation. Moreover, the present work adds to an accumulating body of evidence which demonstrates that these enzymes can damage crucial structural and regulatory cellular proteins if ever their activity is expressed outside the viral particle itself. 

11039843
Telangiectasia macularis eruptiva perstans presented as a pseudoallergic food reaction. 
Telangiectasia macularis eruptiva perstans (TMEP) is a rare form of cutaneous mastocytosis observed in less than 1% of cases of mastocytosis. 



 

11039843

Clinically, anaphylaxis may appear as a result of increased mast cell degranulation in different circumstances. A case of TMEP presented as pseudoallergic reactions to foods is reported in which the appearance of typical lesions on the trunk and their histological analysis together with a negative food allergy study confirmed the diagnosis. 

2597042
Effects of a low calcium maternal and weaning diet on the thickness and microhardness of rat incisor enamel and dentine. 
The deposition and mineralization of incisor hard tissues have been studied in rat pups nursed by mothers on a low calcium diet or weaned with the maternal diet. Animals were killed at 30 days (control and low calcium diets; maternally fed) or 60 days (after 30 days weaning on maternal diet). The degree of mineralization of enamel and dentine was evaluated by a microhardness method on thick transverse sections. The enamel and dentine thickness, and the diameters of the incisor sections and pulp cavity were measured on microradiographs from the sections. Microhardness values of enamel were similar in groups killed after 30 days maternal feeding, but the microhardness of root enamel was 73-74% less in the low calcium-diet weaned group. Peripulpar dentine had mean microhardness values lower than controls in the group fed maternally for 30 days, whereas the whole root dentine appeared significantly less hard in the low calcium-diet weaned group than in the controls. A significant reduction of the incisor bucco-lingual diameter was observed only in this last experimental group. Enamel thickness was significantly lower in the roots of both experimental groups and in the necks of the low calcium weaned group. The reduction in dentine thickness was greater (from -30 to -56%); in the root it was more evident on the lingual aspect. Thus calcium deficiency in the mother's diet did not influence either the deposition or the mineralization of the pup's incisor enamel and dentine. However, when the offspring were weaned with the maternal calcium-deficient diet, mineralization of the tooth hard tissue was retarded. 

15002851
Intellectual ability in adolescents with conduct disorder. 
A U.K. population of young offenders show the typical deficits in Verbal IQ reported in conduct disordered populations. Performance IQs are generally lower than those of previous studies from the 1970s, raising a question about decline in intellectual ability. 

15839355
Developments in megavoltage cone beam CT with an amorphous silicon EPID: reduction of exposure and synchronization with respiratory gating. 
We have studied the feasibility of a low-dose megavoltage cone beam computed tomography (MV CBCT) system for visualizing the gross tumor volume in respiratory gated radiation treatments of nonsmall-cell lung cancer. The system consists of a commercially available linear accelerator (LINAC), an amorphous silicon electronic portal imaging device, and a respiratory gating system. The gantry movement and beam delivery are controlled using dynamic beam delivery toolbox, a commercial software package for executing scripts to control the LINAC. A specially designed interface box synchronizes the LINAC, image acquisition electronics, and the respiratory gating system. Images are preprocessed to remove artifacts due to detector sag and LINAC output fluctuations. We report on the output, flatness, and symmetry of the images acquired using different imaging parameters. We also examine the quality of three-dimensional (3D) tomographic reconstruction with projection images of anthropomorphic thorax, contrast detail, and motion phantoms. The results show that, with the proper choice of imaging parameters, the flatness and symmetry are reasonably good with as low as three beam pulses per projection image. Resolution of 5% electron density differences is possible in a contrast detail phantom using 100 projections and 30 MU. Synchronization of image acquisition with simulated respiration also eliminated motion artifacts in a moving phantom, demonstrating the system's capability for imaging patients undergoing gated radiation therapy. The acquisition time is limited by the patient's respiration (only one image per breathing cycle) and is under 10 min for a scan of 100 projections. In conclusion, we have developed a MV CBCT system using commercially available components to produce 3D reconstructions, with sufficient contrast resolution for localizing a simulated lung tumor, using a dose comparable to portal imaging. 

7276195
Normative observations on neuropsychological test performances in old age. 
As part of a study of dementia, 162 normal volunteers in the age range of 65-84 years were given a battery of nine neuropsychological tests assessing temporal orientation, short-term memory, language functions, and visuoperceptive capacity. When compared to subjects less than 65 years of age, the groups showed little evidence of generalized decline in cognitive function before the age of 80 years. The 80-84 years subgroup showed a higher overall failure rate on the tests than the younger subgroups. Nevertheless, 70% of all subjects in the 80-84 years subgroup made no more than one failure on the nine tests. There were substantial differences among the tests in respect to their sensitivity to the effects of aging. The largest decline in performance was shown on tests of short-term visual memory, serial digit learning, and facial recognition. The other verbal, memory, and visuoperceptive tests were performed well up to the age of 80 years. The findings are interpreted as providing limited support for the hypothesis that normal aging does not necessarily involve a general decline in level of cognitive functioning. The clinical application of the tests that were sensitive or insensitive to the effects of aging is considered. 

2585720
[A case of reexpansion pulmonary edema during fenestration of a giant hepatic cyst] 
We experienced a case of reexpansion pulmonary edema during the fenestration of giant hepatic cyst. The patient was a 56 year-old female who had been suffering from dyspnea due to a large abdominal mass for 3 months. The preoperative chest X-ray revealed remarkable elevation of diaphragm (right third and left fifth intercostal spaces). The result of blood gas analysis showed hypoxemia and respiratory compensation for metabolic acidosis. By the drainage of 12L of the cyst fluid for 30 minutes during operation, bloody and foamy bronchial secretion spurted out. Vigorous respiratory management using PEEP was promptly started and continued postoperatively in ICU. The endotrachial tube was withdrawn on the 2nd postoperative day. The ratio of protein in airway secretion in to plasma protein was 0.78, and it appeared that the pulmonary edema was mainly caused by increased permeability of pulmonary capillary vessels. 

9109640
Delayed spontaneous alternation in intact and cerebellectomized control and lurcher mutant mice: differential role of cerebellar cortex and deep cerebellar nuclei. 
Lurcher mutant (+/Lc) mice exhibit a massive loss of neurons in the cerebellar cortex and in the inferior olivary nucleus while deep cerebellar nuclei are essentially intact. To discriminate the respective participation of the cerebellar cortex and deep structures in learning and memory, the authors subjected 3- to 6-month-old +/Lc mice to a delayed spontaneous alternation task to test their working and long-term spatial memories. Results show that wild type (+/+) mice alternated above chance even after a 1-hr delay between the forced and choice trials, whereas in +/Lc mice, long-term memory was impaired. Cerebellectomized +/+ mice behave as +/Lc mice (working memory was preserved but long-term memory was not), whereas in the cerebellectomized +/Lc mice, both working and long-term memories were altered. These results are discussed in terms of relationships between the cerebellum and the hippocampus. 

8622780
Increased proteolytic activity in lymphocytes from patients with early onset Alzheimer's disease. 
The levels of calpains (m-calpain and mu-calpain) in peripheral blood lymphocytes from patients with Alzheimer's disease were determined via Western blotting. The Ca-dependent proteolytic activity and the calpastatin activity were estimated using incubation with exogenous substrate. Evidence was obtained for an increased Ca-dependent proteolytic activity in lymphocytes from patients with early onset Alzheimer's disease. There was also an increased level of membrane-bound mu-calpain in this group of patients. The observed changes may be caused by a general dysregulation of Ca homeostasis in peripheral cells of early onset Alzheimer victims. 

2115248
Evaluation of surgical procedures for cyanotic congenital heart disease by using MR imaging. 
ECG-gated MR imaging has been shown to be effective for the diagnosis of congenital heart disease. In this study, we assessed its role in the postoperative evaluation of surgical procedures in patients with complex congenital heart disease. MR images of 26 patients with Rastelli (five), Fontan (three), Senning (three), Damus (one), Jatene (eight), Waterston (four), and Potts (two) procedures were evaluated retrospectively. The accuracy of MR imaging was compared with that of angiography in 20 patients. The surgical anastomoses were identified in all patients. Patency, atresia, or hypoplasia of central pulmonary arteries and postoperative complications (focal stenoses of pulmonary arteries, thrombosed conduit, peri-conduit abscess) were shown. Narrowing of the right ventricular outflow tract and focal compression of the proximal pulmonary arteries were recognized as specific complications of the Jatene procedure. MR imaging appears to be effective in the postoperative evaluation of surgical procedures used for congenital heart disease. It should be considered as an alternative to repeated catheterization and angiography for the postoperative examination of children with complex congenital heart disease. 

3387501
Melatonin circadian rhythm in anorexia nervosa and obesity. 
The mean 24-hour secretion and circadian rhythm of melatonin were studied in 12 female subjects with anorexia nervosa (AN), 13 massively obese (OB) women, and 9 normal weight healthy volunteers to investigate the relationship between type of feeding behavior and hormonal secretory pattern. Blood samples for melatonin were drawn every 4 hours from 0400 h to 2400 h and every 2 hours from 2400 h to 0400 h. Mean 24-hour melatonin secretion was significantly higher in AN than in OB patients and controls. Melatonin circadian rhythms were disrupted in 8 of the 12 AN patients and in 9 of the 13 OB subjects, with phase-advanced nocturnal rises, abnormal diurnal peaks, or no nocturnal rises. The population mean cosinor analysis validated the existence of a significant circadian rhythm of the hormone in AN but not in OB subjects. No significant correlation between mean 24-hour secretion or type of circadian alterations and degree of weight deficit or excess was observed. The circadian alterations of melatonin in AN and OB may be linked to impaired secretory tonus of noradrenalin in the central nervous system, possibly unrelated to feeding patterns. 

18159525
The laboratory diagnosis of Haemophilus ducreyi. 
Chancroid is a sexually transmitted infection caused by Haemophilus ducreyi. This fastidious, Gram-negative coccobacilli dies rapidly outside the human host, making diagnostic testing using culture methods difficult. This genital ulcer infection is not common in Canada and, therefore, can often be misdiagnosed. The objective of the present paper is to provide practical approaches for the diagnosis of chancroid in Canadian patients where the prevalence of this infection is low. Issues related to sample collection, sample transport and available diagnostic tests are reviewed, and several alternative approaches are outlined. Although antigen detection, serology and genetic amplification methods have all been reported for H ducreyi, none are commercially available. Culture is still the primary method available to most laboratories. However, the special media necessary for direct bedside inoculation is often not available; therefore, communication with the diagnostic laboratory and rapid specimen transport are essential when chancroid is suspected. 

10744032
Transforming growth factor-beta1 stimulates contraction of human glioblastoma cell-mediated collagen lattice through enhanced alpha2 integrin expression. 
Rapid invasiveness is a feature of the highly malignant glioblastoma tumor and is closely related to patient prognosis. The interaction between extracellular matrix (ECM) and cell surface receptors such as integrin heterodimers play a key role in the process of tumor invasion. We investigated the effects of transforming growth factor-beta1 (TGF-beta1), which is a mitogenic factor for glial cells, on integrin expression in T98G human glioblastoma cells using an in vitro model 3-dimensional collagen lattice. Exogenously applied TGF-beta1 dose-dependently enhanced collagen lattice contraction. Among the inhibitory antibodies tested against alpha integrin subunits, the anti-alpha2 antibody, P1-E6, alone prevented the enhanced contractile response by TGF-beta1, whereas any alpha integrin antibody (including P1-E6) had little effect on lattice contraction when cultured without TGF-beta1. RT-PCR analysis revealed that TGF-beta1 strongly increased alpha2 integrin transcript level. Furthermore, pretreatment with antisense phosphorothioate oligodeoxynucleotides against human alpha2 integrin using hemagglutinating virus of Japan (HVJ) liposome-mediated transfer prevented the effects of TGF-beta1 and also reduced the lattice contraction even in the absence of TGF-beta1. This data indicates that increased expression of alpha2 integrin is responsive to enhanced collagen lattice contraction by TGF-beta1. We suggest that TGF-beta1 exerts its effects on the invasive property of glioblastoma cells via upregulation of the alpha2 integrin subunit expression. 

4005883
Meningioma in the interpeduncular cistern in a child. 
The authors describe an 8-year-old boy who presented with progressive oculomotor palsy on the left side. The diagnostic evaluation with computerized transmission tomography (CTT), metrizamide CTT cisternography, and angiography indicated an extra-axial tumor in the left interpeduncular cistern, extending into the suprasellar and prepontine cisterns. A meningioma was demonstrated with attachment only to the interpeduncular portion of the left oculomotor nerve. The patient was treated successfully by complete removal through a pterional approach. 

8722310
Rapid diagnosis of influenza type A infection: comparison of shell-vial culture, directigen flu-A and enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. 
Two direct antigen detection methods (Directigen FLU A, Becton-Dickinson, Cokeysville, Md. and Influenza A virus ELISA Antigen detection kit, Alpha Biotech, Milano) were compared with isolation by shell-vial cultures for rapid diagnosis of influenza type A virus infection. The three methods were performed using a reference viral suspension consisting of a clinical isolate of influenza type A virus as well as 41 nasopharyngeal aspirates collected from patients with influenza symptoms. Influenza type A virus was recovered from 14 specimens by shell-vials. Ten specimens were positive by Directigen FLU A and 7 by ELISA antigen detection kit. When performed on clinical samples the sensitivity of Directigen FLU A and ELISA was 64.2% and 42.8%, respectively. The limit of sensitivity of the shell-vials, performed on a virus stock suspension titrated by haemagglutinin activity, was 0.06-0.03 HA units/ml at 24 hours or 72 hours after inoculation. Directigen FLU A and ELISA detected as positive a virus stock suspension containing 0.25 HA units/ml and 1 HA units/ml, respectively. 

11858650
Benign esophageal stricture in the dog and cat: a retrospective study of 20 cases. 
Twenty animals with benign esophageal strictures are presented. Most of the esophageal strictures were thought to be related to gastroesophageal reflux during ovariohysterectomy and were located at the distal portion of the thoracic esophagus (caudal to the base of the heart). For the dilation procedure, the endoscope tip or a balloon catheter was used and the outcome was generally considered to be good. The endoscope tip was an adequate instrument for dilation in some cases. 

7789769
Structure and regulation of a complex locus: the cut gene of Drosophila. 
The cut locus encodes a homeobox protein that is localized in the nuclei of a variety of tissues and is required for proper morphogenesis of those tissues. Cut protein is required in embryonic and adult external sensory organs, where its absence results in conversion of the organs to chordotonal organs. Expression of cut also occurs in the Malpighian tubules, spiracles, central nervous system, and a number of other tissues. Gypsy transposon insertions upstream of the cut promoter block expression in subsets of these tissues. The effect of the gypsy insertions is polar, with those farthest from the promoter affecting the fewest tissues. The hypothesis that gypsy insertions block a series of tissue-specific enhancer elements that are distributed over a region of 80 kb upstream of the promoter predicts the location of the enhancers for cut expression in each of the tissues in which it is active in embryos. DNA fragments from this region drive expression of a reporter gene in each of the embryonic tissues in which endogenous cut gene is expressed. Each tissue has its own enhancer, and none of the enhancers require the activity of the endogenous cut gene to function. 

14749752
Insulin sensitivity in Chinese ovo-lactovegetarians compared with omnivores. 
AIM: To compare the insulin sensitivity indices between Chinese vegetarians and omnivores. METHODS: The study included 36 healthy volunteers (vegetarian, n=19; omnivore, n=17) who had normal fasting plasma glucose levels. Each participant completed an insulin suppression test. We compared steady-state plasma glucose (SSPG), fasting insulin, the homeostasis model assessment for insulin sensitivity (HOMA-IR and HOMA %S) and beta-cell function (HOMA %beta) between the groups. We also tested the correlation of SSPG with years on a vegetarian diet. RESULTS: The omnivore subjects were younger than the vegetarians (55.7+/-3.7 vs 58.6+/-3.6 year of age, P=0.022). There was no difference between the two groups in sex, blood pressure, renal function tests and lipid profiles. The omnivores had higher serum uric acid levels than vegetarians (5.25+/-0.84 vs 4.54+/-0.75 mg/dl, P=0.011). The results of the indices were different between omnivores and vegetarians (SSPG (mean+/-s.d.) 105.4+/-10.2 vs 80.3+/-11.3 mg/dl, P<0.001; fasting insulin, 4.06+/-0.77 vs 3.02+/-1.19 microU/ml, P=0.004; HOMA-IR, 6.75+/-1.31 vs 4.78+/-2.07, P=0.002; HOMA %S, 159.2+/-31.7 vs 264.3+/-171.7%, P=0.018) except insulin secretion index, HOMA %beta (65.6+/-18.0 vs 58.6+/-14.8%, P=0.208). We found a clear linear relation between years on a vegetarian diet and SSPG (r=-0.541, P=0.017). CONCLUSIONS: The vegetarians were more insulin sensitive than the omnivore counterparts. The degree of insulin sensitivity appeared to be correlated with years on a vegetarian diet. 

8755145
Propionibacterium granulosum activities in rats during the muscle phase of Trichinella spiralis invasion. 
Immune response of Wistar rats, infected with 4000 L1 T. spiralis and treated with P. granulosum during the muscle phase of nematode invasion were measured. The increase of spleen mass was observed in all groups infected and exposed to P. granulosum. Intraperitoneal injection of bacteria results in higher level of T lymphocytes and activated neutrophils. The level of inhibition of macrophages migration was depended on relation to the time and doses of injection. In non-specific stimulated animals there were not statistically significant changes in the level of specific IgG1 antibodies determined by ELISA, against the crude extract of infective larvae of T. spiralis. The reduction of intensity of nematode invasion during the muscle phase was not observed in rats after P. granulosum treatment. 

12226231
Cholinephosphotransferase and Diacylglycerol Acyltransferase (Substrate Specificities at a Key Branch Point in Seed Lipid Metabolism). 
Many oilseed plants accumulate triacylglycerols that contain unusual fatty acyl structures rather than the common 16- and 18-carbon fatty acids found in membrane lipids of these plants. In vitro experiments demonstrate that triacylglycerols are synthesized via diacylglycerols in microsomal preparations and that this same sub-cellular fraction is the site for the synthesis of phosphatidylcholine, which in seeds is synthesized from diacylglycerol by CDP-choline: diacylglycerol cholinephosphotransferase. In microsomes from Cuphea lanceolata, a plant that accumulates fatty acids with 10 carbons and no double bonds (10:0) in its oil, the diacylglycerol acyltransferase exhibited 4-fold higher activity with 10:0/10:0 molecular species of diacylglycerol than with molecular species containing 18-carbon fatty acids. In castor bean (Ricinus communis), which accumulates oil containing ricinoleic acid, diricinoleoyldiacylglycerol was the favored substrate for triacylglycerol synthesis. In contrast to these modest specificities of the diacylglycerol acyltransferases, the cholinephosphotransferases from these plants and from safflower (Carthamus tinctorius) and rapeseed (Brassica napus) showed little or no specificity across a range of different diacylglycerol substrates. Consideration of these results and other data suggests that the targeting of unusual fatty acids to triacylglycerol synthesis and their exclusion from membrane lipids are not achieved on the basis of the diacylglycerol substrate specificities of the enzymes involved and may instead require the spatial separation of two different diacylglycerol pools. 

8694035
In normal postmenopausal women physiologic estrogen replacement therapy fails to improve exercise tolerance: a randomized, double-blind, placebo-controlled, crossover trial. 
OBJECTIVE: Our purpose was to test whether estrogen replacement therapy could increase exercise tolerance in postmenopausal women. STUDY DESIGN: A randomized, double-blind, placebo-controlled, crossover study in 31 healthy postmenopausal women who received 12 weeks of physiologic estrogen replacement therapy (micronized estradiol, 2 mg/day) and were evaluated with modified Balke exercise treadmill tests. RESULTS: Serum estradiol levels increased significantly during replacement therapy in this cohort of female volunteers with a mean age of 59 years, and resting heart rate was lower in women receiving estrogen replacement (p < 0.05). However, neither the heart rate nor the blood pressure responses to exercise was different, nor was the total exercise time, rate of oxygen uptake, or maximal oxygen uptake increased after estradiol treatment. Similarly, ventilatory parameters were unaffected by estradiol. The slope of the respiratory exchange ratio was slightly but significantly different (p < 0.05) while volunteers received estrogen replacement therapy. CONCLUSION: Estrogen replacement therapy, which achieves serum estradiol concentrations in the physiologic range for 12 weeks, fails to increase exercise tolerance or improve cardiovascular response to exercise in postmenopausal women. 

15077801
Health survey of house finches (Carpodacus mexicanus) from Wisconsin. 
We conducted a health survey of house finches (Carpodacus mexicanus) without evidence of Mycoplasma gallisepticum infection in order to establish baseline population health measures and estimate prevalence of potential pathogens likely to influence host susceptibility to mycoplasmosis. Seasonal changes in several physiologic parameters were observed. Weights were greater in winter compared with the breeding season (P < 0.01), fat scores were greater in winter than during fall migration (P < 0.01) or the breeding season (P < 0.01), and packed cell volume and total plasma protein measures during fall migration (P < 0.05) and winter (P < 0.01) were greater than during the breeding season. Culture of voided fecal material yielded 13 bacterial isolates likely representative of normal gastrointestinal flora. Avian pox lesions and blood and gastrointestinal parasite infections were at low prevalence (< or = 4%) compared with Proctophyllodes spp. feather mite infestations (32%) in the population. All parasites occurred at generally low levels in individual hosts. A logistic regression analysis of our data suggests that greater fat scores, tarsal length, and being male are potential risk factors for mite infestation in house finches. 

9324062
Homocysteine and vascular dysfunction. 
Elevated plasma levels of homocysteine and disulfide adducts of homocysteine (collectively termed "homocyst(e)ine") are associated with increased risk of thrombotic and atherosclerotic vascular disease. It is still not evident, however, whether moderately elevated plasma homocyst(e)ine concentration per se is a cause, or rather just a marker for an associated condition that may predispose to development of vascular disease or its complications. This distinction has important clinical consequences, since dietary intervention to lower plasma homocyst(e)ine has been proposed as a global strategy to decrease the prevalence of vascular disease. Studies of cultured cells in vitro have led to the hypothesis that homocysteine may predispose to vascular disease by altering the normally antithrombotic and vasoprotective phenotype of vascular endothelium, perhaps through a mechanism that involves generation of peroxides and other reactive oxygen species. Recent findings in animal and human models of moderate hyperhomocyst(e)inemia provide support for some aspects of this hypothesis. Endothelial dysfunction in hyperhomocyst(e)inemia may contribute to development of atherosclerosis and predispose to complications such as thrombosis and vasospasm. Important questions to be addressed in future investigations include the relative importance of homocysteine versus associated conditions (such as folate deficiency) in the etiology of vascular dysfunction, the role of homocysteine-induced oxidant stress, and the potential benefits of lowering plasma homocyst(e)ine levels through dietary supplementation with B vitamins. 

6792239
Sonography for diagnosis and follow-up of neonatal adrenal hemorrhage. 
Neonatal adrenal hemorrhage was diagnosed by ultrasound as an echo-free mass superior to downward displaced normal kidneys in three newborns. In one, the adrenal hemorrhage was bilateral. Fine needle aspiration was performed to confirm the diagnosis in one case. The babies were followed-up until adrenal calcifications were seen on ultrasound as linear echoes with posterior acoustic shadowing. These calcifications were confirmed by plain films. It is suggested that the diagnosis of neonatal adrenal hemorrhage should be based on ultrasound and on one initial intravenous urogram. Follow-up examinations should be restricted to ultrasound and plain films. In doubtful cases fine needle aspiration can be added for confirmation. 

11521502
Differences in inflammatory responses and cytotoxicity in RAW264.7 macrophages induced by Streptomyces Anulatus grown on different building materials. 
Streptomyces anulatus, an indicator microbe of mold in buildings, was grown on different building materials in order to study the impact of growth conditions on the ability of the spores of this microbe to induce toxicity and inflammatory responses. The microbes were grown for 2 months on sterilized and unsterilized wood, chipboard, concrete, plaster board and mineral wool in tight glass vessels under humid conditions. The highest microbial spore concentration was detected on the sterilized mineral wool followed by the sterilized plaster board and the unsterilized mineral wool. Mouse RAW264.7 macrophages were exposed in vitro for 24 h to the spores of S. anulatus and the production of the inflammatory mediators, nitric oxide (NO), tumor necrosis factor alpha (TNF alpha), interleukin-6 (IL-6), interleukin-10 (IL-10) and cytotoxicity, were measured. The dose equivalent to 5 x 10(5) spores/ml of medium was used to compare the different materials. The most intense production of NO (11.6 microM), TNF alpha (560 pg/ml) and IL-6 (2800 pg/ml) in macrophages was induced by the spores grown on sterilized plaster board. They also caused the greatest loss of cell viability (39%). The spores grown on sterilized concrete induced significant production of NO (1.5 microM) and decreased cell viability (22%), and the spores grown on unsterilized and sterilized mineral wool increased production of NO (4.1 microM and 0.8 microM, respectively). The spores did not stimulate production of the anti-inflammatory cytokine IL-10. These results indicate that the ability of S. anulatus to induce inflammatory responses and cytotoxicity in macrophages is dependent on the growth conditions provided by different building materials. 

8607462
Software standards and the laboratory information system. 
Software standards simplify communication and cooperation between applications provided by different software vendors. However, adherence to a rigid standard can stifle innovation. Open standards, which are not proprietary to any particular vendor, are particularly useful. Many standard-setting organizations have provided useful tools for laboratory informatics, including the American Society for Testing and Materials (ASTM), Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers, National Committee for Clinical Laboratory Standards, and the College of American Pathologists. Data communication standards, such as ASTM 1238, HL7, and Digital Image Communication of Medicine, have reduced the cost and improved the timeliness of interfaces. Nomenclatures, particularly the Systematized Nomenclature of Medicine (SNOMED), have facilitated the structuring of medical information, and decision rules can be communicated with ASTM E1460. Laboratory Observation Identifier Names and Codes has eased the problem of identifying tests during interchange of laboratory data. Implementation standards are useful references for those deploying information systems. Standards have provided multiple benefits to laboratories and to the health care organizations of which they are a component. 

2385197
Optimal design of radiation compensators. 
A method to achieve the optimal design of radiation therapy compensating filters in multibeam situations is proposed. Dose distribution is optimized such that it approaches the prescribed value in the target zone, is minimized everywhere else, and does not exceed designated limits at vulnerable regions. Field shapes, sizes, and weights, together with filter thicknesses that take into account missing tissues and body heterogeneities, are calculated as a result of this process. The dose distribution, after the application of the calculated filters and beams, is also predicted. The method is rigorous, and its accuracy depends only upon the accuracy of the applied dose calculation method. Examples are discussed and verified using data obtained from Theraplan 300L treatment planning system. 

12585400
Effects of a nonplanar porphyrin rings on the spin-spin interactions in low-spin ferric porphyrin radical cationst. 
Low-spin ferric porphyrin radical cations formed by the oxidation of chloro(meso-tetraalkylporphyrinato)iron(III) followed by the addition of bulky 2-methylimidazole show antiferromagnetic coupling, which is interpreted in terms of the interaction between porphyrin a2u and iron d(xy), orbitals caused by the S4 ruffling of the porphyrin core. 

12881582
Internal jugular vein thrombosis associated with hemodialysis catheters. 
PURPOSE: To determine the prevalence of internal jugular vein thrombosis among patients undergoing hemodialysis in whom tunneled dialysis catheters were placed by interventional radiologists and to evaluate potential risk factors for thrombosis, such as the number of catheters inserted per patient through the right internal jugular vein, catheter type and material, total catheter days, and catheter-associated infection. MATERIALS AND METHODS: Ultrasonographic (US) evaluation of the right internal jugular vein was performed by interventional radiologists in 143 patients with a history of dialysis catheter placement. The examination focused on the detection of right internal jugular vein thrombosis, with or without occlusion. Total catheter days, catheter type, and catheter-related complications, most notably infection, were evaluated with database analysis for possible association with subsequent development of thrombosis. Statistical analysis of potential risk factors was performed with logistic regression models and chi2 tests. RESULTS: Evidence of right internal jugular vein thrombosis was present in 25.9% of the patients enrolled in the study. Among the veins with thrombosis, 62% were occluded. Only the mean number of catheters placed in the right internal jugular vein per patient was significant below the level of P =.20; therefore, a multivariate logistic regression model was not used. CONCLUSION: Prevalence of internal jugular thrombosis, both complete and incomplete, was higher in the study population than previously reported. The risk factors that were analyzed demonstrated no statistically significant association with development of thrombosis. 

2607440
Responses of electroreceptors in the snout of the echidna. 
1. This is a report of experiments which provide evidence in support of the existence of an electric sense in the echidna, or spiny anteater Tachyglossus aculeatus. It is the first known example of electroreception in a terrestrial animal. 2. In each of four animals anaesthetized with alpha-chloralose, afferent responses were recorded in dissected filaments of the infraorbital branch of the trigeminal nerve which supplies skin of the upper jaw. Recordings were obtained from a total of forty-seven units identified as electroreceptors, by their responses to weak voltage pulses using focal stimulation of the moist skin surface. 3. In the absence of a stimulus, some receptors had an irregular resting discharge; others were silent. The receptive field for each receptor consisted of a discrete spot. Receptive fields were restricted to the tip of the snout. Cathodal stimulation over the receptive spot was excitatory for the duration of an applied voltage pulse. Reversal of stimulus polarity silenced any on-going activity and was followed by a post-anodal rebound excitation. 4. Receptor threshold was best measured not in air but with the snout immersed in tap water. An electric field was applied between a pair of large plate electrodes on either side of the snout. Threshold for thirty receptors lay in the range 1.8-73 mV cm-1. Measurements of response latency and of conduction path length gave estimates of axonal conduction velocities for the afferent fibres of 10-18 m Receptors responded to sinusoidally changing voltage gradients over the range 0.5-200 Hz with a maximum sensitivity at 20 Hz. 5. In one experiment a receptor site was marked with fine pins. Serial sections of the piece of underlying skin revealed a large mucus-secreting gland at the marked spot. Similar glands in skin of the platypus have previously been shown to be the sites of electroreceptors. 6. In a behavioural experiment an echidna was trained to choose between two identical tap water-filled troughs, one of which had a weak electric field across it. The animal learned to detect field strengths down to 1.8 mV cm-1 which corresponded to threshold for the most sensitive receptor measured in a subsequent electro-physiological experiment. It is concluded that the echidna, like the other Australian representative of the monotremes, the platypus, has an electric sense. It remains to be determined what kinds of sources of electric fields the animal encounters in its normal habitat. 

11440155
Features of distamycin preferential binding sites on natural DNA predicted using differential scanning calorimetry. 
The interaction of distamycin with ColE1 DNA was examined by using differential scanning calorimetry (DSC) taking the helix-coil transition theory of DNA into consideration. Our results here strongly indicate that the affinity of distamycin to DNA, at a low distamycin concentration, depends highly on the DNA sequence, and preferential binding occurs to the sites of four to six successive A-T pairs having two or more successive G-C pairs on both their ends. 

3980440
Structure of complex flagellar filaments in Rhizobium meliloti. 
The complex flagella of Rhizobium meliloti 2011 and MVII-1 were analyzed with regard to serology, fine structure, subunits, and amino acid composition. The serological identities of flagellar filaments of the two strains were demonstrated by double immunodiffusion with antiflagellin antiserum. The filaments had a diameter of 16 nm. Their morphology was dominated by the prominent undulations of an external three-start helix running at a 10-nm axial distance and at an angle of 32 degrees. Faint nearly axial striations indicated the presence of a tubular core of a different helical order. The complex filaments consisted of 40,000-dalton flagellin monomers. Typically, the amino acid composition was 3 to 4% higher in nonpolar residues and 5 to 7% lower in aspartic and glutamic acids (and their amides) than that of plain flagellar proteins. There were no immunochemical relationships among Pseudomonas rhodos, Rhizobium lupini, and R. meliloti complex flagella, suggesting that the latter represent a new class. 

6847295
Isolated unruptured aneurysm of the left coronary sinus of Valsalva. 
An isolated unruptured aneurysm of the left coronary sinus of Valsalva was detected incidentally in a patient with a bicuspid aortic valve in whom the left circumflex coronary artery arose from the right coronary artery. With the patient on cardiopulmonary bypass, the mouth of the aneurysm was closed by suturing the reflected posterior cusp of the aortic valve to the aortic root. A Starr-Edwards prosthetic aortic valve was inserted, and an aortocoronary saphenous vein bypass graft maintained good blood flow down the left anterior descending coronary artery. Previous reports of this rare condition and its treatment are discussed. 

16202050
Effect of bur type and conditioning on the surface and interface of dentine. 
The purpose of this in vitro study was to evaluate the surface and resin-dentine interface characteristics of permanent tooth dentine cut with diamond or carbide burs and treated with phosphoric acid (PA) or an acidic conditioner. Labial surfaces of permanent incisors were prepared into dentine with high-speed carbide or diamond burs and divided into two halves. Phosphoric acid 36% was applied on one half and non-rinse conditioner (NRC) was applied on the other half. Ten randomly selected scanning electron microscopy (SEM) fields from each specimen (n = 15) were evaluated. Occlusal surfaces of third molars were divided in two halves for evaluation of the resin-dentine interface. The halves were randomly assigned to one of each conditioner and restored with Prime & Bond NT/Spectrum. Ten specimens were analysed by SEM to evaluate hybrid layer formation and interfacial seal. We observed that surfaces prepared with carbide bur presented less residual smear plugs (P < 0.05) than surfaces prepared with diamond burs. Surfaces conditioned with NRC, which is a smear layer modifier, presented more residual smear plugs than surfaces conditioned with PA (P < 0.05). Treatment with PA resulted in more sealed interfaces than specimens treated with NRC. Within the limitations of this study the results showed that carbide burs leave a surface that is more conducive to bonding than diamond burs. 

2237324
Salmonella and Shigella carriers among refugees from the middle east and Sri Lanka in Denmark. 
One per cent of ten thousand refugees were asymptomatic carriers of Salmonella and Shigella species found by a differentiated health check programme at a Danish Red Cross arrival centre in Denmark 1985 and 1986. Six patients with typhoid fever and one with S. parathyphi-A septicaemia all fell ill within the first few weeks after arrival. A child of a chronic S. typhi carrier developed typhoid fever four months after arrival. Cases of sporadic and mild diarrhoea occurred due to Salmonella and Shigella species. The carriers were instructed in prophylactic, hygienic measures and no outbreaks developed. The health check system in this period seemed to be sufficient in relation to preventing outbreaks of infections caused by non-typhoid Salmonella and Shigella species. The relative cost-effectiveness of a more intensive S. typhi screening on arrival is questionable. The organization of health check systems should be reviewed regularly, as each refugee situation is different and will change in different periods. 

16116436
Translation elongation factor 1A is essential for regulation of the actin cytoskeleton and cell morphology. 
The binding of eukaryotic translation elongation factor 1A (eEF1A) to actin is a noncanonical function that may link two distinct cellular processes, cytoskeleton organization and gene expression. Using the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae, we have established an in vivo assay that directly identifies specific regions and residues of eEF1A responsible for actin interactions and bundling. Using a unique genetic screen, we isolated a series of eEF1A mutants with reduced actin bundling activity. These mutations alter actin cytoskeleton organization but not translation, indicating that these are separate functions of eEF1A. This demonstrates for the first time a direct consequence of eEF1A on cytoskeletal organization in vivo and the physiological significance of this interaction. 

12491705
[The "candlestick" technique for the correction of certain types of congenital metacarpal synotosis] 
Metacarpal synostosis is a rare congenital hand malformation requiring only occasionally a surgical correction. However in case of divergent epiphyses there is a progressive accentuation of the deformity. In the "Y" type of symmetrical synostosis, the authors propose a trapezoidal osteotomy with upside down relocation allowing realignement of the epiphyses without distant bone donor site. 

17110009
Developing, integrating, and perpetuating new ways of applying sociology to health, medicine, policy, and everyday life. 
As a framework for presenting ideas on developing ways to make sociology more applicable, we focus on the recent state of medical sociology research. Data for this paper were generated through a content analysis of a twelve-year period (1993-2004) of the Journal of Health and Social Behavior (JHSB) and Social Science & Medicine (SSM). The analysis aims to determine if the content of JHSB and SSM reflect the breadth of the sub-discipline of medical sociology as well as the stated goals of the journals. The selected issues of JHSB and SSM were coded on the basis of the following attributes: (1) Primary Substantive Topic, (2) Methodology, (3) Data Type and Analytic Technique, and (4) Research and Policy Recommendations. We found that the orientation of JHSB articles was towards generating research and theory that shy away from policy, interdisciplinary approaches, and applied issues. SSM content tends to display more interdisciplinary breadth and variety, but also reflects a dearth of applied recommendations. Our discussion focuses on what JHSB and SSM could be. We present ideas on how the sociological discipline in general-and JHSB and SSM in particular-can help generate and nourish new forms of inquiry that can impact the way research questions are framed. We conclude that such a shift is needed in order to maximize the applicability of social scientific evidence to everyday life, and we share examples situated within a socio-medical context, where there is a particular need for the application of social evidence to practice. 

17352702
A conceptual framework contributing to nursing administration and research. 
The health care system has undergone major changes in the last decade. With greater acuity and complexity of illness, the adoption of innovative technologies and the shortage of health care personnel, the coordination and integration of health care services has become increasingly demanding for administrators. Growing dissatisfaction and concerns about safety issues are being expressed by the users of care who need to navigate through an increasingly complex system and by health care personnel who feel less efficient within the organization. Nursing administrators have a responsibility to address these issues but there is little scientific evidence to guide their actions. There are also few comprehensive models highlighting the main components of nursing administration - models that could guide nursing administration research. This paper presents a conceptual framework for nursing administration and research that links patient health care needs, nursing resources and the nursing care processes to the context of the health care system, and the social, political and cultural environments of care. A selected review of the oncology and cancer care literature is presented to demonstrate how this framework can organize existing knowledge about these concepts in the context of cancer care. 

8237526
[Inhibition of tumor cell growth by the action of high-energy sources] 
In vitro comparison of the cytotoxic action of high-energy shockwave and megavoltage radiotherapy on tumoral cells. The inhibitory action these two therapeutic approaches have on cell viability is determined both singly and jointly, through life staining exclusion and nucleoside uptake tests. High energy shockwaves have a cytotoxic action significantly greater than low- and medium-energy levels of megavoltage radiation. The cytotoxic effect from megavoltage radiation is significantly greater than that resulting from high levels of high-energy shockwave as shown by the life staining exclusion tests. However, the nucleoside uptake test shows that cytotoxicity from either type of energy is no significantly different. When measuring the cumulative cytotoxic action of high energy shockwaves plus megavoltage radiation, the level of cytotoxicity is greater than the individual inhibitory actions on cell viability, but the degree of cytotoxicity induced cannot be comparable to that produced by higher energy levels from both sources separately. 

3673040
[Association of Ebstein's disease and aortic coarctation] 
The rare case of a 58 years old male patient with a combination of Ebstein's disease and coarctation of the aorta is reported. The patient presented and died with manifestations of cardiac and respiratory failure. The post mortem examination revealed the combination of Ebstein's disease and coarctation of the aorta. The analysis of the clinical and paraclinical data points to an atypical course of the disease probably due to the opposite hemodynamic characteristics of the two congenital heart diseases. 

3988640
Comparative performance of straightbred and crossbred (F1) sires. 
The first phase of this study was the production of contemporary straightbred (SB) and reciprocal crossbred (F1) bulls by mating Angus (A) bulls to A and Santa Gertrudis (SG) cows and SG bulls to SG and A cows. Of the bulls produced during the 4-yr period, those used for breeding included 15 A, 15 SG, 8 A X SG and 8 SG X A. For 205-d weight and weight/day of age (W/DA) postweaning, A X SG had higher (P less than .05) performance than SG X A bulls and SG had higher (P less than .05) performance than A bulls. There was no difference (P greater than .05) between SG and A X SG for 205-d weight, postweaning average daily gain (ADG) or postweaning W/DA. Heterosis estimates were 5.2 (P less than .10), 9.9 (P less than .01) and 5.8% (P less than .01) for 205-d weight, postweaning ADG and W/DA, respectively. The second phase of this study was the comparison of SB and F1 bulls for reproductive and progeny performance by exposing them as yearlings to 25 Polled Hereford cows each. There were no differences (P greater than .05) among the four sire groups for proportion of cows exposed that had a calf, had a live calf or weaned a calf. Reproductive performance of sires also was evaluated in terms of number of days (NOD) from the beginning of the breeding period until calves were born. The NOD for calves by SG was greater (P less than .05) than for calves by A or F1 sires. Compared with calves from SB sires, the NOD for calves from A X SG and SG X A sires were 5.0 and 10.6 d (P less than .05) lower. Differences among sires within year and breeding of sire were significant for all preweaning traits and for W/DA postweaning of their progeny. The SG-sired calves were heavier (P less than .05) for birth and 205-d weight and had higher (P less than .05) postweaning ADG than A-sired calves. Mean performance of calves by reciprocal F1 sires did not deviate (P greater than .05) from the mean performance of those by SB sires. Calves by A X SG sires had higher (P less than .05) 205-d weight, postweaning ADG and W/DA than calves by SG X A sires. Results indicated that the primary genetic effects responsible for differences in performance of calves sired by F1 vs SB bulls were mean transmitted and mean heterotic effects. (ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 400 WORDS) 

8007630
Stage I adenocarcinomas of the lung: survival of females and males. 
Seventy-two cases of Stage I lung adenocarcinomas in females were analyzed and compared with 84 cases in males, all of which were surgically resected at the National Kyushu Cancer Center Hospital in Japan. The females with Stage I adenocarcinomas had a tendency, that was not significant, towards a longer survival than the male patients. When subdivided by age into less than 50, between 50 and 70, and more than 70 years-old, the female patients had a tendency, that was not significant, towards a longer survival in each group. In each age group, the ratio of smokers to non-smokers was higher in the males. The female group of ages 50 to 70 had the best 5-year survival rate. By multiregression analysis, age was found to be the most important factor for improved survival. The results indicate that a hormonal factor in Stage I lung adenocarcinoma does not influence survival. 

10757945
The Role of Psychological Factors in Bariatric Surgery for Morbid Obesity: Identification of Psychological Predictors of Success. 
This paper deals with two important questions in the Outcome of surgical treatment for morbid obesity. First, what is the impact of bariatric surgery on psychological functioning or quality of life? Second, and perhaps more important, can pre-surgical factors be identified that predict the outcome of surgery? These questions are answered by a systematic review of the current literature in this area. Throughout this paper the need for methodological rigor is stressed, and conclusions are based only on empirically sound findings. It is concluded that surgery is generally associated with improved psychological functioning and quality of life for most individuals. While a significant minority of morbidly obese individuals do not respond positively to surgery, there is no evidence to support the theory that obesity is a psychological defense mechanism, and therefore that bariatric surgery will produce widespread psychological problems. On a less positive note, while some studies identify pre-surgery psychological factors that predict weight loss following surgery, there has been no attempt to systematically replicate findings across studies, and no consistent findings have emerged from the literature. Due to the fact that the predictor variables examined have not been selected on theoretical grounds, the interpretation of isolated findings is difficult. On the basis of this review, however, distress over obesity appears to be a potentially important psychological predictor of the success of surgery. Unfortunately, there currently is no measure to specifically measure distress over obesity. What is needed at this time is a theoretically derived approach to the development of a scale to assess distress over obesity. 

9215231
Time-dependent change in fast pathway refractoriness after slow pathway ablation in atrioventricular node reentrant tachycardia. Mansfield Polaris Investigators. 
OBJECTIVE: To determine the time course of change in fast pathway refractoriness after slow pathway ablation. BACKGROUND: Antegrade fast pathway refractoriness has been observed to shorten in patients undergoing slow pathway ablation for atrioventricular (AV) node reentrant tachycardia. The time course and mechanism of this observation have not been explained. METHODS: Twenty-eight patients with AV node reentrant tachycardia and dual AV node pathways undergoing slow pathway ablation had the fast pathway effective refractory period (ERP) assessed immediately before, and at 0, 15, 30 and 45 mins after slow pathway ablation (Group 1). Twenty-five additional patients with AV node reentry and dual pathways involved in a multicentre protocol evaluating the Mansfield Polaris LE catheter underwent assessment of fast pathway refractoriness before and after slow pathway ablation, and at a routine three-month follow-up electrophysiology study (Group 2). RESULTS: In Group 1, antegrade fast pathway ERP fell from 394 ms before ablation to 334 ms immediately after slow pathway ablation, increased to 348 ms within 15 mins and was 353 ms at 45 mins (ANOVA P < 0.001). Retrograde fast pathway ERP fell from 325 ms before ablation to 294 ms at 45 mins (P = 0.02). In Group 2, antegrade fast pathway ERP fell from 390 ms before ablation to 337 ms after ablation, and rose to 362 ms at three months (P = 0.01). Retrograde fast pathway ERP also fell from 347 ms to 319 ms after ablation (P = 0.01), and remained unchanged at three months. CONCLUSION: Slow pathway ablation results in an immediate and sustained change in antegrade and retrograde first pathway refractoriness. There are immediate reversible and long term nonreversible components to this phenomenon. The latter finding may be related to loss of electrotonic inhibition of the fast pathway by the slow pathway. 

17718116
Sir Francis Galton and proficiency testing in cytopathology. 
Data from the National Cytology Proficiency Testing Update show that as of January 31, 2006, 9% of 12,786 examinees failed the test on the first attempt. For the second attempt, the failure rate among those who had initially failed remained surprisingly similar, 10%, although common sense would dictate that it should be much higher among those who have already failed the test once and should have lower professional skills. What is the reason for this remarkable improvement in performance? There is a simple explanation: this is a statistical phenomenon, known as "regression toward the mean." Two groups of examinees earn failing scores during proficiency testing: those whose skills are really insufficient and those who are competent but who achieved lower scores due to random variation in the test results. The latter, "misclassified" examinees subsequently "regress" toward the mean during the second test; that is, their test results become more commensurate with their genuine skills. Since the failure rates of all participants during the first and second attempts were similar, we must assume that the majority of the examinees who failed on the first attempt fall into the second, misclassified group, and only a minority have truly insufficient skills. 

10068956
Degradability of forage proteins by in situ and in vitro enzymatic methods. 
The overall objective of these two studies was to evaluate the efficacy of using the proteolytic enzyme from Streptomyces griseus to estimate concentrations of ruminally degradable protein (RDP) in a wide array of forages. In the first study, alfalfa and prairie hays that previously had been evaluated in vivo for RDP were incubated in a replicated 3 x 3 factorial combination of enzyme concentrations (6.6, 0.66, and 0.066 activity units/ml of incubation medium) and incubation times (2, 4, and 48 h). Two treatment combinations (6.6 activity units for 4 h and 0.066 activity units for 48 h) yielded respective RDP estimates for alfalfa and prairie hay that were close to the known in vivo values. In the second study, 20 diverse forages were evaluated for RDP by using the in situ technique. These forages also were evaluated for RDP with the two enzyme concentrations identified in the first study, but incubation times were expanded to include 1, 2, 3, 4, and 5 h at the high concentration and 24, 30, 36, 42, 48, and 54 h at the low concentration. At the high enzyme concentration, r2 statistics from linear regressions of enzymatic estimates of RDP on corresponding estimates obtained by the in situ procedure were high (r2 > or = 0.898) at all incubation times; in addition, slopes (range = 0.88 to 1.00) and intercepts (range = -9.4 to 3.5%) approached unity and 0, respectively. At the lower enzyme concentration, r2 statistics were still good (> 0.81), but slopes (0.59 to 0.67) and intercepts (18.5 to 21.9%) for all incubation times did not meet the respective goals of unity and 0. 

18037898
Engulfment of apoptotic cells: signals for a good meal. 
The clearance of apoptotic cells by phagocytes is an integral component of normal life, and defects in this process can have significant implications for self tolerance and autoimmunity. Recent studies have provided new insights into the engulfment process, including how phagocytes seek apoptotic cells, how they recognize and ingest these targets and how they maintain cellular homeostasis after the 'meal'. Several new factors that regulate engulfment have been identified, whereas the roles of some of the older players require revision. This Review focuses on these recent developments and attempts to highlight some of the important questions in this field. 

7050328
Adult respiratory distress syndrome in children. 
Twenty patients (age 2 weeks to 15 years) who fulfilled strict selection criteria for adult respiratory distress syndrome were identified during a 3 1/2-year period. The underlying disease was intra-abdominal infection/septicemia in seven, hypovolemic shock, near drowning, closed space burn, or cardiogenic shock caused by nupercaine intoxication in two each, and miscellaneous in five. The mean time of artificial ventilation with PEEP was 18 days (range 5 to 92), and the mean time of FIO2 greater than or equal to 0.5 while on the ventilatory 139 hours (range 12 to 648). PEEP levels were most often between 8 and 15 cm H2O. Eight patients had a pulmonary air leak. Eight patients died (40% mortality). Death was nearly always related to unresolved basic medical or surgical problems and multiple organ failure. Treatment of ARDS includes elimination of the cause of ARDS, early institution of mechanical ventilation with PEEP, prompt recognition and treatment of superimposed infections, and careful management of additional organ failures. 

588389
Oxygen therapy after thoracotomy. 
Arterial blood samples were taken from patients before thoracotomy, and on the 1st day after operation, with the patient breathing first air, and then 24%, 28% and 35% oxygen from a venturi-type mask. PaO2 was reduced markedly by operation, the reduction being related to the value before operation. Oxygen therapy restored PaO2 to a value greater than the value before operation in nine of 11 patients and was not associated with significant increases in PaCO2. The effect of administration of oxygen on PaO2 could be predicted from the PaO2 when breathing air. The pattern of response to oxygen suggested that the hypoxaemia was caused by ventilation/perfusion mismatch in most of the patients. 

12930022
Pattern of drug resistant Helicobacter pylori in dyspeptic patients in Thailand. 
Emergence of drug resistant Helicobacter pylori (H. pylori) has occurred in various countries and could compromise the efficacy of current treatment regimens. The aim of the study was to identify the pattern of antibiotic resistant H. pylori in Thailand and evaluate various factors associated with drug resistance. Between June 2001 and December 2002, a total of 560 dyspeptic patients who underwent upper gastrointestinal endoscopy at King Chulalongkorn Memorial Hospital were included in this study. Antral gastric biopsies were obtained for H. pylori cultures and susceptibility tests using Epsilometer test (E-test). The value of antibiotic resistant breakpoints were amoxicillin 0.5 microg/ml, clarithromycin 1.0 microg/ml, metronidazole 8 microg/ml, and tetracycline 4 microg/ml, respectively. H. pylori were detected in 315 patients using the rapid urease test (56.25%). Cultures for H. pylori were positive in 172 patients. E-test for all four antibiotics was successfully placed in 79 isolations. The prevalence of antibiotic resistant H. pylori were amoxicillin 13.9 per cent (11/79), clarithromycin 19.0 per cent (15/79), metronidazole 30.4 per cent (24/79), tetracycline 5.1 per cent (4/79), and multi-drugs 16.5 per cent (13/79), respectively. However, age, sex, or endoscopic findings did not differ between the patients with H. pylori resistant strains and sensitive strains. The emergence of antibiotic and multi-drug resistant H. pylori in Thailand were relatively high and these could compromise the efficacy of current treatment regimens. The factors associated with drug resistant H. pylori could not be demonstrated in the present study. Further study in a larger number of patients might be necessary to identify factors associated with resistant H. pylori. 

3198757
Anticonvulsant hypersensitivity syndrome. In vitro assessment of risk. 
Arene oxide metabolites of aromatic anticonvulsants (phenytoin, phenobarbital, and carbamazepine) may be involved in the pathogenesis of hypersensitivity reactions. We investigated 53 patients with clinical sensitivity to anticonvulsants by exposing their lymphocytes in vitro to drug metabolites generated by a murine hepatic microsomal system. The diagnosis of a hypersensitivity reaction was corroborated by in vitro rechallenge for each drug (phenytoin, n = 34; phenobarbital, n = 22; carbamazepine, n = 25) when cytotoxicity (% dead cells) exceeded 3 SD above the mean result for controls. Cross-reactivity among the drugs was noted. 7 out of 10 patients who had received all three anticonvulsants had adverse reactions to each. 40 out of 50 patients tested to all three drugs in vitro were positive to each. Adverse reactions were indistinguishable among anti-convulsants. Skin rash (87%), fever (94%), hepatitis (51%), and hematologic abnormalities (51%) were common clinical features of each drug. 62% of reactions involved more than two organs. Cells from patients' parents exhibited in vitro toxicity that was intermediate between values for controls and patients. In vitro testing can help diagnose hypersensitivity to anticonvulsants. Cells from patients may also be used for prospective individualization of therapy to decrease risk of adverse reaction. Cross-reactivity among the major anticonvulsants is common and should be considered before deciding on alternative therapy. 

6119623
Effects of various structurally related beta-adrenoceptor blocking agents on maximum upstroke velocity of action potential in guinea-pig papillary muscles. 
The effects of indenolol (7.0-100 mumol/l), befunolol (15.3-250 mumol/l), metoprolol (58.4-1000 mumol/l), Ko707 (7.3-100 mumol/l), D-25 (3.7-100 mumol/l) and Ko1313 (73.9-1000 mumol/l) on action potentials were investigated in isolated guinea-pig papillary muscles. All these aryloxyisopropylaminopropanol derivatives produced a concentration-dependent reduction of V max at a basic rate of 1 Hz. The reduction was less prominent when interstimulus intervals were prolonged. The time course of recovery of V max during diastole was studied by assessing V max in premature responses at 0.25, 0.1 and 0.027 Hz and in responses after interrupting driving stimuli of 1 Hz. The recovery process was approximated by a single exponential function prominent when interstimulus intervals were prolonged. The time course of recovery of V max during diastole was studied by assessing V max in premature responses at 0.25, 0.1 and 0.027 Hz and in responses after interrupting driving stimuli of 1 Hz. The recovery process was approximated by a single exponential function prominent when interstimulus intervals were prolonged. The time course of recovery of V max during diastole was studied by assessing V max in premature responses at 0.25, 0.1 and 0.027 Hz and in responses after interrupting driving stimuli of 1 Hz. The recovery process was approximated by a single exponential function. The results, together with those reported previously (Sada and Ban 1980, 1981), revealed: (1) a significant correlation between potencies of these derivatives for depression of V max at 0.027, 0.25, 1 and 5 Hz and their log n-octanol/water partition coefficients (log P): (2) The time constants of recovery were relatively concentration independent and correlated significantly with the molecular weights. The results suggest that the potency of these drugs for the depression of V max was mainly determined by log P, being modified secondarily by the time constants of recovery which are intimately associated with the molecular weights. 

10227816
IL-12-Independent costimulation pathways for interferon-gamma production in familial disseminated Mycobacterium avium complex infection. 
We have described previously a family with an apparent genetic susceptibility to disseminated Mycobacterium avium complex infection and an underlying defect in IL-12 regulation leading to abnormally low interferon-gamma production. Their T cells appear to act normally when in the presence of normal accessory cells. Cell-to-cell contact was necessary for normal monocytes to complement the familial patient monocyte defect, suggesting the familial defect in interferon-gamma costimulation involves pathways requiring cell surface molecule interactions. In an effort to better characterize the abnormality in these patients, we examined the role of known costimulatory molecules in residual costimulation by patient PBMC compared to normals. Whereas normals utilized CD40/CD40L interactions and IL-12 production for optimal interferon-gamma costimulation in PHA-stimulated cocultures, familial patient interferon-gamma production was low and unaffected by their blockade. CD86 blockade caused a greater than 50% reduction in both normal and familial patient interferon-gamma production, implying that a majority of residual familial patient costimulation required this pathway. Furthermore, selected myelomonocytic cell lines (K562 and THP1) acted as potent accessory cells for interferon-gamma production by familial patient and normal T cells, largely independent of IL-12 production. However, CD86 blockade of K562 cell/familial cell cocultures resulted in less than a 20% reduction in interferon-gamma production, indicating that familial patient cells respond to IL-12- and CD86-independent costimulatory signals for interferon-gamma as well. Thus, we demonstrate that the familial defect also involves interferon-gamma costimulation pathways requiring both CD40/CD40L interaction and IL-12 production, while residual pathways remain that allow low-level interferon-gamma production. Familial Mycobacterium avium patient monocytes and certain myelomonocytic cell lines can be exploited to investigate IL-12-independent costimulation for interferon-gamma production. 

3434497
[A case of angiomyolipoma originating from polycystic kidney with horseshoe kidney] 
A case of renal angiomyolipoma originating from polycystic kidney with horseshoe kidney is reported. A 32-year-old woman visited our hospital with the complaint of proteinuria. with computerized tomographic scan and further examinations the patient was diagnosed as having renal angiomyolipoma with tuberous sclerosis. The tumor originated from a polycystic horseshoe kidney. Three weeks later, she complained of right flank pain and was diagnosed with spontaneous rupture of the angiomyolipoma. Right heminephrectomy was performed and histological examination confirmed the preoperative diagnosis. Some discussion is made on the characteristics and treatment of renal angiomyolipoma, and the statistics on renal diseases with tuberous sclerosis in Japan are presented. 

6257528
Effect of VIP, phenoxybenzamine and prednisolone on cyclic nucleotide content of isolated guinea-pig lung and trachea. 
Vasoactive intestinal polypeptide (VIP) increased the cyclic AMP content of guinea pig lung and tracheal tissues. Combinations of the peptide with prednisolone or with phenoxybenzamine potentiated the effect of VIP on cyclic AMP. The trachea-relaxant effect of VIP also was reinforced by the addition of prednisolone or phenoxybenzamine. At the same time, cyclic GMP content in these tissues changed little in response to these agents. The results provide a biochemical basis for the tracheal-relaxant action of these agents, and for the potentiation of bronchodilation by prednisolone and by alpha-receptor blockade. The findings are also consistent with the view that relaxation of airway smooth muscle is mediated by an elevation of intracellular cyclic AMP. 

3604554
Changes in catecholamine contents in ovarian follicular theca, progesterone contents in granulosa, and LH concentrations in peripheral plasma during the ovulatory cycle in the hen. 
By the use of high-performance liquid chromatography, the content of norepinephrine (NE) and epinephrine (E) in the theca of the largest and the second largest preovulatory follicle of the ovary of the hen was found to increase from 15 h (NE) or 18 h (E) to reach a peak 9 h (NE) or 9-6 h (E) before ovulation of the largest follicle. The content of progesterone in the granulosa of these follicles and the concentration of LH in the peripheral plasma of the same hen, both of which were measured by radioimmunoassays, showed a peak 6 h before ovulation. The results suggest that the catecholamines are involved in some events occurring in both follicles some several hours before ovulation of the largest follicle during the ovulatory cycle. 

15246976
CFTR involvement in nasal potential differences in mice and pigs studied using a thiazolidinone CFTR inhibitor. 
Nasal potential difference (PD) measurements have been used to demonstrate defective CFTR function in cystic fibrosis (CF) and to evaluate potential CF therapies. We used the selective thiazolidinone CFTR inhibitor CFTR(inh)-172 to define the involvement of CFTR in nasal PD changes in mice and pigs. In normal mice infused intranasally with a physiological saline solution containing amiloride, nasal PD was -4.7 +/- 0.7 mV, hyperpolarizing by 15 +/- 1 mV after a low-Cl- solution, and a further 3.9 +/- 0.5 mV after forskolin. CFTR(inh)-172 produced 1.1 +/- 0.9- and 4.3 +/- 0.7-mV depolarizations when added after low Cl- and forskolin, respectively. Systemically administered CFTR(inh)-172 reduced the forskolin-induced hyperpolarization from 4.7 +/- 0.4 to 0.9 +/- 0.1 mV but did not reduce the low Cl(-)-induced hyperpolarization. Nasal PD was -12 +/- 1 mV in CF mice after amiloride, changing by <0.5 mV after low Cl- or forskolin. In pigs, nasal PD was -14 +/- 3 mV after amiloride, hyperpolarizing by 13 +/- 2 mV after low Cl- and a further 9 +/- 1 mV after forskolin. CFTR(inh)-172 and glibenclamide did not affect nasal PD in pigs. Our results suggest that cAMP-dependent nasal PDs in mice primarily involve CFTR-mediated Cl- conductance, whereas cAMP-independent PDs are produced by a different, but CFTR-dependent, Cl- channel. In pigs, CFTR may not be responsible for Cl- channel-dependent nasal PDs. These results have important implications for interpreting nasal PDs in terms of CFTR function in animal models of CFTR activation and inhibition. 

8128599
Isolation of different non-cytopathogenic bovine viral diarrhoea (BVD) viruses from cytopathogenic BVD virus stocks using reverse plaque formation method. 
Non-cytopathogenic (NCP) bovine viral diarrhoea (BVD) viruses were isolated from three cytopathogenic (CP) BVD virus stocks using the reverse plaque formation method, which was based on intrinsic interference. By means of an exaltation of Newcastle disease virus (END) test, these NCP BVD viruses were divided into two groups; END phenomenon positive (END+) and END phenomenon negative (END-) viruses. 



 

8128599

Additionally, the END+ NCP BVD viruses interfered only with CP BVD virus whereas the END- NCP BVD viruses interfered with vesicular stomatitis virus as well as CP BVD virus. Differences in antigenicity existed among the three CP strains, however, each group of parent CP BVD virus and derivative NCP BVD virus was antigenically indistinguishable. 

9392338
Primary non-Hodgkin's lymphoma of the lacrimal sac: a case report and a review of the literature. 
BACKGROUND: Primary non-Hodgkin's lymphoma of the lacrimal sac is extremely rare, with most reported cases representing secondary involvement of a systemic malignancy. METHODS: The clinical record of a 70-year-old female who presented with epiphora and swelling of the lacrimal sac area is described. A review of the literature of patients with primary lacrimal sac lymphoma also is presented. RESULTS: Computed tomography demonstrated a lacrimal sac mass involving the nasolacrimal canal. Histopathologic examination of a biopsy specimen revealed a diffuse large cell lymphoma. Using immunohistologic staining, the tumor was a B-cell type, similar to those described in the literature. The patient was treated with 50 gray of irradiation and chemotherapy with cyclophosphamide, doxorubicin, vincristine, and prednisone. The patient remained free of lymphoma 26 months after initial treatment. An ocular examination was unremarkable except for epiphora. CONCLUSIONS: Radiotherapy and/or chemotherapy can treat localized lymphoma of the lacrimal sac successfully. 

8303447
Surgical and clinical results of scoliosis surgery using Zielke instrumentation. 
All patients with idiopathic thoracolumbar or lumbar scoliosis treated by a single surgeon with a single-stage fusion with Zielke instrumentation and a minimum 2-year follow-up were reviewed. Thirty-two patients were reviewed (94% follow-up), 13 adolescents and 19 adults. All patients were evaluated clinically and radiographically, as well as psychosocially. There were no major complications. The average curve correction was 73%. The instrumentation was kyphogenic, but this did not affect the overall sagittal contour or the clinical results. Back pain was significantly improved, as was cosmesis. The Zielke device was found to be an effective device for the correction of thoracolumbar and lumbar curves in selected adolescents and adults. 

12846305
Phonological neighbourhoods in the developing lexicon. 
Structural analyses of developing lexicons have provided evidence for both children's holistic lexical representations and sensitivity to phonetic segments. In the present investigation, neighbourhood analyses of two children's (age 3;6) expressive lexicons, maternal input, and an adult lexicon were conducted. In addition to raw counts and frequency-weighted counts, neighbourhood size was calculated as the proportion of the lexicon to which each target word is similar, to normalize for vocabulary size differences. These analyses revealed that children's lexicons contain more similar sounding words than previous analyses indicated. Further, neighbourhoods appear denser earlier in development relative to vocabulary size, presumably because children first learn words with more frequent sounds and sound combinations. Neighbourhood density as a proportion of the size of the lexicon then decreases over development as children acquire words with less frequent sounds and sound combinations. These findings suggest that positing fundamentally different lexical representations for children may be premature. 

8430078
Use of photoactivatable peptide substrates of Saccharomyces cerevisiae myristoyl-CoA:protein N-myristoyltransferase (Nmt1p) to characterize a myristoyl-CoA-Nmt1p-peptide ternary complex and to provide evidence for an ordered reaction mechanism. 
Nmt1p (EC 2.3.1.97) catalyzes the transfer of myristate (C14:0) from coenzyme A to the N-terminal glycine residue of a variety of eukaryotic cellular and viral proteins. Our recent studies of the 455-amino acid Saccharomyces cerevisiae acyltransferase (Nmt1p) suggested that its mechanism of catalysis is ordered Bi Bi with myristoyl-CoA binding occurring prior to binding of peptide and release of CoA occurring prior to release of the myristoyl-peptide. The interaction between enzyme and peptide has now been examined in greater detail by using photoactivatable octapeptide substrates containing 125I-labeled azidosalicyclic acid attached via an amide bond to the gamma-amino group of a diaminobutyrate residue located at position 2 or the epsilon-amino group of a lysine residue located at position 8. The photopeptides can be specifically crosslinked to chymotryptic fragments of Nmt1p in the presence but not in the absence of a nonhydrolyzable myristoyl-CoA analog, S-(2-oxo)pentadecyl-CoA. Labeling of the chymotryptic fragments is markedly reduced when GLYASKLS, a high-affinity substrate derived from residues 2-9 of S. cerevisiae ADP-ribosylation factor 2, or ALYASKLS, a competitive inhibitor (for peptide), is added with the iodinated photopeptide. These findings suggest that peptide affinity for the acyl-CoA-Nmt1p binary complex is much greater than it is for apoNmt1p, consistent with the ordered Bi Bi mechanism ascribed to Nmt1p. Finally, automated sequential Edman degradation of these chymotryptic fragments suggests that the peptide binding domain of Nmt1p may be composed of elements from two protease-resistant domains, Arg42-Try219 and Thr220-Leu455. 

12915946
Variables affecting the occurrence of gastroesophageal reflux in obstructive sleep apnea patients. 
A number of recent studies have suggested that apnea and/or hypopnea episodes may be in a causal relationship with nocturnal gastroesophageal reflux (GER) episodes in obstructive sleep apnea (OSA) patients. In this study, we addressed the possible factors that may affect the occurrence of reflux events in OSA patients. For this reason, we investigated respiratory and sleep parameters in OSA patients with or without nocturnal GER episodes. Nineteen patients who were referred to the sleep laboratory for suspected sleep apnea were included in the study. All subjects underwent polysomnographic evaluation simultaneously with distal and proximal esophageal pH monitoring. During the recording period, a total of 134 reflux events, 134 from distal probes and none from proximal probes, were recorded. We divided patients into two groups: (1) nocturnal GER-positive patients ( n=8; age: 41.9+/-11.9) and (2) nocturnal GER-negative patients ( n=11; age: 45.4+/-3.3). We compared demographic, respiratory and sleep parameters between the two groups. Then we analysed the time relation between GER episodes and obstructive respiratory events. The two groups were matched by age and body mass index. Sleep and respiratory parameters were not different between the two groups. In conclusion, we suggested that age, body mass index and the severity of disease in obstructive sleep apnea patients are not effective determinants of gastroesophageal reflux. There is no sufficient evidence to accept arousals and obstructive apneas as primary causes of gastroesophageal reflux and vice versa. And finally, sleep macroorganisation has no impact on the occurrence of GER in OSAS. 

4331962
The regulation of growth hormone secretion from the isolated rat anterior pituitary in vitro. The role of adenosine 3':5'-cyclic monophosphate. 
1. The release of growth hormone from isolated fragments of rat anterior pituitary tissue incubated in vitro was studied by employing a double-antibody radioimmunoassay. 2. In the absence of added stimuli, two phases of hormone release could be distinguished, an early phase of 2h duration and a subsequent late phase. In the early phase, hormone release was rapid but could be significantly decreased by calcium depletion and by 2,4-dinitrophenol whereas the rate of release in the late phase was uninfluenced by these incubation conditions. These results have been interpreted as indicating the existence of a secretory component in the early phase of release. 3. In subsequent experiments, the effects of various agents on the rate of hormone output during the late phase of incubation were investigated. Hormone release was increased by theophylline and by dibutyryl cyclic AMP (N(6)-2'-O-dibutyryl-adenosine 3':5'-cyclic monophosphate), the response to both of these agents being related to the concentration of the stimulant employed. 4. The stimulation of growth hormone output by theophylline was significantly decreased by calcium deprivation and by 2,4-dinitrophenol. The response to dibutyryl cyclic AMP was diminished by 2,4-dinitrophenol, iodoacetate and 2-deoxyglucose but not by malonate or colchicine. 5. Arginine, beta-hydroxybutyrate, albumin-bound palmitate and variation in the glucose concentration of the incubation medium over a wide range were without any statistically significant effect on the rate of hormone release from either control pituitary fragments or those subject to secretory stimulation by dibutyryl cyclic AMP. 6. It is suggested that the regulation of growth hormone secretion is mediated by cyclic AMP (adenosine 3':5'-cyclic monophosphate). The secretion observed in response to cyclic AMP requires the presence of ionized calcium and a source of metabolic energy but is independent of pituitary protein synthesis de novo. The integrity of the glycolytic pathway of glucose metabolism appears to be essential for cyclic AMP-stimulated growth hormone secretion to occur. 

17132644
Predictive performance of 'Servin's formula' during BIS-guided propofol-remifentanil target-controlled infusion in morbidly obese patients. 
BACKGROUND: The aim of this study was to assess the predictive performance of 'Servin's formula' for bispectral index (BIS)-guided propofol-remifentanil target-controlled infusion (TCI) in morbidly obese patients. METHODS: Twenty patients (ASA physical status II-III, age 32-64 yr) undergoing bilio-intestinal bypass surgery, were recruited. Anaesthesia was induced by using a TCI of propofol with an initial target plasma concentration of 6 microg ml(-1), then adapted to maintain stable BIS values ranging between 40 and 50. A TCI of remifentanil was added to achieve pain control and haemodynamic stability. For propofol, weight was corrected as suggested by Servin and colleagues. With ideal body weight (IBW) corrected according to formula suggested by Lemmens and colleagues. For remifentanil, weight was corrected according to IBW. Arterial blood samples for the determination of blood propofol concentrations were collected at different surgical times. The predictive performance of propofol TCI was evaluated by examining performance accuracy. RESULTS: Median prediction error and median absolute prediction error were -32.6% (range -53.4%; -2.5%) and 33.1% (10.8%; 53.4%), respectively. Wobble median value was 5.9% (2.5%; 25.2%) while divergence median value was -1.5% h(-1) (-7.7; 33.8% h(-1)). CONCLUSION: Significant bias between predicted and measured plasma propofol concentrations was found while the low wobble values suggest that propofol TCI system is able to maintain stable drug concentrations over time. As already suggested before, a computer simulation confirmed that the TCI system performance could be significantly improved when total body weight is used. 

1743863
Leukoplakia of the cornea presenting as fingerprint epithelial lines: a case report. 
Opacities in association with fingerprint patterns of the epithelium were seen in the upper half of the right cornea of a 52-year-old patient complaining of decreased vision. Removal of the corneal epithelium from the involved area resulted in visual improvement and normalization of corneal appearance. Histological examination of the removed epithelium failed to reveal the typical intraepithelial formation of basement membrane invaginations even in the areas corresponding to the fingerprint patterns. Moderate to severe degree of atypia were seen in the epithelial cells. No abnormalities were observed in 3 conjunctival specimens excised at the time of epithelial removal. The diagnosis of corneal dysplasia (leukoplakia) was made. Our report is the first description of epithelial fingerprint patterns of the cornea associated with leukoplakia. 

17150022
Ovarian cancer vaccine trials and tribulations. 
Solid tumor vaccine therapy is coming of age. After years of failures, setbacks and negative trials, the first positive trials of antitumor vaccines in humans are being seen. Antitumor vaccine trials have reported an improvement in progression-free survival in breast cancer and an overall survival advantage in prostate cancer. Although, to date no positive Phase III antitumor vaccines trials in ovarian cancer have been reported, recent great strides have been made in improving tumor vaccine target antigens, improving antigen presentation and understanding the mechanisms of immunosuppression associated with tumors. In addition, biological therapies are now being identified that may enhance the efficacy of tumor vaccines. This review summarizes recent trials of ovarian cancer vaccines and addresses future directions to improve vaccine efficacy. 

15317837
Functional properties of electrical synapses between inhibitory interneurons of neocortical layer 4. 
The existence of electrical synapses between GABAergic inhibitory interneurons in neocortex is well established, but their functional properties have not been described in detail. We made whole cell recordings from pairs of electrically coupled fast-spiking (FS) or low threshold-spiking (LTS) neurons, and filled some cells with biocytin for morphological reconstruction. Data were used to create compartmental cable models and to guide mathematical analysis. We analyzed the time course and amplitude of electrical postsynaptic potentials (ePSPs), the subthreshold events generated by presynaptic action potentials, in both FS and LTS neurons. The results imply that the generation of ePSPs is predominantly a linear process in both cell types for presynaptic firing of both single and repetitive spikes. Nonlinearities shape ePSPs near spike threshold, but our data suggest that the underlying synaptic current is still a linear process. Cell-to-cell electrical signaling on longer timescales also appears to be linear. Cable models of electrically coupled FS and LTS neurons imply that the analyzed electrical synapses are, on average, within 50 mum of the soma. Finally, we show that electrical coupling between 2 inhibitory cells promotes synchrony at all spiking frequencies. This contrasts with the effect of reciprocal inhibitory postsynaptic potentials (IPSPs) evoked by the same cells, which promote antisynchronous firing at frequencies less than about 100 Hz. Electrical coupling counteracts the antisynchronous behavior induced by IPSPs and facilitates spiking synchrony. Our results suggest that electrical synapses among inhibitory interneurons are most readily described as low-pass linear filters that promote firing synchrony. 

15363412
The transcription factor FUSCA3 controls developmental timing in Arabidopsis through the hormones gibberellin and abscisic acid. 
Although plants continually produce different organs throughout their life cycle, little is known about the factors that regulate the timing of a given developmental program. Here we report that the restricted expression of FUS3 to the epidermis is sufficient to control foliar organ identity in Arabidopsis by regulating the synthesis of two hormones, abscisic acid and gibberellin. These hormones in turn regulate the rates of cell cycling during organ formation to determine whether an embryonic or adult leaf will emerge. We also show that FUS3 expression is influenced by the patterning hormone, auxin, and therefore acts as a nexus of hormone action during embryogenesis. The identification of lipophillic hormones downstream of a heterochronic regulator in Arabidopsis has parallels to mechanisms of developmental timing in animals and suggests a common logic for temporal control of developmental programs between these two kingdoms. 

1698028
Expression of the alpha/beta and gamma/delta T-cell receptors in 57 cases of peripheral T-cell lymphomas. Identification of a subset of gamma/delta T-cell lymphomas. 
Fifty-seven cases of peripheral T-cell lymphoma were studied for cell expression of the T-cell receptor (TCR) chains, using monoclonal antibodies specific for the beta chain (beta F1) of the alpha/beta TCR, and for the delta chain (anti-TCR delta-1) of the gamma/delta TCR. Three different patterns were demonstrated: in 39 cases (69%), the phenotype (CD3+beta F1+TCR delta-1-) was that of most normal T cells. A second pattern was found on six cases (10%), which were of CD3+beta F1-TCR delta-1+ phenotype, and in which DNA analysis showed a clonal rearrangement of the delta locus in the five cases studied. It is suggested that these cases are the neoplastic counterpart of the small subpopulation of normal T cells that express gamma delta receptor. It is of considerable interest that these gamma delta lymphomas had unusual clinicopathologic presentations, as one case corresponded to a lethal midline granuloma and the five others to hepatosplenic lymphomas with a sinusal/sinusoidal infiltration in spleen, marrow, and liver. The fact that the distribution of the neoplastic gamma delta cells in the splenic red pulp resembles that of normal gamma delta cells reinforces the concept of a preferential homing of gamma delta T cells to this tissue. A third pattern (CD3 +/- beta F1-TCR delta-1-) was seen in 12 cases (21%), in which, by contrast to normal post-thymic T cells, no evidence of either alpha beta or gamma delta T cell receptor was found. 

17919413
[Expression of proteins associated with multidrug resistance and resistance to chemotherapy in lung cancer] 
OBJECTIVE: Membrane transporters are proteins that play a crucial role in resistance to chemotherapy. The aim of this study was to assess the influence of membrane transporter protein expression on chemotherapeutic response. MATERIAL AND METHODS: One hundred and forty seven samples of tumor tissue were collected from 143 patients; 35 samples were obtained by bronchoscopy and 112 were surgical specimens. A total of 101 samples from 99 patients were adequate for study. Cryopreserved samples were subjected to immunohistochemical analysis to detect 3 proteins associated with multidrug resistance: P-glycoprotein (Pgp), multidrug-resistance-associated protein 1 (MRP1), and lung resistance protein (LRP). RESULTS: In 16 cases none of the proteins were expressed. A single protein was expressed in 32 (3 Pgp, 11 MRP1, and 18 LRP); 2 in 34 cases (24 Pgp and LRP; 5 MRP1 and Pgp; 5 MRP1 and LRP); and all 3 in 17 cases. No significant relationship was found between age and the expression of Pgp (P=.74), MRP1 (P=.95), or LRP (P=.26). Nor were there significant differences in number (P=.72) or type of coexpressed proteins (P=.39) by sex, by tumor stage (number, P=.55; type, P=.21), or by tumor grade (number, P=.59; type, P=.51). There was a highly significant trend toward coexpression of Pgp and LRP (P< .01) but not of Pgp and MRP1 (P=.18) or MRP1 and LRP (P=.26). MRP1 was expressed less often in adenocarcinoma. LRP was expressed less often in squamous cell carcinoma than in adenocarcinoma and undifferentiated large cell carcinoma. Coexpression of Pgp, MRP1, and LRP was observed most often in squamous cell carcinoma. CONCLUSIONS: Proteins associated with multidrug resistance are commonly expressed in lung cancer. Of the 3 proteins studied, LRP was the one most often found. Coexpression of more than 1 of the proteins was found in a considerable percentage of patients. Pgp was mainly found to be coexpressed with LRP. Pgp expression and the number of coexpressed proteins seemed to have a negative impact on response to chemotherapy. 

8322810
Hematologic abnormalities in children with Down syndrome. 
We compared the hematologic parameters of 18 otherwise healthy children with Down syndrome (DS) in the age range of 2-6 years to those of 18 healthy non-DS controls matched for age and gender. The children with DS had MCVs and hematocrits increased significantly compared to controls and decreased WBCs compared to controls; 66% of the children with DS compared to 11% of non-DS controls had MCVs greater than the 97th percentile for age (P < 0.0001); the mean MCVs were 86.9 and 80.6, respectively. Although hematocrits were within normal limits for age for all DS and non-DS subjects, the DS patients had significantly higher hematocrits (39.1% vs. 36.9%, P < 0.014). We also found that 33% of the children had WBCs < 5% for age compared to 6% of controls. To determine whether folate deficiency contributed to these observations, we measured serum and RBC folate concentrations: these were not significantly different between the 2 groups. We conclude that macrocytosis and leukopenia are common in children with DS. 

128798
[Major objectives of pathogenic therapy of septicemia] 
On the bases of the published data and their own experience the authors outline the context of the functional biochemical alterations that give an orientation in the choice of the major objectives of pathogenic therapy in the course of septicemias. Analysis of the frequency and intensity of these alterations make it possible to establish therapeutical priorities. In this sense it is demonstrated that hyperazotemia, hyperalbuminemia, low alkaline reserve, elevated serum lactate and a decrease in the plasma Na+/K+ ratio are characteristic of septicemia with a state of toxiinfectious shock. 

15880322
The epidemiology of thin basement membrane nephropathy. 
The prevalence of this basement membrane nephropathy (TBMN) may be approximated from the known frequencies of glomerular hematuria in the population, and from the prevalence of autosomal-recessive Alport syndrome and its known relationship to TBMN. These approaches confirm that TBMN affects more than 1% (but < 10%) of the population, making it the commonest inherited renal disease, and one of the commonest conditions affecting the kidney after infections, hypertension, and stones. TBMN is the most frequent cause of persistent glomerular hematuria. Although we do not advocate mass screening for hematuria to detect TBMN, we strongly support investigating hematuria that is discovered incidentally. Individuals with TBMN and isolated hematuria should be evaluated initially by a nephrologist and subsequently reviewed by their family doctor. Those with proteinuria, hypertension, or renal impairment are at risk for progressive renal impairment and should by examined carefully for features of Alport syndrome or an additional glomerular or tubulointerstitial lesion, undergo a renal biopsy examination, be treated symptomatically, and be monitored by a renal physician. 

8195511
T wave alternans in idiopathic long QT syndrome. 
OBJECTIVES. The study evaluates the association between T wave alternans and the risk of cardiac events (syncope, aborted cardiac arrest or cardiac death) in a large population of patients with idiopathic long QT syndrome. BACKGROUND. T wave alternans is an infrequently recorded electrocardiographic (ECG) finding in patients with delayed repolarization, and its clinical significance is not clear. METHODS. A total of 4,656 ECG recordings in 2,442 patients enrolled in the International Long QT Syndrome Registry were reviewed for episodes of T wave alternans. To determine the risk associated with T wave alternans, independent of corrected QT interval (QTc) duration, patients with T wave alternans were matched for QTc value (every 0.025 s1/2) to patients with long QT syndrome without T wave alternans. RESULTS. T wave alternans was identified in 30 patients (25 of whom had a QTc interval > 0.50 s1/2). A strong association between QTc prolongation and T wave alternans was observed (odds ratio 1.23 per 0.01-s1/2 unit increase in QTc, p < 0.0001). Conditional logistic regression analyses with adjustment for age, gender, status and QTc value revealed that T wave alternans did not make a significant independent contribution to the risk of cardiac events. The risk of experiencing a major cardiac event was primarily related to length of QTc. CONCLUSIONS. T wave alternans, a marker of electrical instability and regional heterogeneity of repolarization, identifies a high risk subset of patients with prolonged repolarization. Patients with T wave alternans have an increased risk of cardiac events, but this risk is primarily related to the magnitude of repolarization delay (QTc prolongation). T wave alternans does not make an independent contribution to the risk of cardiac events after adjustment for QTc length. 

10618506
Methods for quantifying phagocytosis and bacterial killing by human neutrophils. 
This paper reviews a variety of methods available for quantifying phagocytosis and bacterial killing by neutrophils. We outline the advantages and disadvantages of each technique, with the selection of a technique for research or analytical purposes being dependent on the information required and the resources available. A detailed protocol is provided for a comprehensive microbiological technique that measures both phagocytosis and killing in a single assay, along with a kinetic analysis for measuring and calculating separate rate constants for the two events. The kinetic analysis can be easily adapted to other methods to give the same quantitative information. 

6715818
Distal ulnar growth arrest. 
Four cases of arrest of distal ulnar physeal growth occurring in children ages 7 to 13 years had follow-up for 2 to 10 years. Each patient developed bowing of the radial diaphysis, ulnar translation of the distal radial epiphysis, and increased ulnar angulation of the distal radiocarpal joint surface. Growth discrepancies were documented in both the ulna (range 2.2 to 3.9 cm) and to a lesser extent the radius (range 0.2 to 1.6 cm) when compared to the opposite forearm in each patient. The progression of deformity appeared to be greatest during adolescence. Radial deviation and pronation were limited to varying degrees in each case. No patient had significant pain or functional impairment, but the cosmetic appearance was always displeasing. Indications for surgical treatment include increasing ulnar angulation of the distal radial articular surface, progressive loss of motion, and displeasing cosmetic appearance. 

17324477
Transplantation of GABAergic neurons but not astrocytes induces recovery of sensorimotor function in the traumatically injured brain. 
Embryonic stem (ES) cells have been investigated in many animal models of injury and disease. However, few studies have examined the ability of pre-differentiated ES cells to improve functional outcome following traumatic brain injury (TBI). The purpose of the present study was to compare the effect of murine ES cells that were pre-differentiated into GABAergic neurons or astrocytes on functional recovery following TBI. Neural and astrocyte induction was achieved by co-culturing ES cells on a bone marrow stromal fibroblast (M2-10B4) feeder layer and incubating them with various mitogenic factors. Rats were initially prepared with a unilateral controlled cortical contusion injury of the sensorimotor cortex or sham procedure. Rats were transplanted 7 days following injury with approximately 100K GABAergic neurons, astrocytes, fibroblasts, or media. Animals were assessed on a battery of sensorimotor tasks following transplantation. The stromal fibroblast cells (M2-10B4), as a control cell line, did not differ significantly from media infusions. Transplantation of GABAergic neurons facilitated complete and total recovery on the vibrissae-forelimb placing test as opposed to all other groups, which failed to show any recovery. It was also found that GABAergic neurons reduced the magnitude of the initial impairment on the limb use test. Histological analysis revealed infiltration of host brain with transplanted neurons and astrocytes. The results of the present study suggest that transplantation of pre-differentiated GABAergic neurons significantly induces recovery of sensorimotor function; whereas, astrocytes do not. 

1708020
A salt-hypertension hypothesis. 
In urban Australia, the risk of retiring with hypertension is greater than 40%, and the basic abnormality--a rise in blood pressure (BP) with age--is almost universal. A hypothesis linking this with salt, therefore, concerns everyone. The diet of early humans was unsalted, and the Na content of breast milk (6 mmol/kg) shows how little NaCl is needed even during the most rapid period of growth. The hypothesis that the hypertonic concentration needed to preserve food causes the BP to rise with age is based partly on the normotensive status of contemporary "salt-free" societies and partly on experimental evidence. "Salt-free" populations seldom use alcohol and happen to be lean and active, with a low fat intake and largely vegetarian diet, but Westerners with similar virtues do not escape hypertension. Ideally, the prophylactic effect of avoiding salt would be ascertained in large-scale, prospective trials, but practical, ethical and, economic factors impose serious design problems. Nevertheless, a public health intervention based on this hypothesis would be incomplete without a serious attempt to measure the outcome. 

6424360
[Method of isolating and controlling fluorescent Fab fragments of antibodies against horse serum proteins] 
For the first time the lyophilized fluorescent Fab-fragments of rabbit antibodies to horse serum protein, suitable for detecting different antigens and antibodies to these antigens, have been obtained by the specially developed method. The criteria to be used in the control of the antispecific fluorescent fragments of antibodies have been described and the methods of their control before and after lyophilization have been developed. The use of the antispecific fluorescent Fab-fragments of antibodies has been shown to considerably accelerate and simplify the indirect immunofluorescent assay. 

9170045
Evaluation of an ultrasmall superparamagnetic iron oxide in MRI in a bone tumor model in rabbits. 
Ultrasmall superparamagnetic iron oxides (USPIOs) are a class of MRI contrast agents having moderately selective affinity for the reticuloendothelial cells of lymph nodes and bone marrow. This study evaluated a USPIO preparation, Combidex (Code 7227), in MRI of a rabbit bone tumor model. VX2 carcinoma implanted into the tibial marrow of nine subject rabbits was studied. After tumor growth, the subjects underwent MRI of their lesions both before and after intravenous administration of Code 7227. Code 7227 was judged subjectively to conspicuously reduce the signal intensity of normal marrow on some pulse sequences. A hypointense zone outlined the tumor margins on postcontrast imaging, which allowed improved visualization of the soft tissue component of the larger lesions. Accumulation of the contrast agent in a zone of inflammation outside the tumor margin was demonstrated on histologic sections of the lesions. Code 7227 deserves additional study as a potential contrast agent for MRI of bone tumors. 

3861630
Pancreatic metastases in bone sarcomas: CT demonstration. 
Two patients with bone sarcomas were found to have pancreatic masses on routine follow-up CT. Although pancreatic metastasis most often occurs in a setting of widely disseminated disease, it may occur as an isolated finding, most often asymptomatic. It may also be responsible for clinical pancreatitis. Both of these presentations have significant implications for further management. 

15953820
Is hypercholesterolemia a risk factor for Alzheimer's disease? 
There is considerable attention being given to the association of Alzheimer's disease and cholesterol homeostasis. To that end, some have suggested that elevated cholesterol levels are a risk factor for Alzheimer's disease. If elevated cholesterol is a risk factor for Alzheimer's disease, then it would be expected that patients with Alzheimer's disease would have elevated serum and brain cholesterol levels. Studies were reviewed that have examined cholesterol levels in Alzheimer's patients and control subjects, including prospective studies, and based on that review, the conclusion is reached that the majority of studies do not support elevated cholesterol levels in serum and brain as a risk factor for Alzheimer's disease. Alternative hypotheses are discussed, including cholesterol domains and subgroups of individuals with hypercholesteremia. 

6670024
The knee--elbow position in lumbar disc surgery: a review of complications. 
Follow-up studies were carried out in 1962, 1977, and 1981 on 35% or 943 or our 2690 patients operated upon from 1950 through 1981 for lumbar disc herniation. Seven hundred and twenty-four were done with and 1848 without spinal fusion. There were 11.2% operative, 8.3% postoperative and 18.9% late complications. Sepsis occurred in 2 patients (0.2%). Thrombosis decreased from 10% in the 1950s to 4% in the 1960s and to zero in the late 1970s. Reoperations were performed in 10.8% of the fused and in 23.6% of the nonfused patients. There were no serious vascular injuries and no postoperative deaths. Serious complications from lumbar disc surgery with the patient in the knee--elbow position occur rarely and ought to be avoided. Posterior spinal fusion seems to give better protection against recurrence of pain than simple removal of the herniated disc material. 

10515210
An easy and reliable procedure of microdissection technique for the analysis of chromosomal breakpoints and marker chromosomes. 
Microdissection in combination with reverse painting fluorescence in-situ hybridization (FISH) is a very effective method to identify breakpoints and rearrangements of derived chromosomes and reveal the chromosomal origin of marker chromosomes. We describe an influorescence in-situ hybridizationnovation that allows a convenient, fast and safe isolation of microdissected fragments as currently available protocols. The microdissected chromosomes are harvested in a collection drop located in a movable micropipette adjusted to a second micromanipulator under microscopic observation. We used this technique to analyze several cytogenetic aberrations. In order to evaluate the efficiency of our microdissection procedure, we compared the results obtained with microdissection probes made from only one fragment with those obtained with more than six microdissected fragments. In all cases, the single-fragment microdissections were sufficient to provide probes. 

9894049
A developmental and psychoeducational approach to reducing conflict and abuse in little league and youth sports. The sport psychiatrist's role. 
To stress a point made earlier, whether backyard or Little League, the tone of the youth sports experience is greatly influenced by the player and team selection process. All possible steps should therefore be taken to ensure that the draft is held on high moral ground, and that the adult participants, even on the Major Little League level, behave cooperatively rather than competitively. If it is the community's hope that Little League will "build character, and not characters," it must embrace Shields and Bredemeier's work and flood the Draft Room with the four virtues of compassion, fairness, sportspersonship, and integrity. In one attempt to achieve fairness and balance, some leagues enter player evaluations into a data base and allow a properly programmed computer to project equal teams. It might be best, however, to borrow a page from backyard baseball, and make team selection a more cooperative venture. Wolff has proposed such a draft model. He recommends that each child's name be placed on a big blackboard at the beginning of the draft. All assembled give their assessment of each child's baseball ability, and a consensus skill-level number (one through five) is entered next to each player's name. If there are 72 names, and the league wishes to form six teams of 12 players each, dividing up the rated players so that the skill levels balance would assure everyone (coaches, parents, the league, and by extension, the community) that the teams were of relatively equal strength. No coach at this point would know to which team he or she was being assigned, so there would be no motive for "stacking" a given team. Each team would be designated by a letter of the alphabet, and the six letters would be thrown into a hat. The six coaches would then blindly pick a team from the hat. If a coach desired that his or her child play on his or her team, fair adjustments (trades) could be made subject to majority agreement. The three draft models can be summarized as follows: Draft Model 1 Public tryouts Previous year rating Coach makes selections Can be very competitive, lacking in "character" Can result in very unequal teams Draft Model 2 Player evaluations placed into a data base Properly programmed computer projects equal teams Draft Model 3 All names placed on a blackboard Relative merits of players discussed Equal team drawn up and placed into a hat Adjustments can be made for coach's child If practical, this author suggests that coaches not pick a name for the team until the first team meeting or practice, when that task can be given to the children. In a symbolic way, this returns some of the sport to them while encouraging social interaction among new teammates, and helping the coach detect who the leaders are. Names of professional teams in the major sports, especially baseball, are to be avoided, as they fuel longstanding unconscious associations and fantasies, and may subtly tilt all participants toward the professional "win at all costs" mentality. No one draft model is perfect for every town, and even the most ethical attempt to achieve balance among teams can be severely tested by parents who request that their athlete be placed on the same team as another child for social or car pool reasons. Such requests are not inviolate, however. For example, they do not usually dictate placement in school classes, and car pools are frequently disrupted when children, in individual sports such as Tae Kwan Do, reach different ability levels, and so attend practices at different times. Baseball is no longer the national pasttime and, as we approach the millennium, American children have too many other attractive, competing interests and time demands to spontaneously organize a pick-up game. One coach shared with the author that his saddest moment in CAP League came when he arrived at 6 PM at a field that had been "reserved" for his team, and found a group of boys who were playing a pick-up game. The coach's impulse was to set his boys fre 

17395177
Effect of dimethyl sulphoxide on oxidative stress, activation of mitogen activated protein kinase and necrosis caused by thioacetamide in the rat liver. 
Thioacetamide (400 mg/kg body weight, i.p.) was administered to rats. After 12 h the activity of plasma glutamate-oxaloacetate transaminase (GOT) and glutamate-pyruvate transaminase (GPT) was significantly higher than that of the control group, and after 24 h plasma GOT and GPT activities strongly increased. These results indicated that the necrotic process was initiated at about 12 h and developed thereafter. By co-administration of dimethyl sulphoxide (DMSO, 18 and 1 h before, and 8 h after administration of thioacetamide: each time, 2.5 ml/kg body weight, p.o.), plasma GOT and GPT were significantly decreased and were even comparable to the control group, showing that DMSO totally prevented the necrotic action of thioacetamide. After 12 and 24 h of thioacetamide administration, the hepatic level of vitamin C, the most sensitive chemical indicator of oxidative stress, decreased significantly, indicating that oxidative stress was significantly enhanced 12 h after thioacetamide intoxication and thereafter. DMSO totally restored the liver vitamin C level, demonstrating that DMSO effectively ameliorated the oxidative stress caused by thioacetamide, resulting in the prevention of necrosis of the liver. Phosphorylated c-Jun NH(2)-terminal kinase (JNK) significantly increased transiently 12 h after treatment with thioacetamide. These results indicated that oxidative stress and the activation of JNK took place almost simultaneously. Phosphorylated extracellular signal-related kinase (ERK) 2 was significantly increased 6-12 h after thioacetamide injection. Phosphorylated p38 MAPK (mitogen activated protein kinase) was significantly decreased 24 h after administration of thioacetamide. DMSO treatment inhibited the change of these MAPKs by thioacetamide, corresponding with the prevention of the liver necrosis as well as the attenuation of oxidative stress. 

11448536
The p53 codon 249 mutant--derived from human functional adrenal tumors--can modify the cell shape of normal adrenocortical transfected cells. 
Our previous study has indicated that p53 gene mutation occurred in 73% of human functional adrenal tumors, and the mutation hot spots were focused on codons 100, 102 (exon 4), and 249 (exon 7). Furthermore, a transcriptional activity study revealed that the mutant p53 protein derived from human functional adrenal tumors lost 90% transcriptional activity and the ability to bind with the p53 sequence. In order to investigate the influence of the mutant protein extracted from adrenocortical tumors on normal adrenal cells, we first cloned p53 cDNA from the human primary aldosteronism and constituted it with isopropyl thiogalactoside (IPTG) inducible expression vector as recombinant plasmid. The recombinant plasmid was then transfected to normal bovine adrenocortical cells through electroporation. The results showed that the p53 protein mutations at codons 100 and 102 could neither affect the cell morphology nor enable cell growth on the soft agar. In addition, no significant difference was found in cortisol level between the p53 transfected and the control cells. On the other hand, cell morphological changes and cell proliferation rate increase were observed when we used IPTG to induce the expression of the p53 protein, which mutated at codon 249, in adrenocortical cells. The cell morphology changes included less flattened and decreased elongation when compared to non-transfected cells. However, the cortisol level in transfected cells was not affected by the p53 mutants. Taken together, we concluded that the mutant p53 protein indeed participates in adrenal carcinogenesis; however, it has no influence on hormone production and secretion. 

9134212
Tachykinin receptors in the guinea-pig isolated oesophagus: a complex system. 
1. The tachykinin receptors mediating contraction of isolated longitudinal strips of the guinea-pig oesophageal body were characterized with substance P (SP), neurokinin A (NKA) and neurokinin B (NKB) as well as the analogues, [Sar9,Met(O2)11]SP, [Nle10]NKA(4-10) and [MePhe7]NKB, selective for NK1, NK2 and NK3, receptors, respectively. Experiments were performed both in the absence and presence of a cocktail of peptidase inhibitors, captopril (1 microM), thiorphan (1 microM) and amastatin (20 microM), in order to determine whether membrane bound proteases are important in the metabolism of tachykinins in this preparation. 2. All agonists produced concentration-dependent contractile effects. The presence of the peptidase inhibitors shifted the concentration-response curves of SP, [Nle10]NKA(4-10) and [MePhe7]NKB significantly leftwards and the concentration-response curve of NKB was shifted significantly rightwards. However, the EC50 values were significantly different only for [Nle10]NKA(4-10) and NKB. 3. In the presence of the peptidase inhibitors, the EC50 values of the selective agonists, [MePhe7]NKB (0.6 nM) and [Nle10]NKA(4-10) (66 nM) indicated the presence of both tachykinin NK3 and NK2 receptors. [MePhe7]NKB produced less than 50% of the maximal response obtained with the other agonists. Since [Sar9,Met(O2)11]SP produced a small response in the nanomolar concentration range in about 30% of the preparations tested, it is possible that some NK1 receptors were also present. 4. Assuming competitive antagonism, the NK2-selective antagonist SR 48,968 (30 nM) gave apparent pKH values of 8.13 and 8.65 for [Nle10]NKA(4-10) in the absence and presence of peptidase inhibitors, respectively, supporting the presence of NK2 receptors. 5. The NK3-selective antagonist SR 142,801 (0.1 microM), suppressed responses to low (0.1-10 nM) concentrations of [MePhe7]NKB. These contractile responses to [MePhe7]NKB were also abolished by atropine (0.6 microM) suggesting that this response was mediated via cholinergic nerves. 6. It is concluded that the guinea-pig oesophagus is a complex system which has both NK2 and NK3 receptors and possibly some NK1 receptors as-well. 

9071362
Affiliative processes and vocal development. 
Affiliative behavior is often expressed through communication, and the nature of affiliative interactions affects the ontogeny of communication. I presented three phenomena that demonstrate the importance of affiliation in vocal development in marmosets and tamarins, but the results have parallels in many other species including birds, dolphins, and humans. Pygmy marmosets use trill-like vocalizations to maintain contact with other group members. Individuals change subtle aspects of call structure when they encounter new social groups or acquire a new mate. This process of vocal accommodation is common in many other species. Infant pygmy marmosets go through a stage of "babbling." producing long sequences of vocalizations that have several similarities to the babbling of human infants. Babbling infants receive more social attention than nonbabbling infants, and these social interactions may shape vocalizations towards more adult forms. In adult cotton-top tamarins, food-associated vocalizations communicate the presence and quality of food. However, reproductively inhibited juveniles and subadults use many other types of calls in feeding situations and display a high proportion of imperfect forms of adult food-associated calls. When subadult monkeys are paired with new mates and change their reproductive status, they rapidly (within 3-6 weeks) display both adult structure and adult usage of food-associated calls, suggesting that affiliative processes can both facilitate and inhibit vocal ontogeny. Three mechanisms of how social interactions affect communication (multimodal stimulation, attentional focus, and reinforcement) were proposed and illustrated through examples of parrots learning English labels for objects and attributes and infant cotton-top tamarins acquiring food-associated vocalizations. 

6896258
Phase II evaluation of 4'-(9-acridinylamino)-methanesulfon-m--anisidine (AMSA) in patients with advanced head and neck cancers. 
4-(9-Acridinylamino) methanesulfon-m-anisidine (AMSA) was evaluated in 26 patients with advanced head and neck cancer in a phase II study. All patients were previously treated with one or combinations of the three modalities, namely, surgery, radiation treatment, or chemotherapy. Among the 23 evaluable patients, 2 achieved a partial response, 4 a minimal response, 9 with stable disease, and 8 with disease progression. Side effects were mainly granulocytopenia with mild GI symptoms. AMSA may have activity in recurrent squamous cell cancers of the head and neck and further evaluation in previously untreated patients or combination of AMSA with other chemotherapeutic agents should be considered. 

2360884
Upbeat nystagmus influenced by posture: report of two cases. 
Two cases of vertical gaze nystagmus, which were influenced by posture are reported. In both cases, upbeat nystagmus (UBN) on forward gaze in upright and supine positions changed to downbeat nystagmus (DBN) in prone position. Convergence had no influence on the vertical nystagmus. A CT scan revealed an atrophy of the anterior vermis of the cerebellum in the first case. The UBN of the second case was suspected to be associated with lesions in the brachium conjunctivum. The authors concluded that both UBN and DBN were not completely separate, but they could coexist in cases with certain lesions in the posterior cranial fossa. 

17905041
Independent associations of alexithymia and social support with depression in hemodialysis patients. 
OBJECTIVE: The influences of alexithymia and social support on depression among chronically ill patients were examined prospectively. METHODS: The study population was 230 outpatients receiving chronic hemodialysis (HD) therapy. The Beck Depression Inventory-II (BDI-II), the 20-item Toronto Alexithymia Scale (TAS-20), and two subscales of the Social Support Questionnaire were given to the subjects. The BDI-II was readministered after a 6-month interval, and subjects who showed deterioration in their depression score above the level predicted from their baseline score were identified. Multivariate logistic analysis adjusted for age, gender, cause of dialysis, and psychosocial variables were performed. RESULTS: Baseline depression was significantly and independently associated with alexithymia and low satisfaction with available support. Deterioration of depression after 6 months was predicted by alexithymia and poor available support. CONCLUSIONS: Alexithymia and reduced social support might have independent associations with the presence and the prognosis of depression among HD patients. 

3598288
[Studies on dynamic posture in normal persons and scoliotic patients] 
Dynamic posture of 127 normal males, 144 normal females and 68 scoliotic patients was studied by a system utilizing Moire topography, a video recorder and Apple II microcomputer system. The normal group was divided into five subgroups by age and the scoliotic group into three subgroups according to the Cobb angle. The following results were obtained: The clockwise rotation during on-the-spot marching was larger in early juvenile females. The rotation movement during on-the-spot marching was almost symmetrical in normal individuals older than seven years of age. In scoliotic patients, the trunk movement during on-the-spot marching was asymmetric. The angle of rotation during on-the-spot marching was significantly larger in scoliotic patients than in normal adolescent females. A propensity was found that the greater the scoliosis curve was the less was the rotation angle of the trunk during on-the-spot marching. 

3208049
Obstructive pancreatitis: unusual causes of chronic pancreatitis. 
Fifty-eight consecutive surgical pancreatic resections for chronic pancreatitis were examined. Eight cases were identified with obstructive pancreatopathy; all underwent pancreato-duodenectomy. Histological examination revealed that obstruction in three cases was due to duodenal wall cysts, and in two patients it was associated with pancreas divisum (the accessory papilla was obstructed by a neuroendocrine tumour in one case and by ectopic pancreatic tissue in the other). One case each was due to obstruction of an anomalous duct by vegetable matter, to segmental pancreatitis, and to an intraductal carcinoma. Obstructive pancreatitis has many causes and diligent pre-operative assessment is required as surgical resection may be beneficial. Special efforts should be made to identify ductal anomalies, duodenal cysts, ectopic pancreatic tissue, and small ampullary tumours of exocrine and endocrine origin in order to define the aetiology of pancreatitis. 

2382262
Ultrastructural characterization of enterochromaffin-type cells in human gastric carcinoma. 
Ultrastructural characterization has been performed on eosinophilic granular cells occurring in gastric carcinomas. Of these, the present paper dealt with enterochromaffin (EC)-type cells. EC-type cells were identified by the presence of eosinophilic granules, immunoreactivity for serotonin (5 HT) and argentaffinity. Conventional electron microscopy revealed that they bore membrane bound, electron-dense granules of varying size (100-800 nm in shorter diameter), which were larger than those of normal EC cells. Their shapes are round, rod-shaped and concave. The granules are immunolabeled for 5HT by both pre- and post-embedding methods. The preembedding method also disclosed diffuse cytosolic immunoreactivity. Both differentiated-type and undifferentiated-type gastric carcinomas showed essentially the same results. General trends of occurrence of Paneth-like and EC-type cells in gastric carcinomas were also discussed. The present study confirmed that EC-type cells in gastric carcinoma retained basic characteristics of EC cells despite of morphological deviation from the normal cells. It is speculated that they are derived from neoplastic precursor cells with a special differentiation. 

16273269
The proteasome inhibitor MG132 induces apoptosis in human pancreatic cancer cells. 
The ubiquitin-proteasome system plays a critical role in the regulation of programmed cell death. Proteasome inhibitors induce apoptosis in various cancer cells and have antitumor effects in murine tumor models. In the present study, we investigated whether the cell-permeable proteasome inhibitor MG132 (carbobenzoxyl-L-leucyl-L-leucyl-L-leucinal) reduced the growth of a human pancreatic cancer cell line through induction of apoptosis in vitro. The effects of MG132 (0.125-1.000 microM) on the growth of the human pancreatic cancer cell line BxPC-3 were analyzed by cell count and MTT assay. Apoptosis was determined by FACS analysis after annexin V and propidium iodide staining and the enrichment of intracellular nucleosomes. The proteasome inhibitor MG132 decreased cell growth of the human pancreatic cancer cell line BxPC-3 in a dose- and time-dependent manner. This effect was at least in part mediated by the induction of apoptosis. A combination therapy with standard cytotoxic agents and proteasome inhibitors could potentially be a novel therapeutic strategy in treatment of pancreatic cancer. 

6231105
An alternative pathway of T-cell activation: a functional role for the 50 kd T11 sheep erythrocyte receptor protein. 
A series of seven monoclonal antibodies was produced against the T-lineage-specific 50 kd T11 sheep erythrocyte rosette (SRBC) receptor protein in order to define the function of the molecule. Three distinct epitopes were detected: T11(1), the SRBC binding site expressed on all T lymphocytes and thymocytes; T11(2), an epitope unrelated to the SRBC binding site but with a similar distribution; and T11(3), a neo-epitope expressed only upon T-cell activation. Simultaneous triggering of T11(2) and T11(3) epitopes by monoclonal antibodies induces T lymphocytes to proliferate and mediate their functional programs in the absence of antigen and/or antigen-presenting cells. This antigen-independent mode of triggering is distinct from that involving the T3-Ti antigen receptor complex and represents an alternate pathway of T-cell activation. Given that T11 is the earliest T-lineage surface glycoprotein to appear in thymic ontogeny and is thus expressed before T3-Ti, the former may be involved in clonal expansion and/or differentiation during early development. 

1355917
Central and peripheral effects of repeated stress and high NaCl diet on neuropeptide Y. 
This study was performed to investigate the influence of repeated psychological stress alone or combined with high NaCl intake on the function of the sympathetic nervous system. In addition, NPY levels have been measured in brain regions of potential importance in the central regulation of stress responses (ventrolateral and dorsomedial medulla, paraventricular and arcuate nucleus of the hypothalamus, and frontal cortex). Normotensive Wistar rats received a standard diet alone or supplemented with NaCl. To accentuate differences in sodium balance, rats on the high NaCl diet (HNa) were uninephrectomized. Half the animals on each diet were subjected to chronic stress using daily sessions (1 h) of immobilization stress. After 12 days, plasma levels of neuropeptide Y (NPY), norepinephrine (NE), and epinephrine (E) were measured basally and in response to acute footshock stress. HNa intake or chronic stress alone did not significantly alter either basal or stimulated plasma levels of NPY. However, combining the treatments produced a significant interaction, increasing the NPY response to footshock by 31% compared to HNa alone (p = 0.039) and by 98% compared to stress alone (p less than 0.001). Chronic stress increased basal levels of NE and enhanced the response to subsequent acute stress: combining the treatments did not yield further increases. Plasma levels of E were not significantly affected by the treatments. In the brain, stress alone had no effect on the NPY levels in the structures studied. HNa intake induced a significant increase in NPY levels of the arcuate nucleus, and produced a significant interaction with stress in the dorsomedial medulla. In a supplementary experiment, to evaluate the role of the autonomic nervous system in plasma NPY responses, treatment with the ganglion blocker hexamethonium was shown to significantly attenuate stress-induced changes in NPY, NE, and E. 

17930628
Scaling analysis of domain-wall free energy in the Edwards-Anderson Ising spin glass in a magnetic field. 
The stability of the spin-glass phase against a magnetic field is studied in the three- and four-dimensional Edwards-Anderson Ising spin glasses. Effective couplings J(eff) and effective fields H(eff) associated with length scale L are measured by a numerical domain-wall renormalization-group method. The results obtained by scaling analysis of the data strongly indicate the existence of a crossover length beyond which the spin-glass order is destroyed by field H. The crossover length well obeys a power law of H which diverges as H --> 0 but remains finite for any nonzero H, implying that the spin-glass phase is absent even in an infinitesimal field. These results are well consistent with the droplet theory for short-range spin glasses. 

12909058
Electrokinetic flow in a capillary with a charge-regulating surface polymer layer. 
An analytical study of the steady electrokinetic flow in a long uniform capillary tube or slit is presented. The inside wall of the capillary is covered by a layer of adsorbed or covalently bound charge-regulating polymer in equilibrium with the ambient electrolyte solution. In this solvent-permeable and ion-penetrable surface polyelectrolyte layer, ionogenic functional groups and frictional segments are assumed to distribute at uniform densities. The electrical potential and space charge density distributions in the cross section of the capillary are obtained by solving the linearized Poisson-Boltzmann equation. The fluid velocity profile due to the application of an electric field and a pressure gradient through the capillary is obtained from the analytical solution of a modified Navier-Stokes/Brinkman equation. Explicit formulas for the electroosmotic velocity, the average fluid velocity and electric current density on the cross section, and the streaming potential in the capillary are also derived. The results demonstrate that the direction of the electroosmotic flow and the magnitudes of the fluid velocity and electric current density are dominated by the fixed charge density inside the surface polymer layer, which is determined by the regulation characteristics such as the dissociation equilibrium constants of the ionogenic functional groups in the surface layer and the concentration of the potential-determining ions in the bulk solution. 

11076072
Rapid determination of nitrite by reversed-phase high-performance liquid chromatography with fluorescence detection. 
Measurement of nitrite and nitrate, the stable oxidation products of nitric oxide (NO), provides a useful tool to study NO synthesis in vivo and in cell cultures. A simple and rapid fluorometric HPLC method was developed for determination of nitrite through its derivatization with 2,3-diaminonaphthalene (DAN). Nitrite, in standard solution, cell culture medium, or biological samples, readily reacted with DAN under acidic conditions to yield the highly fluorescent 2,3-naphthotriazole (NAT). For analysis of nitrate, it was converted to nitrite by nitrate reductase, followed by the derivatization of nitrite with DAN to form NAT. NAT was separated on a 5-microm reversed-phase C18 column (150X4.6 mm, I.D.) guarded by a 40-microm reversed-phase C18 column (50x4.6 mm, I.D.), and eluted with 15 mM sodium phosphate buffer (pH 7.5) containing 50% methanol (flow-rate, 1.3 ml/min). Fluorescence was monitored with excitation at 375 nm and emission at 415 nm. Mean retention time for NAT was 4.4 min. The fluorescence intensity of NAT was linear with nitrite or nitrate concentrations ranging from 12.5 to 2,000 nM in water, cell culture media, plasma and urine. The detection limit for nitrite and nitrate was 10 pmol/ml. Because NAT is well separated from DAN and other fluorescent components present in biological samples, our HPLC method offers the advantages of high sensitivity and specificity as well as easy automation for quantifying picomole levels of nitrite and nitrate in cell culture medium and biological samples. 

6779716
Changes in the serine-specific transfer ribonucleic acid pattern of guinea pig epidermis after corticosteroid treatment. 
The pattern of serine-specific tRNAs from guinea pig epidermis was determined and compared to that from liver by employing reversed phase chromatography on total tRNA preparations aminoacylated with 3H- or 14C-serine. Five tRNAserS (I-V) were found, two of which, tRNAserI and tRNAserV, appear to be "typical" for epidermis and in so far probably reflect in some way metabolic peculiarities of epidermal cell differentiation. This hypothesis was further corroborated by showing that the locally applied corticosteroid triamcinolon selectively increases tRNAserI and tRNAserV 2-3-fold. The implications of these findings were discussed in detail. 

3077661
Chronic illness behavior and noncompliance with treatment: pathways to an interactional approach. 
The increasing cost of medical overconsumption is partially due to the physicians' neglect in everyday clinical practice of the intrinsic gratification of the sick role in our society. Many health care providers do not seem to realize that their intervention as experts in the patient's personal life inevitably implies they are becoming part of the ongoing learning history of that individual. Chronic somatic complaining and partial or complete refusal to follow therapeutic advice have to be viewed, first and foremost, as a symptom of a dysfunctional interaction between the patient and his/her immediate environment of which the clinician became a significant member. Management of chronic illness behavior and non-compliance with treatment requires both a functional analysis and a strategy inspired by an interactional perspective on the attitudes and behaviors of at least three parties involved in health care: doctor, patient, and family. 

9633602
A conserved tryptophan at the ferredoxin-binding site of ferredoxin:nitrite oxidoreductase. 
Treatment of spinach leaf ferredoxin-dependent nitrite reductase with N-bromosuccinimide (NBS), under conditions where slightly less than 1 mol of tryptophan is modified per mole of nitrite reductase, inhibits the catalytic activity of the enzyme by ca. 80% without any effect on substrate binding or other enzyme properties. Complex formation between nitrite reductase and ferredoxin completely protects the enzyme against this inhibition. Transient kinetic measurements show that the second-order rate constant for reduction of NBS-modified nitrite reductase by reduced ferredoxin is approximately four-fold larger than that observed for the native, unmodified enzyme. Also, reduction of NBS-modified nitrite reductase by the 5-deazariboflavin radical shows a different kinetic pattern than that observed with the native enzyme, suggesting that tryptophan modification increases access of the radical to the low-potential [4Fe-4S] cluster of the enzyme, decreases the accessibility to the siroheme group of the enzyme, or both. The tryptophan that is modified has been identified as the absolutely conserved W92. A methionine, M73, that is also modified by NBS, has been identified. The ferredoxin-binding site on spinach nitrite reductase thus appears to include W92 and perhaps M73, in addition to the previously identified R375, R556, and K436. 

9590144
High-dose cytarabine-containing chemotherapy with or without granulocyte colony-stimulating factor for children with acute leukemia. 
We sought to determine the role of granulocyte colony-stimulating factor (G-CSF) as an adjunct therapy in high-dose cytarabine-containing chemotherapy (HD C/T) for children with acute leukemia. Seventeen patients, aged 9 months to 18 years old, 8 ALL and 9 AML, were treated with cytarabine (Ara-C) 1 g/m2 q12h for 8 doses with mitoxantrone, idarubicin, VP-16, or asparaginase. A total of 71 courses of HD C/T was given. G-CSF was not used in 14 courses (Group A). Prophylactic G-CSF was given in 57 courses (Group B) as 200 microg/m2/d SC started one day after the completion of HD C/T and continued until the neutrophil recovery was maintained. The incidences of sepsis per course in Group A and Group B were 35.7% (5/14) and 40.4% (23/57), respectively. While 2 patients in Group A died of sepsis or pneumonia, none in Group B died. The mortality and delay in chemotherapy were fewer in Group B (P = 0.037 and 0.0006, respectively, Fisher exact test). There was a shorter average number of days of neutrophil <500/cumm, antibiotic usage, fever, and hospital stay in Group B (11, 8, 5, 17 days in Group B vs. 21, 17, 10, 37 days in Group A; P = 0.0001, log-rank test; 0.0006, 0.0023, 0.0001, Wilcoxon rank sum test, respectively). The incidence of neutropenic fever was lower in Group B, but the difference did not reach statistical significance (P = 0.06, Fisher exact test). We conclude that G-CSF as an adjunct therapy in HD C/T is effective in reducing mortality, days of neutropenia, antibiotic usage, fever, hospital stay, and frequency of delay in chemotherapy. The efficacy of this treatment approach requires further testing in a randomized, controlled trial. 

898441
[Experiences with lavage cytology from renal pelvis and ureter (author's transl)] 
In 41 cases of roentgenologic filling defects in renal pelvis and ureter, which could not be determined exactly preoperatively, we could confirm the diagnostic value of cytology from washings of renal pelvis and ureter (lavage cytology), especially in preoperative diagnosis of carcinoma of renal pelvis and ureter. Ten of fourteen tumors (71%) were detected by this method. The diagnostic reliability increased with tumor-stage and was more accurate than the normal exfoliative urinary cytology. In five cases of hypernephromas invading the renal pelvis lavage cytology was not successful and we had obtained only false negative results. In roentgenologic filling defects that were not tumor-induced especially uric acid stones, inflammatory processes, blood clots and renal cysts, we had no false positive results. Our findings are discussed together with the literature. 

488598
[A rare case of Friedreich's atoxia with cardiac involvement: the torsade de pointe (author's transl)] 
The Authors describe a case of Friedreich's ataxia complicated by an unusual arrhythmia, torsade de pointes, the only manifestation of cardiac involvment in this patient. Then some hypothesis of etiopathogenetic mechanism of this rhythm disturbance in patients affected with Friedreich's ataxia are proposed. 

3060534
AIDS-associated lymphomas. 
Patients with HIV infection, like immunosuppressed transplant recipients, are at high risk for the development of non-Hodgkin's lymphoma. These are high-grade lymphomas of B cell origin. Most patients present with advanced extralymphatic disease, and primary lymphoma of the central nervous system has frequently been reported. The cause of the non-Hodgkin's lymphomas in the setting of HIV infection remains unclear. In contrast to those lymphomas observed in transplant recipients, Epstein-Barr virus DNA sequences have been identified in a minority of AIDS-associated lymphomas. Response to therapy in these patients has been disappointing. Response rates to chemotherapy have been lower than those observed in other lymphoma patients, and treatment has been complicated by lack of adequate bone marrow reserve and the occurrence of frequent opportunistic infections. Survivals have been short. Good performance status and absence of a prior AIDS diagnosis are important predictors of response and survival. Although Hodgkin's disease has been observed in HIV-infected patients, epidemiologic data are not suggestive of a direct causal relationship. Hodgkin's disease in this setting is characterized by poor prognosis histologic pattern, advanced disease, and median survivals of less than 1 year. 

11428068
[Geriatric assessment. The status of current knowledge with reference to suitability criteria (discrimination, prediction, evaluation, practical aspects)] 
Comprehensive geriatric assessment was developed in the Anglo-American countries as a diagnostic process to better understand the effects of diseases and interactions of multiple chronic conditions. To standardize the use of assessment instruments, a working group of the two German geriatric societies has elaborated recommendations. As the first step, an expanded version of the screening according to Lachs should be used, followed by performing the Barthel-ADL, the Mini-Mental State Examination, the Geriatric Depression Scale, the 'Timed Up and Go' and the (Semi-) Tandem Stance. The expanded version of the screening of Lachs is helpful for targeting patients and for placement; the others are not useful for that purpose. No instrument satisfactorily fulfills all test criteria, which include validity, reliability, sensitivity, practicability and repeatability, and, in part, these dimensions are not investigated at all. All test instruments are diagnostic tools for functional status and capabilities but do not give information about resource needs. No instrument covers the new concept of ICIDH completely. 

11598120
Multiple activation loop conformations and their regulatory properties in the insulin receptor's kinase domain. 
Low catalytic efficiency of protein kinases often results from intrasteric inhibition caused by the activation loop blocking the active site. In the insulin receptor's kinase domain, Asp-1161 and Tyr-1162 in the peptide substrate-like sequence of the unphosphorylated activation loop can interact with four invariant residues in the active site: Lys-1085, Asp-1132, Arg-1136, and Gln-1208. Contributions of these six residues to intrasteric inhibition were tested by mutagenesis, and the unphosphorylated kinase domains were characterized. The mutations Q1208S, K1085N, and Y1162F each relieved intrasteric inhibition, increasing catalytic efficiency but without changing the rate-limiting step of the reaction. The mutants R1136Q and D1132N were virtually inactive. Steric accessibility of the active site was ranked by relative changes in iodide quenching of intrinsic fluorescence, and A-loop conformation was ranked by limited tryptic cleavage. Together these ranked the openness of the active site cleft as R1136Q approximately D1132N > or = D1161A > Y1162F approximately K1085N > Q1208S > or = wild-type. These findings demonstrate the importance of specific invariant residues for intrasteric inhibition and show that diverse activation loop conformations can produce similar steady-state kinetic properties. This suggests a broader range of regulatory properties for the activation loop than expected from a simple off-versus-on switch for kinase activation. 

10214910
DNA damage excision repair in microplate wells with chemiluminescence detection: development and perspectives. 
The development of in vitro repair assays with human cell-free extracts led to new insights on the mechanism of excision of DNA damage which consists of incision/excision and repair synthesis/ligation. We have adapted the repair synthesis reaction with cells extracts incubated with damaged plasmid DNA performed in liquid phase to solid phase by DNA adsorption into microplate wells. Since cells extracts are repair competent in base excision and nucleotide excision repair, all types of substrate DNA lesions were detected with chemiluminescence measurement after incorporation of biotin-deoxynucleotide during the repair synthesis step. Derivatives of our initial 3D-assay (DNA damage detection) have been set up to: i) screen antioxidative compounds and NER inhibitors; ii) capture genomic DNA (3D(Cell)-assay) that allows detection of alkylated base and consequently determines the kinetics of the cellular repair; and iii) immunodetect the repair proteins in an ELISA reaction (3D(Rec)-assay). The 3D derived assays are presented and discussed. 

15872278
Interrelationship between polymorphisms of incA, fusogenic properties of Chlamydia trachomatis strains, and clinical manifestations in patients in The Netherlands. 
IncA variation among Dutch Chlamydia trachomatis isolates was investigated. Of 98 strains, two carried an incA with a premature stop codon, lacked IncA, and were nonfusogenic, while 96 contained an intact incA, expressed IncA, and were fusogenic. Among these 96 strains, nine IncA sequence types were found, of which the three most frequently encountered (88% of the strains) were randomly distributed among symptomatic and asymptomatic patients. 

12123080
The formation of a cyclic diacetal of methyl alpha-D-mannopyranoside with a 16-membered macrocyclic loop. 
The X-ray structure of a diacetal with a 16-membered macrocyclic loop, which was obtained as a product of the condensation of methyl alpha-D-mannopyranoside and 1,4-bis(2-formylphenoxy)butane is presented together with polymeric compounds resulting from polycondensation; a similar polymer was formed in the reaction of methyl 2,3:4,6-di-O-salicylidene-alpha-D-mannopyranoside with 1,4-dibromobutane. 

3294996
[Early detection of ureteral injuries associated with hysterectomy. A prospective echographic study] 
Among ureteral injuries that occur during hysterectomy some are neglected and remain asymptomatic. They occur even, although not particularly, during so-called easy operations. Their severity and their need for early treatment point to the use of effective screening. It is not possible to carry out intravenous urography routinely. Searching, however, for pyelo-calyceal dilatation by ultrasound of the kidneys can show ureterohydronephrosis and can detect ureteral trauma. The authors carried out such ultrasound controls in 150 consecutive patients the day before, and the fourth and ninth days after hysterectomy. On the fourth day pyelo-calyceal dilatation is seen more frequently but is not large. Large dilatation appearing on the fourth postoperative day may be considered an early and reliable sign of suspect injury. The authors suggest that renal ultrasound should be carried out routinely on the day before and the fourth day after hysterectomy. The authors feel that when dilatation of the pyelo-calyceal area increases by 12 mm or more between the two examinations major ureteral injury must be suspected and urography carried out intravenously. 

1604271
Chelated lead and bone lead. 
In this study a close correlation [correlation coefficient (r) = 0.86, P less than 0.001] was found between the blood lead level of 20 lead workers and their urinary excretion of lead for 24 h after intravenous infusion with 1 g of the chelating agent calcium disodium edetate. In addition, there were significant associations between lead levels in different bones (tibia/calcaneus: r = 0.93, P less than 0.001; tibia/phalanx: r = 0.67, P less than 0.002; calcaneus/phalanx: r = 0.80, P less than 0.001), as measured by in vivo X-ray fluorescence. Chelation produced no significant change in the lead level in either tibia or calcaneus. There was a significant correlation between chelated lead and bone lead (eg, for calcaneus, r = 0.62) in currently exposed workers. However, there was no significant relationship when a retired worker and an inactive worker were included (r = 0.14). It was concluded that chelatable lead mainly reflects the blood and soft-tissue lead pool, which is only partly dependent upon the skeletal lead content that comprises the biggest share of the total body burden. 

6858490
[Pathomorphosis of progressive paralysis] 
The author analyses 34 cases of general paresis. All the cases had been verified by laboratory findings. Some peculiarities of the disease manifestation in present-day conditions were discovered. A prolongation of the life-span and the disease incubation period in treated patients, as well as an increase of the disease incidence among women and a rarity of the formerly "classical" expansive form of the disease are noted. Data on the time course of CSF findings are presented. 

16405189
[Towards the general theory of immunity] 
The molecular studies of plant immunity resulted in revealing general pattern in the mechanisms of innate resistance of plants, invertebrates and vertebrates. These studies removed an ambiguity in the estimate of the role of different immunomodulators (supressors, specific and non-specific elicitors) of plant parasites, and allowed approaching the general theory of immunity. Such theory could be based on guard model of Biezen and Jones (1999), according to which the specific elicitors of parasites work as a factor of pathogens. Their ability to suppress the immune response to infection is determined by bounding of signal proteins of plants and stopping the transmission of signal to the factors that regulate transcription. Resistance proteins recognize the complex and interacting with it turn the cellular metabolism to the induction of defense response. 

18021298
Accelerated release of exosome-associated GM1 ganglioside (GM1) by endocytic pathway abnormality: another putative pathway for GM1-induced amyloid fibril formation. 
Exosomes are extracellularly released small vesicles that are derived from multivesicular bodies formed via the endocytic pathway. We treated pheochromocytoma PC12 cells with chloroquine, an acidotropic agent, which potently perturbs membrane trafficking from endosomes to lysosomes. Chloroquine treatment increased the level of GM1 ganglioside in cell media only when the cells were exposed to KCl for depolarization, which is known to enhance exosome release from neurons. In the sucrose-density-gradient fractionation of cell media, GM1 ganglioside was exclusively recovered with Alix, a specific marker of exosomes, in the fractions with the density corrresponding to that of exosomes. Notably, amyloid-beta assembly was markedly accelerated when incubated with the exosome fraction prepared from the culture media of PC12 cells treated with chloroquine and KCl. Furthermore, amyloid-beta assembly was significantly suppressed by the co-incubation with an antibody specific to GM1-bound amyloid-beta, an endogenous seed for amyloid formation of Alzheimer's disease. Together with our previous finding that chloroquine treatment induces the accumulation of GM1 ganglioside in early endosomes, results of this study suggest that endocytic pathway abnormality accelerates the release of exosome-associated GM1 ganglioside following its accumulation in early endosomes. Furthermore, this study also suggests that extracellular amyloid fibril formation is induced by not only GM1 gangliosides accumulated on the surface of the cells but also those released in association with exosomes. 

9861351
Detection of HPV-16 genome in human oral cancers and potentially malignant lesions from India. 
The presence of high risk human papilloma virus (HPV) 16 and 18 was examined in 100 oral cancer patients of Indian descent, 80 patients with potentially malignant oral lesions and corresponding clinically normal mucosa from 48 of these patients. Additionally, presence of HPV-33, -6 and -11 was also studied in 86 oral cancers, 50 potentially malignant oral lesions and 30 corresponding normal oral mucosa. All the patients with oral cancer and oral lesions, were long term tobacco-chewers, and a majority of the patients were in Advanced Stages III and IV. The DNA samples were amplified by polymerase chain reaction (PCR) using HPV L1 consensus primers. Typing of HPV was performed by Southern hybridization analysis of the PCR products using HPV-16, -18, -33, -6 and -11 type specific oligonucleotide probes. HPV-16 was detected in 15 out of 100 (15%) oral tumours, 27 out of 80 (34%) potentially malignant lesions and 15 out of 48 (31%) of the corresponding normal mucosa in the patients with oral lesions. HPV-18 was not detected in any of the oral cancers, oral lesions and normal mucosa. HPV-33 and the low-risk HPV-6 and -11 were also not detected in the oral cancers, oral lesions and corresponding normal mucosa. A significantly higher prevalence of HPV-16 was observed in oral lesions (27 out of 80, 34%) as compared to oral cancers (15 out of 100, 15%). The observed difference of 19% (95% confidence interval [CI]: 6%, 31%), between these two proportions was statistically significant at the 5% level of significance. Our data indicates that HPV-16 may play a direct role in a certain proportion of oral cancers; whereas in a subpopulation of oral cancers HPV-16 infection may be vital in the early events associated with development of potentially malignant oral lesions, and the presence of the virus not essential in the progression of the oral lesion to frank malignancy. 

10449267
Bacterial isolates from patients with preterm labor with and without preterm rupture of the fetal membranes. 
OBJECTIVE: The aim of this study is to describe the bacterial flora of women in preterm labor with or without premature rupture of membranes. METHODS: Retrospective studies of 239 patients with preterm labor were performed. RESULTS: One hundred and twenty-three of 239 patients with preterm labor (51.5%) had bacterial vaginosis. Seventy of the 239 patients with preterm labor (29.3%) developed premature rupture of the membranes (preterm PROM). Of the 70 patients with preterm PROM, 51 (72.9%) had bacterial vaginosis. Therefore, 51 of the 123 patients with bacterial vaginosis (41.5%) developed preterm PROM. An increased number of organisms detected from the vaginal discharge in patients with preterm labor was associated with preterm PROM by Cochran-Armitage test. An increased number of organisms detected from the vaginal discharge in patients with preterm labor complicated with bacterial vaginosis was significantly associated with preterm PROM by Cochran-Armitage test. CONCLUSIONS: In preterm labor, the number of different species detected in the vagina provide sensitive and specific prediction of preterm PROM in patients with preterm labor. 

17043661
A small molecule based on the pRb2/p130 spacer domain leads to inhibition of cdk2 activity, cell cycle arrest and tumor growth reduction in vivo. 
One strategy in the development of anticancer therapeutics has been to arrest malignant proliferation through inhibition of the enzymatic activity of cyclin-dependent kinases (cdks), which are key regulatory molecules of the cell cycle. Over the past few years, numerous compounds with remarkable cdk inhibitory activity have been studied in cancer therapy, although it is very difficult to point out the best cdk to target. An excellent candidate appears to be cdk2, whose alteration is a pathogenic hallmark of tumorigenesis. The small molecule described in our study showed an inhibitory effect on the kinase activity of cdk2, a significant growth arrest observed in a colony formation assay and a reduction in the size of the tumor in nude mice, thus suggesting its potential role as a promising new type of mechanism-based antitumor drug, also for the treatment of hyperproliferative disorders. 

8372429
Regulatory elements involved in tax-mediated transactivation of the HTLV-I LTR. 
HTLV-I is the etiologic agent of adult T-cell leukemia. In this study, we investigated the regulatory elements and cellular transcription factors which function in modulating HTLV-I gene expression in response to the viral transactivator protein, tax. Transfection experiments into Jurkat cells of a variety of site-directed mutants in the HTLV-1 LTR indicated that each of the three motifs A, B, and C within the 21-bp repeats, the binding sites for the Ets family of proteins, and the TATA box all influenced the degree of tax-mediated activation. Tax is also able to activate gene expression of other viral and cellular promoters. Tax activation of the IL-2 receptor and the HIV-1 LTR is mediated through NF-kappa B motifs. Interestingly, sequences in the 21-bp repeat B and C motifs contain significant homology with NF-kappa B regulatory elements. We demonstrated that an NF-kappa B binding protein, PRDII-BF1, but not the rel protein, bound to the B and C motifs in the 21-bp repeat. PRDII-BF1 was also able to stimulate activation of HTLV-I gene expression by tax. The role of the Ets proteins on modulating tax activation was also studied. Ets 1 but not Ets 2 was capable of increasing the degree of tax activation of the HTLV-I LTR. These results suggest that tax activates gene expression by either direct or indirect interaction with several cellular transcription factors that bind to the HTLV-I LTR. 

6835523
Auditory cortical field projections to the basal ganglia of the cat. 
Projections to the basal ganglia from four auditory cortical fields in the cat were studied by combining microelectrode-mapping of the neurons' best frequencies with autoradiographic and histochemical tract-tracing techniques. Each auditory field is a source of projections to the homolateral basal ganglia. The distribution of labeling within the basal ganglia is related to the cortical field in which the injection site is located. The dorsal portion of the putamen and adjacent caudate nucleus are connected with cortical fields situated anteriorly and dorsally, while the ventral portion of the putamen and adjacent lateral amygdaloid nucleus are related to auditory fields situated posteriorly and ventrally. Injections of two different tracers into different best-frequency loci of one cortical field provided evidence that low best-frequency neurons project medially within the basal ganglia while high best-frequency neurons project more laterally. We concluded that there was a basic similarity among patterns of terminations in the basal ganglia from axons that originate in different auditory cortical fields. When the source of a projection was confined to a restricted portion of an auditory cortical field, labeling appeared as dense patches of silver grains separated from each other by areas of less dense labeling. Often, these patches were distributed within a sheet of tissue, elongated both dorsoventrally and anteroposteriorly. Loci having the same best-frequency representation, but situated in different auditory cortical fields, project upon overlapping but not coextensive portions of a single sheet of tissue. Thus the projections from geographically distant cortical loci possessing similar best-frequency representations are notably distinguished on a topographic basis. By comparison, two adjacent sheets of tissue were labeled when two injections were made into the low best-frequency and high best-frequency representations of the same auditory field. Double-injection, double-tracer experiments revealed that adjacent sheets of tissue received projections from different best-frequency loci. These observations suggested a degree of tonotopic organization to this projection system which was equipoise to the evidence obtained for a topographic organization. 

4248439
Plasma fibrinogen levels in normal and sick cows. 
Mean plasma fibrinogen levels were determined in 133 normal calves, bulls, non-pregnant and pregnant cows. These were 508, 505, 660, and 581 mg per 100 ml of plasma respectively. The levels in 233 sick cows were often greatly increased. This appeared to be related to inflammation and tissue destruction. Lower than normal levels were sometimes seen in liver disease and terminal states. 

7957108
Serum-regulated transcription by serum response factor (SRF): a novel role for the DNA binding domain. 
The transcription factors Serum Response Factor (SRF) and Ternary Complex Factor (TCF) form a ternary complex at the c-fos Serum Response Element (SRE). We show that in NIH3T3 cells TCF binding is required for regulated transcription in response to stimulation by phorbol myristate acetate (PMA), but not by whole serum. We constructed a novel transcriptionally inactive SRE variant whose serum-regulated activity can be partially restored by overexpression of SRF in the absence of bound TCF. Activation by SRF does not require the SRF N-terminal phosphorylation sites, but is potentiated 2- to 3-fold by the SRF C-terminal activation domain. Mutations in the SRF DNA binding domain, which do not affect the ability of SRF to bind DNA, abolish its ability to mediate TCF-independent serum-regulated activation and reduce activation by the SRF/TCF(Elk-1) ternary complex. Efficient activation requires that SRF be targeted to DNA via its own DNA binding domain. 

3573432
Aging variabilities of level-dose relationship in antiepileptic monopharmacy--with reference to drug interaction between mono- and bipharmacy. 
The influences of age, dose and comedication on the dose-level relationship were investigated using the ratio of plasma level to dose per body weight (microgram/ml/mg/kg/day) as an index in patients who had received the therapeutic doses of antiepileptic drug(s) for a long term. Samples of the blood concentrations were taken from 1,922 patients ranging in age from one to 40: 1,567 measured values were obtained under medication with phenobarbital (PB), phenytoin (PHT), carbamazepine (CBZ) or valproate (VPA) alone, and 2,201 under medication with any two of the above-mentioned antiepileptic drugs. With regard to PB, PHT, CBZ and VPA, when used alone, the L/D ratio was the lowest in the youngest age group, increased toward the latter half of teens, reached a peak at about age 20 and slightly decreased in the rest between the 20s and 30s. The age when the L/D ratio changes with aging is consistent with the age when the body weight of children obviously increases. As a result, during such a term, the fairly constant blood concentration can be maintained without overtly changing the daily dose. In the same age group given a single antiepileptic drug, the L/D ratio for PHT steeply increased at the dose of 4 in adults or 5 mg/kg/day in children, while the ratio rather decreased for CBZ and VPA. Clinical considerations should be paid to the fact that there was a non-linear relationship between the dose and the plasma concentration not only of PHT but of CBZ and VPA, and that the turning points were all within the range of therapeutic doses. (ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS) 

15953493
Fear potentiation and fear inhibition in a human fear-potentiated startle paradigm. 
BACKGROUND: The inability to suppress excessive fear or anxiety is a significant clinical problem. In the laboratory, extinction is a preferred method for the study of fear inhibition; however, in this paradigm the same stimulus causes both elicitation (excitation) and inhibition of fear, making it difficult to know whether an experimental manipulation that affects extinction does so by affecting one or both of these processes. For this reason, we sought to develop a behavioral procedure in humans that would render a stimulus primarily inhibitory. METHODS: We adapted a conditional discrimination procedure (AX+/BX-), previously validated in animals, to a human fear-potentiated startle paradigm. Forty-one healthy volunteers were presented with one set of colored lights paired with the delivery of aversive airblasts to the throat (AX+) and a different series of lights presented without airblasts (BX-). RESULTS: Participants exhibited fear potentiation to AX+, discrimination between AX+ and BX-, and transfer of fear inhibition to A in an AB compound test but not in an AC compound test. CONCLUSIONS: We believe this procedure will advance clinical research on fear disorders, such as posttraumatic stress disorder and phobias, by providing an effective and relatively independent measure of fear potentiation and fear inhibition. 

9231999
Concentrations of selected contaminants in cabin air of airbus aircrafts. 
The concentrations of selected air quality parameters in aircraft cabins were investigated including particle numbers in cabin air compared to fresh air and recirculation air, the microbiological contamination and the concentration of volatile organic compounds (VOC). The Airbus types A310 of Swissair and A340 of Lufthansa were used for measurements. The particles were found to be mainly emitted by the passengers, especially by smokers. Depending on recirculation filter efficiency the recirculation air contained a lower or equal amount of particles compared to the fresh air, whereas the amount of bacteria exceeded reported concentrations within other indoor spaces. The detected species were mainly non-pathogenic, with droplet infection over short distances identified as the only health risk. The concentration of volatile organic compounds (VOC) were well below threshold values. Ethanol was identified as the compound with the highest amount in cabin air. Further organics were emitted by the passengers--as metabolic products or by smoking--and on ground as engine exhaust (bad airport air quality). Cleaning agents may be the source of further compounds. 

11364635
Clinical trials. 
The National Institutes of Health (NIH) is seeking participants for a variety of trials. All patients will be tested in the Washington, DC area, and some will be compensated. Trials currently enrolling are testing treatments for MAC, CMV retinitis, immune system function, and the effectiveness of several experimental medications. Enrollment information is provided for each trial. 

2588229
[Genetic variation and genetic diseases] 
Detailed knowledge of the genetic make-up of individuals, revealed by examination of their DNA, is emerging as a significant component in medical diagnosis. Sometimes direct examination of DNA can determine whether a mutant gene is present or not. In other instances the genetic constitution of an individual can be inferred by use of genetic markers known to be close to the gene. The applications of this new level of knowledge are far reaching, extending to disease predisposition to several illness and responses to infectious agents. The use of DNA polymorphisms associated with linked DNA segments should permit diagnosis of hitherto undetectable disease states and also chromosomal localization of the loci responsible. The eventual isolation of the gene itself should lead to a better understanding of the molecular basis of inherited disease. 

8205285
Science, ethics guidelines, and advocacy in epidemiology. 
This article examines current ethics guidelines for recommendations on advocacy as an acceptable activity for epidemiologists. Three sets of guidelines, those produced by the Industrial Epidemiology Forum (IEF), the International Epidemiological Association (IEA), and the Council of International Organizations of Medical Sciences (CIOMS), appear to endorse the role of advocate, although there are differences in their recommendations. The IEF guidelines hint that advocacy is appropriate, the IEA guidelines recommend separating the roles of scientist and advocate, and the CIOMS guidelines recommend advocacy dependent on the quality of epidemiologic research and on causal interpretations of the data. Advocacy in the form of public health recommendations can be justified in terms of the principle of beneficence found in the guidelines, but is a central obligation only if the aims of the profession are enlarged to include not only the study of disease but also a commitment to disease prevention. An important issue in women's health--alcohol and breast cancer--provides an illustrative example. 

11087743
Characterization of the stromal cell-derived factor-1alpha-heparin complex. 
The binding of chemokines to glycosaminoglycans is thought to play a crucial role in chemokine functions. It has recently been shown that stromal cell-derived factor-1alpha (SDF-1alpha), a CXC chemokine with potent anti-human immunodeficiency virus activity, binds to heparan sulfate through a typical consensus sequence for heparin recognition (BBXB, where B is a basic residue KHLK, amino acids 24-27). Calculation of the accessible surface, together with the electrostatic potential of the SDF-1alpha dimer, revealed that other amino acids (Arg-41 and Lys-43) are found in the same surface area and contribute to the creation of a positively charged crevice, located at the dimer interface. GRID calculations confirmed that this binding site will be the most energetically favored area for the interaction with sulfate groups. Site-directed mutagenesis and surface plasmon resonance-based binding assays were used to investigate the structural basis for SDF-1alpha binding to heparin. Among the residues clustered in this basic surface area, Lys-24 and Lys-27 have dominant roles and are essential for interaction with heparin. Amino acids Arg-41 and Lys-43 participate in the binding but are not strictly required for the interaction to take place. Direct binding assays and competition analysis with monoclonal antibodies also permitted us to show that the N-terminal residue (Lys-1), an amino acid critical for receptor activation, is involved in complex formation. Binding studies with selectively desulfated heparin, heparin oligosaccharides, and heparitinase-resistant heparan sulfate fragments showed that a minimum size of 12-14 monosaccharide units is required for efficient binding and that 2-O- and N-sulfate groups have a dominant role in the interaction. Finally, the heparin-binding site was identified on the crystal structure of SDF-1alpha, and a docking study was undertaken. During the energy minimization process, heparin lost its perfect ribbon shape and fitted the protein surface perfectly. In the model, Lys-1, Lys-24, Lys-27, and Arg-41 were found to have the major role in binding a polysaccharide fragment consisting of 13 monosaccharide units. 

9265852
The costs of production diseases in dairy herds in England. 
Economic losses due to common health problems in dairy cattle were investigated in 90 Friesian/Holstein herds (average size 152 cows), which calved in England during the 1992/1993 season with an average annual yield of about 6000 l per cow. By using only the direct costs of common production diseases and other health problems (mastitis, lameness, vulval discharge, treatments for oestrus-not-observed, retained foetal membranes, milk fever, twinning, calf mortality and aid at calving), the cost of ill health in a 100 cow herd with average rates of these problems (compared with target levels) was estimated at Pounds 6300 per year. The costs ranged from Pounds 1200 (average of the top 10%) to Pounds 13600 (average of the worst 10% of the herds). The main losses were due to mastitis and lameness (38 and 27% of health cost, respectively). 

4040097
Histopathological evaluation of rat urinary bladders from the IRDC two-generation bioassay of sodium saccharin. 
Bladder tissues from rats treated with sodium saccharin in a two-generation dose-response study, in which 1.0% in the diet had been identified as the no-effect level for primary bladder cancer, were re-examined without knowledge of the test groups or the previous histopathological findings. Compound-related increases in the incidences of hyperplasia were found at the 6.25 and 7.5% saccharin levels (the highest dietary levels tested). There were also compound-related increased in the incidence of transitional-cell papillomas and/or carcinomas at the 4.0, 5.0, 6.25 and 7.5% levels. There was a slight increase in the incidence of transitional-cell carcinomas at the 3.0% level, but this was not statistically significant (P = 0.25). No compound-related effects were evident at the 1.0% level. All tumours were well to moderately differentiated and there was no increase in mean grades of severity or anaplasia for any proliferative lesion. 

1664721
Attenuated revertant serotype 1 Marek's disease viruses: safety and protective efficacy. 
In earlier studies, a revertant serotype 1 Marek's disease virus (MDV), clone Md11/75C/R2, was found to be a highly protective vaccine virus but was mildly pathogenic for susceptible chickens. The term "revertant" indicates that the virus, after attenuation, gained virulence following backpassage in chickens. The present study is an attempt to develop a more attenuated but still protective vaccine virus from Md11/75C/R2. Forty-two derivative viruses or clones from Md11/75C/R2 were evaluated. Two of these, designated clones R2/23 and R2/29, induced viremia but little or no pathology in preliminary trials and were selected for further study. In a series of nine trials, both clones provided protection against challenge with very virulent MDV strains that was superior to that induced by turkey herpesvirus (HVT) and was not significantly different (P greater than 0.05) from that induced by a bivalent (HVT + SB-1) vaccine. Both clones appeared fully attenuated based on pathogenicity tests in susceptible antibody-negative chickens. Both clones gained virulence on backpassage in chickens, but this seemed of little concern because neither virus spread by contact to other chickens. Although the two clones were very similar, clone R2/23 appeared to have a slightly lower pathogenic potential following backpassage and thus best meets the combined criteria of safety and efficacy. 

10915077
High levels of tumor necrosis factor-alpha and interleukin-1beta in bacterial vaginosis may increase susceptibility to human immunodeficiency virus. 
Bacterial vaginosis (BV) was identified recently as a cofactor that promotes sexual transmission of human immunodeficiency virus (HIV). This study was done to determine if interleukin (IL)-1beta and tumor necrosis factor (TNF)-alpha could be measured consistently in cervical secretions and if high levels of these cytokines were associated with BV. Secretions were obtained from 209 study subjects; most samples had detectable levels of TNF-alpha (84.2%) and IL-1beta (79.8%). BV was detected in 53 (27.0%) of 196 women. High cytokine levels were significantly associated with BV (adjusted odds ratio [AOR], 4.17; 95% confidence interval [CI], 1.69-10.30), oral contraceptive use (AOR, 2.78; 95% CI, 1.04-7.48), and high leukocyte counts on vaginal smear (AOR, 1.18; 95% CI, 1.03-1.36). Since these cytokines could up-regulate local HIV replication through activation of the long terminal repeat promoter region, the association of BV with high levels of IL-1beta or TNF-alpha may partly explain the mechanism by which this risk factor enhances HIV transmission. 

7451235
[Phosphorus-calcium metabolism and plasma 25-hydroxycholecalciferol in intestinal malabsorption] 
One hundred and four children aged 0-15 years, with suspicion of malabsorption were studied. They had a proximal jejunal biopsy and, at the same time, the following measurements: 25-hydroxycholecalciferol (25-OH-CC), calcium, phosphorus and serum alkaline phosphatase, bone age on X-ray of the left hand and wrist, cortical thickness of the 2nd, 3rd, 4th metacarpal bones. For the analysis of the results, the patients were divided into two groups according to the season (winter vs. summer). None of the patients in either group had clinical or radiological signs of rickets. The following results were obtained: 1. The 25-OH-CC serum levels were significantly lower during the winter than during the summer months. This was observed more frequently in the cases with atrophy of the jejunal mucosa. 2. During the summer, the 25-OH-CC serum levels were not different in the cases with normal or pathological mucosa. This demonstrates the importance of the skin synthesis of vitamin D during the summer months. 3. The mean of the serum calcium levels was significantly lower in the group of children with atrophy of the jejunal mucosa than in children with normal intestinal biopsy. The serum calcium levels were not correlated with the serum 25-OH-CC levels. 4. The serum phosphorus levels were significantly lowered during the winter months in the children aged 0-3 years with pathological jejunal biopsy. 5. The serum alkaline phosphatase levels were lowered in cases of total atrophy of the jejunal epithelium cells. 6. Cortical thickness of the metacarpal bones becomes thinner with the progression of the alteration of the jejunal epithelium cells, independently of season or age. However, only the group of children aged 0-3 years studied during the winter months and with total atrophy of the jejunal mucosa have a significantly diminished cortical thickness of the metacarpal bones. The lowering of the calcium levels and the decrease of the cortical thickness are probably secondary to an impaired intestinal absorption of calcium. In the syndrome of malabsorption, the integrity of the jejunal epithelial cells seems to play a more important role than a vitamin D deficiency in the genesis of this calcium malabsorption. 

14618242
The newly detected mutations in the RET proto-oncogene in exon 16 as a cause of sporadic medullary thyroid carcinoma. 
Medullary thyroid carcinoma (MTC) occurs as a sporadic form or, less frequently, as an autosomal dominant inherited familial disorder. Germline mutations in the RET proto-oncogene in exons 10, 11, 13, 14, 15, and 16 are found in most of the familial cases (nearly 95%). Somatic mutations in sporadic MTC are detected in 23-69% of patients. The most frequent somatic mutation is located in exon 16 at codon 918, and only a small percentage of mutations are found in exons 10, 11, 13, and 15. We have searched for somatic mutations in Czech MTC patients using direct sequencing. We report here two new somatic missense mutations in exon 16 of the RET proto-oncogene associated with the sporadic MTC detected in two Czech men. A homozygous mutation at codon 922 TCC(Ser)-->CCC(Pro) as a result of loss of heterozygosity was revealed in the first patient. In the second one a heterozygous mutation at codon 930 ACG(Thr)-->ATG(Met) was found. 

2465851
Cocaine and adrenaline: a safe or necessary combination in the nose? A study to determine the effect of adrenaline on the absorption and adverse side effects of cocaine. 
The use of topical cocaine in nasal surgery is widely accepted. However, the value and safety of using adrenaline in addition is strongly disputed. Serial serum cocaine levels were estimated in 30 patients during routine nasal surgery with half the patients receiving preoperative nasal preparation with cocaine alone and the other half receiving a cocaine and adrenaline combination. The serum cocaine values and the incidence of toxic effects of cocaine were compared between the 2 groups. Results showed that the addition of adrenaline significantly reduced the systemic absorption of cocaine during surgery but caused no significant increase in toxic cardiovascular effects compared with the use of cocaine alone. No evidence of cocaine toxicity was seen in either group. Preparations including adrenaline were also observed to intensify local nasal vasoconstriction resulting in a better operative field. It is concluded that adrenaline can still be a valuable as well as safe addition to topical cocaine used in the nose. 

3081996
Aspirin does not inhibit human megakaryocyte thromboxane synthesis in vivo. 
Cyclooxygenase activity in human platelets reappears after ingestion of aspirin as a function of the platelet production rate. In different studies the activity reappeared without delay or with an interval of at least 48 h after stopping the drug. Because inhibition of megakaryocyte cyclooxygenase is the sole likely explanation for a delay we determined thromboxane B2 in human megakaryocytes obtained under local anaesthesia. We found that aspirin does not inhibit human megakaryocytes in vivo but does so in vitro. Therefore, it does not seem likely that there is actually a delay in platelet cyclooxygenase resurgence after aspirin intake. In order to suppress platelet cyclooxygenase constantly, aspirin should be given once or twice a day and not once or twice a week. 

2826761
Inhibition of 3H-leukotriene D4 binding to guinea pig lung receptors by the novel leukotriene antagonist ICI 198,615. 
The specific binding of [3H]5(S)hydroxy-6(R)-S-cysteinylglycyl -7(E),9(E),11(Z),14(Z)-eicosatetraenoic acid ([3H]LTD4) to receptors on guinea pig lung parenchymal membranes and its inhibition by ICI 198,615, a representative example of a new class of leukotriene antagonists, was characterized by a receptor-ligand binding assay. [3H]LTD4 bound specifically and rapidly (Kon = 0.29 +/- 0.6 nM-1.min-1) reaching equilibrium within 15 min. The rate of binding was greatly inhibited in the presence of ICI 198,615. Excess LTD4 or ICI 198,615 slowly (t1/2 = 20 min) dissociated about 70% of the receptor-bound [3H]LTD4, whereas in combination with GTP analogs, both induced a rapid (t1/2 less than 5 min) and full dissociation. Equilibrium saturation analysis of [3H]LTD4 binding demonstrated a saturable (Bmax = 1014 +/- 174 fmol/mg) and high affinity (Kd = 0.43 +/- 0.09 nM) binding site. A high degree of stereoselectivity was demonstrated with inhibition of binding by the stereoisomers of LTD4: S,R much greater than R,R greater than R,S much greater than S,S. The rank order for inhibition of binding by peptide leukotriene was: LTD4 greater than 5(S)-hydroxy-6(R)-S-cysteinyl-7(E),9(E),11(Z),14(Z)-eicosatetraenoic acid much greater than 5(S)hydroxy-6(R)-S-glutathionyl-7(E),9(E),11(Z),14(Z)-eicosatetraenoic acid (potency ratios were: 1:4:590). In competition assays, ICI 198,615 competitively inhibited binding of [3H]LTD4 (Ki = 0.27 +/- 0.16 nM) and was 2300-fold and 3100-fold more potent than LY171883 or FPL55712. These data, together with results obtained previously in functional receptor assays, illustrate that this new class of leukotriene antagonists are the most potent and selective competitive antagonists of LTD4 receptors yet described. 

16834853
Ventilatory and intensive care requirements following oesophageal resection. 
INTRODUCTION: The aim of this study was to analyse the results of early postoperative extubation following oesophagectomy. PATIENTS AND METHODS: All patients who had undergone oesophageal resection between 1994 and 2001 were identified from a prospectively collected database. Their records were then reviewed in order to analyse morbidity and mortality along with intensive care unit (ICU) and ventilatory requirements. All patients were extubated immediately following surgery and monitored on a surgical high dependency unit (HDU). RESULTS: A total of 98 resections were undertaken (76 men; mean age, 64.3 years; range, 40-80 years). Surgical procedures were Ivor-Lewis (71), left thoraco-abdominal (15) and transhiatal (12) oesophagectomies. Overall, 8 patients died and 13 patients had anastomotic leaks. Sixteen patients required ventilation and admission to ICU, of whom 5 died. Three patients died on HDU following an elective decision not to transfer to ICU. Reasons for ventilation and ICU admission were anastomotic leaks (6), respiratory problems (6), left ventricular failure (1), cardiac arrest (1), small bowel herniation through the hiatus (1) and ischaemic stomach requiring revision of anastomosis (1). No patient required ventilation and admission to ICU within 48 h of original surgery. CONCLUSIONS: Patients undergoing oesophageal resection can be safely managed on a surgical HDU without routine postoperative ventilation. Although ventilation and ICU will be required in a significant number due to postoperative complications, this is unlikely to occur in the first 48 h. The requirement for an ICU bed to be available on the day of surgery should, therefore, no longer be considered necessary. This has important implications for the scheduling of elective oesophageal surgery. 

18176205
Improved Viability of Random Pattern Skin Flaps through the Use of Adipose-Derived Stem Cells. 
BACKGROUND:: Flap necrosis caused by inadequate blood supply is a common postoperative complication in reconstructive surgery. Because a putative stem cell population within the adipose tissue has been found to possess angiogenic potential, the authors sought to determine whether these cells might selectively induce neovascularization and increase the viability of random pattern skin flaps. METHODS:: Adipose-derived stem cells were isolated from the inguinal fat pads of ICR mice and expanded ex vivo for three passages. After the elevation of cranially based random pattern skin flaps (3 cm long and 1 cm wide), 1,1'-dioctadecyl-3,3,3',3'-tetramethylindocarbocyanine (DiI)-labeled adipose-derived stem cells were then injected into the pedicle base (group A) or 1.5 cm distal to the pedicle (group B). Medium containing no adipose-derived stem cells, mature adipocytes, or basic fibroblast growth factor were injected in three other control groups separately. (n = 10 for each group). Millimetric measurements were taken at postoperative day 7 for evaluation of flap viability. Specimens were harvested for histologic analyses. RESULTS:: Adipose-derived stem cells led to a statistically significant increase in flap viability in both group A and group B compared with the control and the adipocyte groups. Histologic examination also demonstrated a statistically significant increase in capillary density in both group A and group B. Moreover, some of the endothelial cells were stained positively for DiI. CONCLUSIONS:: These findings suggest that adipose-derived stem cells have a potential for enhancing the blood supply of random pattern skin flaps. This mechanism might be both the direct differentiation of adipose-derived stem cells into endothelial cells and the indirect effect of angiogenic growth factor released from adipose-derived stem cells. 

8545527
Significance of adrenal corticosteroid secretion for the food restriction-induced enhancement of alcohol drinking in the rat. 
Male Wistar rats with continuous access to 6% ethanol solution and water in their home cages were subjected to food restriction (FR). Reduction of body weight to 80% of normal was associated with a significant increase in ethanol drinking. It is known that the stress of FR gives rise to increased corticosterone secretion, and in line with these findings it was found that the weight of the thymus (whose size is inversely related to corticosterone levels) was reduced to 55% of normal in the present FR rats. Two subsequent experiments indicated that this adrenal activation contributed to the FR-induced enhancement of alcohol drinking. Firstly, adrenalectomized rats showed no evidence of enhanced alcohol drinking during food restriction, suggesting that adrenal corticosterone hypersecretion contributes to the enhanced ethanol consumption during FR. Secondly, treatment of FR rats with the enzyme inhibitor cyanoketone, which blocks stress-induced but not basal corticosterone secretion, at least partly prevented the FR-induced increase in ethanol drinking. These results add further evidence that sustained exposure to corticosterone facilitates ethanol consumption in the rat. 

3393879
Exposure to low-frequency electromagnetic fields--a health hazard? 
Several epidemiologic studies indicate an association between exposure to low-frequency electromagnetic fields and certain types of cancer. However, there is no solid evidence from current experimental studies to support the hypothesis of carcinogenicity. Further research is needed, and in the present extended abstract Swedish epidemiologic studies projected for the future are briefly outlined. The studies will be time-consuming and will involve high costs. However, we anticipate that within the next four years the approach described will contribute significantly to knowledge about the possible health hazards caused by electromagnetic fields. 

6822726
Hydatid disease in the Western Isles. 
An investigation into the incidence of hydatid disease was carried out in the Hebridean islands of Lewis and Skye. The results showed that 20% of the sheep were infected and 10% of the dogs harboured Echinococcus granulosus. Sporadic human cases continue to occur but using serological tests we were unable to show evidence of subclinical infection in the population sampled. 

11094720
[Kinetics of photoinduced oxidative-reductive transformation of the reaction center P700 in leaves of C3- and C4-plants] 
The light-induced changes in the kinetics of the oxidation of photosystem I reaction center P700 in leaves of C3 and C4 plants, depending on the time of leaf adaptation to dark before the illumination were studied. The EPR 1 signal from oxidized centers P+700 was used to monitor the kinetics of P700 redox transients. Similar dependences of the light-induced changes in the kinetics of P700 versus the adaptation time were observed in leaves of three kinds of plants: bean, orange and maize. These data suggest that the deactivation of the Calvin cycle enzymes, which occurs 1-3 min after ceasing the illumination, is the main factor that causes the retardation of the light-induced oxidation of P700. 

17307334
Tamoxifen-induced activation of p21Waf1/Cip1 gene transcription is mediated by Early Growth Response-1 protein through the JNK and p38 MAP kinase/Elk-1 cascades in MDA-MB-361 breast carcinoma cells. 
Tamoxifen (TAM) is a synthetic non-steroidal anti-estrogen compound that is widely used as an effective chemotherapeutic agent for treatment and prevention of breast cancer. Unfortunately, prolonged treatment with TAM causes TAM-responsive tumors to become TAM resistant through an as-yet-unknown mechanism. To develop novel anti-breast cancer agents that are therapeutically superior to TAM, we must first fully understand the biological effects of TAM. In this study, we found that TAM treatment of MDA-MB-361 breast cancer cells activated p21Waf1/Cip1 gene transcription independently of p53. Furthermore, TAM-induced p21Waf1/Cip1 promoter activity was enhanced by transient expression of the gene encoding Early Growth Response-1 (Egr-1) protein, a transcription factor that plays an important role in cell growth and differentiation. The TAM-induced p21Waf1/Cip1 promoter activity was blocked by the expression of small interfering RNA (siRNA) targeted to Egr-1 mRNA. In addition, induction of Egr-1 expression by TAM occurred at the transcriptional level via Ets-domain transcription factor Elk-1 through the JNK and p38 mitogen-activated protein (MAP) kinase pathways. Inhibition of the JNK and p38 MAP kinase signals inhibited Egr-1-mediated p21Waf1/Cip1 promoter activity. We conclude that TAM stimulation of p21Waf1/Cip1 gene transcription in MDA-MB-361 cells depends largely on Elk-1-mediated Egr-1 expression induced by activation of the JNK and p38 MAP kinase pathways. 

9247041
Macrophages and respiratory viruses. 
This review highlights some of the interactions between alveolar macrophages and human/swine influenza A viruses, porcine reproductive and respiratory syndrome virus (PRRSV), bovine parainfluenza type-3 (PI-3) virus, bovine respiratory syncytial virus (BRSV) and bovine viral diarrhoea virus (BVDV). In influenza A infection, macrophage-cytokines are believed to mediate the typical constitutional effects and inflammation in the respiratory tract. The same cytokines possibly play a role in influenza-bacterial respiratory disease. PRRSV has a very restricted tropism for alveolar macrophages. The virus causes some secondary infections to be more severe, but this could not be related to impaired macrophage functions. Bovine RSV and PI-3 virus, on the other hand, interfere with selected macrophage functions. In addition, PI-3 virus adversely affects lymphocyte proliferation because it interferes with the accessory role of macrophages. One of the characteristic effects of BVDV on monocytes-macrophages is stimulation of prostaglandin E2 production. 

6641768
Partial trisomy 3p in two siblings: clinical and pathological findings. 
Two siblings affected with partial trisomy 3p resulting from a maternal balanced translocation 46,XXt(3;10) (p21;q26) are reported. The clinical features of this syndrome are reviewed. The necropsy findings of the two siblings are discussed. 

7687026
Clastogenic effect of extracts obtained from Crotalaria retusa L. and Crotalaria mucronata Desv. on mouse bone marrow cells. 
This work has evaluated the clastogenicity of six extracts (tea and aqueous extract of leaves, tea, aqueous and methanolic extracts of dried fruit, and tea of unripe fruit) obtained from Crotalaria retusa L. and three extracts (tea and methanolic extract of dried fruit, and tea of unripe fruit) obtained from Crotalaria mucronata Desv. The extracts were injected intraperitoneally into mice, and the animals were killed 24 h after treatment for preparation of bone marrow cells. The extracts obtained from fruits of Crotalaria retusa were found to cause a dose-dependent increase in the frequency of chromosomal aberrations in mice. On the other hand, no statistically significant increase in the frequency of aberrant cells was observed for the animals treated with leaf extracts obtained from Crotalaria retusa and with extracts from fruits of Crotalaria mucronata. The possibility that the pyrrolizidine alkaloid, monocrotaline, present in Crotalaria retusa exerts a clastogenic effect on mouse bone marrow cells is discussed. Our conclusion is based on studies using intraperitoneal treatments. Effects of oral exposure to extracts of Crotalaria retusa are unknown. 

2005554
Prospective comparison of the effects of Occucoat, Viscoat, and Healon on intraocular pressure and endothelial cell loss. 
We compared the effect of Occucoat (2% hydroxypropylmethyl-cellulose), Viscoat (sodium hyaluronate-chondroitin sulfate), and Healon (sodium hyaluronate) on postoperative intraocular pressure (IOP) and endothelial cell damage. One hundred fourteen patients having planned extracapsular cataract extraction with posterior chamber lens implantation using a viscomaterial were prospectively randomized into one of five groups. Group I received Occucoat which was removed from the anterior chamber at the conclusion of surgery. Group II received Occucoat which was not removed (retained). Group III received Viscoat which was removed, Group IV received Viscoat which was retained, and Group V received Healon which was removed. No prophylactic ocular hypotensive medications were given. Intraocular pressure was measured at four hours, 24 hours, one week, one month, three months, and one year postoperatively. Compared to preoperative IOP, all groups had a significant IOP increase at four hours. All but the Viscoat removed group (Group III) showed a statistically significant increase at 24 hours postoperatively (P less than .05). No group had a significant increase at one week or later. Specular microscopy showed no significant difference in cell loss between any of the groups at three months or within each group when compared to preoperative cell counts (P greater than .1). 

4074261
Aldosterone, cortisol, and electrolyte responses to hypobaric hypoxia in moderate-altitude natives. 
Serum aldosterone, cortisol, and electrolyte concentration, and urinary aldosterone and electrolyte excretion responses were examined in seven low-altitude natives (LAN) (373 m or less, aged 19-25 yr) and nine moderate-altitude natives (MAN) (1,830-2,200 m, aged 19-23 yr) for 2 d at their own residence (home) altitude (PB 740 or 585 mm Hg, respectively) and later for 2 d during decompression at a simulated altitude of 4,270 m (PB 447 mm Hg). The LAN group demonstrated higher (p less than 0.05) serum cortisol concentrations and respiration rates, and lower (p less than 0.05) serum aldosterone and potassium, and urinary aldosterone, sodium, and potassium concentrations at certain times during decompression compared to their home responses. Moderate-altitude native responses, on the other hand, were generally unchanged. Manifestations of acute mountain sickness at PB 447 mm Hg were also significantly greater in the LAN group. Thus, it appears that the MAN subjects were influenced less by the drop in ambient oxygen tension associated with PB 447 mm Hg. 

3237831
Rhythms in behaviors, body temperature and plasma corticosterone in SCN lesioned rats given methamphetamine. 
In aperiodic rats with lesions in the suprachiasmatic nuclei (SCN), rhythms with a circadian period in spontaneous locomotion, wheel-running, feeding, drinking, body temperature and plasma corticosterone were restored by chronic administration of methamphetamine. These rhythms were not entrained by a light-dark cycle. Wheel-running, feeding and drinking rhythms in individual rats were in phase in terms of ultradian bout as well as circadian fluctuation. Rhythms of the intraperitoneal temperature appeared accompanying the spontaneous locomotor rhythm. The phase relation between the two rhythms was similar to that of SCN dependent rhythms. Plasma corticosterone also fluctuated in a circadian fashion. The corticosterone peak preceded the activity onset of locomotor rhythm by a few hours, which was similar to the phase relation observed in the SCN intact animals. It is concluded that the oscillatory mechanism underlying the spontaneous locomotor rhythm in SCN lesioned and methamphetamine treated rats drives also other physiological rhythms. The phase-relations among them were similar to those of rhythms driven by the circadian pacemaker in the SCN. 

16751678
Aortic stenosis catheterization revisited: a long sheath single-puncture technique. 
OBJECTIVES: To evaluate the accuracy of a new long sheath single-puncture technique in obtaining accurate transvalvular gradients in aortic stenosis. BACKGROUND: Despite advances in echo Doppler, the evaluation of aortic stenosis continues to be a common procedure in the cardiac catheterization laboratory. Experts agree that simultaneous evaluation of the proximal aortic and left ventricular pressures yields the most accurate data; however, this is difficult to achieve unless two arterial punctures are performed. METHODS: We postulated that using a 4 Fr pigtail catheter inside a 55-cm long 6 Fr sheath would provide accurate simultaneous pressure data, yet avoid the complications of two arterial punctures. We performed this technique in 13 male patients, and placed a second arterial catheter in the aortic root as a control aortic pressure. We then performed this technique in 55 other male patients without placing an additional control arterial catheter. RESULTS: In the test population, correlation of aortic valve areas and transvalvular gradients was excellent. In the larger population, adequate hemodynamic data was obtained in 52 patients, with no difficulty engaging coronary arteries or grafts via the long sheath, and with an acceptable major complication rate of 1.5%. CONCLUSIONS: Using a 4 Fr pigtail catheter with a 55-cm long 6 Fr sheath is a safe, efficient way to obtain excellent hemodynamic data in an aortic stenosis catheterization procedure. 

17473619
Virtual reality for mobility devices: training applications and clinical results: a review. 
Virtual reality technology is an emerging technology that possibly can address the problems encountered in training (elderly) people to handle a mobility device. The objective of this review was to study different virtual reality training applications as well as their clinical implication for patients with mobility problems. Computerized literature searches were performed using the MEDLINE, Cochrane, CIRRIE and REHABDATA databases. This resulted in eight peer reviewed journal articles. The included studies could be divided into three categories, on the basis of their study objective. Five studies were related to training driving skills, two to physical exercise training and one to leisure activity. This review suggests that virtual reality is a potentially useful means to improve the use of a mobility device, in training one's driving skills, for keeping up the physical condition and also in a way of leisure time activity. Although this field of research appears to be in its early stages, the included studies pointed out a promising transfer of training in a virtual environment to the real-life use of mobility devices. 

1659610
Phosphatidyltransferase activity in Bacillus megaterium. 
Phosphatidyl transfer between phosphatidylethanolamine, phosphatidylglycerol or phosphatidylserine as donors and primary hydroxyl acceptors including ethanolamine, glycerol, serine and Triton X-100 has been shown to be catalysed by membrane particles derived from Bacillus megaterium strains ATCC 13632 and ATCC 14581. The rate of cardiolipin synthesis from phosphatidylglycerol in the presence of ethanolamine was an order of magnitude greater than that of phosphatidylethanolamine formation. Cardiolipin synthesis from phosphatidylethanolamine in the presence of glycerol was also observed, and was 1.5-fold greater than the formation of phosphatidylglycerol. Similar heat lability, effects of pH and of Triton X-100 for phosphatidyl transfer and cardiolipin synthesis indicate that both reactions were catalysed by cardiolipin synthase. 

9153472
Epstein-Barr virus encephalomyelitis diagnosed by polymerase chain reaction: detection of the genome in the CSF. 
A case of encephalomyelitis with polymerase chain reaction detection of Epstein-Barr virus (EBV) in the CSF, and concurrent serologic changes consistent with acute systemic EBV infection is presented and discussed. We document involvement of the brain, spinal cord, and nerve roots, summarize some unusual imaging findings, and note the evolution of CSF oligoclonal bands. 

3618681
Increased thromboxane biosynthesis in normal pregnancy is mainly derived from platelets. 
Thromboxane biosynthesis was determined in normal pregnant subjects by measurement of its major urinary and plasma metabolites, 2,3-dinor-thromboxane B2 and 11-dehydro-thromboxane B2. Urinary 2,3-dinor-thromboxane B2 increased early in pregnancy (731 +/- 124 pg/mg creatinine) compared with nonpregnancy (less than 350 pg/mg creatinine; p less than 0.001) and the postpartum period (155 +/- 42 pg/mg creatinine, p = 0.015) and remained elevated throughout gestation. Similarly, plasma and urinary 11-dehydro-thromboxane B2 were increased in pregnancy. To determine the cellular origin of the increase in thromboxane biosynthesis in pregnancy, platelet cyclooxygenase was selectively inhibited with aspirin in a dose of 120 mg orally followed by 20 mg twice daily for 7 days (n = 4). Selectivity was confirmed by measurement of urinary 2,3-dinor-6-keto-prostaglandin F1 alpha, an index of prostacyclin biosynthesis. Coincident with a 97% inhibition of serum thromboxane B2, urinary 2,3-dinor-thromboxane B2 was almost completely inhibited and paralleled the recovery of platelet cyclooxygenase after withdrawal of aspirin. This study demonstrates that thromboxane biosynthesis is increased in pregnancy. The increase is mainly platelet derived and is consistent with increased platelet activation throughout pregnancy. 

3881852
Removal of marrow T cells with OKT3-OKT11 monoclonal antibodies and complement to prevent acute graft-versus-host disease. A pilot study in ten patients. 
We studied the feasibility of T cell depletion of bone marrow for transplantation in preventing acute graft-versus-host disease GVHD in patients having a high risk of acute GVHD. We report our preliminary clinical experience of the ex-vivo treatment of allogeneic marrow using a pan-T monoclonal antibody combination (OKT3-OKT11) plus baby rabbit complement. Ten patients received allografts from HLA-identical sibling donors. All patients had malignant hematological disease with poor prognosis (6 acute leukemia, 3 chronic granulocytic leukemia, and 1 multiple myeloma). Nine patients were at high risk of acute GVHD (older than 30 years for 4 patients, chronic granulocytic leukemia in acute or accelerated phase for 3, and acute leukemia in relapse for 2). Posttransplant management with methotrexate was maintained until day 100 in the first four patients and stopped at day 11 for the six others. The ex-vivo treatment with the OKT combination and complement removed 88.3% +/- 11.8 of the T lymphocytes. The myeloid progenitors recovered at the end of the procedure showed a moderate effect of monoclonal antibodies and complement (75.8% +/- 12.2). Engraftment was achieved in all patients: 23.3 days +/- 5.10 to reach 0.5 X 10(9) granulocytes per liter and 31.5 days +/- 12.2 to reach 50 X 10(9) platelets per liter. No acute GVHD was observed in this group of patients. Of the 10 patients, 7 are alive and well and have been in continuous remission from 2-10 months. Three patients have relapsed. 

10790141
Multiplex PCRs for identification of Escherichia coli virulence genes. 
PCRs were developed to detect 11 Escherichia coli virulence genes. Primers amplified the respective genes without cross-reaction with other genes. Specificity was maintained in multiplex reactions; excellent amplification of target genes was possible with a minimum of four multiplex reactions. These reactions successfully identified genes in E. coli from the feces of four dogs. 

1698571
The mechanism of positive inotropy induced by adenosine triphosphate in rat heart. 
When applied extracellularly in the micromolar range, ATP and related compounds induced a positive inotropy in the rat papillary muscle. This was also true in the rat auricle after pertussis toxin treatment. Then, in both tissues, ATP further increased the contraction after a maximal beta-adrenergic stimulation. The increase in contractile force could be related to the increase in the calcium current. The L-type calcium current was measured by whole-cell patch-clamp recording in single cells isolated from the rat ventricle after the sodium and potassium currents were inhibited by tetrodotoxin and cesium, respectively. When added alone, 10 microM ATP increased the calcium current by 60%. Adenosine 5'-O-(3-thiotriphosphate) was also able to increase calcium current. Adenosine was much less effective, and GTP, UTP, CTP, and ITP were without effect. A similar increase in calcium current was observed when ATP was added in addition to a maximal stimulation by a beta-adrenergic agonist or after internal perfusion with cyclic AMP. However, this increase was preceded by a transient decrease whose origin could not be attributed to a P1-purinergic agonistic effect of ATP. The transient decrease was not elicited by adenosine or in a magnesium-free HEPES solution and was not suppressed after pertussis toxin treatment. This effect appeared related to the variations in the holding current also observed upon ATP application. Together with vasodilation, ATP and adenine compounds induced positive inotropy. The latter effect could be attributed in part to the increase in calcium current and was independent of cyclic AMP. Both effects are complementary with the beta-adrenergic stimulation and can help healthy cells to compensate the failing zone from which ATP could be released. 

14601094
Clear cell ependymoma: a clinicopathologic and radiographic analysis of 10 patients. 
BACKGROUND: Clear cell ependymoma (CCE) is an uncommon central nervous system tumor with a predilection for the supratentorial region in children. Histologically, it may mimic oligodendroglioma, central neurocytoma, hemangioblastoma, and renal cell carcinoma. METHODS: The authors reviewed the clinical, radiographic, and pathologic features, therapy, and outcome in 10 children with CCE who were treated at St. Jude Children's Research Hospital (1984-2003). Fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH) was performed using 1p/1q, 19p/19q, CEP18/DAL1, and bcr/NF2 probe pairs. RESULTS: The median patient age at diagnosis was 7.5 years (range, 1-19 years). Tumors occurred supratentorially in 9 of 10 patients. All tumors had rounded nuclei with surrounding, clear halos and at least focal perivascular pseudorosettes. Seven tumors had anaplastic features. No deletions involving 1p, 19q, or NF2 were detected. The tumors from 5 of 7 patients, all with anaplasia, had losses of both CEP18 and DAL-1. Radiographically, all tumors were enhanced, and 9 tumors had associated cysts with enhancing walls. Seven patients underwent gross total resection, which was near total in one patient and subtotal in two patients. Five patients received immediate postoperative local radiotherapy. Three patients were diagnosed initially with pilocytic astrocytoma (one patient) and oligodendroglioma (two patients) and were observed. The progression-free survival and overall survival rates at 5 years were 34% +/- 20% and 75% +/- 19%, respectively. The median follow-up was 37 months (range, 5-239 months). Five patients developed local recurrence within a median of 9 months after diagnosis. Two patients developed extracranial soft tissue and lymph node metastases. CONCLUSIONS: CCEs were found to have a predilection for extraneural metastases and early recurrence and demonstrate characteristic radiographic features, anaplastic histologic features, and chromosome 18 losses. The authors recommend resection followed by local radiotherapy as the treatment of choice in children. 

1203871
Benign metastasizing uterine leiomyoma. Multiple lymph nodal metastases. 
A case of histologically benign lymph nodal metastases from a uterine leiomyoma in a 27-year-old woman is reported. It is postulated that fragments of a leiomyoma, detached at the time of endometrial curettage, entered dilated lymphatic channels in or adjacent to a large projecting submucous leiomyoma, and seeded several pelvic and para-aortic lymph nodes. During an interval of 8 years, these grew slowly and did not infiltrate the perinodal tissues or give rise to secondary metastases. 

2246405
Effect of the topical anesthetic EMLA on the efficacy of pulsed dye laser treatment of port-wine stains. 
EMLA cream (Eutectic Mixture of Local Anesthetics) is a new topical anesthetic composed of 25 mg lidocaine and 25 mg prilocaine in an oil-in-water emulsion cream. It has been found to be very effective for local anesthesia prior to venepuncture, minor surgical procedures, and pulsed dye laser (PDL) therapy for port-wine stains (PWS) in children. However, since EMLA may cause vasoconstriction of cutaneous vessels, we tried to determine whether pretreatment with EMLA decreases the efficacy of subsequent PDL treatment. We report eight patients between the ages of 4 and 32 years with PWS who received two test site treatments prior to PDL treatment. One site was pretreated with EMLA cream under occlusion for 60 minutes and then left unoccluded for 15 minutes prior to PDL test treatment. The other site, in the same area of the PWS and patient's body, was not pretreated with EMLA. The test sites were compared 6-8 weeks later to determine whether EMLA decreased the degree of lightening of the PWS compared to the non-EMLA-treated site. We conclude that EMLA is an effective topical anesthetic for PDL treatment of PWS and does not adversely affect the efficacy of the treatment. 

1634457
Extrathoracic Castleman's disease. 
Castleman's disease is an uncommon clinical entity. We report two cases of this disease with a brief review of literature. Both of them had extrathoracic disease which is relatively infrequent. One of them presented with localized hyaline vascular type of the disease and the other with the multicentric plasmacytic variety. The patient with the latter form of Castleman's disease had sclerodactyly, which has not been reported earlier in association with this disease. 

1971020
Inhibitory effects of amiloride on alpha adrenoceptors in canine vascular smooth muscle. 
Amiloride inhibits vascular smooth muscle contractions from canine aorta and saphenous vein. The mechanisms were studied using radioligand binding and functional techniques. Amiloride inhibited [3H]prazosin and [3H]rauwolscine binding to alpha-1 and alpha-2 adrenoceptors in a concentration-dependent manner. Amiloride increased Kd values for [3H]rauwolscine without affecting the maximum binding of [3H]prazosin. These results suggest that the drug interacts with the alpha-1 adrenoceptor binding sites in a competitive manner and with the alpha-2 adrenoceptor binding sites in a noncompetitive manner. Amiloride reduced maximal contractile responses to agonists selective for both alpha adrenoceptors and to elevated K+, the EC50 values were increased by about 10-fold in the presence of amiloride. In Ca+(+)-free Krebs' solution, contractions induced in saphenous vein after addition of Ca++ in saphenous vein in the presence of adrenoceptor agonists were inhibited by amiloride. Our results suggest that amiloride reduced alpha-1 and alpha-2 adrenoceptor-mediated responses and inhibited Ca++ influx. 

8825501
Field trials with methoprene, temephos, and Bacillus thuringiensis serovar israelensis for the control of larval Culiseta melanura. 
In 1992, Altosid (methoprene) pellets, Abate (temephos) 5 CG, and Bactimos (Bacillus thuringiensis serovar israelensis) granules were applied aerially to small field plots within a Culiseta breeding swamp. Aspects measured included the deposition and diffusion of larvicides into larval crypts and effects on larval Culiseta melanura and nontarget aquatic organisms. Formulations were deposited at approximately 50% of application rates. The presence of methoprene in 8 crypt water samples indicated that this larvicide was able to diffuse into Cs. melanura larval crypts. Methoprene was selected for evaluation in a large-scale field trial. In the spring of 1993, methoprene pellets applied to 25% of the study area were an effective larvicide against Cs. melanura. The inhibitory effect on pupae exceeded 81% over a 5-wk posttreatment period. 

9577309
Glutathione peroxidase (EC 1.11.1.9) and superoxide dismutase (EC 1.15.1.1) activities in riboflavin-deficient rats infected with Plasmodium berghei malaria. 
Riboflavin deficiency interferes with the growth and multiplication of malaria parasites as well as the host response to malaria. The objective of the present work was to determine the effects of riboflavin deficiency on erythrocyte glutathione peroxidase (EC 1.11.1.9; GPx) and superoxide dismutase (EC 1.15.1.1; SOD) in rats infected with Plasmodium berghei malaria. Riboflavin in its co-enzyme form, FAD, is required by glutathione reductase (EC 1.6.4.1) to regenerate GSH and GSH is an important cellular antioxidant both in its own right and also as a substrate for the enzyme GPx. Weanling rats were deprived of riboflavin for 8 weeks before intraperitoneal injection of 1 x 10(6) P. berghei parasites. Control animals were weight-matched to the respective riboflavin-deficient group. At 10 d post-infection, parasite counts were higher in the weight-matched control group than the riboflavin-deficient group (P = 0.004). GPx activity was higher in erythrocytes of rats parasitized with P. berghei than comparable non-infected rats regardless of riboflavin status (P < 0.05). As mature erythrocytes do not synthesize new protein, the higher GPx activities were probably due to the presence of the parasite protein. In erythrocytes from riboflavin-deficient rats, GPx activity tended to be lower than in those rats fed on diets adequate in riboflavin (weight-matched controls) whether parasitized or not, but the difference was not significant. Neither riboflavin deficiency nor malaria had any effect on erythrocyte SOD activity. It was concluded that riboflavin deficiency has no marked effect on erythrocyte GPx or SOD activity in the rat. 

588338
[Coronary arteriovenous fistula. Considerations on differential diagnosis] 
Review is made of the literature of coronary arteriovenous fistula, since its first description up to 1975; we mention the most important points treated by each author. Two cases are studied clinically, by entheterization and coronariography. We take into consideration the differential diagnosis with patent ductus arteriosus, ventricular septal defect with aortic insufficiency, and rupture of congenital aneurysm sinus of valsalva to right cavities. The result of these studies is that, if an atypical continous murmur for an arterial duct is present, we may suspect a coronary fistula as a first possibility, since an aneurysm of valsalva's sinus is a rare entity. 

5675512
Production of highly labeled adenoviruses. 
A method is described for increasing the incorporation of radioactive thymidine into adenovirus deoxyribonucleic acid by the use of amethopterin. In addition, a modified procedure is presented for the preparation of highly purified adenoviruses. This procedure, which employs enzymatic digestion of cellular debris, obviates the necessity for fluorocarbon treatment of crude virus suspensions, and routinely provides excellent recovery of virus. 

16075658
A double-blind comparison of escitalopram and paroxetine in the long-term treatment of generalized anxiety disorder. 
BACKGROUND: This study compared the efficacy and tolerability of escitalopram, a newer SSRI, with paroxetine in the treatment of generalized anxiety disorder (GAD). METHODS: Patients with DSM-IV-defined GAD were randomized to receive 24 weeks of double-blind flexible-dose treatment with either escitalopram (10-20 mg/day) or paroxetine (20-50 mg/day), followed by a 2-week, double-blind, down-titration period. Mean change from baseline to endpoint (LOCF) in Hamilton Anxiety Scale (HAMA) scores was the primary efficacy variable. RESULTS: Mean baseline HAMA scores for the escitalopram (N = 60) and paroxetine (N = 61) groups were 23.7 and 23.4, respectively. After 24 weeks of treatment, mean changes in HAMA scores were -15.3 and -13.3 for escitalopram and paroxetine, respectively (p = 0.13). Significantly fewer patients withdrew from escitalopram than paroxetine treatment due to adverse events (6.6% vs. 22.6%; p = 0.02). The frequency of treatment-emergent adverse events was higher with paroxetine vs. escitalopram: overall (88.7% vs. 77.0%), insomnia (25.8% vs. 14.8%), constipation (14.5% vs. 1.6%), ejaculation disorder (30.0% vs. 14.8%), anorgasmia (26.2% vs. 5.9%), and decreased libido (22.6% vs. 4.9%). Conversely, diarrhea and upper respiratory tract infection were reported more with escitalopram than paroxetine (21.3% vs. 8.1%, and 14.8% vs. 4.8%, respectively). CONCLUSIONS: These results support the use of escitalopram as a first-line treatment for GAD. 

11188944
[Vasodilators in isolated human radial arteries] 
This paper was designed to evaluate the effectivity of several vasodilators, applied topically, to attenuate the hyperreactivity of radial arteries (RA) implanted as aorto-coronary bypass. Remnant segments of the RA were obtained from 20 operations, and each of the segments was divided into 4 rings. The rings were incubated for 30 minutes in control conditions (n = 20) or in presence of 30 microM of Diltiazem (DILT, n = 6), 30 microM of mibefradil (MIBE, n = 4) or a mixture of 30 microM of verapamil + 30 microM of nitroglycerin (VP-NTG, n = 6). A subsequent exposure to KCl 80 mM (in absence of vasodilators) evoked a sustained contraction in control rings, which was attenuated by 35 +/- 9% by DILT, 48 +/- 13% by VP-NTG and by 69 +/- 20% by MIBE (p < 0.05). Preincubation with vasodilators also attenuated the rate and intensity of rhythmic contractions of the RA. In rings that were cold-stored during 24 hs and then restimulated with KCl 80 mM the depressing effect was still evident: DILT 53 +/- 6%, VP-NTG 46 +/- 14% and MIBE 61 +/- 9% (p < 0.05). The effect of MIBE was more intense and persistent than that of DILT or VP-NTG, even at concentrations eliciting a similar initial depression of contraction. It is concluded that the exposure to vasodilators during a period equivalent to the duration of the surgical preparation of the RA produces an attenuation of the arterial reactivity that might provide an additional protection against RA spasm during the immediate postoperative period. 

8262697
IL-4 receptor expression by SAC-activated B-lymphocytes: its role in B-cell proliferation and the effect of cyclosporine (CsA), prednisolone and verapamil. 
Expression of the IL-4 receptor was studied in a highly purified population of human B-lymphocytes stimulated by Staphylococcus aureus, cowan I (SAC). Flow cytometric analysis showed that incubation with SAC in the absence of detectable levels of IL-2, IL-4 and IL-6 resulted in a striking increase in cellular binding of IL-4. The SAC-stimulated B-cells responded to exogenous IL-4 by DNA synthesis. This response was unaffected by CsA or prednisolone, but was inhibited by the Ca2+ channel blocker verapamil. 

3863535
Low serum oestriol and Cushing's syndrome during pregnancy. 
Previously in world literature there have been reports of 40 pregnancies in women with untreated Cushing's syndrome. The perinatal mortality in these series has been 12.9%. This paper reports on a case in which low serum oestriol excretion was the first abnormal laboratory value in a patient with only a few signs of Cushing's syndrome habitus and adrenal adenoma. 

15527127
Simultaneous extraction and fate of linear alkylbenzene sulfonates, coconut diethanol amides, nonylphenol ethoxylates and their degradation products in wastewater treatment plants, receiving coastal waters and sediments in the Catalonian area (NE Spain). 
The efficiency of six wastewater treatment plants (WWTPs) in the Catalonian region to remove several classes of ionic and non-ionic surfactants was investigated, using solid-phase extraction (SPE) followed by liquid chromatography-mass spectrometry (LC-MS). Occurrence and distribution of linear alkylbenzene sulfonates (LASs), coconut diethanol amides (CDEAs), nonylphenol ethoxylates (NPEOs) and their degradation products were studied in coastal areas receiving WWTP effluents. For the analysis of sediment samples pressurized liquid extraction (PLE) followed by SPE extract clean-up and LC-MS detection was used for simultaneous extraction of all target compounds. Concentrations of parent long ethoxy chain NPEOs in raw water entering WWTPs ranged from 60 to 190 microg/L. In effluents concentrations ranged from 2.8 to 6.6 microg/L, which corresponded to an average primary elimination of 93-96%. Nonylphenol (NP) was found in concentrations from 0.2 to 18 microg/L in WWTP influents and up to 5 microg/L in the treated water, showing a clear declining trend with respect to concentrations reported in the last 5 years. The elimination of LASs and CDEAs varied depending on the WWTP and was higher than 85% in well operated WWTPs with secondary treatment and only 56% (for CDEAs) and 30% (for LAS) in WWTPs with primary treatment. Levels up to 86 mg/kg of LAS, 1.7 mg/kg of NP, 400-760 microg/L for NPEOs and NPECs were detected in sediments at sampling points near the discharge of WWTP effluents, clearly showing that in coastal area receiving WWTP effluents surfactants and their degradation products are widespread contaminants. 

12374196
Ceramide regulation of apoptosis versus differentiation: a walk on a fine line. Lessons from neurobiology. 
One of the characteristics of ceramide-mediated biology is the variety of biological outcomes observed in response to its intracellular accumulation. The molecular mechanisms that govern the cell "decision-making" in response to ceramide remain largely unclear. In this perspective, the study of neural models has begun to provide important insight into the understanding of these mechanisms that regulate differentiation and cell death. Indeed, differentiation and cell death are among the most common effects elicited by ceramide in most cell types and in neural cells, too. Therefore, the lessons we may learn from the study of ceramide regulation of neurobiology would also shed light on the regulation of ceramide-mediated biology in other cellular models. Since increasing evidence links aberrant metabolism of ceramide to different pathologies, the understanding of the mechanisms underlying these events may represent the key to the design of novel therapeutic approaches. 

11899659
[Retention of a memory trace of learning induced by a new and extinctive stimulus in C57BL/6J and BALB/c mice] 
Influence of preliminary habituation to the experimental box on passive avoidance learning was studied in mice of C57BL/6J and BALB/c strains. The 20-fold preexposure of mice to the environmental stimulus inhibited the acquisition and consequent retention of a memory trace in BALB/c mice and did not affect the acquisition in C57BL/6J mice. Subsequent retention in this strain was facilitated. The interstrain differences are discussed with respect to detected genetically determined types of behavior and exstinctive inhibition at the habituation stage. 

15697181
The impact of toxicology on public health policy and service: an update. 
The Division of Toxicology, Agency for Toxic Substances and Disease Registry (ATSDR) has a Congressional mandate to develop toxicological profiles for chemicals of greatest concern at hazardous waste sites. These chemical profiles provide a comprehensive evaluation and interpretation of the health effects, chemical and physical properties, production and use, potential for human exposure, analytical methodologies, and regulations and advisories for those chemicals. In addition, these profiles identify critical gaps in the knowledge base for these chemicals and identify levels of significant human exposure. Health assessors and other public health officials use this information to make critical decisions regarding the potential for adverse health effects at hazardous waste sites and other chemical-release events through such activities as public health assessments, chemical-specific and health-specific consultations, health-guidance-value derivations, database development, and emergency response actions. In a previous paper, we provided an overview of six specific public-health activities conducted by the ATSDR Division of Toxicology and examined how these activities have made unique impacts on public health policy and service. In this paper, we follow up on two of these, ATSDR polychlorinated biphenyls (PCBs) activities and ATSDR mercury activities, and examine their long-term, continually evolving impacts on public health policy and service. 

8921944
Dendritic cells process exogenous viral proteins and virus-like particles for class I presentation to CD8+ cytotoxic T lymphocytes. 
Previous reports have indicated that both dendritic cells and macrophages have the ability to induce cytotoxic T lymphocyte (CTL) and T helper (Th) cell responses in vivo. Dendritic cells process exogenous antigens conventionally for presentation on major histocompatibility complex (MHC) class II molecules. However, unconventional processing of exogenous antigens in vitro for presentation on MHC class I molecules is still an open question. In this study, we report that a cloned dendritic cell line (D2SC/1) is able to present cell debris-associated exogenous viral proteins to MHC class I-restricted CTL in vitro. The dendritic cell line was very efficient in processing recombinant lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus nucleoprotein (LCMV NP) and presenting the class I-restricted epitope to CTL primed in vivo. Peritoneal macrophages could also process the recombinant LCMV NP for subsequent MHC class I presentation, but were less efficient compared to the dendritic cells. Furthermore, recombinant yeast-derived virus-like particles carrying the HIV-1 V3 loop (V3-VLP), which are protenaceous and do not contain any lipid, were also found to be efficiently processed by the dendritic cell line for presentation of the class I-restricted epitope. These results clearly indicate that viral proteins, in particulate form or associated with cell debris, are processed by dendritic cells for CTL induction. 

8782893
Identification of osmoresponsive neurons in the forebrain of the rat: a Fos study at the ultrastructural level. 
The aims of this study are twofold. The first is to describe the ultrastructural morphology of putative osmoreceptors concentrated in the ventral aspect of the lamina terminalis in the rat forebrain. The second is to determine whether or not these neurons lie within an area which lacks a blood-brain barrier, i.e. the organum vasculosum lamina terminalis. The results describe a compact population of neurons in the ventral part of the lamina terminalis which both respond to an osmotic challenge and project directly to the supraoptic nucleus. Injection of horseradish peroxidase into the circulation, as a marker to define areas of the brain without a blood-brain barrier, indicates that these neurons are in the dorsal aspect of the organum vasculosum of the lamina terminalis. An ultrastructural analysis of the neurons in this area, which respond to an osmotic challenge with an elevation of Fos protein, show them to have no specific morphological characteristics which differentiate them from other, non-responsive neurons in the organum vasculosum of the lamina terminalis. However, one possible exception is that osmotically sensitive neurons have a less indented nucleus, suggesting that they are in a more active state than their non-osmotically sensitive neighbours. It is concluded that neurons in this region of the brain are candidate structures for the "receptors" which mediate vasopressin release in response to an osmotic challenge. The response of only a subset of neurons in the organum vasculosum of the lamina terminalis to an osmotic stimulus, despite an apparent morphological homogeneity and the ability of blood borne agents to reach all parts of the structure suggests that osmoresponsiveness is conferred by unique membrane properties or intracellular processing events. The presence of synaptic input to osmoresponsive cells indicates a potential for integration of other inputs at this level. 

16332365
Cardiovascular malformations with normal smooth muscle differentiation in neural crest-specific type II TGFbeta receptor (Tgfbr2) mutant mice. 
Previous studies have demonstrated that TGFbeta induces a smooth muscle fate in primary neural crest cells in culture. By crossing a conditional allele of the type II TGFbeta receptor with the neural crest-specific Wnt1cre transgene, we have addressed the in vivo requirement for TGFbeta signaling in smooth muscle specification and differentiation. We find that elimination of the TGFbeta receptor does not alter neural crest cell specification to a smooth muscle fate in the cranial or cardiac domains, and that a smooth muscle fate is not realized by trunk neural crest cells in either control or mutant embryos. Instead, mutant embryos exhibit with complete penetrance two very specific and mechanistically distinct cardiovascular malformations--persistent truncus arteriosus (PTA) and interrupted aortic arch (IAA-B). Pharyngeal organ defects such as those seen in models of DiGeorge syndrome were not observed, arguing against an early perturbation of the cardiac neural crest cell lineage. We infer that TGFbeta is an essential morphogenic signal for the neural crest cell lineage in specific aspects of cardiovascular development, although one that is not required for smooth muscle differentiation. 

7161687
Combined use of ultrasound and computed tomography in the evaluation of fetal intracranial abnormality. 
Antenatal ultrasonic findings in two pregnancies with fetal intracranial abnormality were completed by taking a restricted number of computed tomography (CT) scans under ultrasonic control. General information achieved by CT was not greater compared with ultrasonography. CT demonstrated better than ultrasound the calcified areas in the intracranial teratoma of the fetus. In the case of fetal hydrocephaly the existence of a dilated, but otherwise intact cerebral ventricular system was established by CT after a somewhat controversial ultrasonic finding. CT can be used as a complementary examination when there are specific problems to be evaluated after antenatal ultrasonic scanning. CT should be used in these cases under ultrasonic control and the information of the both methods must be combined for the clinical decisions. 

1192655
Diagnosis and prognosis of acute cervical spinal cord injury. 
The diagnosis of complete or incomplete quadriplegia and designation of functional levels can be accurately determined during the first 24 hours after injury in virtually all cases of severe traumatic quadriplegia. The prognosis for recovery depends upon an understanding of regeneration of nerve roots following injury and the significance of return of involuntary reflex activity. A realistic prognosis and accurate evaluation of various forms of treatment depend upon accurate documentation of the pattern of sensory and motor deficits. 

8468529
Hepatic lipase treatment of chylomicron remnants increases exposure of apolipoprotein E. 
The consequences of hepatic lipase treatment of chylomicron remnants were studied. Rats were fed corn oil to induce production and secretion of chylomicrons and were then injected with polyclonal antiserum raised against hepatic lipase to specifically and quantitatively inhibit hepatic lipase activity in vivo. A fraction enriched in chylomicron remnants was isolated from rat plasma by a brief centrifugation step that preferentially isolates triglyceride-rich apolipoprotein (apo) B-48-containing lipoproteins. The chylomicron remnants were then treated with hepatic lipase in vitro, or incubated under identical conditions in the absence of enzyme (control incubations). Hepatic lipase-treated and control chylomicron remnants were isolated by a second brief centrifugation step using discontinuous salt gradients. Control lipoproteins were collected from one discrete band at d < 1.02 g/ml. Hepatic lipase-treated chylomicron remnants formed two discrete bands and were collected at two densities: d < 1.02 g/ml and 1.02 < d < 1.04 g/ml. The buoyant (d < 1.02 g/ml) subfraction of hepatic lipase-treated chylomicron remnants was depleted of 62% of the total phospholipid when compared to control d < 1.02 g/ml lipoproteins. The dense (1.02 < d < 1.04 g/ml) subfraction of hepatic lipase-treated chylomicron remnants was depleted of 65% of particle phospholipid content and 90% of particle triglyceride content when compared to control d < 1.02 g/ml lipoproteins. The dense (1.02 < d < 1.04 g/ml) subfraction of hepatic lipase-treated chylomicron remnants showed 5- to 7-fold greater immunoreactivity of apoE when compared to control lipoproteins in competitive displacement immunoassays. These data suggest that extensive hydrolysis of chylomicron remnant phospholipid and triglyceride leads to the formation of a dense remnant particle that contains highly exposed apoE. This increased exposure of apoE may be the key to the previously observed increased degradation of chylomicron remnants treated with hepatic lipase because more exposed apoE may bind better to cell surface lipoprotein receptors. Furthermore, the data imply that hepatic lipase cleaves chylomicron remnant phospholipid and triglyceride in a sequential fashion; hydrolytic intermediates depleted only of phospholipid precede the formation of a smaller dense remnant particle depleted of phospholipid and triglyceride. 

6488026
Karyometric development of four topographic subdivisions of the paraventricular nucleus in normal and castrated mice. 
A karyometric study of the spontaneous development of four topographic subdivisions in the paraventricular nucleus was made in male albino mice from the 5th to the 190th day of postnatal life. Another 25 animals were castrated at 20 days and examined at 25, 35, 45, 55 and 85 days of life. A comparison was established between both groups of mice. 

11593555
Enhancing effects of silkworm expressed recombinant human macrophage colony-stimulating factor on hematopoietic recovery of irradiation-injured mice. 
OBJECTIVE: To study the hematopoietic enhancing effects of recombinant human macrophage colony-stimulating factor (rhM-CSF) expressed in silkworm. METHOD: Balb/c mice were irradiated with sublethal dose of 60 Co gamma-rays and then administered intraperitoneally with silkworm expressed rhM-CSF (1000 U per individual for 7 days) in treatment group or with normal saline (for 7 days as well) in control group. The hematopoietic recovery of irradiation mice was observed by comparing peripheral white blood cell (WBC) counts, differential counts of WBC and bone marrow hematopoietic progenitor cell colony forming assay in soft agar at different time after irradiation. RESULTS: The total WBC counts (x 10(9)/L) of treatment group at day 15 and 20 after irradiation(3.42 +/- 1.20, 5.56 +/- 2.50, respectively) were significantly higher than those of control group (2.03 +/- 0.90, 3.72 +/- 2.30; both P < 0.05). On days 10, 15, 20, 25 and 30 after irradiation, the monocyte counts (x 10(9)/L) of treatment group (0.08 +/- 0.06, 0.16 +/- 0.10, 0.48 +/- 0.35, 0.47 +/- 0.21 and 0.33 +/- 0.17, respectively) were all significantly higher than those of control group (0.025 +/- 0.016, 0.05 +/- 0.04, 0.23 +/- 0.16, 0.33 +/- 0.19 and 0.17 +/- 0.13; all P < 0.05). On days 15, 20 and 25, the granulocyte count (X 10(9)/L) of treatment group (1.03 +/- 0.61, 2.18 +/- 1.19 and 3.28 +/- 1.09) were also higher than those of control group (0.62 +/- 0.37, 1.40 +/- 0.99 and 2.20 +/- 0.74; all P < 0.05). On day 9 after irradiation, the bone marrow CFU-GM yield of control group (19 +/- 11/10(6) cells) was significantly lower than that of treatment group (78 +/- 30/10(6) cells, P < 0.05). CONCLUSION: rhM-CSF expressed in silkworm could accelerate hematopoietic recovery in irradiated mice. 

15487590
Assessing genetic diversity of Ginkgo biloba l. (Ginkgoaceae) populations from China by RAPD markers. 
Genetic diversity and differentiation of nine populations of Ginkgo biloba L. (Ginkgoaceae)from China were evaluated using RAPD. Of 47 clear and repeatable RAPD bands, 46 were polymorphic (overall polymorphism = 97.9%). A ranged from 1.57 to 1.83 with a mean of 1.75. Mean He was 0.3159 (0.2429-0.3603). The Shannon index ranged from 0.3432 to 0.5119 with a mean of 0.4489. The GST was 0.1609 and AMOVA analysis indicated 89% of the variation within populations. UPGMA clustered the 9 populations into two groups: one containing only population JF and the other including 8 populations. Genetic diversity and differentiation of Chinese populations were higher than those of Korean and North American populations, which are ultimately descended from China, as reported previously. 

17657932
[Imaging in the screening and diagnosis of hepatocellular carcinoma in cirrhosis liver in Tunisia. A series of 30 cases] 
The aim of our study is to expose a practical screening and diagnosis strategy of HCC occuring in cirrhosis liver, which is nowadays a health public matter in Tunisia. METHODS: HCC routine screening in cirrhosis liver has been conducted every 6 months using a combination of abdominal sonography and serum alpha-foetoprotein levels. PCUS, CT scan or MRI have been performed each time a focal liver lesion was discovered in US, or in case of elevated serum alpha-foetoprotein levels. 30 cases of HCC were identified. RESULTS: US has shown a unique nodule in 46% of the cases, multiple nodules in 50% of them. No lesion has been discovered in 4% of the cases. Nodule size ranged from 8 to 140 mm. Heterogenous hyperechoic pattern was the most frequent one (41%). Hypervascular doppler feature was authentified in 20% of the cases. Serum alpha-foetoprotein levels had respectively a sensitivity and a specificity of 14% and 44% in lesions inferior to 3 cm, 62% and 80% in lesions superior to 3 cm. Typical arterial enhancement of HCC was depicted in 1 case for PCUS, in 76% for CT scan and 60% for MRI. CONCLUSION: Combination of abdominal sonography and serum alpha-foetoprotein levels practiced every 6 months represent a good compromise between cost and effectiveness. Second intention imaging is based on CT scan in Tunisia because of its availability compared to MRI. PCUS is becoming in the near future the best modality for lesion caracterization thanks to its safety and relative inexpensiveness. 

3620765
Co-ordinated countermeasures of Caribbean countries against the illicit drug traffic: recent developments and prospects. 
The illicit traffic in narcotic drugs and psychotropic substances presents a growing threat to the Caribbean countries and territories. The geographical location of the Caribbean subregion between the areas in South America producing illicit drugs and lucrative illicit markets in North America and Europe is an important factor contributing to an increasing involvement of the subregion in illicit drug trafficking operations. In addition, the archipelagic configuration of many of the countries and territories of the Caribbean makes it easier for traffickers to escape law enforcement action, thus providing a further stimulus to international drug trafficking. The Caribbean Governments have therefore initiated law enforcement countermeasures to combat drug trafficking and taken legal and administrative action to prevent and eradicate illicit cultivation of narcotic crops, as well as to prevent and reduce illicit demand for drugs. The Governments have also made increasing efforts to improve international and bilateral co-operation to combat drug trafficking and drug abuse. The decisive efforts of Caribbean Governments, however, are impeded, on the one hand, by the limited availability of trained professional manpower and of the technical and economic resources required to combat drug trafficking effectively, and, on the other hand, by the superior financial and technical capacity of the international drug trafficking organizations. The provision of technical and financial assistance by the international community to the countries and territories of the Caribbean is therefore needed to help overcome these constraints and to enable them to cope with the increasing drug problems in the subregion. 

1806046
Morphometric study of the LH-immunoreactive gonadotrophic cells of rats following treatment with methoclopramide. 
The LH-immunoreactive cells of the adult rat hypophysis were studied morphometrically after chronic treatment with methoclopramide. The morphological features of these cells showed modifications in both male and female rats, after treatment. Additionally, morphometric changes revealed a significant decrease (p less than 0.05) in both cytoplasmic area, which was more evident in the female rats, and nuclear area, with respect to the normal and control animals. These findings suggest that chronic inhibition of the dopaminergic system in rats atrophies LH-immunoreactive gonadotrophic cells of rats. 

2184006
Managing elevated blood lipid concentrations. Who, when and how? 
Patients with elevated serum cholesterol concentrations, particularly men, should be treated to lessen their chance of subsequent morbidity from coronary heart disease. Reduction of elevated triglyceride levels is more contentious, but is justified in severely affected individuals. The levels requiring treatment can only be judged by consideration of the overall clinical setting, including patient age and sex, the presence of other risk factors and the particular lipoprotein abnormality. In general, relative youth, male sex, a low level of high density lipoprotein (HDL) cholesterol and a strong family history of coronary heart disease will favour vigorous therapy. The possibility that hyperlipoproteinaemia is secondary to some other metabolic disorder should be considered, particularly in regard to elevated triglyceride levels. 

6242882
Ly-m11: the H-3 region of mouse chromosome 2 controls a new surface alloantigen. 
Spleen cells from an SJL mouse immunized with B10.S spleen cells were fused with the nonsecretor myeloma line NS.1. One established hybrid cell line continuously secreted antibody that recognized a new antigenic specificity, tentatively called "Ly-m11." This newly found antigen is detectable on nearly 100 percent of spleen and lymph-node cells, 70 percent of bone-marrow cells, and 20 percent of thymus cells by direct cytotoxicity assays, and on the cells derived from kidney and liver. Strains that are Ly-m11 (+) include C57BL/6, C57BL/10J, B10.S, C57BR/cdJ, C57L/J, and C57BL/KsJ. Other mouse strains so far tested are Ly-m11 (-). The strain distribution pattern distinguished Ly-m11 from any known murine lymphocyte alloantigens, but it follows the H-3 alpha haplotype which is defined by skin transplantation. Linkage tests of nine congenic strains of H-3 and/or H-13/alpha loci and five recombinant inbred lines including CXB, BXH, AKXL, SWXL, and BXD revealed no recombinations between H-3 and Ly-m11 loci on chromosome 2. This newly discovered Ly-m11 alloantigen could itself constitute a minor histocompatibility antigen detectable by serological means. 

2815746
[Two-step removal of Kehr's drain from the common bile duct] 
The removal of Kehr's drain from the common bile duct is not an indifferent procedure. In about 5% of cases complications develop, as described. Two-step removal of T drain prevents accumulation of bile around the defect in the common bile duct and development of such complications as massive escape of bile, septic complications, biliary peritonitis. In a group of 167 patients with T drain in whom the drain was removed in one step, three cases of serious complications developed, and in the group of 120 patients with two-step removal of T drain no complications were noted. 

9484435
Editing site recognition in plant mitochondria: the importance of 5'-flanking sequences. 
Cytidine to uridine (C-to-U) editing occurs in plant mitochondria with very high specificity such that only specific cytidines are converted to uridines. The mechanisms for editing site selection in plant mitochondria are unknown. In order to examine the determinants of editing site recognition, repeated mitochondrial DNA sequences that include edited nucleotides have been evaluated as editing substrates. During evolution the maize mitochondrial ribosomal protein subunit 12 (rps12) gene recombined with intron 1 of the ribosomal protein subunit 3 (rps3) gene and a region of the S1-like sequence of the 2.3 kb plasmid. These recombinations created a second copy of an internal portion of the rps12 gene, known as rps12b, which includes the first four editing sites of rps12 transcripts. The duplicated sequence extends seven nucleotides upstream of editing site 1 and six nucleotides downstream from editing site 4. The sequences of rps12 and rps12b are identical between these sites except for a single change at -5 from editing site 1. These modifications did not effect C-to-U conversion at editing sites 2, 3, or 4 in rps12b; however, no editing was detected at editing site 1 in rps12b cDNAs. Thus, the 5' recombination abolished editing at site I, while the 3' recombination modified the downstream RNA sequence, but did not effect editing at site IV. Secondary structure prediction suggests that changes in editing site recognition do not correlate with differences in secondary structures, and that primary RNA sequence may be responsible for editing site specification. 

16402108
Antiarrhythmic drug research. 
This article was written as part of the 75th anniversary celebration of the British Pharmacological Society (BPS). It discusses antiarrhythmic drug research conducted by members of BPS, and as published in the British Journal of Pharmacology (BJP). BPS members, past and present, as well as antiarrhythmic manuscripts published in the BJP have been identified. From these data, the article attempts to semiquantitatively summarize results published in the journal, but only quotes selected manuscripts and individuals. Apologies are offered for omissions and errors, but as in any history, a writer's biases and opinions are unavoidable. 

3006826
[Interaction of thymosin fraction 3 with opiate receptors] 
Using the radioreceptor method thymosin fraction 3 was demonstrated to displace 3H-morphine and 3H-naloxone from opiate receptor of crude membrane fraction of the rat brain. The value of EC50 ratio in the presence and absence of 100 mM NaCl seems to indicate that thymosin contains one or several partial agonists of morphine. Furthermore, the peptide nature of these ligands is suggested on the basis of enzymatic treatment data. The possible role of opioid peptides in the realization of thymus endocrine functions is discussed. 

9234444
The use of a mass-action model to validate the output from a stochastic simulation model of bovine viral diarrhoea virus spread in a closed dairy herd. 
The spread of bovine virus diarrhoea virus (BVDV) in a closed dairy herd maintained under typical management conditions is studied using two approaches. In the first instance a stochastic computer model is used to simulate the month-to-month changes in the infection status of each animal. These results are contrasted with the results of a mass-action model which uses three differential equations. A comparison of the two approaches indicates that the results are in broad agreement. The stochastic approach has the benefit of providing an estimate of the probability of the infection becoming extinct and the herd becoming BVDV-free for different herd sizes. 

10901823
Ethics in the practice of psychiatry in South Africa. 
OBJECTIVE: To determine attitudes with regard to ethics in the practice of psychiatry in South Africa. DESIGN: Cross-sectional survey. METHOD: The study utilised clinical vignettes, with gender and race of the patient as potential modifying variables in diagnosis and management. Open-ended questions pertaining to potential abuses were included. SETTING AND SUBJECTS: Questionnaires were mailed to all practising psychiatrists in South Africa in 1993 and 1994. OUTCOME MEASURES: Responses to questionnaire. RESULTS: A 40% response rate was obtained (N = 73). Patient race and gender did not influence diagnosis or have a marked impact on the prescription of treatment. Pressure from the patient's family on the psychiatrist did alter case management, as did the psychiatrist's age and gender in some instances. Racial discrimination, sexual misconduct and economic abuses were the most frequently cited areas of observed abuse. CONCLUSION: The development of an ethical framework for the practice of psychiatry in South Africa would appear to be of critical importance. 

15450735
Optimisation and validation of methods to assess single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs) in archival histological material. 
BACKGROUND AND PURPOSE: An increasing amount of evidence indicates that single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs) may affect a variety of oncology related phenotypes. Occasionally, it is convenient to base studies addressing genotype-phenotype relationships on historical patient cohorts, from which only archival specimens are available. This study was conducted to validate protocols optimised for assessment of SNPs based on paraffin embedded, formalin fixed tissue samples. PATIENTS AND METHODS: In 137 breast cancer patients, three TGFB1 SNPs were assessed based on archival histological specimens. In 37 of these patients, the SNPs were also assessed using cultured fibroblasts and the assays were validated by direct comparison of the results. From the remaining 100 patients, only archival material was available. In these patients, the existence of a genetic linkage pattern between the assessed TGFB1 SNPs was used to provide an indirect validation of the genotyping results. Furthermore, two different methods for DNA extraction were compared (semi-automatic DNA extraction using the ABI Prism 6100 Nucleic Acid PrepStation versus Proteinase K digestion for 5 days followed by boiling and DNA precipitation). RESULTS: Assessment of SNPs based on archival histological material is encumbered by a number of obstacles and pitfalls. However, these can be widely overcome by careful optimisation of the methods used for sample selection, DNA extraction and PCR. Within 130 samples that fulfil the criteria for analysis a highly reliable SNP assessment was observed. The study demonstrated that different 'down-stream applications' ('single nucleotide primer extension' or 'TaqMan-based' real-time PCR) could be used as genotyping procedure. CONCLUSIONS: Reliable assessment of SNPs in formalin-fixed paraffin-embedded specimens is possible but a number of precautions should be carefully taken. 

2262763
Relativism and stations of epistemic doubt. 
This sequence of studies examined the role that relativistic thinking plays in the cognitive and social-emotional lives of adolescents. Study 1 introduces an assessment strategy and associated descriptive model employed in evaluating how 70 concrete and formal operational adolescents differently interpret and resolve problems involving competing knowledge claims. A second study explored the relations between the epistemic orientations evidenced by 61 of these subjects and their current level of identity development. Study 3 compared the epistemic assumptions of a group of 29 psychiatrically hospitalized adolescents with those of a matched group of normal controls. Results from these studies indicate that relativistic approaches to problems of belief entitlement are: a) routinely characteristic of most normal adolescents; b) available to formal operational, but not concrete operational individuals; c) associated with more mature ego-identity statuses; and d) typically absent in groups of psychiatrically hospitalized youth. 

2578603
Desensitization of beta-adrenergic receptor-mediated vascular smooth muscle relaxation. 
Responsiveness to catecholamines may be blunted after prolonged exposure to an agonist; this phenomenon, termed desensitization, is often mediated by receptor down-regulation. beta-Adrenergic receptors mediate relaxation of vascular smooth muscle. We have examined the possibility that this response may be desensitized after prolonged exposure to increased concentrations of epinephrine. Rats were treated with epinephrine infusions (300 micrograms/kg/hr from a minipump) for 7 days and had levels of plasma epinephrine 70-fold greater than those of controls. The mesenteric artery rings from the epinephrine-treated rats contracted normally when exposed to serotonin; however, the extent of relaxation promoted by the beta-adrenergic agonist isoproterenol was blunted (86 +/- 4 vs. 43 +/- 9%; p less than 0.05). Acetylcholine and nitroglycerine, which may act through a cyclic GMP mechanism, caused virtually identical relaxation responses in both control and epinephrine-treated groups. To determine the mechanism for the loss in responsiveness to isoproterenol, we measured adrenergic receptors in individual mesenteric arteries using [125I]cyanopindolol. Specific binding of [125I]cyanopindolol was found to have the expected characteristics of interaction with beta receptors. There was no difference in the number of beta-adrenergic receptors between control and epinephrine-treated animals (24 +/- 5 vs. 26 +/- 6 fmol/mg of protein), although there was significantly marked down-regulation of beta-adrenergic receptors in hearts (23 +/- 2 vs. 10 +/- 1 fmol/mg of protein; p less than 0.001) and lungs (172 +/- 29 vs. 76 +/- 7 fmol/mg of protein; p less than 0.01) in the same rats. The ability of isoproterenol to stimulate cyclic AMP production in the mesenteric arteries from the two groups was not significantly different (20.3 +/- 3.5 vs. 23.8 +/- 4.7 pmol of cAMP/mg of protein/2 min). Furthermore, mesenteric artery relaxation was found to be decreased in response to the cyclic AMP analogue dibutyryl cyclic AMP (45 +/- 2.0 vs. 28 +/- 2.0%; p less than 0.001) in the epinephrine-infused rats. These data suggest that the desensitization of beta-adrenergic receptor-mediated smooth muscle relaxation may be caused by a mechanism distal to cyclic AMP production. 

8075219
Animal reservoirs for Trypanosoma cruzi infection in an endemic area in Paraguay. 
Animal reservoirs for Trypanosoma cruzi infection were investigated in 5 communities in the Department of San Pedro, currently one of Paraguay's most highly endemic areas. A total of 112 domestic animals (37 cattle, 2 horses, 1 ass, 20 pigs, 44 dogs and 8 cats) and 4 wild animals (1 white-eared opossum, 2 yellow armadillos and 1 common long-nosed armadillo) were examined for blood. Although no trypomastigotes were found by 2 direct observation methods, the microhaematocrit and Giemsa stained thick and thin smears methods, several forms of trypanosoma flagellates morphologically identical to T. cruzi were detected in the liver infusion tryptose (LIT) medium from a single sample taken from a yellow armadillo, Euphractus sexicintus. When serum samples of all the animals were examined for antibody to T. cruzi by direct agglutination (DA) test, 3 cattle, 2 pigs, 16 dogs and 3 cats had positive titers (1:32 or greater), but no wild animals showed positive reactions. T. cruzi was not found by culture nor microscopic examination of samples from any of the seropositive animals. However, domestic animals such as cattle, pigs, dogs and cats which were found to be seropositive in this study, possibly act as an animal reservoir in this endemic area as well as armadillos in which T. cruzi was observed. 

7099162
Generation of monoclonal DNP-specific IgM and IgE murine antibodies on the efficacy of hybridization. 
Murine hybridomas secreting monoclonal antibodies against the 2,4-dinitrophenyl (DNP) group were generated by fusion of NS1 mouse myeloma cells and mouse spleen cells. The spleen cells were obtained from recipient mice which had received spleen cells from syngeneic mice immunized with DNP-ovalbumin and which were subsequently infected with N.b. larvae simultaneously with the adoptive cell transfer. The recipient mice were immunized with DNP-N.b.-protein. Four fusion experiments were performed starting with spleen cells from recipient mice at days 5, 11, 20 and 44 after the adoptive cell transfer. Sixty-one hybrids out of 550 secreted immunoglobulins of an unknown specific including 4 IgE- and 7 IgM-secreting hybrids; 2 produced immunoglobulins of an unknown isotype. IgE clones were obtained only when the spleens were taken 1-2 weeks after the adoptive cell transfer, while only IgM-producing cells were generated with spleen cells 6 weeks after the adoptive cell transfer although the IgE-serum titers did not decline within this time period. The analysis of the light chains for the DNP-specific antibodies revealed seven with kappa- and three lambda-light chains. 

6646665
Comparison of oil adjuvant and aluminium phosphate-adsorbed toxoid for the passive immunization of lambs against tetanus. 
Immunization of ewes with oil emulsion toxoid followed by an aluminium phosphate-adsorbed toxoid both containing 10 Lf per dose, resulted in a very high antitoxin level in their lambs. Two injections of aluminium phosphate-adsorbed toxoid also imparted a passive immunity to lambs which is considered to be adequate to protect them against tetanus for 4 weeks after birth. 

6377524
Malaria 1984. Part I. Malaria prophylaxis. 
Guidelines are presented to assist the prescriber in arriving at a logical and up-to-date approach to the chemoprophylaxis of malaria, particularly for residents of and visitors to Africa. Areas of controversy are highlighted, with a critical but simplified practical approach being taken to a complex subject. The importance of a history of recent travel in a patient presenting with an unexplained fever is stressed. A series of tables listing geographical areas where chloroquine- and other drug-resistant Plasmodium falciparum is found is provided as an aid to the logical selection of prophylactic agents for the traveller. For convenience, tables of dosages for all ages are given. Similarly, an algorithm is provided to facilitate decision-making in drug usage. The controversial topic of malaria prophylaxis in pregnancy is discussed in the light of published information. Although the prophylaxis of possible drug-resistant malaria has been alluded to in Part I, in Part II of this series the treatment and theoretical aspects of resistant malaria will be covered with a view to providing guidelines for those faced with this ever-increasing problem. 

2041230
A bacteriological study of perforated duodenal ulcers. 
Peritoneal fluid sampling and bacteriological examination were performed in 63 patients with perforated duodenal ulcers, and the results compared with those in 175 patients with other perforations. Bacterial culture was positive in 100 per cent of the patients whose perforations occurred in the colon, whereas it was positive in only 44.4 per cent of those with duodenal perforations, being negative in many cases when the interval from perforation to surgery was short. A mixed contamination with both aerobes and anaerobes was usually found in the cases of lower digestive tract perforation, and the isolates from duodenal perforations were uniquely aerobes in most cases. It is suggested that bacteria play a minor role in the pathogenesis of early stage duodenal perforation, which supports the technique of primary closure without indwelling drainage tubes during early stage operations following sufficient peritoneal lavage. Moreover, if the stomach is empty at the time of perforation and the peritonitis is localized, even conservative therapy seems possible, provided it is begun shortly after the perforation. 

7193455
A comparison of the relationships between progestin receptors and oestrogen receptors in neural and non-neural target tissues of the rat during the oestrous cycle. 
Similar cyclic changes in the content of nuclear oestrogen receptor occurred in the hypothalamus, cerebral cortex, uterus and pituitary during the oestrous cycle. The relationship of the unoccupied to the total nuclear oestrogen receptor at each phase was similar in all these tissues. However, cyclic changes in the content of the cytosol progestin receptor occurred only in the uterus and pituitary (where they paralleled changes in the nuclear oestrogen receptor), but not in the hypothalamus or cerebral cortex. 

16812050
Repeated acquisition of conditional discriminations. 
A new technique was developed to study the repeated acquisition of conditional discriminations. Using a discrete trial procedure, pigeons were required to learn during each session a different two-member chain of conditional discriminations. Key color and geometric forms were used as stimuli. After the pigeons had reached a steady state of relearning (40 to 60 sessions), the technique was used to investigate variables that have previously been shown to affect the repeated acquisition of response sequences. Various (0 to 90 seconds) durations of timeout for errors were investigated in Experiment I. The stimulus change associated with a timeout, rather than its duration, was found to be the critical variable in acquisition of the discrimination. Extended training on a single chain was found to reduce total errors across sessions in Experiment II. Extended training (three sessions) did not, however, change the pattern of within-session error reduction. In some cases, extended training facilitated acquisition of a partially reversed discrimination. In Experiment III, color rather than chain position was found to control behavior, for three of the four birds, as the second stimulus dimension in the conditional situation. The results of these experiments replicate and extend previous findings concerning some of the variables that affect the repeated acquisition of response sequences. 

8520771
Muscle strength, symptom intensity, and exercise capacity in patients with cardiorespiratory disorders. 
The contribution of muscle strength to symptom intensity and work capacity was examined in normal individuals and patients with cardiorespiratory disorders. Respiratory muscle strengths (maximal inspiratory and expiratory pressures) and peripheral muscle strengths (leg extension, leg flexion, seated bench press, and seated row) were measured in 4,617 subjects referred for clinical exercise testing. Subjects then rated the intensity of leg effort, discomfort with breathing (dyspnea), and chest pain (Borg scale) during an incremental exercise task (100 kpm/min each minute) to capacity on a cycle ergometer. Subjects were classified into groups on the basis of pulmonary function, drug therapy for cardiac disorders, and the presence of chest pain during exercise with electrocardiographic changes indicative of myocardial ischemia. Respiratory and peripheral muscle strengths, normalized for differences in age, sex, and height, were significantly reduced in patients with cardiorespiratory disorders compared with normal individuals. Muscle strength was a significant contributor to symptom intensity and work capacity in both health and disease; a two-fold increase in muscle strength was associated with a 25 to 30% decrease in the intensity of both leg effort and dyspnea and a 1.4- to 1.6-fold increase in work capacity. These results emphasize the need for an integrative approach in the assessment and therapeutic management of exercise intolerance, which considers the contribution of muscle weakness to excessive symptoms and reduced work capacity, in addition to the contribution of ventilatory, gas exchange, and circulatory impairments. 

2591199
The cuticular proteins from free-living and parasitic stages of Haemonchus contortus--I. Isolation and partial characterization. 
1. Cuticles were isolated from the adult males, adult females, the second molt (2M) sheath from the infective larvae (L3(2M)), and the parasitic third stage (L3) of the sheep parasite Haemonchus contortus by a combination of mechanical disruption and detergent treatment. 2. The 2ME soluble cuticular proteins from adult males contained 4 or 5 major protein bands with molecular weights ranging from 100 to 56 kD with the most prominent band at 56 kD. The cuticular proteins from adult females were similar to the male. 3. Cuticular proteins from the larval stages, 2M cuticle, and L3 cuticle, differed from the adults and from each other. The most prominent protein bands were observed with molecular weights on 78 and 39 kD for the L3 cuticle and 100, 91 and 46 kD for the 2M cuticle. The 2ME soluble cuticular proteins from all developmental stages were at least partially digested by bacterial collagenase. 4. The amino acid composition of cuticular proteins was similar for the L3 and 2M, but adults had lesser amounts of glycine and greater amounts of basic amino acids than the larval stages. The amount of the isolated cuticle solubilized by the 2ME treatment was greatest in adults (80%) compared to the L3 (64%) and the 2M (22%). 5. These results support a hypothesis that there are quantitative and qualitative stage specific differences in the cuticular proteins of H. contortus. 

17369841
Characterization of Jumping translocation breakpoint (JTB) gene product isolated as a TGF-beta1-inducible clone involved in regulation of mitochondrial function, cell growth and cell death. 
Jumping translocation breakpoint (JTB) is a gene located on human chromosome 1 at q21 that suffers an unbalanced translocation in various types of cancers, and potentially encodes a transmembrane protein of unknown function. The results of cancer profiling indicated that its expression was suppressed in many cancers from different organs, implying a role in the neoplastic transformation of cells. Recently, we isolated JTB as a TGF-beta1-inducible clone by differential screening. In this study, we characterized its product and biological functions. We found that it was processed at the N-terminus and located mostly in mitochondria. When expressed in cells, JTB-induced clustering of mitochondria around the nuclear periphery and swelling of each mitochondrion. In those mitochondria, membrane potential, as monitored with a JC-1 probe, was significantly reduced. Coinciding with these changes in mitochondria, JTB retarded the growth of the cells and conferred resistance to TGF-beta1-induced apoptosis. These activities were dependent on the N-terminal processing and induced by wild-type JTB but not by a mutant resistant to cleavage. These findings raised the possibility that aberration of JTB in structure or expression induced neoplastic changes in cells through dysfunction of mitochondria leading to deregulated cell growth and/or death. 

8965193
Peptide T and glucose metabolism in AIDS dementia complex. 
AIDS dementia complex (ADC) is the most common presenting neurologic manifestation of human immunodeficiency virus (HIV)-1 infection. We report FDG-PET studies in a 39-year-old man who had ADC and completed a 12-wk treatment protocol with 1.2 mg/day of intranasal peptide T, one before and one after 12 wk of treatment with peptide T. Peptide T is an octapeptide under investigation for treatment of ADC patients. Values of rCMRglc were converted to Z scores using the mean and standard deviation of values of rCMRglc in three HIV-seronegative matched controls, each of which was studied twice, at the beginning and end of a 12-wk interval. Thirty-five of 60 regions assayed showed Z scores with absolute values > or = 3 (considered abnormal) in the baseline study. Regions with high absolute values of Z scores were located in subcortical areas and in the limbic system, and to a lesser degree in the frontal, temporal and parietal lobes. Thirty-four of these 35 regions showed remission (decrease in the absolute values of Z scores) after treatment. Only one region showed no improvement in the second study. Three regions with absolute values of Z scores < 3 in the baseline study manifested Z scores with magnitudes > or = 3 in the second study. These preliminary observations suggest that functional neuroimaging techniques provide a useful tool in the evaluation of the response to treatment in ADC patients. 

5060948
The effect of intrauterine contraceptive device (IUD) on pregnancy in the rabbit. 
Rabbits were inserted with 10 cm of Silastic tubing in 1 uterine horn; blastocysts were collected from the control or treated horn on Pregnancy Day 5 and transferred to the opposite horn. 16 of 22 (72%) blastocysts implanted into an IUD horn failed to survive to Day 23. 10 of 16 (62.5%) blastocysts transferred to the control horn were found implanted on Day 12 and 9 pups were delivered. In other rabbits with su rgical anastomosis between the 2 horns, 99.5% of implantations survived from Day 12 to 23 in control horns, but only 20% in IUD horns. The leukocyte counts was markedly elevated in IUD horns and only moderately in control horns. These data indicate that the antifertility effect of the IUD is largely due to its direct contact with the developing embryos and the endometrium. 

1413251
Molecular-resolution images of aspirin crystals with atomic force microscopy. 
The atomic force microscope was developed in order to image arrays of molecules on the (001), (100) and (011) faces of aspirin crystals in water. Lattice spacings and symmetries of methyl groups and the part of the phenyl groups on the (001) face in water are consistent with X-ray diffraction data. Surfaces of the (100) face that show the best-developed cleavage, in general, are difficult to image. Although the lattice constant derived from (100) image is consistent with the X-ray diffraction data, the c-glide plane symmetry is lost and diffused spots are observed that are 1.8-3.1 times more elongated than (001) spots. It is not possible to image the (011) surface. This initial success in imaging the molecular crystal surfaces of drug compounds has clarified the different submolecular structures of the three different crystal faces, and the close relationship between the imaging difficulties and the differences in the dissolution process in water. 

6637528
Coronary arterial disease and atheromatosis in breeding sows. 
The reported investigations were carried out on old breeding sows belonging to the Big White Polish Breed (BWPB) which were compared with a control group of young female pigs before fertilization, belonging to the same breed. In the perinatal period the animals were examined for presence of chronic ischaemic heart disease by clinical methods and ECG. In the interoestrus period determinations were performed in the serum of total cholesterol, free cholesterol, cholesterol esters, triglycerides, free fatty acids, total lipids and lipoprotein fractions. After killing the animals the heart and the coronary arteries were examined macroscopically and microscopically. Clinical examinations demonstrated coronary failure confirmed by ECG investigations. A correlation was found between hyperlipidaemia, particularly dyslipoproteinaemia, and advanced arteriomediosclerosis of the intramural vessels of the left ventricle, with selective, evident atherosclerotic changes in the left main coronary artery. Correlations and clinico-pathological interrelations are discussed between coronary failure, hyperlipidaemia and morphological changes in the left part of the heart. 

7110476
Effect of furosemide on renal size: ultrasonic characterization of renovascular hypertension. 
In this pilot study, sequential ultrasonic scanning was used to assess (a) whether furosemide injection normally causes an enlargement of kidney size, and (b) whether this effect is blunted in renovascular hypertensives to such a degree as to bear potential diagnostic value. Furosemide caused similar degrees of maximal area enlargement in both kidneys of 10 healthy subjects (16.1 +/- 3.9%) and 10 essential hypertensives (14.8 +/- 4.2%) whereas in 11 renovascular patients maximal distension of the affected kidneys was significantly blunted (9.4 +/- 3.7%) in comparison with that of contralateral kidneys (19.6 +/- 7.7%). In the 6 hypertensives with one small kidney not due to renal artery stenosis, maximal enlargement of the affected kidneys averaged 22.8 +/- 5.1%, and that of contralateral kidneys 15.8 +/- 4.2%. In 8 out of the 11 patients with renovascular hypertension the difference in response between the paired kidneys had values outside the ranges of patients with both the other forms of arterial hypertension. The data suggest that the furosemide test may be of value in the screening for renovascular hypertension. 

8857480
Comparison of standard- and extended-length participation in cardiac rehabilitation on body composition, functional capacity, and blood lipids. 
Participation in a standard-length outpatient cardiac rehabilitation program (CRP) for 3 months is known to result in positive changes in body composition, functional capacity, and blood lipids in patients with coronary artery disease. However, there has been little attempt to compare patients who remain active in a formal CRP for an extended length of >1 year with patients who exit after a standard length of 3 months. Consequently, 50 patients underwent a series of tests including a maximal graded exercise treadmill test, assessment of body composition, and fasting blood lipid analysis, at entry to CRP and after a follow-up period that ranged from 1 to 5 years. All patients participated in a standard multidisciplinary cardiac rehabilitation program for 3 months. Twenty-five patients discontinued participation after 3 months and received no other contact from the program staff until follow-up, whereas 25 patients remained active in the program until follow-up. After statistically adjusting for baseline differences between the groups, significant differences were observed between the extended- and standard-length groups at follow-up for body weight (177 vs 183 lbs), percent fat (22% vs 24%), METS (10.5 vs 8.4), high-density lipoprotein level cholesterol (44 vs 39 mg/dl), total cholesterol/high-density lipoprotein ratio (5.2 vs 6.1), and triglycerides (134 vs 204 mg/dl), respectively. No significant differences in the adjusted means were observed between the groups at follow-up for total cholesterol (209 vs 219 mg/dl) and low-density lipoprotein cholesterol (136 vs 138 mg/dl). Data from this study demonstrate the efficacy of extended participation in CRP on body composition, functional capacity, and blood lipids. Greater efforts need to be directed at retaining patients in low-cost, center-based maintenance programs and at extending monitoring of patients exiting standard length CRPs. 

17043530
Basic Science for the Clinician 31: CD Molecules of Relevance to Immunity, Inflammation, and Rheumatologic Syndromes. 
Molecular biologic technology has allowed us to study some of the many proteins expressed by leukocytes at different stages of differentiation, activation, and proliferation. Being able to purify cells with 1 or more surface molecules (eg, by FACS or lysis) with monoclonal antibodies and complement and identifying changes as cells are stimulated or activated has given us real insights into what is happening and how we might be able to modify cells that are going astray (eg, malignancy, autoimmunity). Over the years, there has been remarkable cooperation between laboratories to bring order out of chaos; by trading reagents, scientists have been able to identify the molecules being identified by different laboratories and come up with standardized names, often within the CD, or "clusters of differentiation," framework. These names are not acronyms, and the function and role of the molecule bearing a certain CD designation is not apparent. Worse, the proliferation of numbered CD molecules (over 250, with more to come after another conference in 2004) makes interpretation of the literature very difficult for those not immersed in the field. Thus, I have chosen (nearly arbitrarily and often based on my own interests) a number of CD molecules to briefly describe, pointing out the clinical relevance of each. It is worth reflecting on the fact that many of these were discussed in previous contributions to this series (as is pointed out in the following article). For those of you with the fortitude to follow this series, see how far you (and all of science) have come! 

17383325
Surgical outcome of colon interposition by the posterior mediastinal route for thoracic esophageal cancer. 
BACKGROUND: For thoracic esophageal cancer patients with a history of gastrectomy, esophageal reconstruction using segments of colon was often accomplished using the anterior mediastinal route to avoid fatal complications related to colon necrosis. Our aim was to review our experience with reconstruction by the posterior mediastinal route and assess the surgical outcomes. METHODS: Between 1989 and August 2006, 34 esophageal cancer patients at Akita University Hospital underwent esophageal reconstruction accomplished by colon interposition by the posterior mediastinal route. Data from these patients were reviewed. RESULTS: Colon conduits consisted of left colon segments in 4 patients and right colon segments in 30. The grafts were supplied with blood by the left colonic artery in 13 patients, the middle colonic artery in 20, and the right colonic artery in 1. The esophagocolic (pharyngocolic) anastomosis was located in the neck in 33 patients (97%) and in the thorax in 1. No patient died during the initial hospital stay. There were no instances of colon necrosis. An anastomotic fistula occurred in 3 patients (9%). Proximal anastomotic strictures occurred in 2 patients (6%). No late graft redundancies resulting in significant dysphagia occurred. Reductions in body weight did not differ from those seen when the gastric tube was used for reconstruction, and alimentary function was good after surgery. The 1-, 2-, 3-, and 5-year survival rates were 66%, 52%, 48%, and 48%, respectively. CONCLUSIONS: Colon interposition by the posterior mediastinal route provides a good outcome and is considered the route of first choice. 

1785411
[Removal of renal cell carcinoma extending into the right atrium: report of a case] 
A 65-year old man presented with a seven-month history of macrohematuria and left back pain. Abdominal ultrasonography, enhanced computed tomographic (CT) scanning, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), selective renal angiography and vena cavography revealed a left renal tumor extending into the inferior vena cava and right atrium. Surgery was performed using the cardiopulmonary bypass and the whole tumor was resected grossly except for the tumor invading into the lumbar vein. The patient recovered promptly but died from cancer metastasis six months after operation. 

17129743
Partial hypoxanthine-guanine phosphoribosyl transferase deficiency without elevated urinary hypoxanthine excretion. 
Partial hypoxanthine-guanine phosphoribosyl transferase (HGPRT) deficiency, also known as the Kelley-Seegmiller syndrome, can give rise to a wide range of neurological symptoms, and renal insufficiency. Biochemically, it is characterized by high uric acid concentrations in blood, high uric acid and hypoxanthine excretion in urine, and decreased activity of hypoxanthine-guanine phosphoribosyl transferase activity (HGPRT). However, normal uric acid concentrations in blood and uric acid excretions in urine have been reported. Here, a boy is presented with normal development and suffering from recurrent attacks of acute renal failure with slightly to clearly increased urinary uric acid excretion. Between these attacks, episodes of elevated urinary excretion of uric acid were observed with normal blood concentrations of uric acid and normal urinary excretion of hypoxanthine. HGPRT activity in erythrocytes, leukocytes, and fibroblasts was found to be strongly decreased. This case shows that not only normal blood uric acid but also normal urinary hypoxanthine concentrations do not exclude the diagnosis of partial HGPRT deficiency. 

8831961
Disposition of human drug preparations in the horse. V. Orally administered oxprenolol. 
Urinary concentrations of the beta-antagonist oxprenolol and some of its major human metabolites were determined following oral administration of a dose of 160 mg to five fasted horses. Quantitation was performed by gas chromatography-mass spectrometry (GC-MS) in the selected ion mode (SIM) by monitoring ion m/z 466 of the heptafluorobutyric derivatives. As early as 2 h after dosage oxprenolol could be detected in hydrolysed urine and remained detectable up to 24 h. Maximum urinary concentrations and excretion rates were obtained between 2 and 12 h. After 12 h only 2.8% of the administered dose was excreted as conjugates of oxprenolol and major human metabolites including 4-OH-oxprenolol and 5-OH-oxprenolol. These metabolites were detectable up to 48 h. 

14575515
Novel efficient preparative method for phthalocyanines from phthalimides and phthalic anhydride with HMDS. 
A convenient synthesis of peripherally substituted or unsubstituted phthalocyanines having a variety of metals is described. Phthalocyanines can be obtained by heating phthalimides or phthalic anhydride with metal salts, hexamethyldisilazane, a catalytic amount of p-TsOH, and DMF at 150 degrees C. 

8304473
Effect of cigarette smoke and its condensates on alveolar epithelial cell injury in vitro. 
The oxidant-antioxidant balance in the airspaces of the lungs may be critical in protecting the lungs from the effects of cigarette smoke. We studied the effect of cigarette smoke and its condensates on the detachment, attachment, and proliferation of the A549 human alveolar epithelial cell line, in an in vitro model of cell injury and regeneration and the protective effects of antioxidants. Whole and vapor phase cigarette smoke decreased 51Cr-labeled A549 cell attachment, increased cell detachment, and decreased cell proliferation, as assessed by [3H]thymidine uptake. Freshly isolated rat type II alveolar epithelial cells showed an enhanced susceptibility to smoke-induced cell lysis when compared with the A549 cell line. Reduced glutathione (GSH) (400 microM) protected against the effects of cigarette smoke exposure on cell attachment, proliferation, and detachment. Depletion of intracellular GSH with buthionine sulfoxamine enhanced the epithelial cell detachment injury produced by smoke condensates. We conclude that cigarette smoke and its condensates cause an oxidant-induced injury to A549 human type II alveolar epithelial cells. Both intra- and extracellular GSH have important roles in protecting epithelial cells from the injurious effects of cigarette smoke. 

12009968
Novel method for detecting bovine immunoglobulin G in dried porcine plasma as an indicator of bovine plasma contamination. 
Current U.S. Food and Drug Administration regulations prohibit feeding of protein derived from mammalian tissue, excluding blood and blood products and any product that consists entirely of porcine or equine protein. A novel lateral flow immunoassay device has been developed that can quickly and qualitatively determine the presence of bovine immunoglobulin G (IgG), a major component in blood products, at very low levels (0.01% v/v). The device can be used to test for bovine IgG commingling in spray-dried porcine plasma used in the feed industry. Producers and consumers alike could use this device to verify product content at threshold levels. 

1541638
Intercellular space is affected by the polysialic acid content of NCAM. 
We have previously proposed that polysialic acid (PSA), which is attached to NCAM on the cell surface, can serve to regulate a variety of cell-cell interactions. The present study provides evidence that hydrated PSA influences a sufficiently large volume at the cell surface to exert broad steric effects, and that the removal of PSA in fact causes a detectable change in intercellular space. Using F11 neuron/neuroblastoma hybrid cells as a model system, the measured density and size of PSA suggests that a substantial fraction of the space between two apposed cell surface membranes could be sterically influenced by the presence of PSA. Specific enzymatic removal of PSA, which is similar in magnitude to changes that occur in many tissues during normal development, caused about a 25% decrease in the distance between two apposed cells. By contrast, removal of both heparan sulfate and chondroitin sulfate from the cells had no effect on this parameter. It is proposed that such changes in membrane-membrane distance could serve to alter selectively the efficiency of encounter between complementary receptors on apposing cells, and explain at least in part the broad biological influences of PSA. 

15266614
Does bilirubin protect against hemochromatosis gene (HFE) related mortality? 
Serum bilirubin is an important antioxidant that is found at increased levels in hereditary hemochromatosis patients. We hypothesized that increased levels of serum bilirubin may play a protective role against oxidative stress induced by iron overload in carriers of mutations in the hereditary hemochromatosis gene (HFE). We studied the relation between serum total bilirubin, serum iron levels, the HFE C282Y and H63D mutations, and mortality. The study was conducted in 2,332 randomly selected subjects from the Rotterdam Study, a population-based follow-up study of people aged 55 years or over. Serum bilirubin levels were significantly correlated with serum iron (Pearson's correlation coefficient (r) = 0.4, P < 0.001), transferrin saturation (r = 0.4, P < 0.001), and serum ferritin (r = 0.2, P < 0.05). Carriers of the HFE mutations had higher levels of bilirubin compared to wild-type homozygotes. The relation was the strongest in H63D heterozygotes or homozygotes and C282Y heterozygotes. High levels of serum bilirubin were associated with a 2.8 (95% CI 0.9-8.8) fold reduction in mortality in H63D homozygotes and a 2.2 (1.0-4.7) fold reduction in mortality in C282Y heterozygotes. Taken together, our data suggest that the high levels of the antioxidant bilirubin may counteract the adverse effect of oxidative stress induced by iron overload. This may explain in part the reduced penetrance of the HFE mutations. 

2442873
False positive beta-human chorionic gonadotropin in testicular cancer. 
Persistent elevations in serum markers after chemotherapy for germ cell testicular carcinoma indicate residual disease. We report on a patient with advanced seminoma with choriocarcinoma who had elevated serum beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-HCG) and residual masses on computerized tomography scan after chemotherapy. Wedge liver resection and retroperitoneal node dissection yielded only necrotic tissue which assayed and immunoperoxidase stained positively for beta-HCG. Serum beta-HCG fell to undetectable levels postoperatively, and the patient remains disease-free after three years. Phagocytosis of necrotic tumor apparently released entrapped beta-HCG resulting in a false positive tumor marker. 

9829638
Saquinavir delays the emergence of zidovudine resistance in HIV-1 seropositive patients treated with combination therapy. 
During a randomized double-blind study to assess the antiviral activity of saquinavir (SQV) alone or in combination with zidovudine (ZDV), the emergence of phenotypic resistance was evaluated in 44 patients treated with SQV (13 subjects), ZDV (14 subjects), and SQV plus ZDV (17 subjects). A significant (P< 0.05) lower CD4+ cell count and higher HIV RNA copy number at entry were found in six patients who developed resistant viral strain (3 to ZDV and 3 to SQV) during the first 4 months of treatment. After 1 year, drug-resistant strains (12 to ZDV and 14 to SQV) were isolated in 26 out of 37 patients. A significant higher number of patients treated with ZDV alone (10/13) harbored ZDV-resistant strains compared to patients treated by combination therapy (2/13); whereas more than 50% of patients had SQV-resistant strains aside from treatment. Early SQV-resistant strains were isolated in a limited number of patients treated with SQV alone (3/13). The rates of emergence of resistant strains during ZDV or SQV monotherapies are comparable. Combination therapy may delay the emergence of phenotypic resistance to either drugs in the short term and to ZDV, but not to SQV, at least after 1 year. 

3525787
Immunofluorescent localization of structural collagen types in endochondral fracture repair. 
A nonimmobilized rat tibial fracture model of endochondral osseous repair was examined for the unique localizations of specific collagen genetic types. At various stages of the healing process, the demineralized callus was reacted with immunofluorescent antibodies directed against the type specific forms of matrix collagen. Type III collagen rapidly appeared (day 8-10) and remained in the primitive mesenchymal callus until remodeled. It was particularly prominent in the highly vasoformative regions and the pericallus encapsulation but not present in preexisting cortical and neoformed lamellar bone. The type II collagen, a marker of cartilage, was uniquely located only in areas of chondroid differentiation and calcification. Type II collagen was absent from all bone and was not identified beneath the repairing intact periosteum. The differentiating chondrocytes synthesized type II collagen on an underlayer of type III collagen already within the mesenchymal matrix. From these studies of genetically unique collagen markers, it appears that only in areas of motion or anoxia does an intermediate of chondroid tissue appear. The utilization of specific type II and type III collagen immunofluorescent antibodies has facilitated the understanding of the fracture repair process and has acted as an indicator for unique matrix components. 

1521837
Genotoxicity studies of the food additive ester gum. 
Ester gum (EG) is used in citrus oil-based beverage flavourings as a weighting or colouring agent. In the present study, concentrations of 50, 100 and 150 mg/kg body weight were administered orally to male Swiss albino mice, and sister chromatid exchange and chromosomal aberration were used as the cytogenetic endpoints to determine the genotoxic and clastogenic potential of the food additive. Although EG was weakly clastogenic and could induce a marginal increase in sister chromatid exchange frequencies, it was not a potential health hazard at the doses tested. 

8946071
Arterial stiffening: opposing effects of age- and hypertension-associated structural changes. 
This article reviews the effects of aging and hypertension on geometrical (lumen and arterial wall thickness) and functional (distensibility) properties of large and medium-sized arteries in humans. Several clinical and animal studies show that arterial wall hypertrophy does not increase the elastic modulus of the arterial wall material during sustained essential hypertension. The structural changes associated with either hypertension or aging have opposing effects on arterial distensibility, under similar transmural conditions: the former increasing it, the latter decreasing it. Thus, hypertension cannot be assimilated to aging. The structural and functional changes of the arterial wall material that are associated with the hypertension-induced hypertrophy could be a means by which medium-sized arteries maintain their distensibility characteristics despite increased distending pressure, and large arteries compensate for the age-induced decrease in arterial compliance. 

3629829
[Chemical synovectomy in hemophilia patients] 
Results of chemical synovectomy of knee joints with 70 per cent ethyl alcohol were analyzed in patients with hemophilia. The chemical synovectomy proved to be effective at early stages of hemophilic arthropathy and may be used in order to prevent progress of hemophilic arthropathy in patients with recurrent hemarthroses. 

1849403
Retinoic acid induces liver/bone/kidney-type alkaline phosphatase gene expression in F9 teratocarcinoma cells. 
All-trans retinoic acid (RA) induces alkaline phosphatase (ALP) activity by 3-8-fold in murine F9 teratocarcinoma cells, in parallel with their differentiation towards primitive endoderm. The elevation of ALP activity is associated with increases in the amounts of liver/bone/kidney-type ALP protein and the respective transcript. These effects of RA are due to activation of ALP gene transcription rather than to an increase in the half-life of the mRNA. Induction of ALP mRNA does not require de novo protein synthesis, since it is not blocked by treatment with cycloheximide. Dibutyryl cyclic AMP, which is known to induce further differentiation of F9 cells from the primitive to the parietal endoderm, blocks the induction of ALP mRNA by RA. 

11278109
Episodic retrieval is reflected by a process specific increase in human electroencephalographic theta activity. 
Is an increase in theta during retrieval due (primarily) to the access of a stored code or to more general processes? The electroencephalogram was recorded while subjects performed a recognition task with pictures. According to the event-related desynchronization/synchronization method, the percentage of band power changes was calculated during encoding and retrieval for a theta and three alpha bands. Significant results were obtained (with minor exceptions) only in the theta band. The increase in theta was significantly larger during retrieval than during encoding but did not differ significantly between new and successfully retrieved old pictures. Because a memory trace is lacking for new pictures, the increase in theta during retrieval reflects primarily general processing demands of a complex episodic memory system. 

11731976
Changes in the composition of the urine of yellow-vented bulbuls (Pycnonotus xanthopygos): the effects of ambient temperature, nitrogen, and water intake. 
Uricotely (uric acid >50% of urinary nitrogen) in birds was once considered ubiquitous. However, Anna's hummingbirds (Calypte anna) have been shown to be an exception to this rule; under conditions of low ambient temperature (T(a)) and on a nitrogen-free diet, they increased their water intake and often became ammonotelic (ammonia >50% of urinary nitrogen). Our aim was to identify the effects of nitrogen intake, water intake, and T(a) on the ammonia excretion of yellow-vented bulbuls (Pycnonotus xanthopygos). We chose this predominantly frugivorous species because many of the characteristics of nectarivores that were used to explain increased ammonia excretion by C. anna are also characteristics of frugivorous birds. We assayed ureteral urine composition in eight yellow-vented bulbuls (P. xanthopygos), each randomly allocated a diet of 20% (0.6 M) sucrose solution supplemented by either 1.03 g/L or 7.23 g/L soy protein and held at a T(a) of either 28 degrees C or 10 degrees C. Food, and therefore water, intake rates varied with nitrogen intake but not with T(a). Food intake increased significantly with decreased nitrogen intake, while concentrations of all the excretory compounds in the urine (P<0.05) decreased; yet their proportions in the urine did not change significantly. The lower T(a) had no significant effect on food intake or on the concentration of uric acid. However, at 10 degrees C, the ammonia and urea concentrations increased (P<0.05), and this led to a significant increase in the proportion of ammonia in the urine. Our results demonstrate that, when bulbuls are exposed to low T(a), they are able to save energy by increasing the proportion of the ammonia in their urine. 

16562476
[Relationship of the intensity of Schistosoma japonicum infection to the variation in individual egg count] 
OBJECTIVE: To investigate the relationship of the intensity of Schistosoma japonicum infection with the variation in individual egg counts. METHODS: Stool specimens were collected from residents in a village in Jiangxi Province and examined with Kato-Katz thick smear method for seven consecutive days. Two smears were prepared and microscopically examined for each specimen. 570 individuals completed the investigation. Coefficient of variation (CV) was used to assess the intra-individual variation of the egg counts, in relation to the demographic characteristics including age, sex, occupation, and the intensity of infection. RESULTS: The proportion of individuals with at least one positive finding increased from 33.0% in a single measurement to 56.5% by seven measurements (P<0.01). The average intensity of infection in a single Kato-Katz test (111.06 EPG) was markedly higher than the average accumulated intensity of infection (42.51 EPG). Variation of intra-individual: the variation of CV in female infected subjects was higher than males (P<0.05). The variation of CV in 0-9 age group was higher than other age groups (P<0.05). The lowest variation of CV was detected in fishermen (P<0.05), but no statistical difference was found among other occupation groups. With an increase of the intensity of infection, the variation of CV decreased gradually. A negative correlation was observed between the variation of CV and the intensity of infection(r=-0.717, P<0.01). There was no significant difference in variation of CV between males and females, age and occupation groups when data were stratified according to the intensity of infection (P>0.05). CONCLUSION: The prevalence and intensity of S. japonicum infection by single Kato-Katz test was obviously lower than the real figures. The intensity of infection may be an essential factor that affects the intra-individual variation of egg counts. 

3172823
A simple glass-coated, fire-polished tungsten electrode with conductance adjustment using hydrofluoridic acid. 
A method is described to produce glass-coated tungsten microelectrodes in 4 simple steps: (1) etching of the wire, (2) coating with glass, (3) fire-polishing, and (4) reopening with hydrofluoric acid to adjust the conductance to a final value. Continuous conductance control is provided during the reopening process by means of an admittance meter to guarantee an exact final adjustment of the conductance required. The complete process yields electrodes of high reliability within a few minutes and the quality of the electrodes remains largely unaffected by any of the manufacturing parameters involved, so that high-performance electrodes are produced without sophisticated procedures. The electrodes have been tested successfully over several years recording from cells in the striate visual pathway of the cat. 

6150755
Positive serological evidence that Hantaan virus, the etiologic agent of hemorrhagic fever with renal syndrome, is endemic in Canada. 
Hemorrhagic fever with renal syndrome is endemic in most parts of the world. The etiological agent in known as Hantaan virus. More than 2000 Canadian sera from all age groups and provinces were tested for the presence of antibody to this virus by the indirect immunofluorescent antibody technique. The frequency of seropositivity ranged from 0.3 to 4.0%, with the national average being 1.4%. Newfoundland and New Brunswick in the Atlantic region had the highest positivity, being higher than hyperendemic areas in Korea. The inland provinces of Ontario, Manitoba, and Alberta had only 0.5% positives to Hantaan virus. In contrast, approximately 1.5% of sera from Saskatchewan, Quebec, and British Columbia were positive. No correlation in positivity was found between geography or sex, but positivity did increase with age. The highest titres were found in the group aged 65 to 93 years. 

1064800
Physiotherapy and the frozen shoulder: a comparative trial of ice and ultrasonic therapy. 
In a prospective study ice and ultrasonic applications have been compared in a series of patients with the frozen shoulder syndrome. No significant advantage of one treatment over the other could be demonstrated. It would appear that both of these physiotherapy methods can shorten the painful stage of the condition and, in conjunction with specific exercises, hasten recovery of the range of shoulder movement. 

1428497
Asymptomatic subjects at HIV diagnosis have prolonged survival as AIDS patients. 
The median AIDS survival for all AIDS patients was estimated as 11 months (95% confidence interval (Cl): 8-13 months). For the group of AIDS patients who were asymptomatic when HIV seropositivity was established, the median AIDS survival was 20 months (95% Cl: 13-23 months). For the group with symptomatic HIV infection or those who already had AIDS when HIV seropositivity was established, survival was estimated to 5 months (95% Cl: 1-15 months) and 4.5 months (95% Cl: 2-8 months), respectively. By using a Cox proportional hazard model it was found that being asymptomatic when HIV seropositivity was established or having Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia as the initial AIDS-related disease were associated with long AIDS survival. Being HIV infected by transfusion was associated with short survival. Long AIDS survival in the asymptomatic group may be explained by a positive selection of slow disease progressors. Differences in diagnostic routines may also cause systematic differences in the estimated AIDS survival. 

10893302
Antimalarial, antitrypanosomal, and antileishmanial activities and cytotoxicity of bis(9-amino-6-chloro-2-methoxyacridines): influence of the linker. 
Forty bis(9-amino-6-chloro-2-methoxyacridines), in which acridine moieties are joined by alkanediamines, polyamines, or polyamines substituted by a side chain, were synthesized and tested for their in vitro activity upon the erythrocytic stage of Plasmodium falciparum, trypomastigote stage of Trypanosoma brucei, and amastigote stage of Trypanosoma cruzi and Leishmania infantum as well as for their cytotoxic effects upon MRC-5 cells. Results clearly showed the importance of the nature of the linker and of its side chain for antiparasitic activity, cytotoxicity, and cellular localization. Among several compounds devoid of cytotoxic effects at 25 microM upon MRC-5 cells, one displayed IC(50) values ranging from 8 to 18 nM against different P. falciparum strains while three others totally inhibited T. brucei at 1.56 microM. 

3375244
Regulated expression of genes inserted at the human chromosomal beta-globin locus by homologous recombination. 
We have examined the effect of the site of integration on the expression of cloned genes introduced into cultured erythroid cells. Smithies et al. [Smithies, O., Gregg, R.G., Boggs, S.S., Koralewski, M.A. & Kucherlapati, R.S. (1985) Nature (London) 317, 230-234] reported the targeted integration of DNA into the human beta-globin locus on chromosome 11 in a mouse erythroleukemia-human cell hybrid. These hybrid cells can undergo erythroid differentiation leading to greatly increased mouse and human beta-globin synthesis. By transfection of these hybrid cells with a plasmid carrying a modified human beta-globin gene and a foreign gene composed of the coding sequence of the bacterial neomycin-resistance gene linked to simian virus 40 transcription signals (SVneo), cells were obtained in which the two genes are integrated at the beta-globin locus on human chromosome 11 or at random sites. When we examined the response of the integrated genes to cell differentiation, we found that the genes inserted at the beta-globin locus were induced during differentiation, whereas randomly positioned copies were not induced. Even the foreign SVneo gene was inducible when it had been integrated at the beta-globin locus. The results show that genes introduced at the beta-globin locus acquire some of the regulatory properties of globin genes during erythroid differentiation. 

1636947
[Marginalization and AIDS in pediatrics] 
This study realizes a view of the patient, his disease and his environment, divided in newborn, kindergarten and schoolers, and into other group, adolescents. The themes are neurology clinic, familiar, social and economic environment, problems of the chronic disease, scholarships, hospitalization ahd assistance, adoption and legal rules in relation with the pediatrics patients with AIDS or positives antibodies. 

1432061
Effective synaptic current can be estimated from measurements of neuronal discharge. 
1. The basic question of how motoneurons transform synaptic inputs into spike train outputs remains unresolved, despite detailed knowledge of their morphology, electrophysiology, and synaptic connectivity. We have approached this problem by making measurements of a synaptic input under steady-state conditions and combining them with quantitative assessments of their effects on the discharge rates of cat spinal motoneurons. 2. We used a modified voltage-clamp technique to measure the steady-state effective synaptic currents (IN) produced by rubrospinal input to cat triceps surae motoneurons. In the same motoneurons we measured the slope of the firing rate-injected current (f-i) relation in the primary range. We then reactivated the rubrospinal input during steady, repetitive firing to assess its effect on motoneuron discharge rate. 3. We found that changes in the steady-state discharge rate of a motoneuron produced by this synaptic input could be described simply as the product of the net effective synaptic current measured at the soma and the slope of the motoneuron's f-i relation. This expression essentially redefines synaptic efficacy in terms of a cell's basic input-output function. Further, measurements of effective synaptic current simplify the task of estimating synaptic efficacy, because detailed knowledge of neither the electrotonic architecture of the postsynaptic cell nor of the locations of the presynaptic boutons is required. 

1289838
A simple and convenient method for acyclonucleoside synthesis. 
Introduction of acyclic chain for synthesis of acyclonucleoside derivatives was achieved in a simple and convenient way. Silylated pyrimidine or purine bases were treated with 1,3-dioxolane, trimethyl chlorosilane and metal iodide, such as KI and NaI, all together at room temperature. By this method, 2-thiopyrimidine derivatives were also obtained in good yield, using 2 molecular equivalents of 1,3-dioxolane. 

16931861
Remineralization of enamel caries can decrease optical reflectivity. 
The remineralization of enamel caries can lead to distinct optical changes within a lesion. We hypothesized that the restoration of mineral volume would result in a measurable decrease in the depth-resolved reflectivity of polarized light from the lesion. To test this hypothesis, we measured optical changes in artificial caries undergoing remineralization as a function of depth, using Polarization-sensitive Optical Coherence Tomography (PS-OCT). Lesions were imaged non-destructively before and after exposure to a remineralization regimen. After imaging, microradiographs of histological thin sections indicated that the significant reflectivity reduction measured by PS-OCT accurately represented the increase in mineral content within a larger repaired surface zone. Mineral volume changes arising from remineralization can be measured on the basis of the optical reflectivity of the lesion. 

3225413
Cigarette smoking and Dupuytren's contracture of the hand. 
Microvascular occlusion has been implicated as a possible causative factor of Dupuytren's contracture. Cigarette smoking is one of the most significant factors in the development of peripheral vasculopathy. The relationship between smoking and Dupuytren's contracture of the hand is explored in this article. One hundred thirty-two consecutive patients who had a partial fasciectomy for treatment of Dupuytren's contracture from 1980 to 1985, were analyzed retrospectively. There were 111 males and 21 females. Ninety (68.2%) of 132 patients smoked cigarettes compared with 110 (37.2%) of 296 randomized hospitalized control patients (p less than 0.00001). Eighty (72.1%) of 111 men smoked cigarettes compared with 65 (44.2%) of 147 male control patients (p = 0.000015). Cigarette smoking is linked statistically to Dupuytren's disease and may be involved in its pathogenesis by producing microvascular occlusion and subsequent fibrosis and contracture or by some other mechanism. 

9478163
Quality control for industrial hygiene laboratories. 
In the Republic of Korea a quality control programme has been introduced for industrial hygiene laboratories responsible for monitoring chemicals in working environments. Its development is outlined below. 

12920570
Risk for cytomegalovirus infection following reduced intensity allogeneic stem cell transplantation. 
Preliminary data suggest a faster immune recovery following non-myeloablative stem cell transplantation because of the persistence of recipient T cells, but the real impact on post-transplant infectious complications remains unknown. We retrospectively analysed the incidence of cytomegalovirus (CMV) infection in twenty patients following reduced intensity conditioning with busulfan/fludarabine+/-thiotepa and post-transplant immunosuppression with cyclosporine A/mycophenolate mofetil. Results were compared with 20 patients receiving myeloablative transplants during the same time period and who were matched for CMV risk group and for donor origin. The cumulative incidence of CMV infection following reduced intensity vs. myeloablative transplants was 60.4% vs. 40.0%, respectively (p value 0.1, log rank test). The risk for CMV infection in both cohorts was increased after in vivo T cell depletion with antithymocyte globulin (75% and 60%, respectively). Acute GVHD preceded the diagnosis of CMV infection by a median of 25 (range, 9-61) days following reduced intensity transplants and a median of 14 (range, 10-34) days in myeloablative transplants. Recurrent CMV infections were observed only in patients receiving reduced intensity transplants. Using multivariate analysis only reduced intensity transplantation and in vivo T cell depletion had a significant impact on the risk of CMV infection. In our series the incidence for CMV infection following reduced intensity transplants seems to be increased as compared with risk-matched myeloablative transplants. When adding anti-T cell antibodies to the conditioning regimen, the risk for CMV infection increases by up to 75%. Thorough studies of the risk of post-transplant viral infection are necessary to optimize surveillance as well as pre-emptive and/or prophylactic treatment strategies in the non-myeloablative transplantation setting. 

9042045
Retention of asthmatic patients in a longitudinal clinical trial. 
BACKGROUND: Prevention of study patient attrition and assessment of its impact on outcome data are problems that receive little attention despite their obvious importance in asthma research. OBJECTIVE: The medical, demographic, and psychologic characteristics of asthmatic children and adults who dropped out of a yearlong medication trial were assessed to determine whether this group differed from those who completed the study, potentially introducing bias into the data set and interfering with completion of the study's objectives. METHODS: Profiles of 362 adult and pediatric asthmatic patient dropouts from the multicenter trial were contrasted with profiles of those who completed the study. Despite a 1-month prerandomization screening, 24% of patients failed to complete the trial for varied reasons, which largely included noncompliance and treatment dissatisfaction. RESULTS: Although attrition rates were equal among adults and children, dropout-completer differentiation was not. Adult completers did not differ from dropouts in any variables. However, pediatric dropouts were more likely than completers to be female (67% and 36%, p = 0.008) and to have more reactive airways (PD20, 2.29 +/- 1.32 and 5.2 +/- 1.23, p = 0.05), to have reduced scores on tests of intelligence (Full Scale IQ, 102.2 +/- 2.6 and 112.5 +/- 1.6, p = 0.002) and problem solving (Wisconsin Card Sorting Test Error Scores, 39.8 +/- 4.1 and 29.1 +/- 2.0, p = 0.01), and to have increased behavioral problems (Child Behavior Checklist Total Problem Score, 60.7 +/- 2.5 and 53.6 +/- 1.1, p = 0.003). CONCLUSION: These findings demonstrate the potential of patient attrition to bias outcome in clinical trials and underscore the necessity of: (1) preventing its occurrence, (2) correctly assessing its causes, and (3) determining its ultimate impact on study results. Strategies for each of these three tasks should be implemented at the study's initial planning stages. 

17878947
Comparative analysis of E2F family member oncogenic activity. 
The E2F family of transcription factors consists of nine members with both distinct and overlapping functions. These factors are situated downstream of growth factor signaling cascades, where they play a central role in cell growth and proliferation through their ability to regulate genes involved in cell cycle progression. For this reason, it is likely that the members of the E2F family play a critical role during oncogenesis. Consistent with this idea is the observation that some tumors exhibit deregulated expression of E2F proteins. In order to systematically compare the oncogenic capacity of these family members, we stably over-expressed E2F1 through 6 in non-transformed 3T3 fibroblasts and assessed the ability of these transgenic cell lines to grow under conditions of low serum, as well as to form colonies in soft agar. Our results show that these six E2F family members can be divided into three groups that exhibit differential oncogenic capacity. The first group consists of E2F2 and E2F3a, both of which have strong oncogenic capacity. The second group consists of E2F1 and E2F6, which were neutral in our assays when compared to control cells transduced with vector alone. The third group consists of E2F4 and E2F5, which generally act to repress E2F-responsive genes, and in our assays demonstrated a strong capacity to inhibit transformation. Our results imply that the pattern of expression of these six E2F family members in a cell could exert a strong influence over its susceptibility to oncogenic transformation. 

8763104
[Subcortical dementia] 
Subcortical dementia, a concept introduced 20 years ago, is a clinical entity characterized by memory disorders, an impaired ability to manipulate acquired knowledge, important changes of personality (apathy, inertia or depression), slowed thought processes (or bradyphrenia). It is also marked by overwhelming signs of frontal dysfunction. Cognitive and behavioural disturbances are frequently combined to movement disorders (tremor, chorea, dystonia etc). Anatomical, clinical and scintigraphic data suggest that the frontal signs result from a disconnection of the frontal cortex from the basal ganglia. Therefore it is probably more accurate to use the term subcortico-frontal dementia. This pattern of dementia, clearly different from a cortical dementia as dementia of Alzheimer's disease, may be described in a wide range of diseases which mainly involve the subcortical areas: some cases of Parkinson's disease, Progressive Supranuclear Palsy, Huntington's disease, Wilson's disease, the etat lacunaire, multiple sclerosis and so on. The concept of subcortical dementia has allowed a better understanding of the role of the basal ganglia and their cortical connections in cognition and behavior. Its neurochemical substrate remains poorly characterized, although the ascending dopaminergic and cholinergic pathways seem to be good candidates, at least in Parkinson's disease. 

10694821
An integrin-targeted non-viral vector for pulmonary gene therapy. 
Gene therapy offers potential for the treatment of severe respiratory diseases. However, the vectors which are currently available have drawbacks limiting their therapeutic application. Here we report on an integrin-targeted, non-viral gene delivery system for pulmonary gene transfer. We demonstrate that this vector can deliver the lacZ reporter gene to the lung, transfecting bronchial epithelium and parenchymal cells with similar efficiency to an adenoviral vector and with greater efficiency than a cationic liposome. In addition, vector administration can be repeated leading to further gene expression without inducing inflammation. The advantages of this novel gene delivery system provide considerable potential for targeted gene therapy in vivo. Gene Therapy (2000) 7, 393-400. 

1250070
Monocarboxylic acids from oxidation of acyclic isoprenoid alkanes by Mycobacterium fortuitum. 
Mycobacterium fortuitum utilizes certain stereoisometric mixtures of individual multimethyl branched alkanes as sole carbon source, including 2,6(R), 10(S), 14(RS)-tetramethylhexadecane; 2.6(R), 10(S), 14(RS)-tetramethylheptadecane; 2,6(RS), 10(RS)-trimethyltetradecane, and 2,6(R), 10(S)-trimethylpentadecane. Products of oxidation isolated from the bacterial lipids were acids derived predominantly from oxidation of the isopropyl terminus of each alkane, except in the case of 2,6(RS), 10(RS)-trimethyltetradecane. With the latter, acids from oxidation at either terminus were detected in comparable proportions. 

3005250
The role of Ca2+ and Ca2+-activated phospholipid-dependent protein kinase in degranulation of human neutrophils. 
The degranulation reactions of human neutrophils induced by 1-oleoyl-2-acetylglycerol (OAG), phorbol 12-myristate 13-acetate (PMA), and calcium ionophore A23187 or their combinations, were studied. OAG in the absence of the Ca2+-ionophore A23187 stimulated the releases of both lysozyme and lactoferrin, constituents of the specific granules, but did not stimulate the release of beta-glucuronidase, an enzyme of the azurophil granules. Electron microscopy revealed a selective decrease in the numbers of the specific granules in this case. The combined effects of A23187 at a concentration higher than 0.1 microM and OAG were essentially additive. W-7, known to be an inhibitor of both Ca2+-activated phospholipid-dependent protein kinase (C-kinase) and calmodulin, inhibited the degranulation induced by OAG or PMA, while it inhibited the reaction induced by A23187 less markedly. The release of lysozyme reached a plateau at about 0.1 microM A23187 and increased again at higher concentrations of A23187. The observations suggest that degranulation can be induced by the activation of the C-kinase, and the degranulation by A23187 at low concentrations may be due to the activation of the C-kinase; the effects of A23187 at high concentrations, however, could not be explained only in terms of the activation of the C-kinase. 

6736425
Speech perception by infants: categorization based on nasal consonant place of articulation. 
This study examined the ability of six-month-old infants to recognize the perceptual similarity of syllables sharing a phonetic segment when variations were introduced in phonetic environment and talker. Infants in a "phonetic" group were visually reinforced for head turns when a change occurred from a background category of labial nasals to a comparison category of alveolar nasals . The infants were initially trained on a [ma]-[na] contrast produced by a male talker. Novel tokens differing in vowel environment and talker were introduced over several stages of increasing complexity. In the most complex stage infants were required to make a head turn when a change occurred from [ma,mi,mu] to [na,ni,nu], with the tokens in each category produced by both male and female talkers. A " nonphonetic " control group was tested using the same pool of stimuli as the phonetic condition. The only difference was that the stimuli in the background and comparison categories were chosen in such a way that the sounds could not be organized by acoustic or phonetic characteristics. Infants in the phonetic group transferred training to novel tokens produced by different talkers and in different vowel contexts. However, infants in the nonphonetic control group had difficulty learning the phonetically unrelated tokens that were introduced as the experiment progressed. These findings suggest that infants recognize the similarity of nasal consonants sharing place of articulation independent of variation in talker and vowel context. 

1352819
Supersensitivity of isolated atria from diabetic rats to adenosine and methacholine: modulation by pertussis toxin. 
The chronotropic response of isolated right atria obtained from rats made diabetic 14-15 weeks previously by streptozotocin, was compared with age-matched controls. Diabetic rat atria are significantly more sensitive to the negative chronotropic actions of adenosine and of methacholine. Pretreating both control and diabetic rats with 2.5 mg kg-1 pertussis toxin attenuated the negative chronotropic effects of methacholine and adenosine on isolated atria, although diabetic atria still displayed a significantly greater sensitivity to these agonists (P less than 0.05-0.001). The negative chronotropic effects of methacholine and adenosine on both control and diabetic atria were abolished following pretreatment with higher doses of pertussis toxin (10 mg kg-1). These results suggest that pertussis toxin-sensitive G proteins may be involved in the supersensitivity of diabetic hearts to methacholine and adenosine. 

10842584
Acute and chronic effects of aminoglycosides on cochlear hair cells. 
The first detectable effect on the auditory system after a single high-dose injection of an aminoglycosidic antibiotic (AA) like gentamicin (GM) is the reversible blockade of medial efferent function, probably via blockade of calcium channels at the base of the outer hair cells (OHC). The kinetics of this effect are compatible with that of the molecule in perilymph. In the course of chronic treatment with lower doses, however, ototoxicity develops only after several days of treatment. Still GM can be observed inside the OHCs as soon as 24 hours after the first injection, and will be still present in some OHCs as long as 11 months after a chronic, nonototoxic 6-day treatment. In vitro, the short-term viability of isolated OHCs is not affected by exposure to AAs, but their transduction channels and their response to acetylcholine are reversibly blocked. However, developing organs of Corti in culture are highly and rapidly affected by exposure to AAs. Yet during direct intracochlear perilymphatic perfusion of GM, 2-mM solutions are not ototoxic, and with perfusion with a 20-mM solution ototoxicity develops only after several days of perfusion. From these various observations one can describe some aspects of the mechanisms of ototoxicity of AAs, from their access to perilymph and endolymph, to penetration in the hair cells, likely via endocytosis at their apical pole, and intracellular cytotoxic events. 

9149360
The outcome of surgery for biliary atresia and the current status of long-term survivors. 
Between 1953 and 1995, 300 patients with biliary atresia underwent surgery at Tohoku University Hospital. The 10-year survival of patients who were operated on in or before 1965 was 9%. But the survival rate went up to 61% in patients operated on between 1976 and 1985. Eighty-five patients including 2 who developed liver failure after Kasai operation and underwent liver transplantation have survived more than 10 years. Eleven of them (13%) have recurrent or persistent jaundice. Of the 30 patients who have survived more than 20 years (10 males and 20 females, age range; 20 to 41 years), 20 underwent hepatic portoenterostomy, 8 underwent hepaticoenterostomy and the remaining 2 underwent hepatic portocholecystostomy. None of these patients has undergone liver transplantation. Twenty-two patients have led near-normal lives. The remaining 8 patients have experienced some troubles due to cholangitis, portal hypertension, intrahepatic gallstones and so on. Two of them are considered as candidates for liver transplantation. While the majority of long-term survivors of biliary atresia have good quality of life, close long-term follow-up is essential even in patients with biliary atresia aged 20 years or more. 

2167591
[Prognostic criteria of depression] 
Based on a structural dynamic analysis of the development of the depressive syndromes of varying nosology the psychopathological predictors of the disease duration and quality of the outcome from depression were distinguished. Criteria for harmonicity and structural complexity of the depressive condition were attributed to those predictors. The correlation was found between the syndrome structure and the levels of the ensuing remission. The use of an electrooculographic study allowed an objective evaluation of the expected outcome of depressions. 

17317487
Forehead lipoma resection via a small remote incision using a surgical raspatory. 
Lipomas are benign tumors and, therefore, a surgical technique that does not leave a visible scar would be an ideal method. A forehead lipoma can be extracted using a small remote incision with endoscopic assistance for aesthetic purposes. However, endoscope-assisted surgery is usually technically demanding, time-consuming, and less cost-effective. In this report, we propose an alternative approach to the surgical resection of a forehead lipoma with a small remote incision. Our method uses a surgical raspatory. Our technique allows the complete removal of the lipoma with no complications using a raspatory passed down a subcutaneous tunnel from an incision placed in an aesthetically advantageous site. 

11363389
CMV: the other virus. 
The Food and Drug Administration (FDA) approved the use of Gilead Sciences' intravenous drug, cidofovir, for people with CMV retinitis. The FDA also granted final marketing approval for ganciclovir eye implants sold by Chiron Vision. Chiron and Hoffmann-La Roche are co-marketing the device. The device costs $4,000, plus the cost of surgically fastening the device to the eye, which can be as much as $6,000. The device needs to be replaced every six months. The FDA advisory panel also recommended approving cidofovir as systemic treatment for new or relapsing CMV retinitis in people with AIDS. The drug is currently available free in an expanded access program or as a follow-up to trials. Participants must have experienced CMV relapse on either ganciclovir or foscarnet. Many fear that levels of the drug reaching the eye from oral doses are suboptimal and may induce drug resistance, although observations suggest that resistance is a rare occurrence. 

1334284
[Treatment with lisinopril or nifedipine in essential hypertension. A Norwegian multicenter study of the effect, tolerance and quality of life of 828 patients] 
In a randomized, parallel, double-blind study, lisinopril (n = 412) reduced systolic and diastolic blood pressure more than nifedipine did (n = 416) after ten weeks treatment in patients (40-70 years) with mild to moderate essential hypertension. Lisinopril was tolerated better than nifedipine, with fewer withdrawals. Adverse experiences reported after a general question on discomfort were significantly lower for lisinopril than for nifedipine. Questions referring specifically to symptoms revealed higher frequency of coughing with lisinopril, while flushing, edema, palpitations, dizziness, tiredness and rash were reported more frequently with nifedipine. Quality of life was similarly assessed by both patients and spouses. No significant differences in well-being during treatment were found for either drug, except in the case of the highest dose level of nifedipine, which caused a deterioration of well-being. 

2119233
Determination of metabolite and nucleotide concentrations in proliferating lymphocytes by 1H-NMR of acid extracts. 
Nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) studies of extracts have proven to be a powerful window onto the intracellular machinery of cells and tissues. The major advantages of in vitro 1H-NMR, namely chemical preservation, simultaneous detection, identification, and quantitation of compounds, and sensitivity to a large variety of classes of compounds, are employed in this study to characterize the metabolic course of mitogen-stimulated proliferation of human peripheral lymphocytes. A reliable method to quantitate amino acids, metabolic intermediates, soluble membrane lipid precursors, and purine, pyridine and pyrimidine nucleotides is presented, using samples as small as 30 mg wet weight. A total of 53 substances were detected in lymphocytes and other blood cells. During the course of lymphocyte culture, changes in intracellular concentrations of lactate, taurine, inositol and nucleotides, including NAD, IMP and high-energy phosphates, were especially marked. 1H-NMR compares favorably to 31P-NMR and to HPLC, and is especially attractive in light of expectations for future in vivo application. 

12321861
Training involves many factors. 
The effectiveness of training to improve provider practices depends upon factors such as who is trained and where, what providers are learning and how the information is taught, whether training is reinforced, and how training results are measured. Training should begin with a thorough understanding of providers' abilities, needs, and the settings in which they work. It is also important to consider during the early planning phase how skills acquired during training can be sustained. Needs assessments can identify obstacles to successful training. Existing provider knowledge and skills must also be assessed. Whom and where to train, the training process, the training of clinical procedures, evaluating training, and maintaining skills are discussed. 

6273402
Cholinephosphotransferase in rat lung. The in vitro synthesis of dipalmitoylphosphatidylcholine from dipalmitoylglycerol. 
Active substrate preparations of dipalmitoylglycerol were obtained by sonicating dipalmitoylglycerol, phosphatidylglycerol, and Tween 20 together at 65 degrees C. The apparent Vmax for cholinephosphotransferase in lung microsomes was 30 nmol/min/mg of protein for dipalmitoylglycerol-phosphatidylglycerol-Tween 20 substrate preparations and 43 nmol/min/mg of protein for dioleoylglycerol-phosphatidylglycerol-Tween 20 preparations. Sonication at 65 degrees C was required for maximal activity with dipalmitoylglycerol but not for dioleoylglycerol. Highest activity was obtained when diacylglycerol was sonicated with phosphatidylglycerol and Tween 20 although phosphatidylglycerol also increased the activity when added separately. The presence of phosphatidylglycerol was critical particularly with dipalmitoylglycerol as substrate. Phosphatidylinositol, phosphatidylserine, and phosphatidic acid were slightly active but phosphatidylcholine and phosphatidylethanolamine were inactive. 

3541053
Energy metabolism in demented brain. 
The term dementia refers to a number of very complicated disorders of the brain with several morphological, biochemical and functional alterations. Several alterations occur in Alzheimer's disease. They include alteration in neurotransmitters related substances and changes in brain metabolic rate. Changes in metabolic activity are among the earliest and best documented of all modification reported in Alzheimer's brain. They appear to be correlate with the severity of the disease, and to be more marked in specific areas of the brain which appear to be clinically more involved. In this report will be discussed the observations on changes of cerebral glucose metabolic rate, cerebral oxygen consumption, cerebral blood flow reported in vivo in demented patients. The observations of changes in energy metabolism related enzymes and the relationship between these changes and those in neurotransmitters related substances will be also reviewed. 

11754378
Bone mineral density in well-differentiated thyroid cancer patients treated with suppressive thyroxine: a systematic overview of the literature. 
BACKGROUND: The effects of subclinical hyperthyroidism on bone mineral density (BMD) induced by suppressive thyroxine therapy in patients with well-differentiated thyroid cancer (WDTC) remains unclear. An overview of the current literature was undertaken to evaluate studies to date. METHODS: A systematic medline search yielded a total of 11 studies appropriate for review which included premenopausal women, postmenopausal women, and men on suppressive thyroxine post thyroidectomy for WDTC. Main outcome measures were bone mineral density and bone turnover markers. CONCLUSIONS: Although studies were limited by small numbers and varying degrees of control for confounding variables, results suggested no significant change in bone mineral density for premenopausal women or men. Findings for postmenopausal women remain unclear with two of the best controlled studies reporting opposing results. Further studies for this population are recommended to help guide clinical practice. 

1959967
The scalene tubercle. 
One hundred and thirty right and 114 left first ribs from a random collection have been studied for the characters of the scalene tubercle and the related structures. The tubercle is not always present but the muscular impression for the insertion of the scalenus anterior muscle on the superior surface of the first rib is almost constant and it generally extends upto the medial third of this surface. The arterial groove, generally shallow, lies behind the tubercle or the muscular impression and generally extends only upto the medial 2/3 of the superior surface. Likewise, the venous groove, mostly shallow, lies in front of the tubercle or the muscular impression and extends, generally, only upto the medial 2/3 of the surface. Normally, there is no separate groove for the lower trunk of the brachial plexus. 

10425299
Remarkable suppressive effect of consecutive low-dose cisplatin therapy on advanced ovarian clear cell adenocarcinoma. 
Ovarian clear cell adenocarcinoma (OCCA) is known to be less responsive to cisplatin and most other anti-cancer drugs and to have a poorer prognosis than other ovarian cancers. We report a rare case of stage IIIc OCCA in a patient who has been treated postoperatively with cisplatin alone and continues to survive after 7.5 years. In this case, 25 mg/m2/day of cisplatin was administered for 5 consecutive days every 4 weeks. After remission, intermittent administration of cisplatin every 3 to 4 months was performed 8 times. This case suggests that induction and intermittent chemotherapy using consecutive low-dose cisplatin administration may be a useful treatment for OCCA. 

3259715
An analysis of morphological, cytochemical, immunological and clinical features of adult T cell acute lymphoblastic leukemia. 
Morphological, cytochemical, immunological and clinical features of 19 adult patients with T cell acute lymphoblastic leukemia (T-ALL) were investigated at the time of diagnosis and were compared with those of 34 adult patients affected by B cell acute lymphoblastic leukemia (B-ALL). Immunophenotypic studies employing a wide panel of monoclonal antibodies (mAbs) revealed a heterogeneous pattern of antigen expression in the five T-ALL groups that were identified on the basis of blast T cell differentiation levels. PAS (periodic acid Schiff) negativity and focal AP (acid phosphatase) positivity, as well as white blood cell count and serum lactic dehydrogenase levels, were significantly related to T-ALL when compared with B-ALL. On the contrary, no statistically significant difference was demonstrated in the clinical outcome. 

5061250
Iodine metabolism: preferential renal excretion of iodide derived from triiodothyronine deiodination. 
Measurements were made in rats of the relative rates of accumulation in urine or in the thyroid of radioactive iodide derived from simultaneous injections of (131)I-labeled triiodothyronine and (125)I-labeled iodide. The data indicate that deiodination of triiodothyronine by the kidney results in a loss into the urine of iodine which does not enter the general body iodide pool. This renal "iodide leak" should be considered in kinetic models of iodine metabolism. 

7872688
Multidrug resistance phenotype evaluation by immunofluorescence and functional tests: comparison of two monoclonal antibodies and three fluorescent dyes in three cells lines. 
Various agents have been shown to enhance drug sensitivity of multidrug resistant (MDR) cells and are thus of interest when the MDR phenotype is identified. Detection of MDR cells is of importance and can be carried out either by immunofluorescence with monoclonal antibodies or by functional tests using fluorescent dyes uptake. MDR has been analysed by flow cytometry on three sensitive and resistant cell lines, with MRK16 and C219 monoclonal antibodies directed against P-glycoprotein (P-gp) and with rhodamine 123, Hoechst 33342 and daunorubicin. Resistant cells were revealed by MRK16 and C219 but the results obtained with MRK16 gave higher both percentages of fluorescent cells and mean fluorescence. Fluorescence intensity observed with daunorubicin was lower than with rhodamine 123. With Hoechst 33342, mean fluorescence was quite identical on sensitive and on resistant cells. It was concluded that MRK16 and rhodamine 123 were well adapted to detect P-gp and evaluate its functional ability. 

7919371
Stimulation of interleukin-6 production by endothelin in rat bone marrow-derived stromal cells. 
Endothelin (ET) produced by endothelial cells has recently been found to be a potent vasoconstricting hormone. In this report, ET is shown to be a potent stimulator of interleukin-6 (IL-6) production by rat bone marrow (BM)-derived stromal cells. It was also shown that ET increased the level of mRNA for IL-6 in these cells. The two types of ET receptor (R), ETAR and ETBR, were shown to be expressed on both BM-derived stromal cells in culture and ex vivo in BM tissue, suggesting that ET works as a physiologic stimulator of IL-6 production in the BM. It was shown that ETAR is coupled to phospholipase C activation, leading to the production of inositol 1,4,5-trisphosphate (IP3) and 1,2-diacylglycerol (DAG) as second messengers in BM-derived stromal cells. This was corroborated by data showing that IL-6 production in these cells was induced by combined stimulation with ionomycin and phorbol myristate acetate, thereby bypassing the effects of IP3 and DAG, respectively. This is the first report on the hormonal regulation of IL-6 production by BM stromal cells, indicating that hematopoiesis is subject to endocrinologic regulation under physiologic conditions. ET has recently been reported to be produced by macrophages in response to bacterial lipopolysaccharide and human immunodeficiency virus-1 glycoprotein 120. These facts, taken together with our findings, raise the possibility that ET shares the same role of IL-1 as a local cytokine, mediating an intercellular signal between macrophages and BM stromal cells in response to bacterial or viral stimulation. 

2039807
Protein expression in relation to the cell cycle of exponentially growing human prostatic epithelial cells. 
This report concerns the study of the relationship between protein expression and the cell cycle in exponentially proliferating benign and malignant human prostate epithelial cells in short-term cultures. Multiparameter flow cytometric measurements were performed to correlate the expression of prostate-specific acid phosphatase, epithelial membrane antigen and epitectin with cell cycle progression. The expression of the three proteins was heterogeneous in G1 cells. The early post-mitotic cells exhibited the lowest levels when compared with late G1 cells, wherein the expression was many times greater. There was no further increase as the cells progressed through S and G2 + M. These findings, corroborating prior observations in other systems, suggest the possibility that the levels of the proteins studied increase during the G1 phase of the cell cycle and drop during or immediately after cytokinesis. As an alternate explanation, the heterogeneity of protein expression characteristic of G1 cells may be due, at least in part, to an asymmetric apportionment of cell constituents at mitosis. 

823017
Possible phospholipid precursor for phosphatidylserine in rat heart. 
The incorporation of 32-P-labelled inorganic phosphate into phospholipids of rat heart slices was investigated in pulse-chase experiments. The comparison of the specific activities of individual phospholipids suggested that phosphatidic acid can be 32P precursor for phosphatidylserine. Studies with L-serine revealed the full calcium dependence of phosphatidyslserine formation in heart homogenates. Chasing experiments with [1,2-14C]ethanolamine and [methyl-14C]choline proved the precursor role of phospholipids phosphatidic acid was the most potent in stimulating phosphatidylserine formation in homogenates. The conclusion was reached that phosphatidic acid can also be regarded as precursor for phosphatidylserine. 

2443031
Kinetics of lysosomal protease activity in human otitis media with effusion. 
Hydrolytic activity of various lysosomal proteases--elastase, collagenase, and cathepsins B and H--were measured in 125 middle ear effusions from patients with chronic (serous and mucoid) and acute otitis media with effusion (OME). The levels of cathepsin B activity and alpha-2-macroglobulin during the course of clinical therapies (myringotomy and tympanostomy tubing) were analyzed in 10 chronic OME cases where follow-up evaluation was possible. It is found that the level of lysosomal protease activity (elastase, collagenase and cathepsin B) was higher in acute OME than that in chronic OME; the hydrolytic activity of cathepsin B in middle ear effusions could be used as an indicator to reflect the level of lysosomal proteases activity in the middle ear; in chronic OME, inflammatory reaction including lysosomal protease activity of the middle ear mucosa at the time of the first myringotomy appeared to be more active than that at the time of the final myringotomy, but less than that in acute OME; and the proteolytic damage of lysosomal thiol proteases to the middle ear mucosa, which may be related to the chronicity of OME, could be reduced by both therapeutic myringotomy and tympanostomy. 

3890654
Expression of a melanoma-tumor-associated antigen as demonstrated by a monoclonal antibody (D6.1) in cytopathologic preparations of human tumor cells from effusions and needle aspirates. 
Immunocytopathologic studies were performed on 79 fine needle aspiration biopsies (FNABs) and effusions from 13 melanomas and 57 other human neoplasms with the monoclonal antibody (MAb) D6.1 raised against a partially purified melanoma-tumor-associated antigen (MTAA). The purposes of these studies were (1) to evaluate the ability of MAb 6.1 to react with melanoma cells in cytopathologic preparations and (2) to define the spectrum of reactivity of MAb D6.1 in cytopathologic preparations of non-melanomas. Cytocentrifuge preparations of the cytopathologic specimens were permitted to react with the primary antibody and were then stained by the avidin-biotin-immunoperoxidase method. Thirteen of 13 FNABs of malignant melanomas exhibited staining reactivity with MAb D6.1. Among the nonmelanoma tumors tested, staining reactivity was observed in 30 of 57 specimens. Among specific neoplasms, staining was present in 5 of 11 adenocarcinomas of the breast, 2 of 7 ovarian adenocarcinomas and 5 of 6 metastatic adenocarcinomas from the colon. Among 17 lung cancers examined, staining was noted in 4 of 7 adenocarcinomas, 3 of 4 large-cell undifferentiated carcinomas and 2 of 3 poorly differentiated squamous-cell carcinomas. Two small-cell undifferentiated carcinomas and one carcinoid failed to stain. Three of three adenocarcinomas of the pancreas showed staining. Among the remaining neoplasms examined, one specimen each of carcinoma of the prostate and the cervix and one carcinoma of undetermined primary exhibited staining. Two malignant lymphomas did not stain. Staining of mesothelial cells was observed in three of nine benign effusions. (ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS) 

11792976
Posttransplant lymphoproliferative disorder associated with primate gamma-herpesvirus in cynomolgus monkeys used in pig-to-primate renal xenotransplantation and primate renal allotransplantation. 
BACKGROUND: A series of immunosuppressed cynomolgus monkeys were used in porcine-to-primate and primate-to-primate renal transplantation. In a number of animals nodal and extranodal lymphomas as well as areas of lymphoid hyperplasia in multiple organs (posttransplant lymphoproliferative disorder, PTLD) were recorded. METHODS: PTLD was characterized with respect to manifestation sites, histopathology, immunophenotype, and association with primate Epstein Barr-like Virus by in situ hybridization and quantitative polymerase chain reaction. RESULTS: PTLD was observed in 10 of 245 xenotransplanted and 9 of 231 allotransplanted monkeys; its detection in xenotransplanted animals was significantly earlier after transplantation than that in allo-transplanted animals (median, 40 and 104 days, respectively; P<0.001). In the xenotransplanted animals, four cases showed a B-cell lymphoma and six cases were nonneoplastic (lymphoid hyperplasia). All nine PTLD cases from allotransplanted animals were diagnosed as lymphoma. There was no clear relationship between the use of a particular drug or drug combination in maintenance immunosuppression and the occurrence of PTLD. Fourteen of 19 animals (six of the cases from xenotransplants, eight from the allotransplant series) were positive by in situ hybridization with oligonucleotide probes detecting primate gamma-herpesvirus. CONCLUSION: These data indicate that PTLD in the xeno- and allotransplanted cynomolgus monkeys are associated with primate gamma-herpesvirus-induced B-cell proliferation. 

7540594
Bone marrow stroma-dependent modulation of CD45R isoform expression on Abelson virus transformed pre-B cells. 
The CD45 glycoprotein family exhibits cell-lineage-associated structural heterogeneity which is due, in part, to alternative pre-mRNA splicing. The Abelson murine leukemia (A-MuLV) preferentially transforms immature B cells that express a B-cell-specific high molecular weight CD45 isoform, called B220. However, we observed that A-MuLV-transformed cell lines are often B220- while maintaining high levels of "pan" CD45 expression. In vitro transformation of murine bone marrow revealed that the stromal microenvironment over which A-MuLV-transformed lymphoblasts are grown affected the B220 phenotype of the pre-B cells. Over a period of a few weeks, B220+ populations grown over a clonal stromal cell line gradually became B220-. However, the transition from a B220+ to B220- phenotype was dependent on the lot of fetal calf serum used. In contrast, cells grown over a heterogeneous bone marrow stroma maintained B220+ expression for long periods of time. The appearance of B220- cells in clonal B220+ populations indicated that the change in phenotype resulted in part from modulation of B220 expression. B220- B-cell lines did not express the high molecular weight CD45 RNA species indicating that the B220- phenotype was due to alternative pre-mRNA splicing. Finally, the shift from B220+ to B220- was not accompanied by changes in the stage of development of the cultures. These observations demonstrate that expression of B220 is not required for the continued proliferation of Abelson-transformed pre-B cells and is regulated by unknown environmental factors. 

1681051
Role of the endothelium and smooth muscle tone in the dilator response of the rabbit coeliac artery to histamine. 
The role of the endothelium and vascular tone was studied on histamine-induced relaxation and contraction of the rabbit coeliac artery. Histamine contracted the tissue via the release of noradrenaline (NA), an action blocked by prazosin and mepyramine but not influenced by endothelial removal. Tachyphylaxis readily developed to histamine-induced contractions. After a moderate tone (40-55%) was induced with NA, histamine relaxed the tissues concentration-dependently. This relaxation was absent when the endothelium was removed indicating that the receptors involved are located on the endothelium. When the tone was increased to 80-85% with NA, relaxation could only be demonstrated after blocking H1-receptors. Removal of the endothelium did not influence this response. The relaxant effect of histamine in both preparations, however, was blocked by metiamide indicating that it is H2-receptor mediated. In the rabbit coeliac artery, endothelial H2-receptors are readily activated at moderate tone while muscular H2-receptors are stimulated at high tone after blocking H1-receptors. The predominance of H2-receptors in this artery may serve the physiological function of vasodilation in the blood vessels of the stomach. 

9559329
Effects of the antihypertensive drug efonidipine hydrochloride on albuminuria and renal histopathology in young spontaneously hypertensive rats with diabetes. 
1. We investigated the renal protective effect of efonidipine hydrochloride (efonidipine, NZ-105) in STZ-induced spontaneously hypertensive rats (SHRs, 8 weeks of age). Diabetic SHRs were treated with 15 mg/kg/day of efonidipine for 12 weeks. 2. The dosage of efonidipine was chosen after preliminary studies demonstrated that it showed mild antihypertensive action (within 20% decrease of systemic blood pressure). 3. In the diabetic SHRs, the excretion of urinary albumin was increased (1.78 +/- 0.09 mg/day) at 4 weeks and reached 4.41 +/- 0.12 mg/day at 12 weeks. The levels of urinary albumin in the diabetic SHRs after treatment with efonidipine were significantly less than those in the diabetic SHRs at 8 and 12 weeks (P < 0.01). 4. Levels of creatinine clearance were decreased in the diabetic SHRs after treatment with efonidipine. 5. In light microscopy, the ratio of glomerular tuft to Bowman's areas was significantly decreased compared with those in the diabetic SHRs (P < 0.05). 6. These findings suggest that efonidipine inhibits the development of albuminuria and glomerular enlargement in the streptozotocin-induced diabetic SHRs and may become a useful antihypertensive drug with a renal protective effect. 

15143698
[Noise-induced hearing loss--factors affecting worker's decision to submit a disability claim] 
Noise-induced hearing loss is recognized worldwide as a prevalent work-related morbidity and is the most common compensated occupational disease in Israel. Despite extended legislation, hearing conservation programs, surveillance and biological monitoring (by audiometry) of work sites and workers, the burden of this injury remains high. As a rule, afflicted workers refrain from filing compensation claims and do so only at later stages when both subjective and objective evidence of advanced hearing loss is present. We have evaluated the determinants that seem to influence the decision of an individual worker to file a claim. We found that the major determinants are subjective perception of the level of hearing disability and clinical symptoms such as: tinnitus (OR = 3.3 with CI 95% = 2.1 5.2), verbal communication disturbances (OR = 2.7, 95% CI = 1.9-3.8), complaints of dizziness (OR = 1.9, 95% CI = 1.4-2.5), severity of hearing impairment (by audiometry with OR = 1.04, 955 CI = 1.02-1.06) and musculoskeletal complaints (OR = 1.6, 95% CI = 1.2-2.2). These findings attest to the relatively late stage in the development of noise-induced hearing loss at which workers file a claim for compensation and rehabilitation. In order to alleviate the burden of this injury in the future and encourage workers to approach the National Insurance Institute at an earlier stage, we suggest several ways of intervention and improving the awareness of all parties concerned. 

515678
Acoustically evoked potential: dependence upon age. 
The slow components of the potentials evoked acoustically by pure tones (1 kHz, 0 to 90 dB HL) were compared between two groups of subjects. All subjects of one group were 22 years old; the members of the other group had an average age of 63 years. The P2-latencies of the older subjects were significantly shorter for 60, 75 and 90 dB HL than those of the younger group. This finding was interpreted as a sign of a decreased efferent inhibition of several nuclei of the auditory pathway in the older subjects. No significant difference between the two groups could be found for the amplitudes (N1/P2), the exponent of the intensity function, or the latencies of P1 and N1. 

3998146
Mechanism of preservation of glomerular perfusion and filtration during acute extracellular fluid volume depletion. Importance of intrarenal vasopressin-prostaglandin interaction for protecting kidneys from constrictor action of vasopressin. 
Glomerular circulatory dynamics were assessed in 60 adult anesthetized rats, which were either deprived or not deprived of water for 24-48 h. Water-deprived rats (n = 21) were characterized by a depressed level of single nephron glomerular filtration rate (SNGFR) when compared with nonwater-deprived controls (n = 8) (23.2 +/- 1.3 vs. 44.8 +/- 4.1 nl/min). This was primarily due to decreased glomerular plasma flow rate (71 +/- 5 vs. 169 +/- 23 nl/min) and glomerular capillary ultrafiltration coefficient (0.028 +/- 0.003 vs. 0.087 +/- 0.011 nl/[s . mmHg]). Infusion of saralasin to these water-deprived rats resulted in significant increases in plasma flow rate and ultrafiltration coefficient, and decline in arteriolar resistances. Consequently, SNGFR increased by approximately 50% from pre-saralasin levels. When water-deprived saralasin-treated rats were given a specific antagonist to the vascular action of arginine vasopressin (AVP), d(CH2)5Tyr(Me)AVP, a fall in systemic blood pressure occurred, on average from 102 +/- 5 to 80 +/- 5 mmHg, unaccompanied by dilation of renal arterioles, so that both plasma flow rate (129 +/- 8 vs. 85 +/- 13 nl/min) and SNGFR (31.0 +/- 2.9 vs. 18.2 +/- 4.4 nl/min) decreased. This more selective extrarenal constrictor action of AVP was further documented in additional studies in which cardiac output and whole kidney blood flow rate were simultaneously measured. In water-diuretic rats, administration of a moderately pressor dose of AVP (4 mU/kg per min) resulted in a significant rise in kidney blood flow rate (from 8.8 +/- 1.2 to 9.6 +/- 1.3 ml/min). The higher kidney blood flow rate occurred despite a fall in cardiac output (from 111 +/- 7 to 98 +/- 9 ml/min), and was associated with a significant increase in the ratio of systemic vascular to renal vascular resistance (on average from 0.083 +/- 0.014 to 0.106 +/- 0.019). Furthermore, infusion of d(CH2)5Tyr(Me)AVP to water-deprived animals (n = 6) to antagonize endogenous AVP resulted in systemic but not renal vasodilation, so that kidney blood flow rate fell (by approximately 30%), as did systemic-to-renal resistance ratio (by approximately 30%). When the above two experiments were repeated in indomethacin-treated animals, exogenous AVP administration in water-diuretic rats (n = 6) and antagonism of endogenous AVP in water-deprived rats (n = 7) caused, respectively, parallel constriction and dilation in systemic and renal vasculatures. The net effect was unaltered systemic to renal vascular resistance ratio in both cases. These results indicate that (1) unlike angiotensin II, AVP maintains glomerular perfusion and filtration in acute extracellular fluid volume depletion by a more selective constriction of the extrarenal vasculature. (2) The relative renal insensitivity to the vasoconstrictor action of AVP appears to be due to an AVP-induced release of a potent renal vasodilator, sensitive to indomethacin, presumably prostaglandins. 

16653079
Degree of C(4) Photosynthesis in C(4) and C(3)-C(4)Flaveria Species and Their Hybrids : I. CO(2) Assimilation and Metabolism and Activities of Phosphoenolpyruvate Carboxylase and NADP-Malic Enzyme. 
The degree of C(4) photosynthesis was assessed in four hybrids among C(4), C(4)-like, and C(3)-C(4) species in the genus Flaveria using (14)C labeling, CO(2) exchange, (13)C discrimination, and C(4) enzyme activities. The hybrids incorporated from 57 to 88% of the (14)C assimilated in a 10-s exposure into C(4) acids compared with 26% for the C(3)-C(4) species Flaveria linearis, 91% for the C(4) species Flaveria trinervia, and 87% for the C(4)-like Flaveria brownii. Those plants with high percentages of (14)C initially fixed into C(4) acids also metabolized the C(4) acids quickly, and the percentage of (14)C in 3-phosphoglyceric acid plus sugar phosphates increased for at least a 30-s exposure to (12)CO(2). This indicated a high degree of coordination between the carbon accumulation and reduction phases of the C(4) and C(3) cycles. Synthesis and metabolism of C(4) acids by the species and their hybrids were highly and linearly correlated with discrimination against (13)C. The relationship of (13)C discrimination or (14)C metabolism to O(2) inhibition of photosynthesis was curvilinear, changing more rapidly at C(4)-like values of (14)C metabolism and (13)C discrimination. Incorporation of initial (14)C into C(4) acids showed a biphasic increase with increased activities of phosphoenolpyruvate carboxylase and NADP-malic enzyme (steep at low activities), but turnover of C(4) acids was linearly related to NADP-malic enzyme activity. Several other traits were closely related to the in vitro activity of NADP-malic enzyme but not phosphoenolpyruvate carboxylase. The data indicate that the hybrids have variable degrees of C(4) photosynthesis but that the carbon accumulation and reduction portions of the C(4) and C(3) cycles are well coordinated. 

17552315
Lane-change detection using a computational driver model. 
OBJECTIVE: This paper introduces a robust, real-time system for detecting driver lane changes. Background: As intelligent transportation systems evolve to assist drivers in their intended behaviors, the systems have demonstrated a need for methods of inferring driver intentions and detecting intended maneuvers. METHOD: Using a "model tracing" methodology, our system simulates a set of possible driver intentions and their resulting behaviors using a simplification of a previously validated computational model of driver behavior. The system compares the model's simulated behavior with a driver's actual observed behavior and thus continually infers the driver's unobservable intentions from her or his observable actions. RESULTS: For data collected in a driving simulator, the system detects 82% of lane changes within 0.5 s of maneuver onset (assuming a 5% false alarm rate), 93% within 1 s, and 95% before the vehicle moves one fourth of the lane width laterally. For data collected from an instrumented vehicle, the system detects 61% within 0.5 s, 77% within 1 s, and 84% before the vehicle moves one-fourth of the lane width laterally. CONCLUSION: The model-tracing system is the first system to demonstrate high sample-by-sample accuracy at low false alarm rates as well as high accuracy over the course of a lane change with respect to time and lateral movement. APPLICATION: By providing robust real-time detection of driver lane changes, the system shows good promise for incorporation into the next generation of intelligent transportation systems. 

16089576
Hydrodynamic stability of helical growth at low Reynolds number. 
A cylindrical object growing at a low Reynolds number can spontaneously develop a helical shape. We have studied this phenomenon numerically, and our results may shed some light on the spontaneous formation of helical tails of a dense protein network observed in experiments on actin based motility. We also identify an unstable critical pitch angle which separates helices that straighten into rods from helices that flatten into planar curves as they grow. At the critical angle the pitch angle remains constant, whereas both helical diameter and pitch increase with the helical contour length. 

1067429
Classroom teachers' perceived role in dental health education. 
This investigation utilized mail questionnaires to determine public school teachers' perceived adequacy to teach six dental health topics and responsbility for dental health in the classroom. The majority of public school teachers surveyed in Iowa City and surrounding communities felt adequate to teach dental health topics with two major exceptions: increasing proficiency in brushing and flossing, and understanding the processes and reasons for periodontal disease. More importantly, this study indicates that many teachers do not consider dental health activities to be responsibilities of the public school teacher. 

3228275
Effects of chronic phenobarbital exposure on cultured mouse spinal cord neurons. 
The anticonvulsant phenobarbital (PB), at concentrations of 20, 40, and 90 micrograms/ml, was chronically applied to cell cultures of mouse spinal cord from day 2 or day 14 after initial plating, and the effects of this exposure on neuronal density and morphological characteristics were determined. Neuronal morphological characteristics were analyzed quantitatively following intracellular injection of the fluorescent dye Lucifer yellow. Cultures exposed to PB for 6 weeks, from day 14 after plating, showed concentration-dependent reductions in neuronal density; both large and small neurons were equally affected. PB exposure also reduced dendritic branching frequency, and the length of dendrites, of remaining large neurons. A higher percentage of these neurons had a bipolar branching pattern than was normally the case. Neurons in cultures exposed to PB from day 2 after plating, compared with those exposed from day 14, showed significantly less alteration in terms of density and morphological characteristics. Effects on neuronal morphological characteristics increased with duration of drug exposure. Equimolar concentrations of barbituric acid produced effects similar to those produced by PB. Chronic exposure to PB adversely affects survival and morphological characteristics of mammalian central neurons grown in cell culture. Curiously, exposure from the time of initial plating appears to be less deleterious than exposure initiated 2 weeks later. To the extent that neuronal development in vitro can be compared to the situation in vivo, these results, and those of other investigators, raise concerns about long-term exposure of the developing human nervous system to PB. 

7181445
A genetical analysis of covariation between finger ridge counts. 
1. The genetical and environmental structure of covariation between finger ridge counts in twin and sibling data has been analysed using the method of Martin and Eaves (1977) adapted from Joreskog. 2. The model for environmental covariance contains a single factor loading on all ten digits but most environmental variance is specific to each finger. 3. For additive genetic variance there is one common factor loading on all digits. There are also five other independent factors, one for each digit. The thumb factor loads only on the two thumbs but the four fingers load on the finger in question and on the adjacent fingers. 4. A single common factor for non-additive genetic variance produces a considerable improvement in the model. 5. The pattern of genetic effects differs between left and right hands. 6. Although the same model is appropriate for males and females, different parameters estimates are required. 7. The fit of models is sensitive to the scale of measurement. 

2172375
Sodium pump numbers and cation transport of lymphocytes in pregnancy-induced hypertension. 
Pregnancy-induced hypertension may be linked with sodium pump inhibition and an increase in vascular myocytic tone and, hence, flow impedance. All of the findings of studies on circulating plasma and blood cells are not, however, consistent with this hypothesis. We therefore assessed sodium pump numbers and cation transport in lymphocytes from 23 women with untreated pregnancy-induced hypertension, 28 normotensive pregnant women and 28 healthy non-pregnant women. We measured the maximum 3H-ouabain binding capacity to determine the sodium pump activity and the apparent dissociation constant (the reciprocal of which estimates binding affinity) by Scatchard analysis, ouabain-sensitive (pump-mediated) 86rubidium influx and ouabain-resistant (pump-independent) influx in lymphocytes in vitro. Pregnant women, whether normotensive or hypertensive, had significantly more sodium pump activity and a higher pump-mediated and pump-independent 86rubidium influx than non-pregnant women. Sodium pump activity and the pump-mediated and pump-independent 86rubidium influx all reached normal, non-pregnant levels in normotensive pregnant women 6 weeks after delivery, but remained high in women with pregnancy-induced hypertension. The normotensive and hypertensive pregnant women and non-pregnant women all had similar ouabain binding affinity. The results of our study do not support the circulating sodium pump inhibitor hypothesis in pregnancy-induced hypertension. 

15078029
Shape invariance and a universal form for the Gouy phase. 
It is shown that Hermite-Gaussian beams, Laguerre-Gaussian beams, and certain linear combinations thereof are the only finite-energy coherent beams that propagate, on free propagation, in a shape-invariant manner. All shape-invariant beams have Gouy phase of the universal c arctan(z/zR) form, with quantized values for the prefactor c. It is also shown that, as limiting cases, even two- and three-dimensional nondiffracting beams belong to this class when the Rayleigh distance goes to infinity. The results are deduced from the transport-of-intensity equations, by elementary means as well as by use of the Iwasawa decomposition. A pivotal role in the analysis is the finding that the only possible change in the phase front of a shape-invariant beam from one transverse plane to another is quadratic. 

1164343
Medical aspects of supersonic travel. 
During the 1950s, military aircraft in France and the United Kingdom developed along almost identical lines in that supersonic fighters were developed together with delta-plan research aircraft capable of speeds twice the speed of sound (Mach 2). At the end of the decade, discussions between the British Aircraft Corp. (BAC) and Sub-Aviation of France (SUD) resulted in suggested designs for a supersonic transport (SST) aircraft. With official backing from both governments, the Anglo-French Concorde Agreement was signed in 1962. At first, the development costs were estimated to be between 150 and 170 million, the costs to be equally divided between both nations. The total costs for research and development are now expected to exceed 1065 million! 

2222536
Renal disease in chronic arthritis of childhood. A study of urinary N-acetyl-beta-glucosaminidase and beta 2-microglobulin excretion. 
Urinalyses of randomly obtained samples from children with various types of chronic arthritis revealed proteinuria in 2.3% of patients, hemoglobinuria in 3.5%, erythrocyturia in 4.1%, and leukocyturia in 5.3%; these frequencies are within the range found by screening school children. However, raised urinary levels of N-acetyl-beta-glucosaminidase and/or beta 2-microglobulin (both sensitive measures of renal tubular damage) were found more frequently in children with chronic arthritis than in controls (P less than 0.0001). Abnormalities of either N-acetyl-beta-glucosaminidase or beta 2-microglobulin excretion were associated with active arthritis as measured by physician global estimate of disease activity, with a polyarticular onset of juvenile rheumatoid arthritis, and with the use of slow-acting antirheumatic drugs or the concurrent use of more than 1 nonsteroidal antiinflamtory drug. Abnormal renal tubular function appears to be common in chronic arthritis of childhood. The long-term consequences of this abnormality remain to be elucidated. 

9616246
Cervical ecchordosis physaliphora: CT and MR features. 
We report a case of cervical ecchordosis physaliphora in an elderly man who presented with hemihypoaesthesia and contralateral hemiparesis. MRI showed a well defined, non-enhancing extradural mass lesion on the dorsal surface of the odontoid process of the axis. The lesion was of intermediate signal intensity on T1 weighted images and of low signal intensity on T2 weighted images. CT showed a small bony defect on the adjacent cortex of the odontoid process. Recognition of the imaging features of ecchordosis physaliphora is helpful in suggesting the diagnosis and differentiating the lesion from chordoma. 

10404899
The law, the AMA, and partial-birth abortion. American Medical Association. 
The three articles by Dr. Gans Epner, Drs. Sprang and Neerhof, and Dr. Grimes centered around the issue that criminal laws against so-called partial-birth abortion go beyond banning any one abortion procedure or just "late-term" procedures. It is noted that even the authors gave different definitions of "late term". In addition, neither the phrase "late term" nor "intact dilation" and evacuation is present or defined in any of the partial-birth abortion laws passed in 27 states or in the federal bill. Evidence shows that 17 courts across the US have blocked partial-birth abortion laws as unconstitutional, finding such laws could, at any point in a pregnancy, outlaw an abortion performed using the most common and safest procedures. In these terms, the endorsement of the federal partial-birth abortion law by the American Medical Association gave credibility to the deception that partial-birth abortion legislation is a ban on the intact dilation and extraction procedure. Moreover, it has endorsed government intrusion in a private medical decision and sanctioned a law that subjects physicians to criminal prosecution for providing necessary health care. 

12468115
The economic impact of malaria in Africa: a critical review of the evidence. 
Information on the economic burden of malaria in Africa is needed to target interventions efficiently and equitably, and to justify investment in research and control. A standard method of estimation has been to sum the direct costs of expenditure on prevention and treatment, and the indirect costs of productive labour time lost. This paper discusses the many problems in using such data to reflect the burden to society or the potential benefits from control. Studies have generally focussed on febrile illness, overestimating the burden of uncomplicated malaria, but underestimating the costs of severe illness, other debilitating manifestations, and mortality. Many use weak data to calculate indirect costs, which fail to account for seasonal variations, the difference between the average and marginal product of labour, and the ways households and firms 'cope' in response to illness episodes. Perhaps most importantly, the costs of coping mechanisms in response to the risk of disease are excluded, although they may significantly affect productive strategies and economic growth. Future work should be rooted in a sound understanding of the health burden of malaria and the organisation of economic activities, and address the impact on the productive environment, and epidemiological and socio-economic geographical variation. 

11274678
Social dominance rank and accessory sex glands in wild adult male house mice born to food-deprived mothers. 
Food deprivation after weaning often has greater effects on the reproduction of females than males. However, if animals are deprived prenatally (i.e., through deprivation of the mother during gestation), the reproduction of males may be more negatively impacted because it may decrease their ability to compete with other males and their attractiveness to females. We tested the predictions that adult sons of females that are food-deprived during gestation would tend to lose agonistic encounters with sons of well-nourished (control) females and would have smaller accessory sex glands as well. Sons of control mothers were more frequently dominant to sons of deprived mothers. They also had heavier vesicular-coagulating gland complexes and tended to have heavier preputial glands. However, among males that had not been tested for social dominance rank, there were no such differences in accessory gland weights. These data indicate that maternal food deprivation affects sons only if they engage in agonistic encounters. These effects may be due to a disruption of the organizational effects of testosterone that occur in neonatal male mice and they are likely to have a strong negative impact on the reproduction of the sons of deprived mothers. 

10881092
[Paracoccidioidomycosis in Brazilian Indians of the Surui tribe: clinical-laboratory study of 2 cases] 
Paracoccidioidomycosis has been considered the most frequent endemic systemic mycosis in Latin America. Although most cases of paracoccidioidomycosis involve rural workers, this systemic fungal disease has been scarcely reported among Amerindian populations from Brazil. We report two cases of paracoccidioidomycosis in Tupi-Monde Amerindians from Cacoal, state of Rondonia, Brazil. Both cases exhibited positive serological results by a specific immunodiffusion test only when the assay was performed with antigens obtained from the mycelial form of P. brasiliensis. The authors present a literature review of paracoccidioidomycosis in Brazilian Amerindians and discuss the need for further investigations about the impact of the antigenic diversity of P. brasiliensis from different geographic areas on the serological diagnosis of PCM. 

14651736
Neonatal intraventricular haemorrhage associated with maternal use of paroxetine. 
Selective serotonin reuptake inhibitors (SSRIs) have been reported to inhibit serotonin uptake into platelets, resulting in decreased platelet function. We report a case of a large intraventricular haemorrhage in a 6-h-old boy, whose mother used paroxetine during pregnancy. 

7923964
Long-term evolution and growth patterns in a family with Bartter's syndrome. 
The five-year evolution of three siblings of a sibship affected by a combined potassium and magnesium wasting abnormality associated with hypocalciuria is presented. Fractional distal chloride reabsorption was low. A number of therapeutic measures were attempted with partial or no success. Consequently, patients were kept on oral potassium and magnesium supplementation only. Special attention was paid to nutritional status. Although the three girls maintained a plasma potassium range of 2.6 to 3 meq/l, sexual and mental maturation were not delayed. Growth remained within the lower limits of normality. Considering the poor results obtained from treatment and the side-effects, we conclude that this long-term approach is sound, at least, in less severe cases of Bartter's syndrome. 

3171477
Low density lipoprotein metabolism by human macrophages activated with low density lipoprotein immune complexes. A possible mechanism of foam cell formation. 
Human macrophages play a key role in atherogenesis and are believed to be the progenitors of the cholesteryl ester (CE)-laden foam cells present in early atherosclerotic lesions. Several mechanisms by which macrophages accumulate CE have been recently described. One involves a perturbation in LDL metabolism subsequent to macrophage activation. Thus, we decided to study the effect of macrophage activation by immune complexes on N-LDL metabolism. Initially, LDL-containing immune complexes (LDL-IC) were chosen, since increased plasma levels of these IC have been reported in patients with coronary heart disease. Human macrophages stimulated for 22 h with LDL-IC (250 micrograms/ml) and incubated afterwards for 20 h with 10 micrograms/ml 125I-N-LDL showed a six- and fourfold increase in the accumulation and degradation, respectively, of 125I-N-LDL over the values observed in nonstimulated cells. Scatchard analysis of 125I-N-LDL-specific binding suggests an increase (20-fold) in the number of LDL receptors in macrophages stimulated with LDL-IC. We studied other immune complexes varying in size and antigen composition. Some of the IC were able to stimulate, although to a lesser degree, the uptake of N-LDL by macrophages. Lipoprotein IC are more efficient and have the greatest capacity to increase N-LDL uptake and CE accumulation. We conclude that human macrophage activation by LDL-IC leads to an increase in LDL receptor activity and promotes in vitro foam cell formation. 

2801527
Predictors of rhythm disturbances and subsequent morbidity after the Fontan operation. 
The electrocardiographic, hemodynamic and surgical data of 30 patients who underwent a Fontan operation between 1977 and 1986 were retrospectively reviewed to identify the incidence and predictors of immediate and late postoperative arrhythmias and associated morbidity in long-term survivors. Of 4 patients who died less than 1 year after operation (mortality 13%), 1 death was related to an arrhythmia. Three patients were not in sinus rhythm before operation and were excluded from the statistical analysis that examined predictors of arrhythmias. The remaining 23 long-term survivors have been followed 6.3 +/- 2.6 years (mean +/- standard deviation) since surgery and all remain in New York Heart Association functional class I or II. Ten patients (43%) developed immediate postoperative arrhythmias (less than or equal to 30 days) whereas 11 (48%) had late arrhythmias. With up to 10.7 years of follow-up, the proportion of patients free from late arrhythmias continues to decline. Arrhythmias included bradyarrhythmias, atrial tachyarrhythmias, the tachy-brady syndrome and supraventricular ectopic activity. Immediate postoperative arrhythmias predicted late arrhythmias (p = 0.022). The preoperative electrocardiogram was the only variable useful in predicting both immediate and late postoperative arrhythmias. A more negative P-wave deflection in lead V1 (-2.4 +/- 0.7 vs -1.4 +/- 1.2 mV, p = 0.02) predicted patients with immediate postoperative arrhythmias, whereas both greater P-wave duration and a more negative deflection in this lead predicted late arrhythmias (103 +/- 14 vs 83 +/- 20 ms, p = 0.01, and -2.5 +/- 0.8 vs -1.3 +/- 1.0 mV, p = 0.005, respectively). (ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS) 

83830
[Effects of diets rich in triglycerides and phospholipids on lipase and phospholipase A activities in rat pancreatic juice and pancreas] 
Lipase and phospholipase A activities were increased in the pancreas and pancreatic juice of rats ingesting during two months 20% phospholipids- or triglycerides-rich diets. The activity of lipase is higher with the triglycerides-rich diet and the phospholipase A activity is higher with the phospholipids-rich diet. After seven days of the experiment, these two enzymes activities were less increased with diet containing 40% lipids. 

12629301
A clinical ladder program based on Carper's Fundamental Patterns of Knowing in Nursing. 
Clinical and career ladder programs were popular adjuncts to recruitment and retention during the nursing shortage of the 1980s. Programs commonly used Benner's work as an organizing framework and typically used activities such as continuing education credit, committee participation, work experience, certifications, academic degrees, community service, and performance appraisal scores as criteria for advancement. The authors present a unique clinical ladder program based on Carper's Fundamental Patterns of Knowing in Nursing. This philosophical work has been debated in the literature for many years, yet to the authors' knowledge, this work has never been used as the conceptual basis for program development. The four patterns of knowing in nursing were found to be consistent with the definition of professional nursing, and provided a meaningful organizing framework that was well received by staff registered nurses. An overall history of clinical ladders is presented, followed by the organization's prior experience with these programs, and finally the details of development and implementation of the program with plans for evaluation. 

1579856
The influence of I-E on the generation of autoantibody and specific suppression in rat erythrocyte-immunized mice. 
A proportion of the antibodies produced by mice in response to the injection of rat erythrocytes (RRBC) cross-react with autologous red cells. When spleen cells from mice so immunized are transferred to naive syngeneic recipients, the recipient mice produce high anti-RRBC antibody titres but little or no autoantibody. This phenomenon has been attributed to the action of suppressor T cells. To date, the only mouse strain which consistently fails to demonstrate specific suppression of the autoantibody response is the SJL, which lacks the I-E molecules suggested to be important in the generation of suppressor T cells. The results presented here show that some, but not all, I-E negative strains of mice are capable of exhibiting transferable suppression of RRBC-induced antibodies. 

16346999
Glyphosate-Degrading Microorganisms from Industrial Activated Sludge. 
A plating medium was developed to isolate N-phosphonomethylglycine (glyphosate)-degrading microorganisms, with glyphosate as the sole phosphorus source. Two industrial biosystems treating glyphosate wastes contained elevated microbial counts on the medium. One purified isolate metabolized glyphosate to aminomethylphosphonic acid, mineralizing this accumulating intermediate during log growth. This microorganism has been identified as a Flavobacterium species. 

2529273
Cavernous angiomas of the anterior visual pathways. 
Three patients with cavernomas of the optic nerve, chiasm, or optic tract are presented. All suffered progressive visual loss due to local hemorrhage and the space-occupying effects of the vascular malformation. Computed tomography scans revealed small lesions with mild contrast enhancement in the suprasellar and parasellar cisterns, whereas angiography was unremarkable. Magnetic resonance imaging was helpful in our cases both for diagnosis and for planning surgical approach, showing typical signs of cavernomas as confirmed by subsequent surgery and histological examination. The clinical and intraoperative findings are presented. 

1307152
[The efficacy of preparations with antioxidant action in the combined treatment of phlegmons of the maxillofacial area] 
The efficacy of hexamethylene tetramine (urotropin) was studied in 62 patients with maxillofacial phlegmons. The resultant good effect is explained by the pathogenetic action of the drug. The antiinflammatory effect of urotropin may be explained, on the one hand, by its known antiseptic effect, and, on the other hand, by its membrane-protective effect on the cellular elements, this creating the optimal conditions for the wound reparation. 

392714
Qualitative and quantitative aspects of labeling cell surface carbohydrates using lectins as probes. 
Lectins are proteins which bind mono- and oligosaccharides with great specificity. Many polysaccharides, glycoproteins and glycolipids which are important constituents of cell walls and surface membranes of prokaryotic and eukaryotic cells, contain sugar moieties with which lectins can interact. As a result lectins have been extensively used for the study of cell surface and membrane structure of their labeling. This paper reviews and evaluates the available methods for the preparation of fluorescent, electron-dense and radioactive lectin derivatives. The procedures involved in the visualization of lectin binding under light and electron microscopy are described. In addition, the methods for quantitative evaluation of the fluorescence on labeled cells and for analysis of the number of cell surface lectin binding sites using radioactively-labeled lectins are outlined. Examples are given for the application of fluorescent lectin derivatives for the detection of specific saccharide-containing molecules on the surfaces of living or fixed microbial cells and various normal and neoplastic cells. The use of lectins to demonstrate the dynamic nature of cell membranes and to detect changes in membrane structure or organization which occur or organization which occur during differentiation, development or after neoplastic transformation is discussed. 

14609091
Improvement of the digestibility of the proteins of the red alga Palmaria palmata by physical processes and fermentation. 
Palmaria palmata (dulse) is an edible red alga constituting a potential protein source in human diet. However, previous studies showed that the digestibility of dulse proteins is bad because of the cell-wall encapsulating cytoplasmic proteins and the presence of fibers. The water-soluble xylan, present in high proportions in dulse, could be involved to explain the weak digestibility of proteins. To limit the influence of fibers and to improve the nutritional quality of these proteins, we have treated dulse by physical processes or by fermentation by moulds. After a 30 min predigestion by pepsin followed by a 6 h digestion into a cell dialysis containing porcine pancreatin, the corrected in vitro digestibility of crude dulse was very low (about 1.5% after correction by digestibility blank). The in vitro protein digestibility was estimated to 58% of that of casein for dulse samples obtained after washing in demineralized water and grinding in liquid nitrogen. The in vitro protein digestibility of fermented samples was 45%-65% of that of casein. After physical treatment, the digestibility improvement was related to the elimination of soluble molecules such as xylan and mineral salts. The improvement observed after fermentations seemed due to the degradation of insoluble fibers. 

6366181
Influence of the recipient's size upon renal function following kidney transplantation. An experimental and clinical investigation. 
The influence of the size of the recipient upon posttransplantation renal function was investigated in an experimental study of inbred rats as well as in a retrospective analysis of juvenile recipients of adult donor kidneys. The experimental study revealed either augmentation of the compensatory response, in case of a juvenile donor kidney transplanted into an adult recipient, or attenuation of this response, in case of an adult donor kidney transplanted into a juvenile recipient. Various workers have reported an augmentation of renal function in humans in case of adult recipients of juvenile donor kidneys. In contrast, attenuation of renal function in case of adult donor kidneys transplanted into juvenile recipients, has not been reported. This attenuation was substantiated in our retrospective clinical study. We found that 3 weeks after transplantation, the absolute creatinine clearance (mL/min) was lower in a group of recipients under 12 years old than in a group of recipients older than 12 years. The experimental as well as the clinical investigation indicated that the size of the recipient plays an important part in the functional outcome after renal transplantation. It appeared that the transplanted kidney behaves like a single organ pertaining to the recipient. 

2117555
Change in alpha-ketoglutarate dehydrogenase cooperative properties due to dihydrolipoate and NADH. 
Reducing 2 SH-groups of KGD by dihydrolipoate leads to cooperativity in substrate binding. Cooperative properties of KGD in the KGD complex are modulated by NADH. Physiological significance of these observations is discussed. 

2949133
Administration of gonadal steroids to neonatal rats affects beta-endorphin levels in the adult. 
Administration of gonadal steroids to neonatal rats has a profound effect on the function of the neuroendocrine system in the adult animal. Considering that gonadal steroids modulate hypothalamic and pituitary levels of beta-endorphin (BE) in adult male and female rats, the effects of neonatal gonadal steroid treatment on BE levels in the adult animal were investigated. Neonatal male rats were administered testosterone and neonatal female rats were treated with estrogen. Matched control littermates received vehicle. All animals were sacrificed at 90 days of age. Neonatal gonadal steroid treatment did not affect the level of immunoreactive beta-endorphin (IR-BE) in the anterior pituitary (AP) of male rats but did result in a significant increase in IR-BE in the AP of female rats. Neonatal administration of gonadal steroids produced a significant decrease in IR-BE in the neurointermediate lobe of the pituitary (NIL) of both male and female rats, with the magnitude of the decrease being greater in the NIL of the female rats. IR-BE levels in the hypothalamus of male or female rats were not altered by the treatments. Column chromatography indicated that the increase in IR-BE in the AP represented a proportional increase in BE and beta-lipotropin, while the reduction in IR-BE in the NIL of the treated rats represented a reduction in BE. These findings suggest that gonadal steroids may influence the development of the neurotransmitter systems which regulate BE levels in the adult pituitary, the development of the biosynthetic mechanisms of the adult pituitary, or both. 

7365784
The complete rate equation, including the explicit dependence on Na+ ions, for the influx of alpha-aminoisobutyric acid into mouse brain slices. 
The rate equation, including dependence on Na+-ion concentration for the influx of alpha-aminoisobutyric acid into mouse brain slices incubated in isotonic glucose medium at 37 degrees C, is v = 0.402 S/(1.02(1 + 788/[Na+]2)+S)+0.0477S, where v = influx in mu mol/min, g final wet wt of slices; [Na+] = concentbutyric acid in medium, in mM. This equation shows two kinetically independent, parallel pathways of concentrative uptake: one, saturable and dependent on Na+; the other, unsaturable and independent of Na+. Influx is independent of ionic strength, Cl- ion per se, and a moderate increase in tonicity. The binding of substrate to the saturable carrier depends on the Na+ concentration; the maximum capacity of this carrier does not. For transport, 2 Na+ ions must interact with each saturable transport site. This does not imply coupling between the flux of Na+ and the flux of alpha-aminoisobutyric acid. 

7458533
Epileptogenic stimulation of the cortical masticatory area and the mesencephalic trigeminal nucleus. 
1. The effects of epileptogenic stimulation of the cerebral masticatory area on the somata of the first-order neurons of masticatory proprioception localized in the mesencephalic trigeminal nucleus (MTN) were studied in curarized, lightly anaesthetized rabbits. 2. Low-frequency stimulations inducing modest cortical after-discharges fired the silent MTN units with latencies of 0.3-0.8 sec, and induced alternate excitatory and inhibitory effects on the active units. On some occasions the tonic afferent discharge was changed into rhythmic bursts, which occurred at the constant frequency of 2.5-3.5/sec for the entire range of stimulation frequencies used, i.e. from 0.3 to 10/sec. 3. High-frequency cortical stimulations eliciting true epileptic seizures induced a transient increase in discharge of the MTN units, followed by a prolonged inhibition. 4. All these effects were attributed to activation of reticular pathways acting on the some of the recorded proprioceptive neurons. Such a modulation of the proprioceptive input elicited by the epileptic masticatory cortex may contribute to the motor effects and to the changes of the masseteric reflex which occur during convulsive seizures. 

2271526
Inhibition of recA protein promoted ATP hydrolysis. 2. Longitudinal assembly and disassembly of recA protein filaments mediated by ATP and ADP. 
There are at least two major conformations of recA nucleoprotein filaments formed on poly-(deoxythymidylic acid) [poly(dT)], one stabilized by ATP [or adenosine 5'-O-(3-thiotriphosphate) (ATP gamma S)] and one stabilized by ADP. Assembly of filaments in the ATP conformation is much faster than assembly in the ADP conformation. A third conformation may be present in the absence of nucleotides. The ATP and ADP conformations are mutually exclusive. When a mixture of ATP and ADP is present, recA protein binding is a function of the ADP/ATP ratio. Complete dissociation is observed when the ratio becomes 1.0-1.5. When a mixture of ATP and ADP is present at the beginning of a reaction, a transient phase lasting several minutes is observed in which the system approaches the state characteristic of the new ADP/ATP ratio. This phase is manifested by a lag in ATP hydrolysis when ATP is added to preformed ADP filaments, and by a burst in ATP hydrolysis in all other cases. More than 15 ATPs are hydrolyzed per bound recA monomer during the burst phase. The transient phase reflects an end-dependent disassembly process propagated longitudinally through the filament, rather than a slow conformation change in individual recA monomers or a slow exchange of one nucleotide for the other. The hysteresis exhibited by the system provides a number of insights relevant to the mechanism of recA-mediated DNA strand exchange. 

14719861
Injuries associated with whitewater rafting and kayaking. 
Whitewater rafting and kayaking are growing exponentially in popularity, with almost 10 million rafters and 2 to 3 million kayakers, yet little has been published concerning the safety or hazards of these activities. This article reviews the demographics of such injuries and the types of injuries commonly encountered. Fortunately, fatalities are uncommon in these activities, with rafting and kayaking fatalities occurring at a rate of 0.55 and 2.9 per 100000 user days, respectively. Injury rates for kayaking and rafting are 3 to 6 and 0.26 to 2.1 per 100000 boating days, respectively. Acute injuries in kayaking are usually due to the transferred force of the water on the upper extremity, most often the shoulder, or the impact on an object while "swimming." Acute rafting injuries are more often due to contact with another rafter's paddle or other equipment; the next most common injury is the rafter hitting an object while "swimming. " Chronic injuries are very uncommon in rafting but account for 25% to 40% of all kayaking injuries and are most often either shoulder or wrist complaints. 

8240039
[Regression of tachycardiomyopathy after implant of pacemaker with antitachycardial function] 
A 27-year-old woman with systemic lupus erythematosus and Wolff-Parkinson-White syndrome complicated with refractory tachycardia and class III heart failure treated with pacemaker implantation was described. She had cardiomyopathy that could be due to lupus erythematosus or tachycardia-induced. Nonpharmacologic therapeutic alternative was used and a universal DDD pulse generator with selected programming was chosen. Twenty-four months follow-up showed tachycardia control and regression of symptoms of heart failure to class I as well as improvement of left ventricular function evaluated by echocardiographic method. Thus, pacemaker implant may be an useful alternative approach in patients with tachycardiomyopathy in whose other nonpharmacologic therapeutic options could not be performed. 

11307263
An in vitro study comparing root-end cavities prepared by diamond-coated and stainless steel ultrasonic retrotips. 
AIM: This study compared the appearance of root-end cavity preparations and the time required to prepare them using prototype ultrasonic diamond-coated (DC) and stainless-steel (SS) retrotips. METHODOLOGY: In 12 maxillary and 12 mandibular molar teeth 48 root-end cavities were prepared ultrasonically in the palatal, mesio-buccal, distal and mesial root-ends using DC and SS retrotips, alternately. Replicas of the resected root tips and the root-end cavities were examined under a scanning electron microscope (SEM), recording (i) incidence and extent of dentine cracks (ii) minimum remaining thickness of the dentine walls and (iii) surface quality of the resected root-ends. The time taken to complete the preparation was also recorded. Means of these parameters were compared for both types of retrotips using nonparametric tests. RESULTS: No resected root-ends had cracks before preparation. However, after preparation one root-end cavity shaped by an SS retrotip had a microcrack visible at 23x magnification. Four and seven other root-ends had crazed surfaces in the DC and SS groups, respectively (P > 0.05). Remaining minimum dentine thickness was 0.56 +/- 0.28 mm and 0.71 +/- 0.24 for the DC and SS groups, respectively, and this difference was significant (P < 0.05). A root-end cavity in one specimen in the DC group was perforated. Preparation times ranged from 25 s to 361 s and were significantly lower for DC tips (P < 0.01) than the SS tips. The time required to prepare root-end cavities also differed between roots; root-end preparation in mandibular molars was more time consuming. CONCLUSIONS: A better quality surface was produced by the prototype diamond-coated retrotips, in less time than the SS retrotips, which in turn caused fewer cracks than previously reported. DC retrotips removed more dentine than SS retrotips and should therefore be used with care to avoid overpreparation or perforation. 

8182933
Inactivation of tumor suppressor genes, p53 and Rb1, in plasma cell dyscrasias. 
The role of loss or inactivation of the retinoblastoma (Rb1) and p53 tumor suppressor genes in the pathogenesis of various human malignancies has been well established, yet little is known regarding plasma cell dyscrasias. In the present study, the loss of Rb1 protein expression, and the presence of Rb1 gene rearrangements as well as the presence of p53 somatic mutations (exons 5 through 9) were investigated in a panel of plasma cell dyscrasias, including 15 monoclonal gammopathies of undetermined significance (MGUS), 63 multiple myelomas (MM), and 18 plasma cell leukemias (PCL). In the same panel of cases, we established the frequency of ras oncogene mutations, the main genetic lesion associated with MM. We report that loss of Rb1 protein and p53 mutations are detectable in 34.7 and 9.8% of MM and PCL primary cases; no lesion was found in MGUS. In advanced stage MM, and PCL cases, Rb1 and p53 inactivation, as well as ras mutations were detected. Our findings show that Rb1 and p53 inactivation are associated with aggressive plasma cell dyscrasias, suggesting a role for these lesions in tumor progression rather than initiation. 

3970634
Reversible Pelger-Huet anomaly associated with ibuprofen therapy. 
A patient had a case of acquired-reversible pseudo-Pelger-Huet anomaly associated with a hypersensitivity reaction. Seven weeks after the illness, the hematologic anomaly was no longer present. 

2125850
[Typology and distribution of ganglion cells in the retina of lamprey (Lampetra fluviatilis)] 
Retinal ganglion cells (GC) of the Lamprey were studied after in vitro labeling of these cells by iontophoretic deposition of horseradish peroxidase into the optic nerve. The majority of GC are located at the boundary between the inner nuclear layer and the inner plexiform layer; a small proportion (20%) lies in the vitreous portion of the inner plexiform layer. Four types of GC were identified. 

9299731
Evaluation of multiwavelength chromatograms for the quantification of mixtures of pesticides by high-performance liquid chromatography-diode array detection with multivariate calibration. 
Three multivariate calibration methods, partial least squares (PLS-1 and PLS-2) and principal component regression, were applied to the simultaneous determination of the five pesticides iprodione, procymidone, chlorothalonil, folpet and triazophos by high-performance liquid chromatography with diode array detection. Such detection gives multiwavelength chromatograms from a single analysis of one sample. In this paper, calibration models at two different wavelengths were developed to resolve mixtures of five pesticides with overlapping chromatographic peaks. The first model, carried out at 220 nm as detector compromise wavelength, yielded satisfactory sensitivity for accurate estimation of the concentration of iprodione, procymidone, chlorothalonil and folpet and the second model, at 200 nm, was used for accurate estimation of triazophos. Both calibration models were evaluated using the chromatograms and first-derivative (1D) chromatograms by predicting the concentrations of independent test set samples. Finally, the proposed 1D calibration models were successfully applied to the determination of these pesticides in groundwater and soil samples. In all cases, the PLS-1 calibration method showed superior quantitative prediction ability than the PLS-2 or principal component regression methods. 

15328233
A meta-analysis examining the relationship among dietary factors, dry matter intake, and milk and milk protein yield in dairy cows. 
This meta-analysis was undertaken to determine the impact of dietary components on dry matter intake (DMI), milk yield (MY), and milk protein yield (MPY) in Holstein dairy cows. Diets (n=846) from 256 feeding trials published in Volumes 73 through 83 of the Journal of Dairy Science were evaluated for nutrient composition using 2 diet evaluation models: CPM Dairy (a computer program based on the principles of the Cornell Net Carbohydrate and Protein System) and NRC (2001). Data were analyzed with and without the effect of stage of lactation as a dummy variable (<100 d in milk or > or =100 d in milk). A mixed model regression analysis was used to completely investigate the potential relationships among composition variables and DMI, MY, and MPY. Protein and carbohydrate fractions were the main components within the DMI models, and DMI played a dominant role in estimating MY and MPY. Inclusion of stage of lactation substantially improved the MY models but did not affect model fits or residual structure for DMI and MPY. 

8916807
Seroprevalence of hepatitis B virus among school-age children in the Stann Creek District of Belize, Central America. 
Adults in the Stann Creek District of Belize have a high prevalence of hepatitis B virus (HBV) infection, but the age of onset of these infections is unclear. We conducted a seroprevalence study of hepatitis B markers among Stann Creek school-age children to provide information for planning a hepatitis B vaccine program. The overall prevalence in 587 students was high for antibody to hepatitis B core antigen (anti-HBc) (43.3%) and hepatitis B surface antigen (HBsAg) (7.7%). There was marked variation of anti-HBc by school and by the predominant ethnic groups attending those schools. Maya had the highest prevalence (76%), followed by Mestizo (50%), Garifuna (37%), and Creole (25%). Children less than nine years of age attending the rural primary schools (mostly Mayan and Mestizo) had significantly higher prevalence of anti-HBc than did children attending the urban primary school (mostly Garifuna and Creole) (P < 0.05). Anti-HBc was found in 42% and 36% of students at the two high schools. Of the five schools tested, only at the urban primary school did anti-HBc positivity increase with age. Based on an analysis of the cost of serologic screening before immunization compared with mass vaccination, preimmunization serologic screening resulted in vaccine program cost savings in four of the five schools. Because most children in the rural areas contract hepatitis B before entering school, immunization against HBV should be integrated into the routine infant immunization program. 

523186
Hepatitis B surface antigen and antibody status in biopsy proven chronic hepatitis in Singapore. 
During the period between January 1975 and August 1976, 203 liver biopsies were received at the Singapore General Hospital from patients with a variety of liver diseases. A histological diagnosis of chronic hepatitis was made in 29 patients: 13 cases of Chronic Aggressive Hepatitis (C.A.H.). 10 cases Chronic Persistent Hepatitis (C.P.H.) and 6 of Chronic Lobular Hepatitis (C.L.H.). C.P.H. and C.L.H. were found mainly in the third and fourth decades. C.A.H. was more common in the fifth to seventh decades and occurred principally in females. Hepatitis B antigenaemia was detected in 48.3% of these cases using the immunoelectroosmophoresis (EOP) technique and showed an even scatter in all histological sub-types. Using the reverse passive haemagglutination (rPHA) method for detection by HBs antigen and the radioelectrocomplexing (REC) method for anti-HBs, an immune sub-group (HBs Ag+/anti-HBs+) was identified in greater proportions in C.A.H. and C.P.H. compared to normal controls. This was interpreted to mean that these patients suffered from a primary immunodeficiency characterized by failure of production of high avidity anti-HBs with resulting failure to clear HBsAg leading to perpetuation of liver damage due to circulating immune complexes. It is also suggested that patients with C.P.H. belonging to this immune sub-group may progress to C.A.H. with its more ominous prognosis. 

8549581
Sodium citrate ingestion and muscle performance in acute hypobaric hypoxia. 
Eight subjects were studied on four occasions following ingestion of a 300-ml solution containing either sodium citrate (C, 0.4 g.kg-1 body mass) or placebo (P, sodium chloride 0.045 g.kg-1 body mass), at local barometric pressure (N, PB approximately 740 mmHg, 98.7 kPa) or hypobaric hypoxia (HH, PB = 463 mmHg, 61.7 kPa). At 2 h after ingestion of the solution, the subjects performed prolonged isometric knee-extension at 35% of the maximal voluntary contraction (MVC) measured either in N or HH. Results showed that ingestion of C led to an improvement in muscle endurance (P < 0.01). However, this increase in endurance time for knee extensor muscles was only significant in N (+22%, P < 0.05, compared to +15%, NS, at N and HH, respectively). Following ingestion of sodium citrate, pre-exercise bicarbonate concentrations and pH levels were significantly higher than those measured after P ingestion. A significant treatment effect was observed for blood lactate concentrations with values higher for C than for P after 4, 6 and 10 min of recovery (P < 0.05). Electromyographic signals (EMG) were obtained from the vastus lateralis muscle during the prolonged isometric contraction at 35% MVC. The mean power frequency (MPF) significantly decreased in time under both N-P and N-C conditions. In HH, no significant decrease in MPF was observed with time. The results suggest that C ingestion was an ergogenic aid enhancing endurance during a sustained isometric contraction. In addition, it is suggested that fatigue during prolonged isometric contraction in HH was not directly related to factors determining the EMG signs of fatigue. 

3080523
Mechanisms of immunity to rickettsial infection: characterization of a cytotoxic effector cell. 
Rickettsiae, as other intracellular bacteria, are relatively sequestered from the effects of antibody and local antibody-independent responses. Considering the obligate intracellular nature of rickettsia, the exact mechanisms by which lymphocytes and macrophages encounter rickettsial antigens and eliminate the infection depends upon the appropriate presentation of antigen to the immune system. We demonstrate here that cells taken from the spleens of Rickettsia typhi- or R. tsutsugamushi-infected mice are able to lyse specifically tissue culture targets infected with the homologous organism. This effect was eliminated upon treatment of the spleen cells with anti-Thy-1.2 + complement. Furthermore such T cells exhibit H-2-restricted killing when tested on infected targets of different genetic backgrounds. We propose that a T cell-mediated cytotoxic immune mechanism exists that may play an important role in the elimination of rickettsial organisms during infection. 

10844631
In vivo visualization of hemodialysis-induced alterations in leukocyte-endothelial interactions. 
BACKGROUND: The aim of this study was to develop a model for hemodialysis (HD) in small animals using conventional dialysis equipment that would allow the intravital microscopic observation of leukocyte-endothelial interactions in vivo. METHODS: Cuprophan dialyzers were adapted to obtain a similar ratio of membrane area to blood volume as in clinical HD. A silicone ring was inserted into the dialyzer's inlet to limit the number of blood-perfused capillaries. Rabbits were dialyzed for one hour without a dialysate flow. RESULTS: Extracorporeal circulation with the cuprophan dialyzer resulted in a transient leukopenia and complement activation. At the nadir of leukopenia, leukocytes that rolled along the venular wall were scarcely observed, whereas rolling was abundant (54 +/- 9 per min) prior to extracorporeal circulation. The adhesion of leukocytes to the vascular endothelium was not induced. After 60 minutes, rolling of leukocytes was still reduced by 73 +/- 5.5%, despite the full recovery of circulating leukocyte counts. Extracorporeal circulation without a dialyzer also tended to reduce leukocyte rolling, although systemic leukocyte counts were not affected. CONCLUSIONS: The use of adapted conventional cuprophan hemodialyzers in rabbits yielded a transient leukopenia similar to that in clinical HD. Using intravital microscopy, we demonstrated impairment of leukocyte-endothelial interactions. In addition, our data indicate that tissues, in which leukocytes can roll and adhere, are not automatically sites of leukocyte sequestration during HD-induced leukopenia. 

6855213
Measurement of cardiac pressure-length loops using an improved sonomicrometer. Accuracy and effect of respiration. 
A transit-time sono-micrometer for measurement of myocardial dimensions is described. Crystals of frequencies 1-10 MHz can be used, enabling a large range of distances to be measured. The meter has two channels, operated in sequence to avoid interference between channels. By combining local muscle segment length with the left ventricular pressure in open-chest cats, the pressure-length loop for that segment was continuously displayed. A calibration procedure was developed, permitting calibration to be registered on a recorder and on a storage monitor at any time. Detailed interpretation of loops from normal and ischaemic segments of the left ventricle is presented. Variation of the loop form with respiration is demonstrated, which clearly necessitates a standardized reference point in the respiratory phase for comparing loops from two or more experimental situations. 

8185891
Aggressive angiomyxoma of the vulva: an unusual, deceptive and recurrence-prone tumour with evidence of estrogen receptor expression. Case report. 
Positive staining for estrogen receptors is reported in a new case of aggressive angiomyxoma of the vulva. Clinical, light- and electron microscopic features as well as immunohistochemical reactions in this case are compared with the 28 earlier published cases, and the main differential diagnosis, angiomyofibroblastoma of the vulva, is discussed. 

2559830
Coordinate interactions of cyclic nucleotide and phospholipid metabolizing pathways in calcium-dependent cellular processes. 
It is hoped that his review enables the reader to appreciate the complexities implicit in the interactions among Ca2+, cyclic nucleotides, and phospholipid-metabolizing pathways in cell signal transduction. The interactions are varied and intricate, often involving several levels of cell amplification mechanisms. Upsetting the balance of fatty acids in membrane phospholipids can have detrimental effects on adenylate cyclase. Thus, n - 3 fatty acid enrichment of phospholipids suppresses adenylate cyclase activity. The effects of significant alterations in dietary fatty acids, such as might occur with the current vogue for n - 3 eicosapentaenoic acid and docosahexaenoic acid (fish oil) dietary enrichment regimens, will need to be assessed more fully with regard to stimulus-induced changes in cyclic nucleotide production in various tissues. Since the n - 3 fatty acids have not been demonstrated to affect guanylate cyclase activity, dietary changes in certain of these fatty acids would not be expected to contribute to changes in cGMP generation as much as in cAMP production. Moreover, the ingestion of large quantities of these n - 3 fatty acids can alter the profile of cyclooxygenase and lipoxygenase products produced in cells. According to the paradigm developed in this article, changes in the metabolism of fatty acids are amplified by alterations in cyclic nucleotide production and phospholipase activities, with the eventual physiological impact predicated on the tissue type and the specific stimulus response. There appears to be a rather clear distinction between the regulatory properties of eicosanoids regarding adenylate and guanylate cyclase activities. Whereas prostaglandins often stimulate adenylate cyclase activity, they have little effect on guanylate cyclase activity. On the other hand, the HETE compounds seem to play an important role in guanylate cyclase regulation in certain cells. Moreover, arachidonic acid affects adenylate cyclase activity without prior peroxidation, whereas endoperoxides and hydroperoxides are more effective than arachidonic acid with regard to guanylate cyclase stimulation. However, in the intact cell there is a strong implication that the dual stimulation of guanylate cyclase by Ca2+ and fatty acid evokes optimal enzyme activity. An advantage of multidimensional response mechanisms in cells includes the ability to recognize different stimuli and to respond with specific, coordinated responses modulated in their intensity and/or duration by messenger interaction. Few cell types respond to receptor stimulation in an all-or-none fashion, and the "milieu interior" depends on specific, graded responses to the autonomic nervous system and endocrine stimuli. (ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 400 WORDS) 

12821855
Effect of contrast dose and field strength in the magnetic resonance detection of brain metastases. 
PURPOSE: To compare the diagnostic efficacy of a standard and cumulative triple dose of magnetic resonance (MR) imaging contrast agent in the evaluation of brain metastases using a high-field 3.0 T MR unit versus a standard field 1.5 T MR unit. METHODS: Twenty-two patients with suspected brain metastases were examined at both field strengths using identical postcontrast coronal 3D gradient echo with magnetization preparation, which was adjusted separately for each field strength. In both groups initially, iv injection of 0.1 mmol/kg body weight gadolinium chelate (gadodiamide) and thereafter, 0.2 mmol/kg body weight gadodiamide were administered. Subjective assessment of the images was performed independently by 3 neuroradiologists. Objective measurement of signal-to-noise and contrast-to-noise ratios was obtained. RESULTS: The subjective assessment of cumulative triple-dose 3.0 T images obtained the best results compared with other sequences, detecting 84 metastases, followed by 1.5 T cumulative triple-dose enhanced images with 81 brain metastases. The objective assessment confirmed those results, showing significantly higher signal-to-noise and contrast-to-noise ratios with 3.0 T than with 1.5 T. CONCLUSIONS: Cumulative triple-dose images of both field strengths were superior to standard field strengths. However, administration of gadodiamide contrast agent produces higher contrast between tumor and normal brain on 3.0 T than on 1.5 T, resulting in better detection of brain metastases and leptomeningeal involvement. 

10206991
Cloning of a new mouse two-P domain channel subunit and a human homologue with a unique pore structure. 
Mouse KCNK6 is a new subunit belonging to the TWIK channel family. This 335-amino acid polypeptide has four transmembrane segments, two pore-forming domains, and a Ca2+-binding EF-hand motif. Expression of KCNK6 transcripts is principally observed in eyes, lung, stomach and embryo. In the eyes, immunohistochemistry reveals protein expression only in some of the retina neurons. Although KCNK6 is able to dimerize as other functional two-P domain K+ channels when it is expressed in COS-7 cells, it remains in the endoplasmic reticulum and is unable to generate ionic channel activity. Deletions, mutations, and chimera constructions suggest that KCNK6 is not an intracellular channel but rather a subunit that needs to associate with a partner, which remains to be discovered, in order to reach the plasma membrane. A closely related human KCNK7-A subunit has been cloned. KCNK7 displays an intriguing GLE sequence in its filter region instead of the G(Y/F/L)G sequence, which is considered to be the K+ channel signature. This subunit is alternatively spliced and gives rise to the shorter forms KCNK7-B and -C. None of the KCNK7 structures can generate channel activity by itself. The KCNK7 gene is situated on chromosome 11, in the q13 region, where several candidate diseases have been identified. 

1354274
Prevention of serious cardiac events by low-dose aspirin in patients with silent myocardial ischaemia. The Research Group on Instability in Coronary Artery Disease in Southeast Sweden. 
On exercise testing after an episode of unstable coronary artery disease (CAD; unstable angina or non-Q-wave myocardial infarction), a proportion of patients show ST-segment depression, indicating myocardial ischaemia, but do not report concomitant symptoms of angina. Treatment of such "silent" ischaemia aims mainly to reduce the risk of subsequent cardiac events. We have studied the effect of low-dose aspirin in patients with myocardial ischaemia defined at the predischarge test as silent (though patients might have had symptomatic ischaemia at other times) or symptomatic. 740 men with unstable CAD aged 70 years or less underwent symptom-limited exercise testing before hospital discharge; 144 showed ST depression without pain and 230 ST depression with simultaneous chest pain. Of the silent ischaemia group, 67 were randomly assigned placebo and 77 aspirin (75 mg daily); the corresponding numbers in the symptomatic group were 125 and 105. Angina symptoms were less common in the silent than in the symptomatic ischaemia group both before inclusion and during follow-up, and a greater proportion of the silent ischaemia group were included because of myocardial infarction. In both ischaemia groups aspirin treatment reduced the risk of subsequent myocardial infarction or death by 3 months' follow-up (silent 4% of aspirin-treated vs 21% of placebo-treated patients, p = 0.004; symptomatic 9% vs 18%, p = 0.05); at 12 months' follow-up a significant benefit of aspirin was still apparent in the silent ischaemia group (9% vs 28%, p = 0.005) but not in the symptomatic group (13% vs 22%, p = 0.109). Low-dose aspirin reduced the risk of subsequent myocardial infarction at least as well in silent as in symptomatic myocardial ischaemia. Since improvement of outlook is the main treatment objective in symptom-free patients, aspirin should be a mainstay of their treatment. 

11500047
Phorbol ester downregulates PDGFbeta receptor via PKCbeta1 in vascular smooth muscle cells. 
The role of protein kinase C (PKC) and their isoforms in cell growth regulation remains elusive. Here we showed that in cultured human vascular smooth muscle cells (SMC), the PKC stimulator phorbol 12-myristate 13-acetate (PMA) inhibited [(3)H]thymidine incorporation in response to the growth factor PDGF associated with downregulation of PDGFbeta (but not alpha) receptors, which was recovered to normal level after PKC was depleted. The changes in PDGFbeta receptor were inversely correlated with PKCbeta1 protein levels regulated by PMA. The downregulation of PDGFbeta receptor by PMA was fully prevented by the PKCbeta inhibitor LY379196, however, without recovery of [(3)H]thymidine incorporation to PDGF. In contrast, [(3)H]thymidine incorporation was fully recovered after depletion of PKCs. These results indicate that in human SMC PKCbeta1 mediates PDGFbeta receptor downregulation. Other PKC isoforms activated by phorbol ester also contribute to the inhibitory effects on cell growth. 

1020889
The genera Paranoplocephala Luhe 1910 and Anoplocephaloides Baer, 1923 (Cestoda: Anoplocephalidae), with particular reference to species in rodents. 
The present study redefines the systematic arrangement and taxonomic status of some anoplocephaline cestodes previously allocated among the genera Andrya Railliet, 1893. Paranoplacephala Luhe, 1910, and Aprostatandrya Kirshenblat, 1938. Comparisons indicated that Paranoplocephala omphalodes (Hermann, 1783), type species of Paranoplocephala, differs morphologically from its congeners, all of which conform to the diagnosis of the genus Anoplocephaloides Baer, 1923, hitherto considered a synonym of Paranoplocephala, and that it cannot be distinguished at the generic level from Aprostatandrya macrocephala (Douthitt, 1915), type of the genus Aprostatandrya. The distinction between Andrya and Aprostatandrya based on the presence or absence of a "prostate gland" does not exist, for neither the type species of Andrya, A; rhopalocephala (Riehm, 1881), nor A. cuniculi (Blanchard, 1891) possesses such an organ; rather, the structure of the external seminal vesicle in these cestodes does not differ fundamentally from that in P. omphalodes or in species of Aprostatandrya. Based on these findings, Aprostatandrya Kirshenbalt, 1938 is placed in synonymy with Paranoplocephala Luhe, 1910, and Anoplocephaloides Baer, 1923 is restored to contain all species other than P. omphalodes formerly allocated to the genus. Paranoplocephala. If the pattern of development of the uterus in A. rhopalocephala is found to be like that in P. omphalodes, Paranoplocephala Luhe, 1910 will in turn also become a synonym of Andrya Railliet, 1893. Three additional species of Anoplocephaloides are described, and the zoogeography of Anoplocephaloides spp. and their mammalian hosts is briefly discussed. 

1353082
Papillon-Lefevre syndrome. Characterization of peripheral blood and gingival lymphocytes with monoclonal antibodies. 
A 14-year-old boy with typical features of Papillon-Lefevre syndrome (PLS) is presented. The purpose of this report was to study the immunopheno-typic features of the peripheral blood and gingival tissue lymphocytes with monoclonal antibodies in the patient. Peripheral blood T-cells, helper-T cells, suppressor-T cells, HLA-DR+ cells and IL-2R+ cells were determined using appropriate monoclonal antibodies and indirect immunofluorescence methods. B-cells were identified using the direct immunofluorescence technique. The gingival tissue was processed for both histopathological and immunohistological examinations. Gingival tissue lymphocytes were identified using monoclonal and polyclonal antibodies with the immunoperoxidase technique. Although we have not detected any significant alterations in the peripheral blood B-cell and T-cell populations, NK cells were significantly increased. HLA-DR+ cells and IL-2R+ cells were within normal limits. Histopathology of the diseased tissue revealed predominance of plasma cells in the lamina propria. The majority of the plasma cells were bearing IgG isotype. Most of the CD3+ T-cells were located beneath the pocket epithelium with an almost equal distribution of CD4+ and CD8+ T-lymphocytes, in situ. These findings indicate that PLS is a IgG+ plasma cell dominated lesion with the participation of T-lymphocytes, having similar distributions of both subsets. While the etiopathogenesis of the syndrome still has to be elucidated, these immunohistological findings could be used for further studies in this intriguing entity. 

2153829
Potential antitumor agents. 59. Structure-activity relationships for 2-phenylbenzimidazole-4-carboxamides, a new class of "minimal" DNA-intercalating agents which may not act via topoisomerase II. 
A series of substituted 2-phenylbenzimidazole-4-carboxamides has been synthesized and evaluated for in vitro and in vivo antitumor activity. These compounds represent the logical conclusion to our search for "minimal" DNA-intercalating agents with the lowest possible DNA-binding constants. Such "2-1" tricyclic chromophores, of lower aromaticity than the structurally similar 2-phenylquinolines, have the lowest DNA binding affinity yet seen in the broad series of tricyclic carboxamide intercalating agents. Despite very low in vitro cytotoxicities, several of the compounds had moderate levels of in vivo antileukemic effects. However, the most interesting aspect of their biological activity was the lack of cross-resistance shown to an amsacrine-resistant P388 cell line, suggesting that these compounds may not express their cytotoxicity via interaction with topoisomerase II. 

15085533
Relationships between the fossil colobine Mesopithecus pentelicus and extant cercopithecoids, based on dental metrics. 
Maxillary dental measurements from six specimens of Mesopithecus pentelicus, 64 cercopithecines, 59 African colobines, and 64 Asian colobines were analyzed by means of a "nested research design" that was specifically designed to explore the affiliation between fossils and extant cercopithecoids at different systematic levels. The results showed that the variation among taxonomic groups was mainly associated with size; however, in addition, interesting shape differences emerged, molars were shown to be important discriminators, Mesopithecus was confirmed as a colobine (as expected) and found to be closer to Asian species than to African ones, and the odd-nosed colobines were found to share more dental similarities with Mesopithecus than other colobines. The last finding is in contrast to previous studies, in which it was proposed that M. pentelicus is morphologically closely related to the African colobus and the gray langur (Semnopithecus). 

2888038
Effects of apomorphine and (+/-)-3-(3-hydroxyphenyl)-N-n-propylpiperidine, injected into the striatum, on the caudate spindle in the rat. 
The caudate spindle in rats was observed following bilateral application of apomorphine (1.5-50 micrograms) and (+/-)-3-(3-hydroxyphenyl)-N-n-propylpiperidine (3-PPP, 0.3-3 micrograms) into the striatum. The smallest dose (1.5 micrograms) of apomorphine enhanced the spindle whereas with a larger dose (50 micrograms), suppression occurred. The preferential dopamine (DA) autoreceptor (inhibitory-receptor) agonist, (+/-)-3-PPP, enhanced the spindle, in a dose-dependent manner. The enhancing effect of apomorphine (1.5 micrograms) and (+/-)-3-PPP (3 micrograms) was prevented by neuroleptics, such as haloperidol (20 micrograms/kg, i.v.) and sulpiride (2 mg/kg, i.v.) at doses which, per se, did not affect the spindle. Small doses of neuroleptics are thought to block DA autoreceptors, suggesting that the enhancing effects of the DA agonists are mediated by autoreceptors. These results lend further support to the assumption that the development of the caudate spindle involves activation or DA receptors. Enhancement of the spindle, induced by injections of apomorphine into the striatum (small dose) and (+/-)-3-PPP, may be mediated by DA autoreceptors (inhibitory-receptors) located at presynaptic elements of the nigro-striatal DA system, while suppression may be due to stimulation of the postsynaptic DA receptors. 

17786181
A novel alkylating agent, glufosfamide, enhances the activity of gemcitabine in vitro and in vivo. 
Glufosfamide is an alkylating agent consisting of iphosphoramide mustard conjugated to glucose that is currently included in clinical studies of pancreatic cancer. We studied the effects of glufosfamide, in combination with gemcitabine, on in vitro and in vivo models of pancreatic cancer. In proliferation assays, glufosfamide and gemcitabine inhibited the growth of MiaPaCa-2, H766t, and PANC-1 cells, but the combination of the two agents provided greater effects. Apoptosis of MiaPaCa-2 cells, measured by fluorescence-activated cell sorting, was enhanced by the combination of the two drugs, compared to single-agent treatment. Glufosfamide alone inhibited the growth of red fluorescent protein-expressing MiaPaCa-2 tumors in an orthotopic nude mouse model in a dose-dependent manner. Combining glufosfamide (30 mg/kg) with gemcitabine resulted in enhanced inhibition of tumor growth and significantly prolonged survival. Immunohistochemistry of excised tumors revealed that both glufosfamide and gemcitabine increased levels of apoptosis (measured by terminal deoxynucleotidyl transferase-mediated nick end labeling staining) and reduced proliferation (measured by proliferating cell nuclear antigen staining). No effects on microvessel density were observed. These results support the use of the alkylating agent glufosfamide and the DNA synthesis inhibitor gemcitabine, rather than the use of either agent alone, to provide greater benefits and demonstrate that this combination treatment should be useful in the clinical treatment of pancreatic carcinoma. 

10194756
Morphology and ultrastructure of spiracles in phlebotomine sandfly larvae. 
The morphology and ultrastructure of the larval spiracle system of three phlebotomine sandfly species, Phlebotomus perniciosus, P. perfiliewi and P. papatasi, were examined by scanning (SEM) and transmission (TEM) electron microscopy and by confocal scanning laser microscopy (CSLM). During larval development, thoracic and abdominal spiracles show considerable modifications. In fourth instar larvae, the spiracles consist of a plate with a sclerotized central portion and a peripheral circle of papillae. The latter is distinctive in the larvae of P. papatasi, which are readily distinguished from the other species. Opening clefts across the papillae communicate with an internal chamber that encircles an electrondense plug. Many cylindrical projections cross the chamber, uniting the central plug with the larval body, forming an air filter. Spiracular development in successive larval instars has both a taxonomic and adaptive value. 

2565210
Renal tubular secretion of amiloride and its inhibition by cimetidine in humans and in an animal model. 
The histamine H2 antagonist cimetidine has been shown to reduce the renal tubular secretion of other organic cations through competition for the specific transport system with organic cations in the renal proximal tubule. The potential interaction between cimetidine and the potassium-sparing diuretic amiloride was investigated in humans and in the isolated perfused rat kidney. A chronic dosing study was conducted in eight healthy subjects who received, in random order, amiloride (5 mg daily), cimetidine (400 mg twice daily), both drugs together, and a control phase in which no drug was present. Cimetidine reduced the renal clearance of amiloride by a mean of 17%, from 358 +/- 134 to 299 +/- 118 ml/min (p less than 0.05), and the urinary excretion of amiloride from 65 +/- 11 to 53 +/- 13% of the dose (p less than 0.05). Amiloride reduced the excretion of cimetidine from 43 +/- 7 to 32 +/- 9% of the dose (p less than 0.05) and the area under the plasma concentration-time curve for cimetidine by a mean of 14% (p less than 0.05) but had no effect on the renal clearance of cimetidine. In the perfused rat kidney, cimetidine reduced the amiloride unbound renal clearance to glomerular filtration rate ratio from 5-7:1 to 1-2:1 (p less than 0.05). These studies demonstrate that cimetidine inhibits the renal tubular secretion of amiloride in humans and in rats to a similar extent. In addition, in humans the gastrointestinal absorption of both amiloride and cimetidine appear to be reduced by each other, by an as yet unknown mechanism. (ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS) 

6362161
Chemoimmune prophylaxis of superficial bladder tumors: results after treatment of 130 patients in 4 years. 
Since January 1978 we performed chemoimmune prophylaxis in 130 patients with superficial transitional cell carcinoma of the bladder. After complete tumor resection and exclusion of an urinary tract infection as well as an impaired global immune competence treatment consisted of one intravenous application of 700 mg Cyclophosphamide (CTX)/m2 followed by 6 intravesical instillations of 120 mg BCG/50 ml saline together with BCG skin scarifications. In a total of 12.3% of the treated patients tumor recurrences were observed until the 18th month. These results compared favourably with the high recurrence rate in a group of 80 patients without CTX/BCG prophylaxis. In 48 patients with a history of recurrent tumors statistically significant treatment effects were noted after CTX/BCG (p less than 0.01) using the Wilcoxontest. In 10% of the cases, inflammatory tumor-like lesions developed. Side effects of the treatment were generally well tolerable. From the presented data it is concluded that chemoimmune prophylaxis effectively prevents recurrences in superficial bladder cancer. 

1398023
Progesterone metabolism in vitro in the decapod crustacean, Penaeus monodon. 
Thin-layer chromatography (TLC) and reversed-phase high-performance liquid chromatography (RP-HPLC) with on-line detection of radioactive steroids were applied to identify metabolites of [4-14C]progesterone incubated in vitro with prawn ovary. There was extensive metabolism of progesterone by stage II (vitellogenic) ovary of Penaeus monodon. The most abundant metabolites were 5 alpha-pregnane derivatives together with two minor metabolites, 20 alpha-hydroxypregn-4-en-3-one and 1,4-pregnadiene-3,20-dione. In contrast, a much lower level of progesterone metabolism was observed in stage 0 (immature) ovary of this species. The hepatopancreas, gill, and abdominal muscle of P. monodon all metabolised [4-14C]progesterone to varying degrees, generating materials similar to those produced by the ovary. A comparative study of progesterone metabolism in stage II ovary of Nephrops norvegicus indicated that one metabolite, 20 alpha-hydroxypregn-4-en-3-one, was produced. 

6233930
[Antiandrogens and acne] 
One hundred forty-four patients with acne, in most cases severe, were treated with cyproterone acetate, either at low dose ( Diane : 2 mg daily for 21 days), or at high dose ( Androcur : 50-100 mg daily for 10 days) in an inversed sequential schedule according to Hammerstein . The comparison between the two groups of patients exhibits an highly significant difference in favour of Androcur , as well on seborrhea as on comedones and eruptions, whatever the dose (50 or 100 mg); similarly, the results of Androcur were the same with or without topical treatment (Tretinoin or Benzoyl peroxide). The tolerance was equally good in the two groups. 

15113624
Phospholipid-based microemulsion formulation of all-trans-retinoic acid for parenteral administration. 
All-trans-retinoic acid (ATRA) shows anti-cancer activities, especially in patients with acute promyelocytic leukemia. Due to the highly variable bioavailability of ATRA and induction of its own metabolism after oral treatment, development of alternative parenteral dosage form is required. The principal aim of this study was to develop a parenteral formulation of ATRA by overcoming its solubility limitation by utilizing phospholipid-based microemulsion system as a carrier. Microemulsion was prepared with pharmaceutically acceptable ingredients such as soybean oil and phospholipids. The mean particle diameter and polydispersity of ATRA microemulsion could be decreased to be applicable for parenteral administration by modulation of composition of microemulsion. The loading concentration of ATRA in microemulsion increased by increasing the oil contents and also by inclusion of distearoylphosphatidyl-ethanolamine-N-poly(ethyleneglycol) 2000 (DSPE-PEG). Furthermore, loading of ATRA in microemulsion improved the chemical stability of ATRA. The pharmacokinetic profile of ATRA after intravenous injection of microemulsion formulation to rats was similar to that of sodium ATRA. The growth inhibitory effects of ATRA on human cancer HL-60 and MCF-7 cell lines were also similar between free ATRA and microemulsion formulation of ATRA, suggesting that its anti-cancer activity was not impaired by loading in microemulsion. Our study herein demonstrates that phospholipid-based microemulsion may provide an alternative parenteral formulation of ATRA. 

10635387
Transoral laser microsurgery is the recommended treatment for early glottic cancers. 
Medical terminology frequently mistakes the instrument for the surgical procedure: endoscopic excision of laryngeal cancers existed long before laser came into use. Lasing obeys the same rules as those of suspension laryngoscopy: if adequate laryngeal exposure is not attained, then the procedure is at risk of being incomplete and of providing few satisfactory results. Because a certain degree of literary anarchy exists in terms of definitions for the different cordectomy types, the Nomenclature Committee of the European Laryngological Society has proposed a classification. This categorization is a synthesis and a compromise between members of the Society who had developed and used, for several years, a personal classification. The proposed classification has two aims: to better understand each surgeon's technique in function of the tumoral extent; and to compare more rigorously the postoperative results. This classification includes the following procedures: Subepithelial cordectomy or decortication (Type I); Subligamentous cordectomy (Type II); Transmuscular cordectomy (Type III); Total or complete cordectomy (Type IV); Extended cordectomy encompassing the contralateral vocal fold (Type Va); encompassing the arytenoid (Type Vb); encompassing the ventricular fold (Type Vc); encompassing the subglottis (1 cm) (Type Vd). 

16263910
Increased sensitivity to salt stress in an ascorbate-deficient Arabidopsis mutant. 
The Arabidopsis thaliana ascorbate-deficient vtc-1 mutant has only 30% ascorbate contents of the wild type (WT). This ascorbate-deficient mutant was used here to study the physiological roles of ascorbate under salt stress in vivo. Salt stress resulted in a more significant decrease in CO2 assimilatory capacity in the vtc-1 mutant than in the WT. Photosystem II function in the Arabidopsis vtc-1 mutant also showed an increased sensitivity to salt stress. Oxidative stress, indicated by the hydrogen peroxide content, increased more dramatically in the vtc-1 mutant than in the WT under salt stress. To clarify the reason for the increased oxidative stress in the vtc-1 mutant, the contents of small antioxidant compounds and the activities of several antioxidant enzymes in the ascorbate-glutathione cycle were measured. Despite an elevated glutathione pool in the vtc-1 mutant, the ascorbate contents and the reduced form of ascorbate decreased very rapidly under salt stress. These results showed that the activities of MDAR and DHAR were lower in the vtc-1 mutant than in the WT under salt stress. Thus, low intrinsic ascorbate and an impaired ascorbate-glutathione cycle in the vtc-1 mutant under salt stress probably induced a dramatic decrease in the reduced form of ascorbate, which resulted in both enhanced ROS contents and decreased NPQ in the vtc-1 mutant. 

7640741
[Hyperexplexia] 
Hyperexplexia is a disease of neonatal onset characterized by an exaggerated startle reflex. Early diagnosis is important to rule out epilepsy. Clinical findings are mainly hypertony and generalized startle reflex which is exaggerated by tiredness and some exogenous stimuli. Electroencephalogram is normal. The expression of the disease is variable including minor forms that may be unnoticed and major forms with arthrogryposis-like symptoms, orthopedic complications, false passages, apnea and even sudden infant death (SID). The evolution is generally benign and symptoms disappear within 2 or 3 years. A neuromotor retardation is often present, without intellectual deficit. In severe forms, the risk of SID requires a multidisciplinary follow-up including monitoring and treatment with clonazepam. A low GABA level in cerebrospinal fluid has been reported. Present etiological hypotheses include neuromediator and/or receptor dysfunction. 

557894
Breast milk composition in Ethiopian and Swedish mothers. III. Amino acids and other nitrogenous substances. 
The content of amino acids and other nitrogenous substances was determined in milk samples from Ethiopian and Swedish mothers. The Ethiopian mothers were divided into two groups, one with children having low weight for age and one with children having standard weight for age. All children were in the age range 2 to 5 months, and there were eight in each group. The main findings were as follows: 1) The mean daily milk volumes and total daily nitrogen content in the milk were found to be similar in all three groups. The Swedish group had a significantly lower nitrogen content per milliliter than did the Ethiopian group with low weight for age. 2) The total amino acid composition of the milk was almost identical in the three groups studied except for the tyrosine value, which was significantly lower in the Ethiopian standard group than in the low weight for age group. The composition corresponded well with previous findings. 3) The protein fraction constituted 90 to 92% of the total amino acids, the peptide fraction 4 to 5%, and the free amino acids 5%. 4) The concentrations of free amino acids in milk were lower (2 to 6 times) than in plasma, except for glutamic and aspartic acid. The taurine concentration was much higher in milk than in plasma. Only the urea levels in milk and plasma were significantly correlated. The implications of these findings in child health are discussed. 

16437679
Tumor necrosis factor-alpha-induced protein 1 and immunity to hepatitis B virus. 
AIM: To compare the gene expression profile in a pair of HBV-infected twins. METHODS: The gene expression profile was compared in a pair of HBV-infected twins. RESULTS: The twins displayed different disease outcomes. One acquired natural immunity against HBV, whereas the other became a chronic HBV carrier. Eighty-eight and forty-six genes were found to be up- or down-regulated in their PBMCs, respectively. Tumor necrosis factor-alpha-induced protein 1 (TNF-alphaIP1) that expressed at a higher level in the HBV-immune twins was identified and four pairs of siblings with HBV immunity by RT-PCR. However, upon HBV core antigen stimulation, TNF-alphaIP1 was downregulated in PBMCs from subjects with immunity, whereas it was slightly upregulated in HBV carriers. Bioinformatics analysis revealed a K+ channel tetramerization domain in TNF-alphaIP1 that shares a significant homology with some human, mouse, and C elegan proteins. CONCLUSION: TNF-alphaIP1 may play a role in the innate immunity against HBV. 

11820506
Effects of pH and temperature on benzo[a]pyrene-DNA, -protein, and -lipid adducts in primary rat hepatocytes. 
The effects of pH and temperature on benzo[a]pyrene(BaP)-DNA, -protein, and -lipid adducts were compared in rat hepatocytes treated with [3H]-BaP. In primary rat hepatocytes, BaP-DNA, -protein, and -lipid adducts were formed in a concentration-dependent manner (0.31-2.80 mmol BaP), and the formation of BaP-lipid adducts, specifically triglyceride (TG) adducts, correlated well with that of DNA or protein adducts. As incubation time increased (1-24 h), the formation of DNA or protein adducts was also elevated, while BaP-TG adducts decreased after 3 h of reaction. pH had no effect on the formation of [3H]-BaP-DNA, and -protein adducts, and the TG adducts decreased with increasing pH (3.4-11.4). With an increase in incubation temperature (30-45 degrees C), on the other hand, the adduct formation was increased with increasing temperature up to 40 degrees C and then decreased sharply. These results suggest that the physicochemical properties of BaP-DNA, -protein, and -TG adducts might be important to consider when cells or humans who have been exposed to BaP are monitored for biomarkers. 

10612050
Quantitative secretion and maximal secretion capacity of retinol, beta-carotene and alpha-tocopherol into cows' milk. 
Changes in the contents of retinol, alpha-tocopherol and beta-carotene in plasma, milk and milk fat from 38 Holstein-Friesian cows were followed during their first lactation, and the quantitative and kinetic relationships for secretion of alpha-tocopherol and beta-carotene from blood into milk were determined. The cows were assigned to three groups such that all cows in the same group had the same sire. Milk yield and milk fat content differed with stage of lactation, but not according to sire. The plasma concentrations of retinol, alpha-tocopherol and beta-carotene differed with stage of lactation; in addition, retinol and beta-carotene concentration also differed according to sire. The concentrations of all three vitamins in milk and milk fat differed according to sire and stage of lactation. Furthermore, the total secretion of retinol, alpha-tocopherol and beta-carotene into milk (expressed as mg/d) differed with sire and stage of lactation. The quantitative secretion of alpha-tocopherol and beta-carotene from blood into milk followed Michaelis-Menten kinetics for active transport across membranes. Values of maximum secretory capacity Vmax and the half-rate constant K(m) for both alpha-tocopherol and beta-carotene varied according to sire. Overall means for Vmax for alpha-tocopherol and beta-carotene were 32.4 and 2.5 mg/d. Thus, the daily secretion of alpha-tocopherol and beta-carotene is limited in quantity, and is independent of the yields of milk and milk fat. It follows that continuing breeding and management systems that focus solely on increasing milk and milk fat yield will result in a steady dilution in the milk fat of these vitamins and antioxidants important for the immune defence of the cows and oxidative stability of milk products. The genetic variation found offers the possibility of utilizing these variations in breeding systems. 

3896982
Non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drugs in haemophilic arthritis. A clinical and laboratory study. 
Non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drugs are theoretically contra-indicated in the haemophilias but might be useful for those patients with chronic arthritic pain, as long-term strong analgesics are also undesirable. We carried out studies of platelet function and coagulation in 8 normal controls and 7 haemophiliacs while they were taking sequentially benoxaprofen and salsalate. No significant alterations in platelet function, bleeding time or coagulation occurred with either drug. In a subsequent double-blind controlled clinical trial using ibuprofen and placebo 8 of 9 patients had a significant reduction in pain score whilst using ibuprofen without significant change in the frequency of bleeds or the amount of concentrate used. Laboratory measures of coagulation also failed to reveal any adverse effect of the active drug. Non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drugs may be beneficial and may be used with caution in haemophilia. 

10644330
Respiratory syncytial virus infection and G and/or SH protein expression contribute to substance P, which mediates inflammation and enhanced pulmonary disease in BALB/c mice. 
A distinct clinical presentation of respiratory syncytial virus (RSV) infection of humans is bronchiolitis, which has clinical features similar to those of asthma. Substance P (SP), a tachykinin neuropeptide, has been associated with neurogenic inflammation and asthma; therefore, we chose to examine SP-induced inflammation with RSV infection. In this study, we examined the production of pulmonary SP associated with RSV infection of BALB/c mice and the effect of anti-SP F(ab)(2) antibodies on the pulmonary inflammatory response. The peak production of pulmonary SP occurred between days 3 and 5 following primary RSV infection and day 1 after secondary infection. Treatment of RSV-infected mice with anti-SP F(ab)(2) antibodies suggested that SP may alter the natural killer cell response to primary and secondary infection. In mice challenged after formalin-inactivated RSV vaccination, SP appears to markedly enhance pulmonary eosinophilia as well as increase polymorphonuclear cell trafficking to the lung. Based on studies with a strain of RSV that lacks the G and SH genes, the SP response to RSV infection appears to be associated with G and/or SH protein expression. These data suggest that SP may be an important contributor to the inflammatory response to RSV infection and that anti-SP F(ab)(2) antibodies might be used to ameliorate RSV-associated disease. 

7375239
Neonatal herpes simplex virus infection introduced by fetal-monitor scalp electrodes. 
An infant was severely infected with herpes simplex virus as a result of fetal monitoring with scalp electrodes on the buttocks. The first vesicles appeared at the site where the electrodes had been placed and, by day 9 after birth, additional lesions covered the entire perineum and lower extremities. The child developed acute meningoencephalitis and pneumatosis intestinalis. Herpes simplex virus was isolated from cultures of skin vesicle fluid, cornea, saliva, blood, and spinal fluid. The infection resolved after treatment with adenosine arabinoside, administered intravenously for 11 days and applied topically for another 15 days. A follow-up examination when the child was 2 years old disclosed no physical or neurologic abnormalities. This case illustrates the risk of introducing herpes simplex infection by internal fetal monitoring. 

1524286
Fungal flora of the healthy camelid conjunctival sac. 
Swab specimens for fungal isolation were collected from the healthy conjunctival sacs of 3 species of captive camelids (Lama glama, L guanicoe, L pacos) and llama-guanaco hybrids. Fungi were collected from over half the animals in winter (53%) and summer (56%). Fungal species of 10 genera were isolated. In both seasons, Aspergillus was the most commonly isolated genus; at least 9 species of Aspergillus were found. The fungal organisms isolated were similar to those found in healthy eyes of other domestic animals and may represent a random seeding from the environment where they are ubiquitous. 

7310537
Intestinal synthesis and absorption of vitamin B-12 in channel catfish. 
A feeding experiment conducted in a controlled environment and using a vitamin B12-deficient, but otherwise nutritionally complete, purified diet revealed that intestinal microorganisms in channel catfish synthesized approximately 1.4 ng of vitamin B12 per gram of bodyweight per day. Removal of cobalt from the diet or supplementation with an antibiotic (succinylsulfathiazole) significantly reduced the rate of intestinal synthesis and liver stores of vitamin B12. Radiolabeled vitamin B12 in the blood, liver, kidneys, and spleen of fish fed 60Co in the diet indicated that the intestinally synthesized vitamin was absorbed by the fish. The primary route of absorption was directly from the digestive tract into the blood because coprophagy was prevented in the rearing aquariums and the amount of vitamin B12 dissolved in the aquarium water was too low for gill absorption. Dietary supplementation of vitamin B12 was not necessary for normal growth and erythrocyte formation in channel catfish in a 24-week feeding period. A longer period, however, may have caused a vitamin deficiency since liver-stored vitamin B 12 decreased between the 2nd and 24th weeks. 

10775515
A neurobehavioral treatment for unilateral complex partial seizure disorders: a comparison of right- and left-hemisphere patients. 
This study looked at the efficacy of a multi-disciplinary neurobehavioral approach for treating patients with complex partial seizure disorders. Patients with a seizure focus in either the left or right hemisphere were compared for overall effectiveness of this approach in achieving control of complex partial seizures. Patients in this study received short-term treatment based on a model of self-control developed by the Andrews/Reiter Epilepsy Research Program. This research selected all patients who met the lateralization criterion from among cases receiving short-term treatment between 1992 and 1996. Forty-four patients were identified, a group of 21 right-hemisphere subjects and a second group of 23 left-hemisphere subjects. These patients were treated in a short-term (5 consecutive days) treatment protocol and then released, with weekly phone contact for 6 months following treatment. They were then followed for an additional 19 months through the continued submission of their seizure logs and journals. Subjects in both groups kept seizure records throughout the study starting with a two-month baseline period. Other data collected allowed study of the interaction of emotional states with seizure occurrence. This project produced valuable and relevant information regarding neurobehavioral management interventions as an effective adjunctive or alternative treatment for obtaining seizure control in epilepsy patients. Overall, 79% of patients treated achieved seizure control. More than 64% identified a recognizable emotional state that triggered seizures. The emotional trigger was specific for either the right or left hemisphere. 

3142681
Tumor progression in Sencar mouse skin as a function of initiator dose and promoter dose, duration, and type. 
The influence of initiator dose and promoter dose, duration, and type on the progression of papillomas to carcinomas was examined in Sencar mice. A good dose-response relationship for promotion of papilloma formation by 12-O-tetradecanoylphorbol-13-acetate (TPA) [following initiation with 6.5 micrograms of 7,12-dimethylbenz(a)anthracene (DMBA)] was observed in the range of 0.125 to 2.0 micrograms/mouse. A maximal papilloma response was induced with 2 micrograms/mouse (24 papillomas/mouse). When adjusted for mortality, the carcinoma incidence after 60 wk of promotion was essentially the same (approximately 80%) for doses above 0.5 micrograms/mouse. In a related experiment, mice were given an initiation dose of either 2 or 20 micrograms of DMBA followed by applications of 2 micrograms of TPA for 3, 5, 7, or 60 wk. Papilloma formation was proportional to length of treatment, with a maximum of 29 papillomas/mouse (20-micrograms initiating dose of DMBA) and 10 papillomas/mouse (2-micrograms initiating dose of DMBA) occurring between 10 and 15 wk of promotion. In this experiment, the carcinoma incidence was clearly proportional to the duration of promoter treatment at the low initiation dose of DMBA. The carcinoma incidence, on the other hand, was similar (approximately 70%) in groups of mice given an initiation dose of 20 micrograms of DMBA and promotion treatment for greater than or equal to 5 wk. Thus, the initiator dose had a dramatic effect on the outcome of these experiments. Additional experiments were performed to compare tumor progression with the anthrone promoter, chrysarobin. At optimal promoting doses, chrysarobin treatment produced a maximum number of papillomas that was approximately 1/3 that produced by TPA (6.4 versus 17.0 papillomas per mouse, respectively). However, the carcinoma response was very similar in these two treatment groups, confirming previous work from this laboratory. In addition, chrysarobin treatment following 10 wk of TPA promotion did not enhance the progression of preexisting papillomas to carcinomas. The data presented in this paper are consistent with a model in which several types or stages of papillomas are initially produced during two-stage carcinogenesis in mouse skin with different probabilities of progressing to carcinomas. However, the data indicate that optimal doses of promoter and initiator exist and can influence interpretation of tumor progression studies in mouse skin. 

8636119
Polarized expression of GABA transporters in Madin-Darby canine kidney cells and cultured hippocampal neurons. 
At least three high affinity Na+- and Cl--dependent gamma-aminobutyric acid (GABA) transporters are known to exist in the rat and mouse brain. These transporters share 50-65% amino acid sequence identity with the kidney betaine transporter which also transports GABA but with lower affinity. The betaine transporter (BGT) is expressed on the basolateral surface of polarized Madin-Darby canine kidney (MDCK) cells. Recent evidence suggests that the signals and mechanisms involved in membrane protein sorting share many functional characteristics in polarized neurons and epithelial cells. It was previously shown that the rat GABA transporter GAT-1 is located in the presynaptic membrane of axons where it plays a role in terminating GABAergic neurotransmission. When expressed in MDCK cells by transfection, GAT-1 was sorted to the apical membrane. In this report, we have localized the other two GABA transporters, GAT-2 and GAT-3, in transfected MDCK cells by GABA uptake, immunofluorescence, and cell surface biotinylation. GAT-3, like GAT-1, localized to the apical membrane of MDCK cells while GAT-2, like BGT, localized to the basolateral membrane. We have also expressed BGT in low density cultures of hippocampal neurons by microinjection and immunolocalized it to the dendrites. The distribution of GAT-3 in these neurons after transfection was axonal as well as somatodendritic. These results indicate that highly homologous subtypes of GABA transporters are sorted differently when expressed in epithelial cells or neurons and suggest that these two cell types share the capacity to distinguish among these isoforms and target them to distinct destinations. 

12389779
Long-term changes in sewage sludge stored in a reed bed. 
The problem of the utilization and management of sewage sludge originating from small wastewater treatment plants is still unsolved. A common approach is to store the sludge in plots which in time turn into grassland. This investigation was aimed at evaluating the influence of the storage time in plots on the chemical properties of sewage sludge deposited there. Tests were carried out on samples obtained from discrete layers of stratified sludge that had lain in a hydrophyte facility disused for 7 years after 23 years of continuous sludge discharge. The age of the sludge was established by the lead-210 method. Moisture, organic matter, total nitrogen and total phosphorus contents were measured in samples of dated sewage sludge. The composition of the stored biosolids stabilized with respect to phosphorus, nitrogen and organic matter within 11, 15 and 17 years, respectively. 

8643383
The isolation of U1 RNA-binding antibody fragments from autoimmune human-derived bacteriophage display libraries. 
Almost seventy percent of systemic lupus erythematosus (SLE) patients produce autoantibodies specific for U1 RNA, the RNA component of the U1snRNP complex involved in pre-mRNA splicing. Human anti-U1 RNA antibodies from SLE patients provide an ideal model for studying protein-RNA interactions. In addition, a more in depth look at the mechanism by which an antibody interacts with U1 RNA will lend insight into immune disregulation and may have therapeutic potential in the treatment of autoimmune disease. The possibility of cloning an anti-U1 RNA antibody has been investigated using "phage Fab display," a method involving the display of Fab fragments on the outer surface of filamentous phage. Human Fab cDNA libraries were constructed using total RNA collected from leukophoresed anti-U1 RNA antibody-positive SLE patient sera. The resulting Fab genes were subcloned into a phagemid expression vector which produced phage displaying Fab fragments in E.coli1. Libraries were enriched for U1 RNA-binding clones after several rounds of affinity selection against purified, in vitro transcribed U1 RNA. Putative U1 RNA-binding clones were identified by colony lift and the corresponding Fab genes were expressed and purified from E.coli for binding studies. Results demonstrate that RNA-binding Fab can be isolated from combinatorial phage display libraries. 

9694569
Serotonergic regulation of adrenocortical function. 
Serotonin (5-HT) plays a pivotal role in the regulation of the hypothalamo-pituitary-adrenal axis. In particular, 5-HT is involved in the stimulation of ACTH secretion during stress. Recent data indicate that, at the adrenal level, 5-HT acts as a local regulator of corticosteroid secretion. The presence of 5-HT in the adrenal gland has been demonstrated immunohistochemically and biochemically in various species including frog, mouse, rat and human. In the mouse, 5-HT has been detected in nerve fibers while, in the frog and rat, 5-HT appears to be sequestered in chromaffin cells. In man, 5-HT is stored in perivascular mast cells. In vivo and in vitro studies have shown that 5-HT stimulates mineralo- and glucocorticoid secretion from adrenal cells. In rat, the type of receptor involved in the corticotropic effect of 5-HT is still controversial. In the frog and the human, the effect of 5-HT on the adrenal cortex is mediated through a 5-HT4 receptor subtype positively coupled to adenylyl cyclase and calcium influx. Clinical studies indicate that 5-HT4 receptor agonists stimulate aldosterone secretion in healthy volunteers and in patients with aldosterone disorders. The 5-HT4 receptor agonist cisapride and angiotensin II exert additive effects on aldosterone secretion. In contrast, cisapride has no influence on ACTH-induced aldosterone release. Collectively, these findings suggest that intra-adrenal 5-HT stimulates the secretory activity of adrenocortical cells through a paracrine mode of communication involving a 5-HT4 receptor type. Serotonergic control of corticosteroid production may be involved in the physiological control of the activity of the adrenal cortex, in particular during inflammatory stress. 5-HT may also be implicated in the pathophysiology of aldosterone disorders. 

3694373
Effect of sympathectomy on ontogeny of small intestinal disaccharidases in the rat. 
In the present study the effect of chemical sympathectomy on the development of small intestinal enzymes in the rat was analyzed. Eight doses of guanethidine sulfate were administered subcutaneously every 48 h to 34 newborn rats, starting at birth. The last dose was given at 14 days of age. Twenty-two littermates served as controls. Intestinal lactase, maltase, sucrase, and alkaline phosphatase were determined at 15, 17, 20, 23, and 25 days of age. Sympathectomy was demonstrated by reduction of the number of perikarya in the superior cervical ganglia in treated rats as compared with control rats. A normal developmental pattern of activities of the disaccharidases in the small intestine was observed in both groups. The activity of alkaline phosphatase was significantly lower (p less than 0.01) in the 15- and 17-day-old treated animals. 

3417870
Plasma clearance of human extracellular-superoxide dismutase C in rabbits. 
Extracellular-superoxide dismutase (EC-SOD) is heterogenous in the vasculature with regard to heparin affinity and can be separated into three fractions: A, without affinity; B, with weak affinity; and C, with relatively strong heparin affinity. The plasma clearance of intravenously injected 125I-labeled and unlabeled human EC-SOD C was studied in rabbits. About 90% of injected 125I-EC-SOD C was eliminated from the blood within 5-10 min. Injection of heparin after 10 or 20 min led to an immediate release of all sequestered 125I-EC-SOD C back to the blood plasma. Later injections of heparin led to diminished release, although release could still be demonstrated after 72 h. A half-time of approximately 10 h could be calculated for heparin-releasable 125I-EC-SOD C. Unlabeled EC-SOD C, determined as enzymic activity and with ELISA, was likewise sequestered and released to the same degree as 125I-labeled EC-SOD C by heparin as tested at 20 min and 5 h. The immediacy of the heparin-induced release indicates that the sequestered enzyme had been bound to endothelial cell surfaces. The length of the half-time suggests that the putative cell surface binding has a physiological function and is not primarily a step in enzyme degradation. The distribution of sequestered 125I-labeled EC-SOD C to different organs was determined at times between 10 min and 24 h. Of the organs, the liver contained the most 125I-EC-SOD C, followed by kidney, spleen, heart, and lung. At all investigated times, the content in the analyzed organs was nearly as large as the amount that could be promptly released to plasma by intravenous heparin. This indicates that almost all 125I-EC-SOD C in the organs was present on endothelial cell surfaces and was not bound by other tissue cell surfaces, or was present within the cells. 

11452620
Removal of chemical contaminants from water to below USEPA MCL using fiber glass supported activated carbon filters. 
A new, low-cost fiber glass supported activated carbon (FGAC) filter has been prepared that displays enhanced adsorption characteristics for the removal of BTEX (benzene, toluene, ethylbenzene, and p-xylene) from water to below maximum contaminant level (MCL) regulated by USEPA and two chemical warfare agent simulants (diisopropylmethyl phosphonate and 2-chloroethyl ethyl sulfide) to barely detectable levels. Breakthrough curves for both the FGAC filter and a commercially available granular activated carbon (GAC) filter containing equal weights of adsorbent show that the FGAC filter has greatly improved kinetics of adsorption over the GAC filter for all six chemical contaminants. Benzene breakthrough curves showed the FGAC filter effluent to contain less than one ppb as compared to several parts per million in the GAC filter effluent. This was 2 orders of magnitude better than the GAC and represents a major advance in generating good water quality for the military as well as the general public. The FGAC filter showed a much lower pressure drop and could be completely regenerated at least 6 times by heating to 190 degrees C under vacuum. 

11334198
Evaluation of a new point of care heparin test for cardiopulmonary bypass: the TAS heparin management test. 
Patients undergoing cardiopulmonary bypass (CPB) require anticoagulation with heparin to avoid thrombosis within the bypass circuit. The common method used to monitor the degree of anticoagulation is the activated clotting time (ACT). We evaluated a novel point of care device, the TAS (Pharmanetics, Raleigh, NC, USA) heparin management test (HMT), for its suitability in monitoring anticoagulation during CPB. In vitro analysis showed a dose-response (r2=0.988) of the HMT from 0.078-10.0 U/ml heparin, covering the range of heparin used during cardiac surgery (2-5 U/ml). Fifty randomly selected patients undergoing CPB were studied. Preheparin clotting times for these patients were 143+/-32 s for the HMT and 146+/-18 s for the ACT; 435+/-60 s HMT and 438+/-39 s ACT during CPB; 145+/-50 s HMT and 128+/-14 s ACT post-protamine (r2=0.797). epsilon-Aminocaproic acid treatment for inhibition of fibrinolysis did not affect the HMT. We conclude that the HMT correlates well with the ACT and may be useful for monitoring heparin during CPB. Advantages of the HMT are small sample volume and good sensitivity to heparin. 

12086447
Pyometra in a Siberian Polecat (Mustela eversmanni). 
A 2-year-old Siberian polecat (Mustela eversmanni) from a breeding colony presented for ultrasound evaluation for pregnancy. It was paired with a male for 2.75 months and had remained absent of pregnancy signs when it was anesthetized and clinically evaluated. Until this time, the animal had eaten well and shown no outward signs of debility. On palpation, the animal had a fluid-filled tubular structure in the caudal abdomen, consistent in location and size with the uterus. No sign of vaginal discharge was present. Ultrasonography revealed 10 fluid-filled evaginations (approximately 12 mm in diameter) of the uterine horns. A presumptive diagnosis of a fluid-filled reproductive tract and likely reproductive failure was made in light of the animal's history, its clinical signs, and the ultrasound findings. Euthanasia was performed because the animal was nonreproductive and might yield information relevant to the breeding colony as a whole. Necropsy of the polecat revealed a distended fluctuant uterus containing mildly odiferous, thick, yellow-green, purulent material. Histopathology confirmed the diagnosis of pyometra. A pure and heavy growth of Enterococcus fecalis was cultured from the uterine contents. In light of results from routine minimal inhibitory concentration antibiotic sensitivity screening, this isolate was resistant to all antibiotics tested in the standard teaching hospital screen. 

16933729
Potter's syndrome: a report of 5 cases. 
Bilateral renal agenesis or Potter's Syndrome is an extremely rare congenital anomaly associated with oligohydramnios. The infants die off pulmonary hypoplasia. We herewith report five cases of Potter's Syndrome over a span of one year. 

6685999
Evidence for the requirement of sympathetic activity in the PGE1-induced lacrimal secretion in rabbits. 
The effect of prostaglandin E1 (PGE1) administered either intraarterially or intravenously on basal fluid secretion from the lacrimal gland after various treatments was studied in anaesthetized rabbits. Intraarterial administration of either propranolol (1 mg/kg) or phentolamine (1 mg/kg) effectively prevented secretion induced by PGE1 but not by methacholine. Pretreatment with hexamethonium (1 mg/kg) markedly inhibited PGE1-mediated lacrimal flow whereas methacholine-induced secretion was not affected. The secretory response to PGE1 was completely blocked after section of postganglionic fibres of the ipsilateral superior cervical sympathetic ganglion. On the other hand, preganglionic sympathectomy had no effect on secretion evoked by PGE1. The effect of PGE1 was independent of the route of administration. The results are discussed in terms of stimulation of postganglionic sympathetic nerves by PGE1 to release noradrenaline. The latter, in turn, elicits fluid secretion by a process (or processes) involving activation of beta-receptors, most likely, on the secretory acinar cells. 

2480805
Human epidermal basal keratinocytes express CDw29 antigens. 
Two monoclonal antibodies, K20 and 4B4, assigned to the CDw29 cluster of differentiation antigens, were shown to react with basal keratinocytes (BK). The aim of this study was to identify the antigens recognized by K20 and 4B4 on epidermal cells, and to determine whether they were identical to those found on lymphocytes. Basal keratinocyte-enriched cell suspensions were labelled with 125I and then 1% NP40 cell lysates were used for immunoprecipitation. Under reducing conditions, K20 and 4B4 immunoprecipitated from basal keratinocytes a broad MW 105,000 band and proteins of MW 145,000, 90,000 and 80,000. Under non-reducing conditions, each band was shifted down by approximately 5000 MW. Metabolic labelling studies demonstrated that the MW 145,000 and 105,000 subunits were synthesized by basal keratinocytes. On lymphoid cells, K20 and 4B4 are known to precipitate glycoprotein complexes made of a broad MW 130,000 protein band (beta subunit) associated with a protein of MW 150,000 (alpha subunit) and proteins of MW 90,000 and 80,000 expressed in very low amounts. The MW 145,000 and 105,000 bands immunoprecipitated by K20 from basal keratinocytes correspond to the alpha and beta subunits present on lymphoid cells. It has recently been demonstrated that K20 recognizes the common beta subunit of the very late antigens family (VLA) and that 4B4 defines the helper-inducer subset of T lymphocytes. The present investigation provides evidence that basal keratinocytes share antigens of the VLA family with lymphoid cells and that they play an important role in the immune response in the skin-immune system. 

10485225
[Smoking intervention among hospital staff at the H:S Bispebjerg Hospital. Toward a non-smoking hospital--short-term results] 
As part of aiming towards a non-smoking hospital environment, staff at a Copenhagen university hospital were offered participation in a differentiated smoking cessation programme. This consisted of lectures, group therapy, follow-up visits and individually tailored nicotine replacement therapy free-of-charge for six weeks. Three hundred and seventy-four employees started the programme, with 353 continuing for the full six weeks. They were moderately nicotine dependent with a Fagerstrom score of 5 (0-10). Almost all smoked daily and smoked at work, with 87% having a CO measurement above 5 at the first visit. At six weeks follow-up 209 (59%) were still not smoking and a further seven (2%) had reduced their tobacco consumption substantially. The remainder had started smoking again. Only 10% had a CO measurement > 5 at the end of the study. In conclusion, a combination of theoretical education, individual follow-up visits and nicotine replacement therapy is useful and worthwhile in the effort to support hospital staff in smoking cessation. 

67168
Histocompatibility antigens and genetic control of the immune response in guinea pigs IV. Specific inhibition of lymphocyte proliferation by auto-anti-idiotypic antibodies. 
The in vitro T-cell proliferation induced by penicilloylated bovine IgG (BPO-BGG) in sensitized strain 2 guinea pigs could be specifically blocked by the serum of guinea pig (*305) which had been repeatedly immunized with BPO-BGG over a period of 9 mo. The antibodies which appeared in the serum of this animal (*305) were functionally similar to the strain 2 anti-idiotypic antibodies (a strain 2 BPO-BGG) raised by immunizing strain 2 guinea pigs with immuno-adsorbent column-purified BPO-BGG. Animal *305 had no detectable antibodies to BPO-BGG and failed to give a delayed hypersensitivity skin response when challenged with BPO-BGG. 

6254091
Similar luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone binding sites in rat anterior pituitary and ovary. 
To study the luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone (LH-RH; luliberin) receptors in the rat anterior pituitary gland and ovary, 125I-labeled [D-Ser(TBU)6des-Gly-NH2(10)]LH-RH ethylamide was used as a labeled ligand. The binding characteristics were assessed by Scatchard analysis of labeled ligand binding and by potency displacement with unlabeled peptides. Similar Kd values, ranging from 0.1 to 0.3 nM, were found for the labeled and unlabeled peptides in both tissues. A similar order of potency was observed between the finding affinity of 15 peptides in anterior pituitary and ovarian homogenates and their biological activity on luteinizing hormone release in rat anterior pituitary cells in culture. These data demonstrate that the LH-RH receptors present in the rat ovary have a specificity similar to that of the anterior pituitary LH-RH receptor controlling secretion of luteinizing hormone and follicle-stimulating hormone. Moreover, the binding affinities of the LH-RH agonists and antagonists can account, at least up to a large extent, for their relative biological potencies. Although there definitely are specific LH-RH receptors in the ovary which may play a role in the antifertility effects observed after administration of LH-RH agonists, the possible physiological significance of these ovarian receptors is still unknown and of great biological interest. 

1543505
Diversity among the beta subunits of heterotrimeric GTP-binding proteins: characterization of a novel beta-subunit cDNA. 
Heterotrimeric guanine nucleotide binding proteins transduce signals from cell surface receptors to intracellular effectors. The alpha subunit is believed to confer receptor and effector specificity on the G protein. This role is reflected in the diversity of genes that encode these subunits. The beta and gamma subunits are thought to have a more passive role in G protein function; biochemical data suggests that beta-gamma dimers are shared among the alpha subunits. However, there is growing evidence for active participation of beta-gamma dimers in some G protein mediated signaling systems. To further investigate this role, we examined the diversity of the beta subunit family in mouse. Using the polymerase chain reaction, we uncovered a new member of this family, G beta 4, which is expressed at widely varying levels in a variety of tissues. The predicted amino acid sequence of G beta 4 is 79% to 89% identical to the three previously known beta subunits. The diversity of beta gene products may be an important corollary to the functional diversity of G proteins. 

12201811
An extreme bias in the germ line of XY C57BL/6<->XY FVB/N chimaeric mice. 
Chimaeric analysis is a powerful method to address questions about the cell-autonomous nature of defects in spermatogenesis. Symplastic spermatids (sys) mice have a recessive mutation that causes male sterility due to an arrest in germ-cell development during spermiogenesis. Chimaeric mice were generated by aggregation of eight-cell embryos from sys (FVB/N genetic background) and wild-type C57BL/6 (B6) mice to determine whether the male germ-cell defect is cell-autonomous. The resulting FVB/N<->B6 chimaeras (<-> denotes fusion of embryos) were mated with FVB/N mice and coat colour of offspring was used to identify transmission of FVB/N or B6 gametes. Regardless of the relative contribution of B6 to somatic tissues of the chimaeras, almost all (282 of 284; 99.3%) offspring of B6 XY<->XY FVB/N (+/+ or sys/+) males (n = 9) received a FVB/N-derived paternal gamete. After mating of female B6<->FVB/N chimaeras, 51 of 73 (69.9%) offspring received an FVB-derived maternal gamete. Southern blot analysis of different tissues from chimaeric males indicated that, despite the presence of balanced chimaerism in somatic tissues, the germ line in B6 XY<->XY FVB/N mice was essentially FVB/N in composition. Thus there is a strong selective advantage for FVB/N male germ cells over B6 male germ cells in B6<->FVB/N-aggregation chimaeras at some stage during development of the male germ line. Each of three male chimaeras that were either B6 XY<->XY FVB/N (sys/sys) or B6 XX<->XY FVB/N (sys/sys) in composition was sterile, and testis histology was essentially sysmutant. This finding indicates that the function of the gene(s) affected in the sys mutation may be required in the testis, although whether expression is required in germ cells, somatic cells or both remains unknown. The extreme bias in transmission of male gametes has implications for experimental design in studies that use chimaeric analysis to address questions regarding the cell-autonomous nature of germ-cell defects in mice. 

3021775
Dedifferentiated chondrosarcoma. A report of the clinicopathological features and treatment of seventy-eight cases. 
Dedifferentiated chondrosarcoma is a highly malignant variant of chondrosarcoma. Approximately 11 per cent of chondrosarcomas can be expected to dedifferentiate into more anaplastic lesions. In this report, we analyze the clinicopathological features and treatment of seventy-eight lesions of this type. The ages of the patients ranged from nineteen to eighty-two years (average, 54.6 years). The cartilaginous precursor was central in most patients. Eleven of the lesions developed in the site of a previously resected low-grade chondrosarcoma. Dedifferentiation was from low-grade chondrosarcoma to osteosarcoma in forty-two patients, to fibrosarcoma in thirty-three, and to malignant (fibrous) histiocytoma in three. Perforation of the cortex and a soft-tissue mass were found in most of the patients. Widespread metastatic disease within two years after resection was a frequent finding. The over-all five-year-survival rate was 10.5 per cent. Any potential for a "cure" is related to early diagnosis and adequate surgical treatment by amputation or resection. 

3601738
Diagnosis and treatment of intrapericardial teratoma. 
Intrapericardial teratoma is a rare mediastinal tumor that originates from aberrant clusters of multipotential cells from three germinal layers. Previous reports have used the combination of cardiac angiography, CT scan, and echocardiogram to establish the diagnosis prior to surgery. We report a case of intrapericardial teratoma diagnosed noninvasively and removed surgically within the first three days of life. Furthermore, we compare the diagnostic accuracy of echocardiography and computerized tomography (CT), and discuss the superiority of noninvasive evaluation in the management of these critically ill infants. 

11720006
Evaluation of chronic urticaria in patients with Hashimoto thyroiditis. 
The coincidence of Hashimoto thyroiditis (HT) and chronic idiopathic urticaria (CIU) is a commonly observed phenomenon in western New York. Previous literature suggested that there may be a direct relationship between them. We undertook these studies to determine whether humoral or cell-mediated mechanisms might link HT and CIU. Skin biopsies from patients with CIU, with or without HT, were indistinguishable by light microscopy. No immune complex deposition was observed, although only the skin from patients with CIU and HT contained perivascular fibrin deposits. Similarly, immunohistochemical studies evaluating cellular expression of CD3, CD4, CD8, CD20, and CD68 failed to differentiate between CIU with or without HT. Analysis of Vbeta restriction in thyroid tissue of patients with HT and the skin of patients with CIU and HT by in situ polymerase chain reaction failed to reveal any oligoclonal T-lymphocyte subpopulations. In contrast, only patients with CIU and HT had anti-FcepsilonRI antibodies in their sera that could induce degranulation of normal basophils. Some sera from patients with CIU and HT caused degranulation of normal basophils in the absence of anti-FceRI. The factor causing basophil degranulation in these sera was not determined. Patients with CIU and HT failed to improve clinically with thyroid replacement therapy. All CIU patients were equally well managed with symptomatic therapies. In conclusion, HT likely represents a marker of other autoimmunity, rather than being a direct causative agent in CIU. Management of CIU, with or without HT and with or without anti-FceRI antibodies, should be the same. Future studies will have to examine whether cell-mediated responses participate in CIU, especially in association with HT. 

16847313
The zinc-sensing mechanism of mouse MTF-1 involves linker peptides between the zinc fingers. 
Mouse metal response element-binding transcription factor-1 (MTF-1) regulates the transcription of genes in response to a variety of stimuli, including exposure to zinc or cadmium, hypoxia, and oxidative stress. Each of these stresses may increase labile cellular zinc, leading to nuclear translocation, DNA binding, and transcriptional activation of metallothionein genes (MT genes) by MTF-1. Several lines of evidence suggest that the highly conserved six-zinc finger DNA-binding domain of MTF-1 also functions as a zinc-sensing domain. In this study, we investigated the potential role of the peptide linkers connecting the four N-terminal zinc fingers of MTF-1 in their zinc-sensing function. Each of these three linkers is unique, completely conserved among all known vertebrate MTF-1 orthologs, and different from the canonical Cys2His2 zinc finger TGEKP linker sequence. Replacing the RGEYT linker between zinc fingers 1 and 2 with TGEKP abolished the zinc-sensing function of MTF-1, resulting in constitutive DNA binding, nuclear translocation, and transcriptional activation of the MT-I gene. In contrast, swapping the TKEKP linker between fingers 2 and 3 with TGEKP had little effect on the metal-sensing functions of MTF-1, whereas swapping the canonical linker for the shorter TGKT linker between fingers 3 and 4 rendered MTF-1 less sensitive to zinc-dependent activation both in vivo and in vitro. These observations suggest a mechanism by which physiological concentrations of accessible cellular zinc affect MTF-1 activity. Zinc may modulate highly specific, linker-mediated zinc finger interactions in MTF-1, thus affecting its zinc- and DNA-binding activities, resulting in translocation to the nucleus and binding to the MT-I gene promoter. 

17447850
Flavonoids potentiate the efficacy of cytarabine through modulation of drug-induced apoptosis. 
Recent studies have provided strong evidence for potential beneficial effects of flavonoids in chemoprevention or in combination with chemotherapeutics in tumor cells treatment. The aim of this work was to compare the antioxidant properties of four flavonoids with emphasis on association of these antioxidant properties with their effects on the therapeutic efficacy of cytarabine (AraC) using L1210 leukemia cells. The results of antiproliferative studies showed that antiproliferative potential of flavonoids tested decreased in the order: isorhamnetin > kaempferol > myricetin > rutin, while their antioxidant properties decreased in the order: rutin > myricetin > kaempferol > isorhamnetin. Combinational treatment of isorhamnetin, kaempferol and myricetin with AraC led to synergism in their antiproliferative activities (CIs < 1). Rutin exhibited antagonism with AraC (CIs > 1). Apoptotic DNA fragmentation and flow cytometry analyses revealed that synergism in antiproliferative activities of compounds tested might be due to potentiation of AraC-induced apoptosis. In conclusion, our results clearly indicate that isorhamnetin, kaempferol and myricetin despite their antioxidant properties might be used to increase the sensitivity of leukemia cells to AraC treatment. 

3876444
Thyroid autoantigen-induced lymphocyte proliferation in Graves' disease and Hashimoto's thyroiditis. 
Further progress in understanding T-cell interactions in autoimmune thyroid disease would be possible if T-cell lines and clones could be established. We have therefore examined peripheral blood lymphocyte proliferation in response to a variety of thyroid antigens in Graves' disease and Hashimoto's thyroiditis. A number of different culture conditions were used but in all cases the frequency and magnitude of positive responses were low, the maximum stimulation found for any individual culture with antigen being less than 4-fold above background proliferation. In addition we have examined the blastogenic response of Graves' lymphocytes from thyroid, cervical lymph node and thymus. Positive responses were again found but the stimulation produced by antigen was only 3-fold above background. These results are compatible with recent findings in experimental autoimmune thyroiditis and suggest either that very few antigen-specific T cells are involved in the autoimmune process or that antigen-specific cells exist which can suppress the proliferative response in vitro. It therefore seems unlikely that randomly collected peripheral blood T cells from patients with autoimmune thyroid disease can be sufficiently stimulated by thyroid autoantigens to establish lines or clones without additional manoeuvres such as fractionation into subsets. 

1840732
Immunosuppressive factor in cow follicular fluid. 
The activity of the immunosuppressive fraction and proteinase inhibitor isolated from cow follicular fluid was investigated. The immunosuppressive factor was separated from the accompanying proteinase inhibitor by Sepharose 6B and Sephacryl S-200 column chromatography. In vitro, the fraction significantly reduced mitogen-induced lymphocyte proliferation. In vivo, the fraction inhibited mouse plaque formation. However, the factor had no effect on the development of intact or zona free embryos. The active components have a molecular mass of about 110,000. 

6335757
Renal origin of rat urinary epidermal growth factor. 
The origin of rat urinary epidermal growth factor (EGF) has been investigated. Unilateral nephrectomy decreased the concentration, total output of EGF and EGF/creatinine ratio by approximately 50%, while the output of creatinine was unchanged. Removal of the submandibular glands and duodenal Brunner's glands, organs known to produce EGF, had no influence on the output of EGF in urine. Renal clearance of EGF exceeded that of creatinine, and after bilateral nephrectomy or bilateral ligation of the ureters, the concentration of creatinine in serum increased, while the concentration of EGF was below the detection limit of the assay. Renal production of EGF was confirmed by immunohistochemistry demonstrating EGF immunoreactivity in the afferent arteriole of the juxtaglomerular apparatus. EGF in the submandibular glands and in urine was found to differ with chromatofocusing and reverse-phase HPLC. At isoelectric focusing the pI of submandibular EGF was 4.8 and 5.4 while that of urinary EGF was 5.3 and 6.4. In conclusion, this study demonstrates that urinary EGF mainly originates from the kidneys and is localized to the renal juxtaglomerular apparatus. 

1778692
The work of the National Perinatal Epidemiology Unit. One example of technology assessment in perinatal care. 
This article describes one approach to assessing the effects of perinatal care--that adopted by the National Perinatal Epidemiology Unit in Oxford, England. The unit's research has been based primarily on a combination of simple, descriptive analyses of observational data and statistically robust analyses of evidence derived from randomized controlled trials. 

2492249
Identification of N-(2-propenal)ethanolamine as a urinary metabolite of malondialdehyde. 
N-(2-propenal)ethanolamine was isolated from rat and human urine using anion exchange, cation exchange, size exclusion and high performance liquid chromatography. Acid hydrolysis of the isolate yielded malondialdehyde (MDA) and ethanolamine (E) in a 1:1 molar ratio. A 1:1 E-MDA adduct was synthesized and found to be chromatographically inseparable from the urinary metabolite. Its NMR and UV spectra and lack of fluorescence were consistent with those of an enaminal formed by a Schiff's base reaction. The identification in urine of an adduct of MDA with ethanolamine, and the previous identification of an adduct with serine, constitutes direct evidence for the oxidative decomposition in vivo of polyunsaturated fatty acids present in the relevant phospholipids. The absence in urine of MDA adducts with other alpha-amino compounds (at least in comparable amounts) indicates that the ethanolamine and serine derivatives are formed in situ and not as a result of reactions with MDA generated in enzymatic processes. 

4091075
The influence of smoker status, smoking history, sex, and situational variables on smokers' self-efficacy. 
Recent work in smoking cessation has focused on cognitive factors related to relapse and maintenance. The present investigation utilized an established self-efficacy-based questionnaire to determine whether sex, length of smoking history, successful quitting attempts, and environmental events affected subjects' perceived confidence of resisting smoking urges. It was hypothesized that: (a) subjects with fewer years smoking would have higher self-efficacy than those smoking for longer periods; (b) reported self-efficacy would be lowest for those situations involving negative moods; and (c) successful quitters would report higher self-efficacy than unsuccessful quitters. The second and third hypotheses were strongly confirmed, and a nonsignificant tendency in the expected direction was found for the first hypothesis. The results were generally consistent with the self-efficacy and the Abstinence Violation Effect (AVE) models. 

10926978
Effect of corneal polarization axis on assessment of retinal nerve fiber layer thickness by scanning laser polarimetry. 
PURPOSE: Scanning laser polarimetry uses an anterior segment compensating device that assumes a fixed axis of corneal birefringence, which we call the corneal polarization axis. The purpose of this investigation was to establish the distribution of corneal polarization axes among a population of normal eyes and to evaluate the relationship between corneal polarization axis and posterior segment retardation. METHODS: We constructed a noninvasive slit lamp-mounted device incorporating two crossed linear polarizers and an optical retarder in order to measure the slow axis of corneal birefringence. Normal subjects underwent corneal polarization axis measurement. A subset of eyes underwent scanning laser polarimetry of the peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (n = 32) and macula (n = 29), and retardation measurements were evaluated in each group. RESULTS: One hundred eighteen eyes of 63 normal subjects (35 female, 28 male) underwent corneal polarization axis measurement (mean age, 45.5 +/- 17.1 years). Six eyes (5.1%) demonstrated unmeasurable corneal polarization. In the remaining 112 eyes, the mode of the corneal polarization axis distribution was 10 to 20 degrees nasally downward (range, 90 degrees nasally downward to 54 degrees nasally upward). A significant (P <.0001) correlation was observed between fellow eyes (R(2) =.52), with a mean difference of 11.2 +/- 10.5 degrees (range, 0-52 degrees). Corneal polarization axis was significantly associated (R(2) =.52-.84) with retinal nerve fiber layer and macula summary retardation parameters (average thickness, ellipse average, superior and inferior average, superior and total integral; P <.0001 for all groups). CONCLUSIONS: The mean corneal polarization axis among normal corneas is nasally downward; however, considerable intraindividual and interindividual variability exists. The linear relationship between corneal polarization axis and posterior segment retardation parameters is responsible, in part, for the wide distribution of retinal nerve fiber layer thickness data generated by scanning laser polarimetry. 

3343113
Testing as a teaching tool. 
More than four years ago, the authors initiated testing as a means of obtaining data for evaluating residents. The testing process has evolved now and is used for its teaching value and as a means of objective resident self-evaluation. Testing is designed to provide 10 cases an hour, with characteristics allowing a single diagnosis as a unique answer. No history is provided because a common topic and anatomic area provide a context for each examination. Answers are given during the examination after each question, and discussion follows. All answers are written, and answer sheets are collected. Attendance is high. Test scores are routinely lower than in other forms of evaluation. Testing integrates all aspects of radiology training from cognitive through deductive, simulates written consultations, and provides a means of self-evaluation through rapid feedback. Testing is a viable form of teaching that blends self-evaluation with faculty and peer feedback. 

2597337
Inhibitory effect of extract of Ipomoea pes-caprae on guinea-pig ileal smooth muscle. 
An extract of the plant Ipomoea pes-caprae, used in Thailand as a folk remedy for treating dermatitis caused by jellyfish and Portuguese man-of-war, has been tested for antagonistic activity against histamine, acetylcholine, bradykinin and barium chloride on the isolated guinea-pig ileum. The extract reversibly inhibited the contraction induced by all the spasmogens in a concentration-dependent manner and decreased both the slope and the maximal response of the concentration response curves. It is not likely that the extract specifically interferes at the receptor level. It may be due to the direct action of the extract on the ileal smooth muscle. 

1680840
Enhanced expression of HLA-class II molecules on activated human T lymphocytes following treatment with tumor necrosis factor alpha. 
Many factors induce or enhance expression of major histocompatibility complex class I and class II molecules on various cell types. Human T lymphocytes are class II negative in the resting state but show expression of class II molecules following activation. We analyzed the modulating capacity of the lymphokines recombinant interferon gamma (rIFN-gamma), interleukin-4 (IL-4), and recombinant tumor necrosis factor alpha (rTNF-alpha) on class II expression in subsets of alloactivated human T lymphocytes. The activated CD4+ T cells expressed all three class II isotypes (DR, DQ, and DP), whereas the cytotoxic CD8+ T-cell lines expressed DR and DP molecules but failed to bind DQ-specific monoclonal antibodies significantly. Treatment with rIFN-gamma and IL-4 had no effect on class II expression on any of the T-cell lines or clones, whereas rTNF-alpha enhanced class II expression in both subsets. rTNF-alpha could modulate expression of all three class II isotypes but, in principle, it appears only to affect ongoing class II synthesis as de novo synthesis of class II molecules with a resultant change in the class II phenotype from DR+ DQ- DP+ to DR+ DQ+ DP+ in the CD8+ T lymphocytes was not observed. No synergic effects of rINF-gamma and rTNF-alpha were observed; this results from the fact that activated T cells express few, if any, receptors of rIFN-gamma. 

9596100
Changes in lung lymphocyte populations reflect those seen in peripheral blood in HIV-1 positive individuals. 
We have investigated the level of lymphocytosis present in the lung of human immunodeficiency virus (HIV)-1+ infected patients with and without pulmonary disease and how changes in natural killer (NK), B and T-cells seen in peripheral blood (PB) compare with those seen in bronchoalveolar lavage fluid (BALF). Lymphocyte subpopulations and their expression of activation, cytotoxic markers and memory status were characterized by triple immunofluorescence. Macrophages accounted for over 80% of the BAL cells. Only three out of 72 patients had a lymphocyte percentage >30%. No statistically significant differences in the relative proportions of NK, CD4 and CD8 populations were seen in BALF when compared to PB, except for a twofold increase in the percentage of activated CD8 cells in BALF. The only differences in BALF populations between the HIV-1+ groups were a lower percentage of CD4+ cells, and a higher percentage of activated CD8+ cells in the patients with pneumonitis. In the present cohort of patients there was little evidence for an overall lymphocytosis in bronchoalveolar lavage fluid of HIV-1+ subjects. Changes observed in lymphocyte subsets of bronchoalveolar lavage fluid populations reflected those in peripheral blood, and were similar for patients with and without pneumonitis. Evidence of increased CD8 subset activity in bronchoalveolar lavage fluid did, however, emerge. 

1448506
Papillary adenoma of the nipple. 
Papillary adenoma of the nipple is a benign condition of the nipple that can be confused clinically with adenocarcinoma metastatic to the skin or Paget's disease. Deep biopsy of the nipple is necessary to make a histologic diagnosis. Complete excision of the nipple and the subareolar tissue is sufficient to effect a cure. 

1595721
Use of an automated medication storage and distribution system. 
The effects of an automated medication storage and distribution system in a hospital setting were evaluated. The Pyxis Medstation system was implemented on two nursing units at a 1000-bed tertiary-care referral hospital. The system, which is designed like an automated bank teller, dispenses items to authorized users and records all transactions. Floor-stock controlled substances and noncontrolled medications, large-volume i.v. solutions, and i.v. administration sets were stocked in the system. The system was evaluated (1) by comparing the mean patient charge capture rates for six months before and for three months after implementation, (2) by measuring nurse and pharmacy technician time required for various tasks before and after implementation, and (3) through questionnaires filled out by nurses and technicians. After the system was installed, nursing personnel spent less time on medication-related activities, charting, and documentation and more time interacting with patients. Pharmacy technicians spent more time on floor-stock activities and less time on billing activities. Nurses indicated positive attitudes toward the system features. Both nurses and pharmacy technicians indicated that the system should remain in use. After implementation, the charge capture rate for noncontrolled medications, i.v. solutions, and i.v. sets increased from 63% to 97%. This increase, extrapolated to the entire hospital, reflects $35,000 in additional revenue over the total costs of implementation of the system. Implementation of an automated medication storage and dispensing system is expected to increase hospital revenue and enable nurses to spend more time interacting with patients at this institution. 

6311214
Phospholipase A2 modulation by calmodulin, prostaglandins and cyclic nucleotides. 
Phospholipase A2 in the presence of Ca2+ was stimulated by calmodulin and by prostaglandin F2 alpha. Prostaglandin E2, cyclic-AMP and cyclic-GMP inhibited phospholipase A2 in the presence or absence of calmodulin. Dimethylsuberimidate cross-linking of phospholipase A2 with calmodulin was found to be Ca2+ dependent. These results indicate that phospholipase A2 is directly regulated by a host of key intracellular regulators and is one of the calmodulin-regulated enzymes. 

3449381
Biological N-oxidation of adenine and 9-alkyl derivatives. 
In vitro metabolism of adenine, 9-methyladenine, and 9-benzyladenine using hepatic microsomes of hamster, mouse and rat was investigated. The results indicated that adenine was apparently not susceptible to microsomal N-oxidation. N-oxidation of 9-methyladenine was also not detected, whereas N-demethylation was observed with hepatic microsomes derived from hamster and rat but not from mouse. With 9-benzyladenine, both 1-N-oxide formation and N-debenzylation occurred with microsomes of all species in various amounts. N-Hydroxylation of the 6-amino group was not observed with any substrate in any species. Metabolic results are discussed in relation to chemical structure, electronic, lipophilic and steric factors. 

17274543
A gastric fibrolipoma presenting as acute gastrointestinal hemorrhage. 
A 56-year-old woman was admitted to our hospital with upper gastrointestinal hemorrhage from a gastric submucosal tumor that was treated by a laparoscopic technique. Endoscopy and endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) revealed a 2-cm submucosal tumor located in the posterior wall of the upper gastric body, showing a heterogeneous hyperechoic tumor. A laparoscopic wedge resection of the stomach was performed. Pathological examinations revealed that the tumor was composed of spindle cells like fibroblasts and mature adipocytes. Immunohistochemical examinations revealed that the tumor was negative for desmin and alpha-smooth muscle actin. Based on these findings, a diagnosis of fibrolipoma was made. EUS is useful for differentiating a fibrolipoma from a gastrointestinal stromal tumor or lipoma by the findings of characteristic echogenesity and detection of the tumor origin. 

6497789
A survey of hairy shaker disease (border disease, hypomyelinogenesis congenita) in sheep. 
A survey by mail in 1979 of 995 sheep farmers in Victoria enquiring as to the occurrence of hairy shaker disease (HSD) in lambs on their farms resulted in a 48% response. A total of 17 farms reported the presence of HSD. One hundred and eleven ewes produced lambs with HSD representing a small proportion only of the ewes (0.8%) on these farms and an even smaller percentage of the total ewes (0.03%) in the survey. Abortions were not prevalent on the majority of farms reporting HSD. There was no evidence that HSD was more common in any particular area in Victoria. As was anticipated mucosal disease virus/bovine virus diarrhoea (MDV) antibody was often present in serums from affected sheep. It was concluded that at present, the hairy shaker form of border disease did not appear to be an economically important problem in Victoria. 

18060712
Enhanced resting-state brain activities in ADHD patients: A fMRI study. 
Resting-state functional MRI (fMRI) could be an advantageous choice for clinical applications by virtue of its clinical convenience and non-invasiveness. Without explicit stimulus, resting-state brain activity patterns cannot be obtained using any model-driven method. In this study, we advanced a measure named resting-state activity index (RSAI) to evaluate the resting-state brain activities. Using RSAI, we first investigated the resting-state brain activity patterns in normal adolescents to test the validity of this RSAI measure. Then we compared the resting-state brain activity patterns of Attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) patients to those of their matched controls. According to the resultant brain activity patterns, we suggest that RSAI could be an applicable measure to evaluate resting-state brain activities. As compared to the controls, the ADHD patients exhibited more significant resting-state activities in basic sensory and sensory-related cortices. This finding was in accordance with ADHD symptoms of inattention. 

8746574
Clinical management of posterior chamber intraocular lens implants dislocated in the vitreous cavity. 
BACKGROUND AND OBJECTIVE: To discuss the options for management and review the authors' experience with dislocated posterior chamber intraocular lens implants. PATIENTS AND METHODS: A retrospective review was performed over a 3-year period of 12 consecutive patients with posterior chamber intraocular lens (PC IOL) implants dislocated into the vitreous cavity. The patients were managed with pars plana vitrectomy, repositioning or exchange, and transscleral suture fixation of the PC IOL. RESULTS: The visual acuity was 20/50 or better in 9 patients and the transscleral suture fixated PC IOL was in good position in 12 patients at the most recent follow-up. Perioperative complications included corneal edema, cystoid macular edema, retinal breaks and detachments, and suture erosion. CONCLUSION: Visual and anatomic outcomes were favorable. 

8684739
Sonographic prediction of shoulder dystocia in infants of diabetic mothers. 
OBJECTIVE: To determine if the difference between the abdominal diameter and biparietal diameter (AD-BPD difference), as measured by ultrasound examination, predicts shoulder dystocia in borderline macrosomic infants of diabetic mothers. METHODS: A retrospective study was performed of births occurring from January 1990 through June 1995. Eligibility requirements included diabetic pregnancy, ultrasound examination within 2 weeks of delivery, estimated fetal weight of 3800-4200 g, and vaginal delivery. The mean AD-BPD difference was compared in normal deliveries and those complicated by shoulder dystocia, using the Student t test and by multiple regression analysis. A receiver operating characteristic curve was generated to determine if an AD-BPD cutoff value could be used clinically to predict shoulder dystocia. RESULTS: Thirty-one patients, six with dystocia, were eligible for the study. The mean AD-BPD differences for those with and without shoulder dystocia were 3.1 and 2.6 cm, respectively, a statistically significant difference (P = .05). Comparing the groups with and without shoulder dystocia, no significant differences could be found in mean age, parity, weight, birth weight, or gestational age. Shoulder dystocia occurred in six of 20 patients (30%) in whom the AD-BPD difference was at least 2.6 cm but in none of 11 patients in whom it was less than 2.6 cm, also a statistically significant difference (P = .05). CONCLUSION: The AD-BPD difference was greater in borderline macrosomic fetuses of diabetic mothers who experienced shoulder dystocia than in those who had uncomplicated vaginal deliveries. Applying an AD-BPD cutoff value of 2.6 cm to this population prospectively would have provided excellent sensitivity, specificity, and predictive value in identifying those fetuses at high risk for birth injury. 

17512394
Returning home. 
Returning to one's home country after many years abroad is a life-changing decision that brings with it many challenges, but at the same time, many rewards. 

10783
[Immunologic study of viral hepatitis] 
The author discusses the various immunological methods used to demonstrate antigen in serum hepatitis. This antigen is made up of three main types of particles: a spherical particle, a tub-like structure and a second larger spherical particle with a hexagonal centre, described by DANE. The centre of DANE's particle is immunologically distinct from its surface. The immune complexes thus formed by antibody links between surface antigens play a major role in extrahepatic manifestations of serum hepatitis. The various subtypes of antigen can be used as a basis for geographical and epidemiological study of the disease. The centre of DANE's particle is considered to be the virus itself. It cannot be cultured with current methods but it can be transmitted to chimpanzees. The antibody reacting with the surface antigen is protective. In conclusion, the author observed that an increase in serum transaminases in anesthetized patients occurred only after halothane. This suggests that liver damage after administration of halothane may be due to a direct effect of the product or its metabolites. 

16192138
The limitations of "vulnerability" as a protection for human research participants. 
Vulnerability is one of the least examined concepts in research ethics. Vulnerability was linked in the Belmont Report to questions of justice in the selection of subjects. Regulations and policy documents regarding the ethical conduct of research have focused on vulnerability in terms of limitations of the capacity to provide informed consent. Other interpretations of vulnerability have emphasized unequal power relationships between politically and economically disadvantaged groups and investigators or sponsors. So many groups are now considered to be vulnerable in the context of research, particularly international research, that the concept has lost force. In addition, classifying groups as vulnerable not only stereotypes them, but also may not reliably protect many individuals from harm. Certain individuals require ongoing protections of the kind already established in law and regulation, but attention must also be focused on characteristics of the research protocol and environment that present ethical challenges. 

9864442
Effect of hydrophobization of basic pancreatic proteinase inhibitor on the inhibition of bovine trypsin and human leukocyte elastase. 
The effect of modification of basic pancreatic trypsin inhibitor (BPTI) by derivatives of fatty acids (oleic, stearic) on the inhibition of bovine trypsin and human leukocyte elastase (HLE) was studied. Kinetic constants of interaction with trypsin and inhibition constants of both enzymes were determined. Hydrophobization of BPTI had virtually no effect on its high affinity for trypsin. The coupling of cis-unsaturated oleoyl radicals to the inhibitor molecule significantly increased the efficiency of HLE inhibition, whereas the coupling of saturated stearoyl radicals completely canceled the anti-elastase activity and in some cases promoted the substrate hydrolysis. 

12828321
Community-acquired methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus infection in Singapore is usually "healthcare associated". 
OBJECTIVE: To assess the frequency of community-acquired methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus (MRSA) infections. SETTING: A teaching hospital in Singapore. METHODS: Prospectively collected surveillance data were reviewed during a 1-year period to determine the extent and origin of community-acquired MRSA infections. RESULTS: Whereas 32% of 383 MRSA infections were detected less than 48 hours after hospital admission and would, by convention, be classified as "community acquired," all but one of these were among patients who had been exposed to outpatient centers including dialysis or chemotherapy clinics, visiting nurses, community hospitals, or all three. CONCLUSIONS: With health care increasingly being delivered in an outpatient setting, community-acquired MRSA infections are often acquired in hospital-related sites and most may be more accurately described as "healthcare acquired." Infection control measures need to move beyond the traditional paradigm of acute care hospitals to effectively control the spread of resistant pathogens. 

11088029
sCR1sLe ameliorates ischemia/reperfusion injury in experimental lung transplantation. 
BACKGROUND: The nonspecific immune response with activation of the complement system and polymorphonuclear leukocytes is important for the mediation of reperfusion injury after lung transplantation. In this study, we investigated the combined blockade of the complement system and leukocyte adhesion by a novel drug combining soluble complement receptor type 1 (sCR1, CD35) with the selectin ligand sialyl Lewis X (sLe(X), CD15s) synthesized to sCR1sLe(X). Both sCR1 and sCR1sLe(X) were supplied by AVANT Immunotherapeutics, Inc, Needham, Massachusetts. METHODS: Orthotopic allogeneic single left lung transplantation was performed in male rats (Brown Norway to Fischer F344; n = 5 in all groups) after a total ischemic time of 20 hours. Recipients received either no specific treatment (control) or administration of sCR1 (10 mg/kg) or sCR1sLe(X) (10 mg/kg) 15 minutes before reperfusion by intracardiac injection. Twenty-four hours after reperfusion, the native contralateral lung was occluded to assess gas exchange of the graft only. In additional animals (5 per group), lung tissue was frozen 24 hours after reperfusion and assessed for myeloperoxidase activity as a measurement of neutrophil migration into the graft and thiobarbituric acid reactive substances to quantify lipid peroxidation. RESULTS: Graft function as assessed by arterial PO (2) in recipients treated with sCR1sLeX was superior not only to that of controls (383 +/- 53 vs 56 +/- 7 mm Hg, P =. 000095) but also to that of animals treated with sCR1 (243 +/- 45 mm Hg, P =.031). This improvement was confirmed by significant reduction of neutrophil migration (0.33 +/- 0.05 vs control, 1.0 +/- 0.09 DeltaOD/mg/min, P =.0000024) and lipid peroxidation (6.2 +/- 0. 38 vs control, 10.6 +/- 0.54 pmol/g, P =.00021). CONCLUSIONS: Our data indicate that combined inhibition of complement activation and leukocyte adhesion with sCR1sLe(X) reduces reperfusion injury significantly and that both mechanisms are effectively inhibited in this model. 

12595927
NTP Toxicology and Carcinogenesis Studies of t -Butyl Alcohol (CAS No. 75-65-0) in F344/N Rats and B6C3F1 Mice (Drinking Water Studies). 
t -Butyl alcohol is widely used in the manufacture of perfumes and a variety of cosmetics. It is also used as a raw material in the production of isobutylene, which may be used to produce methyl tertiary butyl ether, a common gasoline additive, or to produce butyl elastomers used in the production of automobile tires. Male and female F344/N rats and B6C3F1 mice were given t -butyl alcohol (greater than 99% pure) in drinking water for 13 weeks or 2 years. The genetic toxicity of t -butyl alcohol was assessed by testing the ability of the chemical to induce mutations in various strains of Salmonella typhimurium and in L5178Y mouse lymphoma cells, sister chromatid exchanges and chromosomal aberrations in cultured Chinese hamster ovary cells, and by measuring the frequency of micronucleated erythrocytes in mouse peripheral blood. 13-WEEK STUDY IN RATS: Groups of 10 male and 10 female F344/N rats were given 0, 2.5, 5, 10, 20, or 40 mg/mL t -butyl alcohol in drinking water for 13 weeks. All males and six females given 40 mg/mL died during the study. Final mean body weights of 10 and 20 mg/mL males and of 40 mg/mL females were 12%, 17%, or 21% less than those of the corresponding controls, respectively. Serum sorbitol dehydrogenase activities in 10 and 20 mg/mL males were greater than that in the controls after 13 weeks. Serum alanine aminotransferase activity in 40 mg/mL females was greater than that in the controls after 2 weeks and greater in all exposed females after 13 weeks. Urine volumes of 10, 20, and 40 mg/mL males and females decreased, and urine specific gravity values increased. Transitional epithelial hyperplasia and inflammation of the urinary bladder were observed in 20 and 40 mg/mL males and 40 mg/mL females. Absolute and relative liver weights of all exposed groups of females and relative liver weights of 5, 10, and 20 mg/mL males were significantly greater than those of the controls. Absolute and relative kidney weights of all exposed groups of males and females were significantly greater than those of the controls. Incidences of mineralization of the kidney were significantly increased in 10, 20, and 40 mg/mL males. The severity of nephropathy in 2.5, 5, 10, and 20 mg/mL males was significantly greater than that of the controls as was the accumulation of hyaline droplets in the kidney of 5, 10, and 20 mg/mL males. The incidences of nephropathy in 10, 20, and 40 mg/mL females were significantly greater than that of the controls. 13-WEEK STUDY IN MICE: Groups of 10 male and 10 female B6C3F1 mice were given 0, 2.5, 5, 10, 20, or 40 mg/mL t -butyl alcohol in drinking water for 13 weeks. The deaths of two males and one female in the 40 mg/mL group were attributed to exposure to t -butyl alcohol. The final mean body weights of 20 and 40 mg/mL males and 40 mg/mL females were significantly lower than those of the controls. There were no biologically significant differences in hematology parameters of exposed and control groups of mice. Transitional epithelial hyperplasia and inflammation were observed in the urinary bladder of 20 and 40 mg/mL males and 40 mg/mL females. 2-YEAR STUDY IN RATS: Groups of 60 F344/N rats were given 0, 1.25, 2.5, or 5 mg/mL t -butyl alcohol (males) or 0, 2.5, 5, or 10 mg/mL t -butyl alcohol (females) in drinking water for 2 years. These correspond to average daily doses of approximately 90, 200, or 420 mg t -butyl alcohol/kg body weight for males and approximately 180, 330, or 650 mg t -butyl alcohol/kg body weight for females. Ten rats per group were evaluated after 15 months of chemical administration. Survival, Body Weights, and Water Consumption: Survival rates of 5 mg/mL males and 10 mg/mL females were significantly lower than those of the controls. The final mean body weights of exposed groups of males were 15% to 24% lower than that of the controls, and the final mean body weight of 10 mg/mL females was 21% lower than that of the controls. Water consumption by males increased with dose; water consumption by females decreased with dose. Hematology and Urinalysis: At the 15-month inte. Hematology and Urinalysis: At the 15-month interim evaluation, there were no significant differences in hematology parameters in males and females, and there were no significant differences in urinalysis parameters in males. Females given 5 or 10 mg/mL had increased urine specific gravities and decreased urine volumes. Pathology Findings: At the 15-month interim evaluation, relative kidney weights of 2.5 and 5 mg/mL males and absolute and relative kidney weights of 2.5, 5, and 10 mg/mL females were significantly greater than those of the controls. At 2 years, the incidence of mineralization in the kidney increased with dose and that of 5 mg/mL males was significantly greater than that of the controls. In the standard evaluation at the end of the study, the incidences of focal renal tubule hyperplasia and of adenoma were increased in exposed males and a carcinoma was observed in one 5 mg/mL male. Renal tubule hyperplasia occurred in one 10 mg/mL female. An extended evaluation of the kidney identified additional male rats with hyperplasia (control, 11/50; 1.25 mg/mL, 13/50; 2.5 mg/mL, 11/50; 5 mg/mL, 19/50) and renal tubule adenoma (7/50, 8/50, 15/50, 10/50); renal tubule carcinomas were identified in two 1.25 mg/mL males and in one 2.5 mg/mL male. Renal tubule adenoma was identified in one 5 mg/mL male from the 15-month extended evaluation. In the standard and extended evaluations combined, there were dose-related increased incidences of hyperplasia and adenoma. The severity of nephropathy and the incidence and severity of transitional cell hyperplasia of the kidney were increased in exposed male and female rats. Linear foci of mineralization were present in the renal papilla of exposed males. 2-YEAR STUDY IN MICE: Groups of 60 male and 60 female B6C3F1 mice were given 0, 5, 10, or 20 mg/mL t -butyl alcohol in drinking water for 2 years. Exposure levels of 5, 10, or 20 mg/mL delivered average daily doses of approximately 540, 1,040, or 2,070 mg t -butyl alcohol/kg body weight to males and approximately 510, 1,020, or 2,110 mg/kg to females. Survival, Body Weights, and Water Consumption: Survival of 20 mg/mL males was significantly lower than that of the controls. The final mean body weights of exposed groups of males were similar to those of the controls. The mean body weights of females given 20 mg/mL were 10&percnt; to 15&percnt; lower than those of the controls from week 13 to the end of the study. Water consumption by exposed groups of males and females was similar to that by the controls. Pathology Findings: Incidences of thyroid gland follicular cell hyperplasia were significantly increased in all exposed groups of males and in 10 and 20 mg/mL females. The incidence of follicular cell adenoma or carcinoma (combined) was marginally increased in 10 mg/mL males (0 mg/mL, 1/60; 5 mg/mL, 0/59; 10 mg/mL, 4/59; 20 mg/mL, 2/57). The incidence of follicular cell adenoma was significantly increased in 20 mg/mL females (2/58, 3/60, 2/59, 9/59). The incidences of chronic inflammation and transitional epithelial hyperplasia of the urinary bladder were increased in 20 mg/mL males and to a lesser extent in 20 mg/mL females. GENETIC TOXICOLOGY: t -Butyl alcohol was tested for induction of genetic damage in vitro and in vivo, and all results were negative. In vitro, t -butyl alcohol was negative in Salmonella typhimurium and mouse lymphoma cell mutation tests, and it did not induce sister chromatid exchanges or chromosomal aberrations in cultured Chinese hamster ovary cells. These in vitro studies were conducted with and without metabolic activation (S9). In vivo, no increase in micronucleated erythrocytes was observed in peripheral blood samples from mice administered t -butyl alcohol in drinking water for 13 weeks. CONCLUSIONS: Under the conditions of these 2-year drinking water studies, there was some evidence of carcinogenic activity of t -butyl alcohol in male F344/N rats based on increased incidences of renal tubule adenoma or carcinoma (combined). There was no evidence of carcinogenic activity in female F344/N rats receiving 2.5, 5, or 10 mg/mL t -butyl alcohol. There was equivocal evidence of carcinogenic activity of t -butyl alcohol in male B6C3F1 mice based on the marginally increased incidences of follicular cell adenoma or carcinoma (combined) of the thyroid gland. There was some evidence of carcinogenic activity of t -butyl alcohol in female B6C3F1 mice based on increased incidences of follicular cell adenoma of the thyroid gland. Exposure to t -butyl alcohol was associated with mineralization and renal tubule hyperplasia in male rats, transitional epithelial hyperplasia and increased severity of nephropathy of the kidney in male and female rats, follicular cell hyperplasia of the thyroid gland in male and female mice, and chronic inflammation and hyperplasia of the urinary bladder in male mice and to a lesser extent in female mice. Synonyms: 2-Methyl-2-propanol, 2-methylpropan-2-ol, TBA, t -butanol, tertiary butyl alcohol, t -butyl hydroxide, trimethyl carbinol, trimethyl methanol 

16514376
Colonic pseudolipomatosis: clinical, endoscopical and pathological features in nine cases. 
Colonic pseudolipomatosis is a rare and benign condition. It is not well known by gastroenterologists and its pathogenesis is still unclear. METHODS: All cases of colonic pseudolipomatosis seen between February 2002 and June 2004 at the Amiens Universisty Hospital were identified and analyzed. RESULTS: During this period, 2099 colonoscopies were performed and 9 cases of colonic pseudolipomatosis were diagnosed (0.4%). Patients were all males aged from 41 to 67 (median age 52 years). They consulted for rectal bleeding (two patients), diarrhea (two patients) or abdominal pain (two patients). In three patients, colonic pseudolipomatosis was a fortuitous discovery during colonoscopy for polyp surveillance. The lesions presented as whitish and yellowish slightly elevated plaques ranging in size from a few millimeters to 4 cm. They extended over a two to 20 cm-long area, located in the right (two patients), transverse (four patients) or left colon (three patients). Microscopic examination showed empty spaces in the lamina propria measuring from 50 to 600 microm. They were negative for anti-CD31, CD34 and PS100 antibodies at immunohistochemistry and negative for Sudan black in three cases. The ultrastructural study showed in two cases round spaces containing small fibrillary protein-like deposits that might be lymph. CONCLUSION: Colonic pseudolipomatosis is rare. Its pathogenesis is not well-known but could be due to gas invasion or extravasation of lymph into lamina propria, maybe induced by mucosal lesions related to barotrauma or certain colonoscope cleaning solutions. 

15603590
Hierarchical structure and modules in the Escherichia coli transcriptional regulatory network revealed by a new top-down approach. 
BACKGROUND: Cellular functions are coordinately carried out by groups of genes forming functional modules. Identifying such modules in the transcriptional regulatory network (TRN) of organisms is important for understanding the structure and function of these fundamental cellular networks and essential for the emerging modular biology. So far, the global connectivity structure of TRN has not been well studied and consequently not applied for the identification of functional modules. Moreover, network motifs such as feed forward loop are recently proposed to be basic building blocks of TRN. However, their relationship to functional modules is not clear. RESULTS: In this work we proposed a top-down approach to identify modules in the TRN of E. coli. By studying the global connectivity structure of the regulatory network, we first revealed a five-layer hierarchical structure in which all the regulatory relationships are downward. Based on this regulatory hierarchy, we developed a new method to decompose the regulatory network into functional modules and to identify global regulators governing multiple modules. As a result, 10 global regulators and 39 modules were identified and shown to have well defined functions. We then investigated the distribution and composition of the two basic network motifs (feed forward loop and bi-fan motif) in the hierarchical structure of TRN. We found that most of these network motifs include global regulators, indicating that these motifs are not basic building blocks of modules since modules should not contain global regulators. CONCLUSION: The transcriptional regulatory network of E. coli possesses a multi-layer hierarchical modular structure without feedback regulation at transcription level. This hierarchical structure builds the basis for a new and simple decomposition method which is suitable for the identification of functional modules and global regulators in the transcriptional regulatory network of E. coli. Analysis of the distribution of feed forward loops and bi-fan motifs in the hierarchical structure suggests that these network motifs are not elementary building blocks of functional modules in the transcriptional regulatory network of E. coli. 

3097876
Effects of low subchronic doses of methoxychlor on the rat hypothalamic-pituitary reproductive axis. 
The pesticide methoxychlor (MXC) is known to possess a weak estrogenic action and has been found to have a number of toxic effects on the rodent reproductive system, primarily at the gonadal level. The purpose of this study was to explore the influence of MXC on the pituitary and hypothalamic components of the male reproductive system at dose levels that were without detectable testicular effects. At 21 days, male Long-Evans rats were gavaged daily with 25 or 50 mg/kg MXC in corn oil. Controls received vehicle only. After 8 weeks of dosing, no significant changes were seen in serum LH, FSH, or prolactin, nor in the pituitary concentrations of LH or FSH. Pituitary prolactin was elevated for both doses, and pituitary fragments perifused in vitro released more prolactin than did controls. The concentration of gonadotropin-releasing hormone (GnRH) was higher in the mediobasal hypothalamus, but only for the 50-mg/kg group. At this dose, there was a corresponding increase in the KCl-stimulated release of GnRH. The data suggest that previously reported reproductive effects of MXC may be mediated, at least in part, through an elevation in prolactin concentration and release, which in turn is able to influence hypothalamic levels of GnRH. This prolactinemic effect may well represent an early component of the adverse action of MXC on the reproductive system. 

4013623
[Environmental effects on the immune system] 
Functions of humoral and cellular immunity indicate sensitively stimulating and suppressing influences from environment, as poisoning agents, stress and interactions of human behaviour. Examples are shown. 

10939949
Ecology. The value of nature and the nature of value. 
Ecosystems are capital assets: When properly managed, they yield a flow of vital goods and services. Relative to other forms of capital, however, ecosystems are poorly understood, scarcely monitored, and--in many important cases--undergoing rapid degradation. The process of economic valuation could greatly improve stewardship. This potential is now being realized with innovative financial instruments and institutional arrangements. 

15367677
FANCG is phosphorylated at serines 383 and 387 during mitosis. 
Fanconi anemia (FA) is an autosomal recessive disease marked by congenital defects, bone marrow failure, and high incidence of leukemia and solid tumors. Eight genes have been cloned, with the accompanying protein products participating in at least two complexes, which appear to be functionally dependent upon one another. Previous studies have described chromatin localization of the FA core complex, except at mitosis, which is associated with phosphorylation of the FANCG protein (F. Qiao, A. Moss, and G. M. Kupfer, J. Biol. Chem. 276:23391-23396, 2001). The phosphorylation of FANCG at serine 7 by using mass spectrometry was previously mapped. The purpose of this study was to map the phosphorylation sites of FANCG at mitosis and to assess their functional importance. Reasoning that a potential kinase might be cdc2, which was previously reported to bind to FANCC, we showed that cdc2 chiefly phosphorylated a 14-kDa fragment of the C-terminal half of FANCG. Mass spectrometry analysis demonstrated that this fragment contains amino acids 374 to 504. Kinase motif analysis demonstrated that three amino acids in this fragment were leading candidates for phosphorylation. By using PCR-directed in vitro mutagenesis we mutated S383, S387, and T487 to alanine. Mutation of S383 and S387 abolished the phosphorylation of FANCG at mitosis. These results were confirmed by use of phosphospecific antibodies directed against phosphoserine 383 and phosphoserine 387. Furthermore, the ability to correct FA-G mutant cells of human or hamster (where S383 and S387 are conserved) origin was also impaired by these mutations, demonstrating the functional importance of these amino acids. S387A mutant abolished FANCG fusion protein phosphorylation by cdc2. The FA pathway, of which FANCG is a part, is highly regulated by a series of phosphorylation steps that are important to its overall function. 

